Moreover, thus thoroughly knowledgeable about meaning, thoroughly knowledgeable about the teaching, cultivates twelve ideations for the generation of all supernatural faculties. 
The twelve ideations are as follows: 
The ideation of lightness is that by means of which becomes convinced of his own body being light as a tūlacotton tuft or a karpāsacotton tuft in the whirlwind. 
Namely, from the bed to the stool, from the stool to the bed, in the samē way, ffom the bed to the grassseat, from the grassseat to the bed. 
e:r The ideation of softness is that by means of which becomes convinced of body being soft like silk or raw silk or woven silk. 
Ṛ This ideation of softness thus is nourishing and facilitating for the ideation of lightness in such a way that being faciliated by it, the ideation of lightness becomes extensive, developed, and abundant. 
Ideation of the space realm The ideation of the space realm is the ideation by means of which becomes convinced of the lightness and softness of his own body. 
The ideation of the mindbody fusion is that by means of which the mind is fused into the body or the body into the mind, due to which his body becomes lighter, softer, more malleable, brighter, obedient to the mind, comnected to the mind, operates depending upon the mind. 
The ideation of conviction is the ideation by means of which becomes convinced that what is remote is near, what is near is remote, what is subtle is coarse, what is coarse is subtle, earth is water, water is earth. 
having been one, he manifests himself magical creations; then, having manifested himself as many, becomes one, to wit, by means of the ideation of conviction which makes the creations disappear; with body, pass unhindered through walls, mountains, ramparts; emerges from and plunges into the ground as if into water; he walks on water without sinking as if on ground; ascends into the sky crosslegged as if a winged bird; or rubs strokes with hand the Sun the Moon, have such great majesty potence; wields power with body up to Brahmas World. 
does all this by means of the ideation of conviction assisted by the ideations of lightness, softness, space realm, mindbody fusion should be understood in due order. 
four elements and a part of the derived matter beneath Brahmas World by means of conviction according to wish. 
and noises of different kinds The ideation of sound combinations and noises of different kinds consists in the cultivation of ideation after having grasped the characteristic of what noise arises, mixed divers, of various groups of people sitting meeting together in a village or a town or a guild or a townsmens assembly or gathering or a spacious house or an inner chamber or the noise of a flowing river. 
By means of this , keeps thought, towards sounds noble ignoble, divine human, remote human, whether they are remote or near. 
The ideation of the visible characteristic of light : 
having grasped the characteristic of light as previous, directs aṭtention to this very characteristic. 
And having grasped the characteristic from a variety of sentient beings, directs attention to this very characteristic by distinguishing between the performace of wholesome unwholesome acts, etc. 
This is the ideation of the visible characteristic of light. 
Due to the cultivation of this , pure divine eye in full detail up to after the destruction of the body are born in a good destination, a heavenly world, amongst deities. 
determined by defilements The ideation of the specific changes in physical appearance determined by defilements is that by means of which observes ascertains the peculiar physical condition of the sentient beings: 
Such is the peculiar physical condition, the specific change in the physical appearance of one who is passioned, to wit, senses are agitated, senses are excited, has a smiling face. 
Such is the peculiar physical condition, the specific change in the physical appearance of one who is hateful, to wit, face is pale, speaks in convulsive utterances, has a frown. 
Due to the assiduous practice of this , there arises the knowledge of the others ways of thought the fruit of cultivation, through which employing mind, fully knows the mind, the rough thinking, the subtle thinking of other sentient beings, of other persons, as in reality. 
whatever thing transforms, whatever magical creation produces, of whatever becomes convinced by means of the noble miraculous power, it actually becomes so, not otherwise. 
And all the can fulfil function. 
It should be known that in such a way generates the five supernatural faculties by means of these twelve ideations, due to assiduous practice according to what is suitable in each case, and according to what is suitable in each case the noble qualities not in common with ordinary people. 
in accordance with the meditation level1 intermediately, intensely, is accordingly born in the community intermediately, intensely, is accordingly porn in the commnunity of the Small Light deities, of the Boundless Light , and of the Radiant Brightness intermediately, intensely, is accordingly ḷborn in the community of the Small Splendour deities, of the Boundless Splendour , and of the Splendid Perfection. 
intermediately, intensely, is accordingly born in the community of the Unclouded deities, of the MeritAbundance , and of the Great Reward. 
If, furthermore, a NonReturner practises the contaminated has practised this , slightly, intermediately, intensely, more intensely most intensely, is accordingly born in the community of the deities of the five Pure Abodes, to wit, amongst the NotProsperous ones, the Untormented ones, the GoodLooking ones, the GoodAppearing Ones, the Highest Ones. 
of space, of consciousness, of nothing whatsoever, of neither ideation nor nonideation slightly, intermediately intensely, is space, of consciousness, of nothing whatsoever, of neither ideation nor nonideation. 
And these deities are immaterial, there exists, therefore, no difference caused by dissimilarity in the place, but there is community of the deities beings without ideation. 
detached from sensual pleasures What are the characteristics of one who is detached from sensual pleasures? 
He has calm bodily actions, immovable senses, and his position does not quickly come to an end. 
Having seen with eyes visible objects, he perceives visible objects does not experience passion for visible objects. 
And he is fearless, has profound understanding, is possessed of an allembracing ease in mind and body, is uncovetous, not agitated, patient, and no thoughts sensual pleasures, etc. 
The characteristics of one who is detached from sensual pleasures should thus be known as such features. 

At one time, the five qualities of Sakra, Lord of the Gods, left him. He knew that his life would end and that he would descend to be born in the world, conceived in the womb of an ass in a pottery. 
What do they say are the five qualities? 
First, the light about the person is extinguished. Second, the flowers above the head wither. Third, one wants to leave one’s seat. Fourth, the perspiration un­ der the armpits is strong-smelling. 
Fifth, defilement sticks to the body. Because of these five things he knew that his merit had ended, and he felt utterly dejected. 
He recalled that only the Buddha might save people from their hardship in the three realms, so he hastened to where the Buddha dwelled. 
At that time the Buddha was sitting in meditation in a cave on Mount Grdhrakuta, having entered the samadhi of universal rescue. 
When the Lord of the Gods saw the Buddha, he kowtowed, did obeisance, and prostrated himself and earnestly took the triple refuge: in the Buddha, in his D octrine , and in his Community . Before he could stand up, his life suddenly ended. He then arrived in a pottery, as the young in the belly of a she-ass. 
The ass then pulled herself loose and ran around in the pottery, breaking the earthenware. Her owner beat her and as a result injured her pregnant womb. Sakra’s spirit immediately returned to his old body. Endowed anew with the five qualities, he was the Lord of the Gods again. 
The Buddha awoke from his samadhi and he said in praise: “Excellent it is, Lord of the Gods, when you can take refuge in the Three Honorable Things (the Buddha, Dharma, and Sangha) when you are about to die. When the retribution for your evil is over, you will not suffer again. 
” Then the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: nature to arise and to pass away. When they have come into being, they suddenly pass away. Their allayment means happiness. 
diluted earth, it will all break. It is the same with a man’s life. 
When Lord Sakra heard the stanzas, he knew that impermanence was inevitable. He recognized that evil and merit change, he un­ derstood that arising and passing away are fundamental, and he followed the path of tranquility. He acknowledged this with joy and attained the path of the stream-enterer . 
The Buddha once was in a pure abode in the land of SravastI and expounded the Doctrine to gods, men, dragons, and demons. 
The queen mother of Prasenajit, the ruler of the land, was more than ninety years old then, and she suddenly fell seriously ill. Medici­ nal herbs did not make her better, and so she died. 
The king and the ministers of the land held a funeral according to the rules. They moved her spirit to a grave. 
When the funeral was over, they passed by the Buddha on their way back. They took off their garments, removed their stockings, and did a deep obeisance in front of the Buddha. 
The Buddha told them to sit down, and he asked them: “The clothes are coarse where you come from, 0 King, and they look different. 
Why this behavior?” The king kowtowed and said: “The queen mother of the land was more than ninety years old when she recently fell seriously ill. She soon passed away. We have escorted her spirit and her coffin to her grave. 
We are just now on our way back, and while passing by we visit you, O Noble Reverend.” The Buddha informed the king: “From of old to this day there have been four great fears: to be born and grow old and wither; to lose one’s spiritual brightness through illness; to lose the spirit after death; and to be separated from one’s loved ones. These are said to be the four. 
They do not give man any fixed time. As all things are impermanent, it is difficult to achieve per­ manence. Everything passes in a day. Man’s life is like that. 
As the five rivers ceaselessly flow day and night, just so is the rapid passing of man’s life.” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanza: return, so is man’s life. Those who are gone do not return. 
The Buddha informed the great king that this applies to the whole world. “None stays long. All must die and none escapes death. 
The kings of the past, the Buddhas and the saints, the seers with the five superknowledges, they have all gone too. None could stay. It is useless to grieve for any harm that befalls the body. 
If one mourns the deceased as a pious son, one performs merits and one does what is meritorious. 
One is followed by the merits as provisions someone on a long journey.” When the Buddha had said this, the king and his ministers all rejoiced. They forgot their sorrow and gave up suffering. All who had come attained the Path. 
Once the Buddha was in the Venuvana in Rajagrha. He entered the city with his disciples. After he had ex­ pounded the Doctrine upon request, he left the city in the afternoon. 
On his way, he met someone driving a big herd of well-fed cows back to the city. Bobbing up and down and twisting, they bumped into each other. 
Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: cattle to the pasture to feed them, that would be like old age-death. They also sustain life. 
and thousands of people who amass possessions; yet all will perish. 
When the Buddha arrived in the Bamboo Garden, he washed his feet, stepped back, and sat down. Ananda came forward, kowtowed, and asked: 
“0 World-honored One, a while ago you expounded on these three stanzas along the way. I still do not know their mean­ ing. 
“Did you see a man driving a herd of cattle?” “Yes, I saw him.” The Buddha informed Ananda: “The herd of this butcher used to number a thousand head. Every day the butcher sent some­ one out of the city to look for fine water and grass, feeding them so that they would become fat and tall. Every day he would pick out the fat ones, lead them away, and have them killed. 
After he had killed more than half of them, the remaining ones still did not take any notice. They just kept bumping into each other, bobbed up and down, and mooed. 
“ But why only these cattle? 
The same applies to people. 
Counting on their selves, they do not know about impermanence. They nourish themselves in a gluttonous way with the five objects of desire. Cheerfully and utterly gratified, they then destroy each other. Because of imper­ manence, retribution for their past is suddenly upon them when they do not expect it. 
Is this any different?” Among those who were sitting there at the time, there were two hundred monks who coveted honors. Hearing the Doctrine and having encouraged themselves, they achieved the six superknowledges and became arhats. 
All those who were seated there felt compassion and joy, and they did obeisance to the Buddha. 
Once the Buddha was in Sravasti, in the Anathapindada Grove in the Jetavana, expounding the Doctrine to his disciples. 
She was fourteen or fifteen years old, beautiful and clever of speech. Her father loved her very much. She suddenly fell seriously ill and died immediately. It was as though there were ripe wheat in the field that was consumed by fire. 
He heard people say that the Buddha was a great sage, and that as a teacher of gods and men he expounded the path of the scriptural texts, making them forget their sorrow and doing away with their suffering. 
Please, World-honored One, have pity on me and instruct me! 
” The Buddha informed the brahman thusly: “There are four things in the world that cannot last long. 
What are these four? 
What is constant will certainly be impermanent; wealth will certainly become poverty; meeting will certainly become separation; the strong will certainly die.” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanza: nevertheless come down. Any coming together implies separation. The living will die. 
When the brahman heard the stanza, his mind suddenly opened up and he wished to become a monk. As his beard and his hair fell off of themselves, he became a monk. Again reflecting upon the nature of impermanence, he entered the path of an arhat. 
Once the Buddha was on Mount Grdhrakuta in Rajagrha. 
At that time there was a luscious lady in the city. She was called Padma. Her beauty was unparalleled in the land. High officials and young people all sought her company and held her in high esteem. 
I should follow the times and enjoy my personal passion!” With this in mind, she returned. 
But the Buddha knew that Padma should be saved. He changed into a woman, a paragon of beauty, excelling even Padma tens of thou­ sands of times. Seeking Padma out, she came toward her. 
So she asked the transformed person where she came from, where her husband and children, her father and brothers all were, whether at home or away, and why she was walking all alone, without any attendants. 
The transformed person replied: “I come from town and I want to return home. Although I do not know you, it would be nice to re­ turn together. Shall we both rest and talk at the spring?” Padma agreed, and they both went back to the spring together. 
If this is the case even for this person, how could I be preserved for a long time? 
I must go to the Buddha and zealously apply myself to the Path!” She then went to the Buddha and prostrated herself. Having done obeisance, she explained everything she had seen to the Buddha. 
The Buddha informed Padma: “Man has four things on which he cannot de­ pend. 
Which four? 
dripping and smelly! It is worn out by illness and suffers the calamities of old age-death. increases. 
One does not see the changes, but life is imper­ manent. 
Oppressed by death, one does not have any relative on whom to rely. 
Indeed, having the quality of the Path, nirvana is eternal happiness. 
The Buddha said: “Excellent! 
” Her hair fell off and she became a nun. She cultivated right contemplation and became an arhat. 
When all who were sitting there had heard the Buddha’s explanation, there was none who was not happy. 
Once the Buddha was in the city of Rajagrha, expounding the Doctrine in the Venuvana . 
Seven days later, each one’s life would end. They talked it over among themselves and said: “ There is nothing we cannot do with the power of our five superknowledges: reversing heaven and earth, stopping the sun and moon, moving mountains, and stopping cur­ rents. 
How can we not escape from this retribution of death?” One said: “I shall enter the ocean. Invisible from above and not on the bottom underneath, I shall stay right in the middle. How could the murderous demon of impermanence know my whereabouts?” Another said: 
“I shall enter Mount Sumeru and close its surface again so that I shall never be visible. How could the murderous demon of impermanence know my whereabouts?” An­ other said: 
How would the murderous demon of impermanence know my whereabouts?” An­ other said: 
“We calculate that we have seven days left to live. We want to flee for our lives now, and we hope we will be able to escape. After our return we shall personally visit you. 
” Thereupon they parted and each went to his own place. 
When the period of seven days was over, the life of each one ended, like fruit that is ripe and falls. 
The market supervisor informed the king that there was a brahman who had suddenly died in the market. 
The king understood and said: “ The four men were going to escape from their retribution. One is already dead. 
I wonder if they can still avoid it?” The Buddha said to the great king that human beings have four things from which they cannot escape. 
What are the four? 
being in an intermediate state one cannot but experience birth. 
Second: being born one cannot but experience old age. 
having grown old one cannot but experience illness. 
Fourth: being ill one cannot but experience death. 
Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: mountain cave, is there a place on earth where one might escape and not experience death. 
bring about what is right! People fret about this and they go through the sorrows of old age and death. the end of birth. 
O monks, reject Mara’s soldiers and be delivered from the birth and death cycle! 
When the king heard the Buddha’s words, he said in admiration: 
“Excellent! This is truly in accord with your teaching, O Rever­ end! The four men were going to escape from their retribution, but one has already died. 
The same will happen to the others, sharing their fate!” Among the ministers and officials there was none who did not have faith. 
Training Once the Buddha was in the land of Sravasti, in the pure abode of the Jetavana. 
The Buddha informed the monks: “Diligently culti­ vate the Path and avoid the rise of any hindrance! When your mind is clear and your spirit is concentrated, you can escape any suffering.” There was a monk whose determination was not fully clear. 
Having eaten his fill he went to his room, closed the door, and quietly went to sleep. Fond of his own self and light in mind, he could not contemplate impermanence. Because he was dull and lazy, day or night meant nothing to him anymore. 
After seven days his life would surely end. The Buddha had pity on him. He feared that he would fall into an evil path. So he entered the monk’s room, snapped his fingers to wake him up, and said: 
oyster, or worm, you are covered with impurity. In your delusion you assume you are a person. with ailments. 
Meeting with any hardship, all you do is resort to sleep. 
apply yourself to a path of benevolence! As a result you will not know sorrow. Always keep it in mind to extin­ guish your intentions! them stands out brightly in the world. 
The merit he produces is thousandfold, and he will never fall into an evil path. 
When the monk heard the stanzas, he immediately woke up, startled. Seeing that the Buddha himself was admonishing him, his respect increased and he gasped with fright. So he rose, kowtowed, and did obeisance to the Buddha. 
The Buddha said to the monk: “Would it be that you know your former lives?” The monk answered: “I am beset by hindrances. 
“Once in the time of the Buddha Vipasyin, you went forth, but you coveted personal honors and you were not mindful of the disciplinary prescriptions in the scrip­ tural texts. Having eaten to the full you withdrew to sleep, not mindful of impermanence. Your life ended and you were reborn among gadflies. You accumulated fifty thousand years and your life ended. 
You later became a conch and an oyster, and a worm in a tree, for fifty thousand years each. 
These four kinds of insects live in lasting obscurity. They are egoistic and long for life. They like to stay in seclusion. Obscurity is their home, and they do not see any light. 
Waking up follows after a sleeping time of a hun­ dred years. You were bound in the net of evil and did not seek that which was essential to leave it. 
Why do you not get enough of sleeping?” Thereupon the monk again heard about his previous causality, and he felt mortified and reproved himself. The clouds of the five hindrances dissipated, and he immediately attained arhatship. 
Once the Buddha was in the land of SravastI, in the Anathapindada Grove in the Jetavana, together with gods and men, expounding the Doctrine with the four classes . 
While meditating he thought, “It is my penis. 
He returned to his quarters, shut the door, and took off his clothes. He sat down upon a wooden board with the intention of chopping off his penis. “Just because of this penis I am made to suffer, passing through the birth and death cycle for countless eons. The three depraved destinations and the six crea­ tures all result from lust. 
If I do not cut this off, I shall not have any way of obtaining the Path.” The Buddha knew what was on his mind and how foolish he was. “ The Path results from restraining the thoughts. Thoughts are the foundation. Ig­ norant of his mortality he hurts himself. 
” The monk greeted the Buddha and stated: “I have been applying myself to the Path for a long time, but I do not understand the way of the Doctrine yet. Every time I sit in meditation I am steeped in desire just when I am about to obtain the Path. My virility is so potent that I am confused and remain in darkness. 
That is why I borrowed a hatchet, wanting to do away with it.” The Buddha informed the monk: “How foolish you are! You do not understand the principle. 
If one wants to seek the Path, one must first eliminate one’s foolishness and then control one’s thoughts! Thoughts are the basis of good and evil. 
If you want to do away with your roots, you must first of all control your thoughts. 
When your thoughts are calmed and your mind clear, you will obtain the Path.” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanza: his mother, if he guides the ruler’s two ministers, and if he gives up all attendants, he is a superior man of the Path. 
The Buddha informed the monk: “Delusion is the basis of the twelve causes . Delusion is the source of all evil. 
Only when you have first elimi­ nated delusion will your mind be settled.” After the Buddha had said this, the monk was ashamed, and so he reproved himself and said: “Ever since I was misled by my foolishness, I have never un­ derstood the old scriptures, so that I am like this! 
Your explana­ tion just now, O Buddha, is truly w onderful!” He internally considered right concentration and breathing while counting . Guarding his mind and restraining his thoughts, he subdued his affections and shut out all desire, and so his mind was settled. 
Once the Buddha was on Mount Grdhraküta in the land of Ràjagrha, explaining the doctrine of immortality to gods and men, to the king and his high officials. 
There was one monk who was willful and reckless. The Buddha knew how he was and sent him to a valley of spirits in the mountains. He had him sit down under a tree to count his breaths and practice concentration. Knowing the length and brevity of the breaths, ânâpâna (breath­ ing exercise) guards the mind. 
There are only demons who frequently come to frighten people.” While he was thinking in this way and before he went back, the World-honored One went to his side. He sat down under a tree and asked himYou are alone here. Aren’t you afraid?” The monk kowtowed and said: 
“I have never been in the mountains before. I was really worried here.” After a while there was a wild elephant king who came by. He lay down against a tree, happy all by himself, [think­ ing “ How pleasant to be away from the other elephants!” The Buddha knew what was on the elephant’s mind, and he said to the monk: 
“Would you know where this elephant comes from ?” He replied: 
“I do not know.” The Buddha informed the monk: “ The size of this elephant’s herd is more than five hundred head. Wea­ ried by the small elephants, he left them and came here. Lying down against a tree, he is thinking how pleasing it is to have left the prison of love. 
An elephant may be an animal, but he thinks about a solitary abode. How much more must you leave your fam­ ily and seek salvation! But in fact, because of your loneliness, you seek companionship! 
One is often hurt by foolish companions. One who stays alone has no antagonists and is free from schem­ ing. It is better to develop the Path all alone. 
There is no need for a foolish companion.” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: good friend, one had better safeguard one’s own good conduct rather than associate with a fool! 
living, why would one need the doings of a companion? 
Be virtuous on your own and free from grief, like the elephant in the open wilderness. 
When the Buddha expounded this, the monk understood. He in­ ternally considered the noble teaching and became an arhat. 
The spirits in the valley all understood too, and became the Buddha’s disciples. They accepted the precepts and did not frighten people any more. 
The Buddha returned to the pure abode together with the monks. 
Once the Buddha was in the land of Sravasti, in the pure abode of the Jetavana, expounding the scriptural Doctrine to gods and men. 
In the land of Rajagrha there were two novice monks who wanted to meet the Buddha. 
Between the two countries, however, there was a desert without any people. At that time, there was a drought and the springs were dry. The two monks were starving and thirsty, gasping feverishly. In an old spring they found plenty of water, but tiny insects made it impossible for them to drink it. 
We did not imagine that we would die here today.” One said: “Let us drink some water to save our lives. When we go and see the Buddha, how will he know the circumstances?” The other responded: 
However, one should keep the precepts and die rather than violate the precepts and live.” So the first one stood up, quickly drank with utmost eagerness, and then continued on his way. 
The other one did not drink and consequently brought about his own death, but he was immediately reborn in the Trayastrimsa heaven. After consideration and self-examination, he knew that in his previous life he had kept and not violated the precepts. 
“As I am reborn here now, truly a meritorious retribu­ tion is not far off!” . 
Holding fragrant flowers, he de­ scended to the Buddha. He greeted the Buddha, stepped back, and stood aside. 
The one who had drunk some water arrived a few days later, exhausted by the journey. He saw that the Buddha’s spiritual qualities were utterly venerable and imposing. He kow­ towed, and having greeted him he stated with tears in his eyes: “My one companion has died yonder. 
I want you, O Buddha, to know that.” The Buddha said: 
“I already know.” The Buddha pointed with his finger and said, “Well, this heavenly person was your companion. He kept the pre­ cepts intact, was reborn in heaven, and arrived here first! 
” There­ upon the World-honored One bared his breast and showed it to him. “You see my appearance, but you do not keep my precepts. Even though you may say that you see me, I do not see you. 
That person who has followed the precepts of the scriptures, though ten thousand miles away from me, is here before my eyes. 
” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: keeps the precepts and does not break them, he is praised in both worlds. His wishes will be fulfilled. 
not completely keep the precepts, he experiences suffering in both worlds. His wishes will not be fulfilled. to the learned and, dwelling in the truth, he understands the meaningful. 
Then, when the monk heard the stanzas, he felt mortified and kowtowed. He repented his error and silently thought about what he had done. 
When the heavenly person heard the stanzas, his mind was pleased and he obtained the eye of the Doctrine. There was none in the crowd of gods and men who did not follow [the instructions]. 
The Very Learned Once there was a poor family in the land of Sravasti. Husband and wife were stingy and they did not believe in the virtue of the Path. The Buddha felt pity for their foolishness. Looking like a poor ascetic, he went to their gate to beg for food. 
The husband was not in at the time, but his wife scolded him beyond reason. 
The ascetic said to her: “I am a man of the Path and I live on alms. 
You do not have to scold me; I am just looking forward to some food!” The master’s wife said: “If you stood there dying, you still would not get any food! How much less so if you want my food now that you are healthy. 
You had bet­ ter go away at once!” The ascetic then kept standing in front of her. He stared, gave his last breath, and appeared to be dead. His body was swollen and out of his nose and mouth came worms. His belly burst and his bowels were in a state of decomposition and impurities flowed forth. 
When the wife saw him, she was alarmed and lost her voice. She ran away and left him. 
Thereupon the man of the Path was suddenly gone. Some miles away from her home, she sat down underneath a tree to rest. 
The husband met his wife while he was on his way back home, and he wondered why she was afraid. 
The wife told him that there was this ascetic whose appearance terrified her. Upon seeing him she was so afraid. 
The husband became angry and asked where the ascetic might be. 
“He is gone, but I think he is not yet far away.” The husband took his bow and girded on his sword. Looking for tracks, he went after the ascetic. Flexing his bow and with drawn sword, he ran straight ahead with the intention of chopping down the man of the Path. 
The man of the Path then magically created a wall of lapis lazuli and surrounded himself with it. The husband ran several times along the wall, but could not get through. So he asked the man of the Path why he did not open the gate. 
The man of the Path replied: “If you want me to open the gate, throw away your bow and sword!” The husband thought to himself: “I must follow his words. 
“I have thrown away my bow and sword. 
Why doesn’t the gate open?” The man of the Path said: 
“I want you to throw away the bow and sword stem­ ming from the evil intentions in your mind! 
“ The man of the Path is a supernaturally noble one who knows my thoughts.” He immedi­ ately kowtowed and repented his mistake. 
“I have a wicked wife who does not recognize a man of truth. She is the instigator of my wickedness. Please have compassion and do not abandon us now! I would like you to exhort her to train in the Path.” So he stood up and went back to his wife, who asked him: 
“Where is the ascetic?” Her husband gave a full explanation of his miraculous power and replied, “He is back there now. You should reform yourself by extinguishing your evil. 
Which qualities of the Path did you practice to bring about such wondrous excellence?” The man of the Path answered: “My extensive learning is insa­ tiable and I unremittingly follow the Doctrine. 
because of these one opens the Path and brings about nirvana.” Thereupon the man of the Path spoke the stanzas: pursues the Dharma, one becomes like a hard wall; one’s zeal then does not break down. 
At that point morality and wisdom are accomplished. wisdom increases. As wisdom sets in, one widely under­ stands the essence of things. 
Perceiving the essences, one is happy following the Dharma. tion, promote joyfulness. Explaining the law of immortal­ ity well, one brings about the gaining of nirvana. 
He who as a result of his learning rejects what is improper arrives at the state of immortality. 
When the man of the Path had spoken the stanzas, he showed the bright appearance of the Buddha. His ample radiance was glori­ ous, illuminating heaven and earth. 
The husband and wife were frightened and their spirits were terrified. They abandoned their evils and cleansed their thoughts, beating their heads on the ground. 
Once the Buddha was in the pure abode of Ghosila in Kausambi, together with the four classes, explaining the great Dharma. 
One day he was walking in the marketplace carrying a torch, and someone asked him: “Why are you walking with a torch in your hand in the daytime?” The brahman answered: 
“ The people in this world are blind. They do not see anything; so I carry a torch in order to illu­ minate them. 
The Buddha knew that the brahman should be saved because of his previous merits. Still, his behavior was haughty, seeking dominance and fame. He did not take imperma­ nence into account. His self-conceit and arrogance were such that he would fall into the hell of Mount T’ai for countless eons and to escape it would be very difficult. 
So the Buddha trans­ formed himself into a worthy and sat down in the marketplace. Then he asked the brahman why he was acting in this way. 
The brahman replied: “Because people are in darkness and cannot dis­ tinguish clearly between night and day, I illuminate them with the flame of my torch.” The worthy again asked the brahman: 
“Among the scriptural texts are the four Vedas. Do you know their essential teachings?” He replied: “I have no clear idea. 
What are their four essential teachings? 
“One, harmoni­ zation of the four seasons through knowledge of astronomy and geography. Two, distinction of the five elements through knowl­ edge of the constellations. Three, being able to pacify the country through knowledge o f government. Four, unfailing firmness through knowledge of military affairs. 
Don’t you possess these teachings of the four Vedas?” The brahman was ashamed. 
He threw away his torch and crossed his hands. His thoughts were not up to it. 
The Buddha knew what was on his mind, and transformed himself back into his own self. His light shone brightly on both heaven and earth. With a divine voice he then spoke this stanza to the brahman: great as to be arrogant toward others, then the one who holds the torch is the blind one. 
After the Buddha had spoken the stanza, he said to the brahman: “No one is in more complete darkness than you, but you have en­ tered a great country with a torch in your hand during the daytime. 
He immediately kowtowed and wished to be his disciple. 
The Buddha accepted him and let him become an ascetic. His thoughts were resolved, his foolishness ended, and he became an arhat. 
Once there was an important elder in the land of Sravasti. His name was Sudatta and he had obtained the status of a streamenterer. 
He had a friend, an elder called Hao-shih, who did not believe in the Buddha’s path or in any therapeutic technique. He happened one day to fall seriously ill. Failing in energy, he had to keep to his bed. 
His relatives and friends all went to ask how he was. They insisted that he seek treatment, but he would not agree at all. 
He replied to everyone: “I have served the sun and moon and been loyal and pious toward the ruler and my father. Even if my life were to end here, I shall never change my mind. 
Sudatta said to him: “The teacher I serve is called the Buddha. His divine qualities spread far and wide. Those who see him gain good for­ tune. 
Be­ cause your illness will last and will not get better soon, I insist that you invite the Buddha, and I hope you will receive his good fortune.” As the day was auspicious, Hao-shih “You may invite the Buddha and his disciples for me.” Sudatta immediately invited the Buddha and his Sangha. 
As he went to the elder’s home, the Buddha emitted a bright light that penetrated everywhere. When the elder saw the light, he felt happy and relieved. 
The Buddha went to him and sat down. He asked the elder how his illness was, which spirits he had served before, and which therapy he had applied. 
Since my forefathers’ time we have followed these practices until we die.” The Buddha said to the elder: “When one is born into the world, there are three kinds of untimely death. To have a disease that does not heal is the first untimely death. To heal but not to be cautious is the second un­ timely death. 
Such illnesses cannot be done away with by the sun or the moon, by heaven or earth, or by serving forefathers, one’s ruler, or one’s father. It will be relieved in time through the path of knowledge. 
First, the temperature of the four elements requires healing herbs. Second, the evil demons of any heresy require the precepts of the scriptures. Third, serving the noble relieves misery, virtue affects the spirits, and merit helps beings. 
” Thereupon the Worldhonored One spoke the stanzas: one’s father out of gratitude. One serves one’s ruler because o f his power. One serves a man of the Path because of his learning. 
one leaves one’s companion in case of urgency. One looks on one’s wife when happy in the bedchamber. If one wants to know, knowledge lies in the discourses. 
that one may commend clear learning. He also cleanses the foundations of purity, ably maintaining the store­ house of the Doctrine. 
what is meaningful. With understanding, the precepts will not be broken. He who has received the Doctrine and maintains it will accordingly quickly achieve tranquility. away with ominous decay. 
If you wish to secure tranquil­ ity and prosperity, you must serve the learned. 
There were once vast mountains in the south o f the land of Rajaghra, two hundred miles away from the city. The roads to every country in the south passed through these mountains. 
They were treacherous and deep, and infested by five hundred bandits who robbed the people traveling through the passes. Afterwards the spoils were freely scattered about. The merchants were ru­ ined and the king’s way blocked. The king pursued the bandits to punish them, but he could not capture them. 
The Buddha was in the land then, and felt pity for the people, considering that those bandits did not know evil from good. “ The Tathagata is in the world, but their eyes do not see him. The drum of the Dharma is beaten every day, but their ears do not hear it. If I do not go to save them, they will fall like rocks into an abyss.” He changed into a man wearing splendid clothes. 
He rode a horse and had a sword on his waist and a bow and arrows in his hands. His saddle and bridle were decorated, adorned with gold and silver, and he let bright moon-pearls hang down from his horse. Making music on horseback, he went into the mountains. 
When bandits saw him, they thought the job was as good as done. They had been bandits for many years but had not yet had such an opportunity as this. Would this be any different from throwing eggs at a rock? 
The whole band of bandits got together and surrounded the trav­ eler. They pulled their bows and drew their swords. 
While they were arguing about which one would strip him clean, the trans­ formed person raised his bow and shot once, with the result that the five hundred bandits were all hit by arrows. He pointed at them with his sword and all of them were wounded. Their wounds were serious, the arrows struck deep, and they all fell down. 
All five hundred bandits lay twisting on the ground. They kowtowed and submitted. “What spirit are you, that you have such super­ natural powers? 
Please, quickly pull out the arrows so that the wounds may heal! 
Our wounds now hurt unbearably.” The transformed person answered: “ These wounds do not hurt. The arrows are not deep. No wound is more serious in the world than sorrow. 
There is no injury worse than foolishness. So long as you cherish the sorrows of greed and injurious thoughts, your sword wounds and poisonous arrow wounds can never heal. 
The roots of these two things are much deeper. The valiant and the strong cannot pull them out. 
Only when one possesses the moral pre­ scripts of the scriptures and becomes learned in the meaningful­ ness of wisdom, can this path of insight cure mental diseases. These prescripts remove sorrowful craving, foolishness, and haughtiness. They suppress violence, luxury, and covetousness. 
darkness obtains a candle. It leads people in the world, just as someone who sees leads those who do not see. 
pride and the joy of luxury, who applies himself and serves the learned, he is called the one who has accumu­ lated virtues. 
When the five hundred men saw the Buddha’s shining appearance and had also heard these stanzas, they kowtowed and took refuge in him. They subdued their thoughts and repented. Meanwhile, the sword’s wounds and poisonous arrows were removed by themselves. They were happy and their minds opened up to accept the five pre­ cepts. 
Earnest Faith There was once a big river southeast of the city of Sravasti. Its waters were deep and wide. More than five hundred families lived along its banks. They had not yet heard about the qualities of the Path or the way of salvation from the worldly. 
The Worldhonored One constantly thought he should go there to save those among them who should be saved. He knew that these families should be saved by their merits. Thereupon the World-honored One went to the riverbank and sat down under a tree. 
When the villagers saw the Buddha’s bright appearance, they found it ex­ traordinary, and there was none who was not impressed. They all went to pay their respects. Some saluted and some bowed, asking how he was. 
The Buddha told them to sit down, and he expounded the Doctrine of the scriptural texts. The crowd heard it, but they did not believe in it because they were used to fraud and were skep­ tical of any true words. 
The Buddha then magically caused some­ one to appear, coming from the south of the river. Walking on the water, just wet to his ankles, he came to the Buddha. He kow­ towed and greeted the Buddha. 
When the crowd saw this, there was none who was not astonished. They asked the transformed person: “From the time of our ancestors we have lived on these shores, yet we have never heard of anyone walking on water. Who are you, sir? 
What kind of magic do you have that you are able to tread on water and not drown? 
Please explain it to us.” The transformed person answered: “I am a foolish person from south of the river. When I heard that the Buddha was here, I wanted to enjoy the virtues of the Path, but when I arrived at the southern shore, I could not cross in time. 
I asked someone on the shore whether the water was deep or shallow. He said: 
T he water may reach up to your ankles. Why do you not wade across?’ I trusted his words and just crossed over like that. 
” The Buddha then said in praise: 
“Excel­ lent! Excellent! If you have faith, you may truly cross the abyss of birth and death. Why be astonished about walking across a river that is a few li w ide?” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: 
One who enjoys the unconditioned is delivered from any bond. 
engenders cessation. Through learning wisdom is ob­ tained. In what is attained there is clearness. 
When the villagers heard the Buddha’s exposition, their faith was realized. Their minds opened up and their faith was firm. They all received the five precepts and became people of pure faith. As their pure faith was developed, the teaching of the Doctrine was spread throughout the world. 
Long ago, when the Buddha was in the world, there was an impor­ tant elder called Hsiu-lo-t’o . His wealth was immea­ surable and he was devoutly attuned to the qualities of the Path. He had vowed that he would always invite the Buddha and his Sangha on the eighth day of the twelfth month, and that after his death his son and grandson would always honor the vow. 
When the elder was dying, he ordered his son not to abandon the prac­ tice. 
His son was called Pi-lo-t’o . Later he became poorer and poorer and had nothing in the house. When the twelfth month arrived, he had nothing to offer. He was sad and unhappy. 
The Buddha sent Maudgalyayana to go and ask Viradha: “The month of your father’s obligation is coming; what plans do you have?” Viradha answered: 
On the eighth day at noon he may radiate his brightness and have a closer look!” Maudgalyayana then returned and reported everything. 
Viradha then took his wife to his father-in-law to borrow a hundred taels of gold. 
On his returning home he provided for everything. The Buddha went to his house with one thousand two hundred fifty monks. When they had taken their seats, they passed the water around and ate. Having cleansed themselves, they returned to their pure abode. 
Viradha was glad and did not feel any contrition. On that day, in the middle of the night, precious objects replenished his storehouse, filling it as in the past. 
When Viradha and his wife saw this the next morning, they were glad but also afraid. They were afraid that officials might see the treasures and ask where they had come from. 
Husband and wife discussed the matter [and decided] that he should go and ask the Buddha. 
So he went to the Buddha and explained the whole situation. 
The Buddha told Viradha: “Put your mind at rest and feel free to use these trea­ sures! Do not be suspicious! By your devout conduct you did not offend against your father’s instructions. 
When a wise person can develop , no matter whether one is a man or a woman or where one’s place of birth is, a meritorious reward follows by itself.” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: 
one is a man or a woman, one is never poor. The wise know this to be true. 
When Viradha heard the Buddha’s explanation, his earnest faith increased. He kowtowed at the Buddha’s feet and returned home with joy. He made a complete analysis of the Buddha’s teaching and instructed his wife and children. They then carried it out and all attained the Path. 
Morality Long ago there were mountains in the land of Benares about forty or fifty li away from the city. Five ascetics lived in the mountains, applying themselves to the Path. 
At dawn they left the moun­ tains to beg for food. After they had eaten, they returned to the mountains, arriving at dusk. Going and returning was so very wearisome that they were not able to sit in meditation and de­ velop right concentration. For years it was like that and they could not obtain the Path. 
The Buddha felt compassion for their fruit­ less efforts. He changed into a man of the Path and went to them. He asked these men aspiring for the Path if it was not too hard to develop the Path dwelling in seclusion. 
It will be just like that all our lives.” The man of the Path said: “Well, he who considers the Path should take morality as its basis and mental restraint as its practice, but if you despise the body while valuing the truth, you will reject your corporal life. So sustain your body with food and guard your mind in right concentration! If you internally apply yourself to tranquility and insight, you will appease your mind and attain the Path. 
Please, men aspir­ ing for the Path, do not go tomorrow! I shall give you nourishment, so that you may rest one day.” So, the five ascetics were very happy, marveling at this wonder. 
With appeased thoughts and a settled mind, they did not worry about going to beg any more. 
At noon the next day the transformed man of the Path came to bring them food. After their meal they were content, their minds tranquil. Thereupon the transformed man expounded the stanzas: faculties. 
Knowing temperance in eating, he applies himself with an alert mind. proper concentration of mind. Internally practicing tran­ quility and insight, he is free from forgetfulness and has right knowledge. izes right knowledge. 
When he practices the Path accord­ ingly, he purifies himself and removes suffering. 
When the transformed man of the Path had spoken these stanzas, he manifested the bright characteristics of the Buddha’s body. Thereupon the five ascetics were spiritually moved. Grateful for his kindness, they kept the precepts and obtained arhatship. 
Mindfulness When the Buddha was once in the world, King Pukkasati and King Bimbisara were friends. 
Upon receiving them, King Bimbisara in turn presented them to the Buddha. He said to the Buddha: “King Pukkasati is a good friend of mine and he has sent me these flowers. I now present them to you, O Buddha. 
With what shall I respond to what he has sent m e?” The Buddha informed King Bimbisara: “Copy the scriptural text on the twelve causes and present it to him. 
Upon receiving the scriptural text, his mind is sure to turn to zealous devotion.” He then copied the scriptural text and added a letter, saying: “You sent me precious flowers. I now present you this bouquet of the Doctrine. Carefully reflect on its meaning! 
If one exam­ ines current customs, there is nothing to enjoy.” So he summoned his ministers, entrusted the state to the crown prince, shaved his head, and became an ascetic. Donning the robe of the Dharma and with alms bowl in hand, he went to a potter’s home outside the city of Rajagrha to spend the night. The following day he went to the city to beg, and after he had eaten he went to the Buddha to receive the precepts. 
The Buddha knew with supernatural knowl­ edge that Pukkasati’s life would end the following day at meal­ time and that he therefore should not come from so far away to meet with him. Furthermore, it would be a great pity if he did not hear the scriptures. Thereupon the World-honored One trans­ formed himself into an ascetic. He went to the potter and asked permission to spend the night. 
You may stay with him in the pottery there.” He took some straw, entered the pottery, and sat down to one side. 
“I have not met the Buddha yet. 
When I learned about the twelve causes, I became an ascetic. Tomorrow I shall enter the city and after my meal of alms food I shall go to meet the Buddha!” The transformed ascetic said: 
“Man’s life is hazardous, with changes occurring from morning till night. In its impermanence, the retribution of past deeds emerges all of a sud­ den, and not at any fixed time. Just observe your body as a coming together of the four great elements. It is the result of their combi­ nation as well as their dissipation, each returning to its origin. 
Develop an awakened mind characterized by emptiness, purity, and thoughtlessness. Be especially mindful of the three respectful doctrines and of giving and the quality of morality. To know impermanence is no different from meeting the Buddha. Your thinking of tomorrow is a profitless thought.” The transformed ascetic then spoke the stanzas: 
refuge in the Buddha, he must day and night constantly be mindful of the Buddha, his Dharma, and his Sangha. the disciples of the Buddha. 
mindful of morality and the virtue of giving! Day and night be mindful of emptiness, aimlessness, and signlessness. 
When the Buddha knew that the king understood, he manifested the splendor and auspicious luminous marks of his Buddha body. 
King Pukkasati was surprised and in rapture. 
The following day, when it was time to eat, King Pukkasati entered the city to beg for alms food. At the gate of the city, he encountered a cow that had just borne her young. Protecting her calf, she butted against King Pukkasati to kill him. 
The Buddha sent his disciples to cremate him and erect a stupa. 
“ It is impossible not to heed the basis of the retribution of evil.” Kindness Once the Buddha was in Rajagrha and mountains existed five hundred li away. In the mountains there was a family of one hun­ dred twenty-two members whose occupation was hunting in the marshes of the mountains. 
They wore furs and ate meat, and had never cultivated the land. 
With noble insight the Buddha knew that they could be saved. He went to the family and sat down under a tree. 
The men had gone off to hunt and only the women were there. When they saw the Buddha’s bright appear­ ance illuminating heaven and earth, and the trees and rocks in the mountains changing to gold, the young and old were ecstatic. Knowing that the Buddha was a supernatural person, they all went to pay their respects, brought offerings, and sat down. 
The Buddha explained to the mothers the wrong of killing living beings, the merit of practicing kindness, and that any affection between two persons is momentary and any union will soon end in parting. 
Upon hearing the scriptural text, the mothers rejoiced and said to the Buddha: “We mountain people are eager to take life in order to have meat to eat. We want to present some to you as a small offering. 
We hope you will accept it.” The Buddha informed the mothers: “It is the rule of any Buddha not to eat meat. As I have already had my meal, you need not provide anything else.” He then instructed them: 
“When man is born in the world, he has food without limit. Why does he not make use of beneficial food but instead does away with living things to stay alive himself? When he dies he falls into a woeful destination, and being hurt he gains no benefit. 
When man eats the five cereals, he feels pity for living beings and the wriggling species. There is no creature that does not want to live. When one kills others to keep oneself alive, calamitous evil does not end. 
When one is compassionate and does not kill, one is without calamity from generation to generation.” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the following stanzas: constantly control himself, dwells in immortality. 
He is in a place where there is no calamity. cautious in his speech and guards his thoughts, dwells in immortality. 
He is in a place where there is no calamity. living beings and who does not annoy anyone, deserves the brahma heaven. 
He transcends birth and death. When the Buddha had spoken the stanzas, the men returned from their hunting. Their women were listening to the scriptures and did not go to welcome them as was the custom. 
The husbands were suspicious and they wondered why things were not as usual. They abandoned the meat and came back thinking that something strange was going on. They came back and saw that all the women were sitting in front of the Buddha listening to the scriptures with folded hands. They became angry and drew their bows, intent on destroying the Buddha. 
But the women remon­ strated, saying: “He is a supernatural person. Do not give rise to any evil thoughts! 
” Therefore each repented his sins and did obei­ sance to the Buddha. 
The Buddha again explained to them the merit of not killing and the evil of doing harm. 
The husbands understood, knelt deeply, and said to the Buddha: “We grew up deep in the mountains, maintaining ourselves by hunting. Our evil misdeeds have accumulated. Which rule should we follow in order to escape grave misfortune?” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: 
with universal love, one gains the eleven praises, and good fortune always follows. 
These are the eleven . When the Buddha had spoken the stanzas, the one hundred twentytwo men and women, young and old, were glad and devoutly accepted them. They all subscribed to the five precepts. 
The Buddha told King Bimbisara to give them land and to present them with cereals. 
The conversion to benevolence was widespread, and throughout the land there was peace. 
Then the king’s mother fell ill. Failing in energy, she had to keep to her bed. He sent for doctors, but he did not receive any medical drafts. He sent for wise women, seeking for them everywhere. 
He again summoned the brahmans in the land and some two hundred people came. He invited them in, had them sit down, offered them food and drink, and informed them: “My mother has been ill for a long time. I do not know what brought this about. 
You have great knowledge and clear understanding of the principles of physiognomy and of heaven and earth and its constellations. 
Why is it that you are unable to tell me what to do?” The brahmans said. The constellations stand in the wrong position and yin and yang are not in harmony. 
That is why this has occurred.” The king said: 
“What is the right thing to do so that she may recover?” The brahmans said: “In a peaceful and pure place outside of the city you should sacrifice to the four mountains, and to the sun and moon and the constellations. You should obtain a hundred ani­ mals of all kinds, including a boy, kill them, and offer them to heaven. 
O king, you should personally lead your mother there, and kneel and do obeisance and beg for her life. 
Only then will she recover.” So the king provided them as instructed. As the boy and a hundred head of elephants, horses, cows, and sheep were driven, they cried out sadly along the way, moving heaven and earth. Leaving through the eastern gate, the king was going to the sacrificial altar to kill and offer them to heaven. 
As the Worldhonored One’s great compassion saves all beings, he pitied this king’s utter foolishness. 
“ How can he give rise to evil by killing many beings in order to save one person!” Thereupon the Worldhonored One led his great assembly to this land. At the eastern gate of the city he met the king and the brahmans on their way out. The animals they were driving came out, crying sadly. 
The king saw the Buddha in the distance, like the sun that has just risen or the full moon. His radiance brightly lit up heaven and earth. When the people saw him, they were all filled with love and reverence. They all wanted to rid themselves of the animals they were driving as well as the sacrificial implements. 
The king then advanced and descended from his carriage. He removed his para­ sol and did obeisance to the Buddha. He crossed his fingers, knelt, and made inquiries to the World-honored One. 
The Buddha told him to rise and asked him where he was going. 
He folded his hands and answered: “ The queen mother has been ill for a long time. I have consulted the finest physicians and the spirits everywhere. Now, I only want to go and allay the constellations, the four moun­ tains, and the five sacred peaks. 
If you want to obtain cereals to eat, you must plow and sow. If you want to obtain great wealth, you must practice giving. If you want to obtain a long life, you must show great compassion. If you want to obtain wisdom, you must apply yourself to learning. 
If you practice these four things, you will gain their fruits as they are sown. 
A wealthy and honor­ able family does not covet the food of the humble. The gods take the seven precious things for their abode. Their clothing and food come naturally. 
Sacrificing to licentiousness is like considering what is wrong to be right. If one kills life to seek life, one is far from the path of life. If one kills the life of many in order to save one person, how could one succeed that way? 
Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanza: spirits in the world, the sacrifice of elephants and horses would not be the same as one act of compassion. 
When the Buddha had spoken the stanza, he cast a bright glow that illuminated heaven and earth. All in the three woeful desti­ nations and in the eight inopportune births were happy, each one in his place. 
King Ho-mo heard the exposition of the wonderful Doctrine, and he saw the bright glow. He was overjoyed and ob­ tained the Path. 
When his sick mother heard the Doctrine, her five feelings lit up and her ailment disappeared. 
When the two hundred brahmans had seen the Buddha’s bright appearance, and once again heard his words, they felt shame and regret, and they desired to become his disciples. 
The Buddha accepted them all, and they became ascetics, each one obtaining his wish. 
The king and his ministers invited the Buddha. When they had worshiped him for a month, he left. The king’s rule was just, according to the Doctrine, and therein the land flourished. 
Words Once King Pukkasati entered the city of Rajagrha to beg for alms. At the gate of the city he was butted to death by a cow that had recently brought forth young. 
The owner of the cow was alarmed, and he sold the cow and turned it over to someone else. 
When that man was pulling the cow to water it, the cow again butted its mas­ ter to death from behind. 
That owner had a son who became ex­ tremely angry. He took the cow to be killed and sold the meat in the market. 
There was a farmer who bought the head of the cow. He carried it with a rope over his shoulder and took it home. Fur­ ther than a li from his home he sat down under a tree to rest and hung the head of the cow from a branch. After a while the rope broke and the cow’s head fell right on top of him. 
In one day the cow had killed a total of three people. 
When King Bimbisara heard this, he wondered why. So he went with his ministers to where the Buddha was. After he had done obeisance upon arrival, he sat apart on the king’s throne. He folded his hands and said to the Buddha: 
“Very odd it is, O World-honored One, that one cow kills three people. 
” The Buddha informed King Bimbisara: “ The retribution of a misdemeanor has an origin. It does not hap­ pen just now.” The king said: 
“I would like to hear the reason.” The Buddha said: “Long ago there were three merchants who went to another country to make a living. They stayed in the house of an aged widow. They had to pay rent, but when they saw that the old woman was a widow, they cheated her and they did not want to pay. 
When the old woman returned and did not see the merchants, she asked her neighbors, who said they had all gone. 
The old woman was furious. So she went looking for them, and after a wearisome pursuit she caught up with them and demanded the rent for the house. 
The three merchants scolded her instead, saying: ‘We already paid you. Why do you ask again?’ They all as one contradicted her and they did not want to pay the rent. 
The old woman was alone and weak and could not do anything. Cursing them angrily she said to the three merchants. I may be in distress now, but why should I bear your cheating rebuttal! 
As for me, I vow that if I shall meet you in the place where I shall later be reborn, I shall certainly kill you so that you may obtain the right path! I shall never forget you! I shall rest when I have killed you. 
Until then, I will not stop!” ’ The Buddha said to King Bimbisara: “The old woman at that time is now this cow. 
The three merchants are the three people, Pukkasati and the others, who were butted to death by the cow.” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: 
rejects the bonds, and bears the harshness, hatred is naturally appeased. 
reason why he destroys himself is because of his evil words. 
When the Buddha had explained this, all those in King Bimbisara’s official retinue were full of respect and vowed to dedicate them­ selves to good conduct. They did obeisance and departed. 
Fundamentals in Pairs Once the king of the land of Sravasti, called Prasenajit, came to where the Buddha was. He descended from his carriage, withdrew his parasol, removed his sword, took off his footwear, folded his hands, and came forward. He prostrated himself, kowtowed at his feet, knelt deeply, and said to the Buddha: “I wish to arrange for a trifling meal tomorrow at the four thoroughfares. 
Well, as the state sovereign you should have intelligent leadership and lead your people along the Path seeking future blessedness!” The king said: 
“With utmost sincer­ ity, I ask leave to make strict preparations.” He prepared delicacies with his own hands and went by himself to receive the Buddha and his monks. 
When they had all arrived at the four thorough­ fares, the Buddha came there and took his seat. passed around water so that they could cleanse themselves, and he poured it with his own hands. 
When the Buddha had finished his meal, he expounded the Doctrine to the king at the four crossroads. Among the countless onlookers at that time were two merchants. One thought: 
“This king is foolish! 
He is the king of the land. What more could he want? 
The Buddha is like an ox, and his disciples are like a cart. The ox pulls the cart in all four directions. The Buddha is ju st like that. 
W hat reason would you have to subm it to and serve him ?” Both men went away, and after a journey of thirty li they stopped and lodged for the night. Buying some wine, they drank together and discussed their affairs. 
The four kings protected the one who had had wholesome thoughts, but the evil spirits on Mount T’ai let the wine enter the belly of the one who had had unwholesome thoughts, burning him like fire. He left the inn and lay down on the road. He sprawled out in the wheel tracks, but in the morning five hundred merchant carts rode over him there and he died. 
When his companion looked for him the next day, he found him dead. He said: “When I return to my country, I shall be suspected of having killed him to take away his belong­ ings. 
There is no sense in taking this lightly.” So he abandoned the riches and went to another country. 
The king of this land had died without a crown prince. In the Book of Prophecies it says: “In the central region there is a humble person who will rule this land. 
The former king has a divine horse, which is sure to bend its knees when a new king is appointed.” They immediately prepared a stately carriage, the divine horse, and the ribbon for the official seal, and they went looking for the sovereign of the land. 
“He has a yel­ low cloud cover; this is the aura of a ruler.” The divine horse bent its knees and licked the feet of the merchant. The officials pre­ pared fragrant hot water, bathed him, and saluted him as their king. Thereupon he occupied the throne and tended to the affairs of the state. 
It must be the Buddha’s kindness that has brought this about.” He then went to the land of SravastI with his officials. 
He kowtowed from a distance and said: “I do not have any merit to receive your kindness, O World-honored One, or to rule over this land. I wish to be kind to the multitude of worthies tomorrow and to look after them.” Once, in the third month, the Buddha informed Ananda and ordered his monks: “ Tomorrow you are invited by that king. 
You must all transform yourselves so that the king and his people will rejoice!” They each used the foundations of their supernatural power to go to that country. They all took their seats in the proper order, dignified and according to the rules. After they had eaten, they washed their hands and expounded the Doctrine to the king. 
The king said: “I am actually an insignificant person. I never had any virtue to speak of. 
“Once that great king gave food to me, to the Buddha, at the four thoroughfares. You, O King, thought: ‘The Buddha is like a king. His disciples are like his ministers.’ You, O King, sowed this seed. 
Now you obtain its fruition. The other person said that the Buddha was like an ox and that his disciples were like a cart. He sowed the calamity of being run over by a cart. Now he is in the hell of Mount T ’ai, run over by a blazing chariot and obtaining his deserts. 
It is not your vigor, O King, that could bring this about. If one does something wholesome, merit follows. If one does something evil, misfortune follows. This is one’s own doing, and it cannot be given by gods, dragons, or spirits. 
Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: the mind is caused by the mind. If one thinks of evil, either of word or deeds, the suffering of sin naturally follows, as a wagon’s wheels leave their tracks. the mind is caused by the mind. 
When the Buddha had spoken the scriptural stanzas, those who had heard them, the king and his subjects, were innumerable. They were all very glad and obtained the eye of the Doctrine. 
Long ago the elder Sudatta bought some land from the crown prince. Together they built a pure abode and presented it to the World-honored One. Each invited the Buddha and his Sangha and made offerings for one month. The Buddha gave an extensive exposition of the luminous Doctrine to both men, and they both attained the Path. 
The crown prince, Jeta, was glad, and he re­ turned to his eastern palace. Praising the Buddha’s qualities, he made music and rejoiced. 
Jeta’s younger brother, Virudhaka, was always at the king’s side. The king then dressed up in plain clothes and, with his courtiers and ladies in waiting, went to where the Buddha was. After he had kowtowed and done obeisance, he in­ tently listened to the scriptures. Virudhaka stayed behind and was in charge of the throne. 
His deceitful ministers, Asraddha and others, then hatched a treacherous plot, and they said: “ Try to wear the great king’s ribbon with his official seal, and sit on the throne! Would you not be just like the king? 
” Thereupon Virudhaka agreed with their words. He donned the robe and mounted the throne. The deceitful ministers all congratulated him: “You are just like the great king! 
” Virudhaka immediately took the leadership over his followers, put on his armor, drew his sword, and went to the pure abode of the Jetavana. He deposed the great king, blocking his return to the pal­ ace. He battled the king s subjects in the Jetavana and killed more than five hundred of the king’s courtiers. 
The king fled with his la­ dies. At the earliest dawn they reached the country of the Sakyas. They became hungry along the way and the king ate radishes. His belly swelled and he died. 
Thereupon, Virudhaka became tyrannical. He drew his sword and entered the eastern palace to behead his elder brother, Jeta. 
Jeta knew his own impermanent nature. He was not afraid, and his countenance did not change color. He expressed gratification with a smile and he willingly submitted to the sword. Before his life ceased, he heard natural music in the sky, welcom­ ing his spirit. 
The Buddha then spoke the stanzas in the Jetavana: good-doer rejoices in both cases. He will rejoice, indeed be glad. Experiencing his merits, his mind is content. 
Receiving his merits, he is delighted. 
King Virudhaka then raised an army to attack the land of the Sakyas, and he killed the men of the Path of the Sakya family. In his cruelty and immorality he committed all five fatal transgres­ sions. 
The Buddha predicted to Virudhaka that, as he was not filial and loyal and his sins were very grave, he would seven days later be burned by the fire of hell. The prediction of the chief prophesier further agreed with that of the Buddha. 
The king panicked. He boarded a ship and went to sea. “I am on water now. 
How could fire consume m e!” At noon on the seventh day there was a spontaneous fire coming out of the water. It burned the ship and sank it. The king was burned too. Consumed by the vicious heat, he suddenly perished. 
Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: The evildoer grieves in both cases. He will grieve, indeed be full of anxiety. Experiencing his sins, his mind is disturbed. 
Experiencing his sins, he is tormented. 
After the Buddha had expounded this, he informed the monks: “Crown prince Jeta did not covet a glorious position. He cherished the Path till death. He was reborn high in heaven and his happi­ ness came of itself. 
King Virudhaka was foolish and he readily gave in to his desires. After his death he fell into hell and the suffering he experienced was immeasurable. 
The powerful and the poor throughout the world are subject to impermanence. There is none who stays long. And so, even the superior being died. 
His whole conduct was a spiritual treasure.” When the Buddha had said this, there was none who did not accept it in faith. 
Beyond Mount Grdhrakuta there once were more than seventy brahmans and their families who deserved to be saved because of their previous merits. The Buddha went to their village and ap­ peared showing his supernatural power of the Path. When they all saw the majesty of the Buddha’s bright appearance, they all respectfully bowed down. 
The Buddha sat down under a tree and asked the brahmans: “For how many generations have you lived in these mountains? 
What do you do to provide for your living?” They replied: “We have been living here for more than thirty gen­ erations. We farm and raise cattle.” He further asked: 
“What practices do you observe with the aim of leaving birth and death?” They replied: 
“We serve the sun and moon, water and fire. 
If someone has died, young and old gather and pray for his rebirth in the brahma heaven, so that he may leave birth and death.” The Buddha said to the brahmans: “Farming and raising cattle, sacrificing to the sun and moon and to water and fire, and pray­ ing for rebirth in heaven are not the right ways to long life or to escape from the birth and death cycle. 
The highest merit does not go beyond the twenty-eight heavens. Without the wisdom of the Path, one falls back into the three woeful destinations. 
Only if one goes forth, develops his determination for purity, and practices what is meaningful for tranquility may one attain nirvana. 
Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: real, have wrong thoughts and will not obtain real gain. 
the unreal, know it to be unreal, will have right thoughts and will certainly obtain real gain. 
Although the gods are happy, they too will die when their merits have been exhausted. 
produced that will not come to an end. Wanting to leave [the cycle of] birth and death, one must practice the true Path. 
When the seventy brahmans had heard the Buddha’s explana­ tion, they understood and were glad, and they wished to become ascetics. 
The Buddha said: “Welcome, monks!” Their hair fell off of itself and they all became ascetics. 
The Buddha and the ascetics set out for the pure abode. When they were halfway there, they longed for their wives and children, and each wanted to withdraw. It happened to rain then, and they became even more depressed. 
The Buddha knew what was on their minds. He magically created several tens of huts along the way. They entered them to get out of the rain, but the huts were leaking. 
Because the huts were leak­ ing, the Buddha spoke the stanzas: the mind does not reflect on one’s actions, it will be penetrated by lust. 
Even though, upon hearing the exposition o f these stanzas, the seventy ascetics did their best to pull themselves together, they still felt darkness in their hearts. The rain stopped and they went on their way. 
On the ground there was some old paper. The Buddha told a monk to pick it up. Being told so he picked it up. 
The Buddha asked the monks: 
“What kind of paper is th is?” The monks said to the Buddha: “This is paper to wrap incense. It may be thrown away now, but it still retains its fragrance. 
The Buddha continued on his way. On the ground there was a broken string. The Buddha told a monk to pick it up. Being told so he picked it up. 
The Buddha further asked: 
“What kind of string is this?” The monks said: “ That string is foul smelling. This is a string to tie up fish.” The Buddha said to the monks: 
“These things are fundamentally pure, but they all depend on a cause to bring about what is wrong or meritorious. 
It is like that paper or that string. When close to fragrance, it is fragrant. When used to tie up fish, it stinks. They are gradually tainted and become accustomed to it without being aware of it. 
” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: putrid thing. Gradually being deluded, they practice what is wrong, and, being unaware of it, they accomplish what is bad. near incense. 
Advancing in knowledge, they practice what is good, and bring about a clear scent. 
When the seventy ascetics had heard these stanzas, they knew that the desire for home was a foul marsh, and that wife and chil­ dren were fetters and handcuffs. With earnest faith they went to the pure abode. 
Reflecting on their actions with an attentive mind, they obtained the path of the arhat. 
Negligence Long ago, when the Buddha was in the world, there were five hun­ dred merchants who had traveled the seas. They returned to their country carrying the seven precious things in large quantities. While passing deep through the mountains, they were misled by evil spirits and they could not find their way out. Their provisions were all used up; and placed in a distressing situation, they all subsequently died from hunger. 
There was an ascetic then in the mountains, who was applying himself to the Path. Upon seeing this situation he thought to himself: “I have been diligent in my application to the Path for seven years, but I can­ not attain it. Furthermore I am poor, without any means to sus­ tain myself. 
These valuable goods do not have any owner. 
I shall take them back and establish a home.” Thereupon he descended from the mountains and took precious things with him. After he had stored them away somewhere, he left the mountains. He asked his brothers to help him carry them back home. 
Just when he was halfway, the Buddha remembered that this monk would surely obtain deliverance. The Buddha then changed into a nun, with shaved head and the robe of the Doctrine, but with powdered face and painted eyebrows, and strung with necklaces of gold and sil­ ver. She entered the mountains through a valley and met the as­ cetic on her way. 
She made a deep bow and asked how he was doing. 
The man of the Path scolded the nun, saying: “Is this the way to attain the Path? 
But why still powder your face, paint your eyebrows, and wear necklaces on your person?” The nun answered: 
He leaves his relatives, applies himself to the Path, dwells in the mountains, and appeases his mind. Why then take what is not yours? In your greed you are forgetful of the Path and quick to leave your noble intentions behind. 
Your birth in the world is like a jour­ ney, but the retribution for your evil is long-lasting.” Thereupon the nun expounded to him the stanzas: 
ing the precepts, however, results in fearful thoughts. When one can do away with the impurities of the three worlds, one is close to nirvana. 
Then, after the nun had spoken these stanzas, showed the brightness of the primary and secondary marks of his Buddha body. 
When the ascetic saw this, his hair stood on end with fear. He kowtowed at the Buddha’s feet, repented his mis­ take, and pleaded: “A fool makes mistakes, acting contrary to the right teaching. 
When he goes on without redeeming himself, what will happen to him ?” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: later restrained himself well, he illuminates the world. 
Mindfulness to concentration is the proper attitude! turns it by means of what is wholesome, he illuminates the world. 
cultivates the Buddha’s teaching illuminates the world as the moon does after the clouds have parted. 
offend, he illuminates the world as the moon does after the clouds have parted. 
When the monk had heard these stanzas, his fetters were removed and his covetousness ceased. He kowtowed at the Buddha s feet and he went to sit under a tree. As his counting of breaths contin­ ued his tranquility and insight became pure. He attained the re­ alization of the fruition of the Path and became an arhat. 
The Mind Once, when the Buddha was in the world, there was a man of the Path. He sat under a tree on the bank of a river, and applied him­ self to the Path, but in twelve years his covetousness had not been conquered. Letting go his thoughts and with a distracted mind, he only held dear the six desires: beauty for his eyes, sounds for his ears, fragrances for his nose, flavors for his mouth, tactility for his body, and dharmas for his mind. 
He transformed himself into an as­ cetic and went to where the man was. They both lodged under a tree. 
On one occasion, by the light of the moon, a tortoise came out from the river to the tree. There also was a hungry otter looking for food. He saw the tortoise and wanted to eat it, but the tortoise drew in its head, tail, and four legs and hid them in its shell. It couldn’t be eaten. 
When the otter was some distance away, the tortoise stuck out its head and feet and walked away. Nothing could be done about it, and so it got away. 
Thereupon the man of the Path said to the transformed ascetic: “This tortoise has an armor to protect its life. The otter could not gain advantage.” The transformed ascetic replied: 
“I think that people in the world are inferior to this tortoise. Ignorant of their impermanence, they give rein to their six senses. When the external Mara gains advantage, the body is destroyed, and the spirit leaves. Birth and death cycles are endless, and revolve in the five destinations. 
Suffering is too immeasurable, all caused by the mind. 
If one has much viciousness in mind, one only provokes evil for himself. parents. You may direct it toward what is right! Do what is meritorious and do not turn back! 
When wisdom is victorious in the battle with Mara, there will be no ailment. 
When the monk had heard the exposition of these stanzas, his covetousness ceased and his desire ended, and he attained the Path of an arhat. 
He knew that the transformed ascetic was the Buddha, the World-honored One. He reverentially adjusted his clothes and kowtowed at the Buddha’s feet. All gods, dragons, and spirits were delighted. 
The Fragrance of Flowers Once the Buddha was in the land of Sravasti. In the sea southeast of the country there was a terrace. On the terrace there were flowers and fragrant trees. The trees were pleasant. 
There were five hundred female brahmans who, although serving a heterodox path, were very diligent and zealous of the mind. They did not, however, know about the Buddha’s existence. 
The women then said to each other: “When we received our forms we were born as women. From our youth until our old age, we are in the custody of three things, and we cannot be free. Furthermore, our life is brief. 
It would be better if we all went to the terrace with fragrant flowers to gather the fragrant flowers. If we are strenuous when fasting and let Brahmadeva descend, he will comply with our wishes. We wish to be reborn in the brahma heaven and to have a long life without death. We also free, without any bondage, freed from any retribution, and without any more sorrow.” So they took their offerings and went to the terrace. 
They gathered fragrant flowers and served Brahmadeva. They held their fast wholeheartedly, wishing to let the venerable spirit descend. 
Thereupon the World-honored One saw these women. Even though they held a lay fast, their minds were resolved and they deserved to be saved. So he flew up in the air with a great multi­ tude of disciples, bodhisattvas, gods, nagas, and spirits, went to the terrace, and sat down under a tree. 
The women were glad and they thought he was Brahmadeva. They comforted each other that they had obtained their wish. 
Then one celestial person said to the women: “ This is not Brahmadeva. This is the most honored one in the three worlds, called the Buddha. 
The people he has saved are innumerable.” Thereupon the women advanced to where the Buddha was. They did obeisance, came forward, and said to the Buddha: “We have a great deal of impurity and we are women now. We wish to be free from bondage and be reborn in the brahma heaven. 
The Buddha said: “0 women, as you are eager to obtain fine gain, you have made this wish. 
In the world there are two things for which the retribution is clear. He who does what is wholesome experiences what is meritorious. He who does what is evil experiences calamity. 
The suffering of the world or the hap­ piness of heaven, the vexation of the conditioned or the tranquil­ ity of the unconditioned, who can choose and take what is true? 
Excellent, 0 women, that you have a clear purpose!” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: heaven? Who can expound the verses of the Doctrine like picking wonderful flowers? 
ware, an illusion, and a brief existence, one brings a stop to the opening of Mara’s flowers and will not experience the cycle of life and death. 
spontaneous, one brings a stop to the opening of Mara’s flowers and will not experience the cycle of life and death. 
When the women had heard these stanzas of the Buddha, they wished to apply themselves to the true Path and to become nuns. Their hair fell off of itself and they were provided with the robe of the Doctrine. After reflection and quiet concentration they attained the path of the arhat. 
Ananda said to the Buddha: “Well, what merit did these women actually have, that they had the Worldhonored One save them? 
And further, as soon as they had heard the exposition of the Doctrine, they went forth and attained the Path.” The Buddha informed Ananda: 
“Once, at the time of the Buddha Kasyapa, there was an important elder whose riches were countless. His wives and ladies numbered five hundred. 
He was jealous by nature and his gate was not opened arbitral ily. The wives and ladies wanted to go and meet the Buddha, but they never obtained his permission. 
The Buddha said to Ananda: The five hundred wives and ladies of that time are the present five hundred nuns. 
Because of the sincerity of their vow they now de­ serve to be saved. That is why the World-honored One saved them! 
” When the Buddha had explained this, there was none who was not glad. 
Chapter XII Formerly, when the Buddha had just attained the Path, he was in the land of Rajagrha. While making conversions he gradually ar­ rived in the land of Sravastl. 
Then there was a merchant, an important person, called Po-li . He went to sea with five hundred merchants searching for precious things. 
The spirit of the sea then came out. He held a handful of water and asked Po-li: “Is the water of the sea plenty or is my handful of water plenty?” Po-li answered: 
“ The handful of water is plenty.” “W hy?” “ The water of the sea may be plenty, but it is useless for one’s present need. It cannot save a thirsty person. A handful of water may be little, but if one meets a thirsty person one may use it and give it to him to save his life. The merit one will experience in later times is incalculable.” The spirit of the sea was glad, and he said in praise: 
“Excellent!” He then took off his eightfold fragrant necklace, comparable to the seven precious things, to present to Po-li. 
While the spirit of the sea accompanied him, he went back safely and arrived in the land of Sravastl. He presented the fragrant necklace to King Prasenajit and gave a complete account of its origin. “I think this fragrant necklace must not be worn by me. I respectfully offer it to you. 
” The king received the fragrant necklace and he thought it wonderful. So he called the women and had them line up in front of him. 
Sixty thousand women came in complete attire. 
The king asked: “Why did my wife Mallika not come for­ ward?” A servant answered: 
“ Today is the fifteenth day. She ob­ serves the fast according to the Doctrine of the Buddha. She dresses in plain clothes, not in grand attire. That is why she does not come forward. 
” Then the king became angry and he sent someone to call her, saying: “ To observe the fast now, do you not disobey the king’s orders?” When he had thus sent for her three times, Lady Mallika came forward dressed in plain clothes. 
Among the multi­ tude she was as bright as the sun and moon, and twice as beauti­ ful as usual. 
The king was startled, and as his respect increased he said: 
I have received this female form. The impurity of its sensual nature night and day accumulates like a mountain. But one’s life is short, and one is afraid of falling into the three woeful destinations. That is why I observe the fast of the Buddha’s Doctrine in my life. 
If one stops craving and follows the Path, one will meet with merit in every existence.” The king rejoiced upon hearing this, and he gave the fragrant necklace to his wife Mallika. 
His wife replied: “I am observing the fast now. 
You may give it to someone else.” The king said: “It was my intention to give it to the most excellent one. You are the most excellent now. Moreover, you observe the fast of the Doctrine, and your determination for the Path is extremely strong. 
If you do not accept it, I shall put it away. 
’ His wife replied: “Oh great king, do not be grieved! 
I hope that you, O king, will depart from your intention and go with me to where the Buddha is. Present this fragrant necklace to the World-honored One, and collect the noble teaching, thus accumulating a kalpa’s merit!” The king agreed with her. 
Your disciples, World-honored One, firmly keep their fast. Such is their honest faith! 
How meritorious!” Thereupon the World-honored One accepted the fragrant necklace and he spoke the stanzas: become beautiful. If one widely accumulates the fragrance of virtue, one’s rebirth will change for the better. 
against the wind. close to the Path and spreading widely, the scent of a virtuous one goes everywhere. 
the fragrant flower of the blue lotus, even though one may say: “This is genuine!”, none could be compared to the scent of the precepts. call it genuine! 
But the scent of keeping the precepts reaches the gods and is most excellent. 
in one’s conduct, the mind becomes tranquil and is deliv­ ered, and one is thereby distanced free from Mara’s path. 
After the Buddha had expounded the stanzas, he again informed the king: “ The fame of the merits of fasting reaches far and wide. When Lady Mallika observes the fast of the Buddha’s Doctrine for one day and one night, this is better than if, for instance, the six­ teen great countries were filled with precious objects and one were to take them and give them away. If one compares the merits, it is like comparing Mount Sumeru and a single bean! 
If one accumu­ lates merit and applies oneself to wisdom, one may attain nirvana. 
The king and his wife, and his ministers great and small, were all happy. They dedicated themselves to the practice of the Doctrine. 
Once the Buddha was on Mount Grdhrakuta in Rajagrha. In the city there were fifty sons of the elders. They went to where the Buddha was, did obeisance, withdrew, and sat down. 
The Buddha explained to them the Doctrine relative to impermanence, suffering, emptiness, and selflessness. “Affection is like a dream. Having come together, people will soon part. Although esteemed and honored, one still feels sorrow. 
When all misfortunes are completely appeased, one will be in absolute peace.” Upon hearing the Doctrine, the fifty people were happy, and they wished to be his disciples. The Buddha said: 
“Welcome, monks!” Their hair fell off of itself and they donned the robe of the Doctrine to become ascetics. 
These ascetics had relatives and friends who were elders. When the elders heard that they had gone forth, they were very happy for them. They went to Mount Grdhrakuta to meet them, and said in praise of them: 
“You were eager to obtain fine gain, and now you have the determination!” They set up an altar for them and invited the Buddha and his Sangha. 
The next day the Buddha and his Sangha came to the dwelling to eat. After the meal, he expounded the Doctrine, and they departed in the after­ noon. 
Those ascetics who had recently become adepts hankered after their kin and wanted to revert back to mundane life. The Buddha knew what was on their minds. As he was about to leave through the gates of the city, he saw that in the foul mud, covered by night soil in the ditch of a field, there grew lotus flowers. They were colorful and their scent was clear. 
road, there grows a lotus flower with a clear delightful scent, mundane person remains in the cycle, but the wise one takes leave of it as a disciple of the Buddha. 
Having spoken the stanzas, the Buddha returned to the moun­ tain. 
The worthy Ananda came forward and said to the Buddha: “When you were near the ditch in the field, World-honored One, I did not understand the meaning of the two stanzas you proclaimed there. 
I would like to hear what they mean. 
” The Buddha informed Ananda: “Did you see that in the impurity of foul mud, on the night soil in the ditch, there grew lotus flowers?” “Yes, I saw them.” The Buddha said: 
“Ananda, when man is in the world he proceeds from birth to birth. Considering a life of a hundred years, more or less, one goes through love for wife and child, hunger and thirst, cold and warmth, sadness or happiness. Moreover, there are one misfortune, two good fortunes, the three poisons, the four errors, the five aggregates, the six entrances, the seven consciousnesses, the eight wrongs, the nine vexations, and the ten evils to contend with. They are all like the impurity of foul mud, the night soil accumulated in the ditch in the field. 
All of a sudden there comes a person who realizes that the world is impermanent, who is in­ tent on applying himself to the Path, develops his determination for purity, concentrates his spirit, destroys false notions, and ulti­ mately brings about his attainment of the Path. He is like a lovely lotus flower that grows in foul mud. He by himself attains the Path, and saves his kin as well. All beings will open up in full understanding. 
He is also like the scent of a flower that overwhelms the stench.” When the fifty monks had heard the Buddha’s expo­ sition of the Doctrine, their determination became firmer and they attained arhatship. 
The Fool Once the Buddha was in the land of Sravasti. 
At that time there was a brahman in the city who was going on eighty years and whose wealth was immeasurable. As a person he was foolish and niggardly, and very difficult to convert. He was not aware of the virtue of the Path, nor did he understand the nature of imperma­ nence. But he still built a fine dwelling: 
The brahman always man­ aged and directed everything by himself. The Buddha saw with his eyes of the Path that this old man’s life would not last all day and that he would go to the nether world. He could not know that himself, and he was simply too busy with his preparations any­ way. His spirit did not have any merit. 
The Buddha led Ananda to his gate. He asked the old man how he felt. “Are you not too tired? 
This dwelling you are building now, for what purpose is it? 
” The old man said: “In the front room I shall welcome visitors and in the hall in the back I shall dwell by myself. In the side rooms both east and west I shall have my children, my possessions, and servants. In summer I shall mount my cool terrace and in winter I shall go to my warm room. 
” The Buddha said to the old man: “For a long time I have heard about you, aged virtuous one. I thought of postponing our conver­ sation, but I happen to have important stanzas. Alive or dead, they are beneficial. 
I wonder if you could just put your things aside for a while and sit down with me to discuss them ?” The old man answered: “Right now I am very busy. I cannot afford to sit down to talk. Come again at a later day and I shall have a good chat with you. 
The impor­ tant stanzas you mention, you can expound them now.” There­ upon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: 
When a fool confidently calls himself wise, he is called an utter fool. 
The brahman said: “You have spoken these stanzas well. You are really keeping me up now! Come later and we shall discuss them again!” The Buddha was grieved then, and he left. 
Later on the old man walked under a rafter which fell and hit his head. His life was lost immediately. His family wept, and it shocked his four neighbors. 
The Buddha had not yet gone far when this mishap took place. When the Buddha returned to the village, he met tens of brahmans. They asked the Buddha where he had come from and the Buddha said: 
“Earlier, when I arrived at the house of the deceased old man, I expounded the Doctrine to him, but he did not believe in the Buddha s words. 
Now he has all of a sudden gone to the nether world.” He again fully explained the meaning of the previous stanzas to the brahmans. 
Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: scoops something flavorful. Even if he associates with the wise for a long time, he still does not know the Doctrine. 
tongue that tastes something flavorful. Even though he associates with the wise for just a while, he immediately understands the essence of the Path. 
readily performs evil, bringing grave misfortune on himself. 
Then, when the brahmans had heard these stanzas, they increased their sincere faith. They did obeisance to the Buddha, were de­ lighted, and carried out their dedicated practice. 
Once the Buddha was in the pure abode of Anathapindada in the land of Sravasti, expounding the Doctrine to gods and men. 
At that time King Prasenajit had a widowed daughter called Vajra . She had returned as a young widow. Her father, the king, felt sorry for her and constructed a separate palace for her elegant livelihood. He gave her five hundred singing girls to amuse her. 
Among them was an elderly servant, called Kubjottara, who used to go to the market to buy ointments and powder, incense, and flowers. 
Once she saw a huge crowd of men and women leave town, each holding incense and flowers. 
So she asked them: 
“Where are you going?” The crowd replied: “ The Buddha has ap­ peared in this existence, the most revered one in the three worlds. He will deliver all beings and all will obtain nir­ vana. 
” When Kubjottara heard this, she was delighted and full of joy. So she thought to herself: “That I meet the Buddha now in my old age is a merit of my previous existence.” She immediately took part of the incense money to buy beautiful flowers. 
She followed the crowd and went to where the Buddha was. She did obeisance, stepped aside, scattered the flowers, and burned the incense, and then listened attentively to the Doctrine. 
After she had left the market, she handled some incense. But on account of listening to the Doctrine and pursued by her previous behavior, the scent of the incense was sweeter and its weight twice as heavy. [Her em­ ployers] did not like her being late and they all reproached her. 
As a loyal servant Kubjottara stated the facts: “In this existence there is a noble teacher, the most honored one in the three worlds. When he beats the unsurpassed drum of the Doctrine, it reverberates throughout the trichiliocosmos. Those who went to listen to his Doctrine were countless. 
Truly, I followed and listened to his Doc­ trine. 
That is why I was delayed.” When the followers of Vajra heard her explanation that the meaning of the Doctrine of the World-honored One was very profound, unheard of in this world, they were delighted and joyful, and they sighed: “What did we do wrong that we alone did not hear it?” So they asked Kubjottara to expound it to them. 
Kubjottara said: “I am a lowly person and my words are unclear. I do not dare to expound it. 
I beg you to [send me to] seek his advice again, and I shall explain it according to his command.” They immediately sent her out and told her again: 
“Communicate to us the complete proceedings! ” When Kubjottara had yet to return, the servants of Vajra were in the courtyard, restless as a child waiting for his mother. The Buddha informed Kubjottara: “If you go back and expound the Doctrine, many will be saved. 
As for the right deportment when expounding the Doc­ trine, first set up a high seat!” When Kubjottara had received the instructions, she reported in full the noble command, and they were all very delighted. They took off their garments, and piled them up to form a high seat. 
When Kubjottara had cleansed her­ self, she received the Buddha’s majestic power and expounded the Doctrine as empowered. Vajra and the others, more than five hun­ dred people, had their doubts resolved. They destroyed their evil and attained the path of stream-enterer. 
The exposition of the Doctrine was so beautiful that they were not aware of being con­ sumed by fire. In one moment they burned to death and were re­ born in heaven. 
The king led his attendants to rescue them from the fire, but when he saw that they were burned, he prepared the coffins and shrouds. After the burial he went to where the Buddha was. He did obeisance to the Buddha, withdrew, and sat down on his usual throne. 
The Buddha asked the king where he came from. 
The king brought his hands together and said: “My daughter Vajra was so unfortunate as to catch fire unexpectedly. Everything was completely burned. I am just back from her coffin and shroud. 
Please, World-honored One, tell me about that unknown .” The Buddha informed the great king: “In the past there was a city called Benares. There was an elder’s wife who led five hundred ladies out of the city to conduct a large sacrifice. 
The rule was that it was not to be tolerated that someone from another family came near. No matter whether close or distant, those who came were thrown into the fire. 
There was an aspirant for Buddhahood in the world then, called Kala. He lived in the mountains. In the morning he came begging for alms and in the evening he quickly returned to the mountains. 
Kala came upon the sacrifice on his begging rounds. When the elder’s wife saw him, she was furious. They all grasped him and pushed him into the fire. When his whole body was ablaze, he used his supernatu­ ral power and flew up in the air. 
The women were terrified and repented their misdeed in tears. They knelt deeply, raised their heads and stated: W e women were foolish, ignorant of your utter truthfulness. We fools were so deranged as to disgrace your divine spirit. 
But when he is about to fall into a place of distress, then he knows it is not good. 
The Buddha informed the great king: “The elder’s wife at the time is your present daughter Vajra. 
The five hundred servants are the present five hundred singing girls, including Kubjottara. 
They do not remain unmanifested for long. Good and evil follow a person, just as the shadow follows the form.” When he had proclaimed this Doctrine, the mighty and lowly in the land devoutly subjected themselves. 
Adept at the various methods of the six arts, astronomy, geography, healing through medicine, landslides and earthquakes, playing dice and chess, playing of artful music, cutting out gar­ ments, embroidering silk, slicing prepared viands, and blending flavors, he was equally versed in human affairs. 
I shall put myself to the test traveling through the countries and I shall overcome any opposi­ tion. My name will spread over the four seas and my expertise will hit the sky. 
Entering the marketplace, he looked around and saw a man sitting down and making a bow out of a horn. While he was sepa­ rating the strings and fashioning the horn, his hands looked as if they were flying. His adjustments were swift as he made the bow. The buyers pressed around him, vying with each other. 
“Since my youth I have thought that my learn­ ing was complete. I did not anticipate feeling inadequate for not learning to make a bow. If I were to contest his skill, I would lose! 
I must learn from him! ” So he followed the bow-maker and sought to be his disciple. 
His art was so ingenious that he even surpassed his teacher. He then gave away his possessions, took his leave, and went away. 
While on his way to another country, he had to ford a river. There was a boatman who was handling his boat as if he were flying. He was turning, going up and down with incomparable swiftness. Again he thought to himself: 
It may be a humble skill, but I do not know it and I should learn it and be equipped with all ten thousand skills.” So he followed the boat­ man and sought to be his disciple. 
In time he knew what was right or wrong. He was making turns while managing the boat far better than his teacher. He then gave away his possessions, took his leave, and went away. 
Again he reached another country. The king ’s palace was be­ yond compare in the world. So he thought to himself: “The carpen­ ter who built this palace—how skillful he is! 
I must again apply myself, so that my mind will be satisfied!” So he sought out the carpenter and wished to be his disciple. He honored him with all his heart and took up the ax. 
In time he gained complete understanding of the measurements, of square and round, of com­ pass and square. He knew completely the timberwork, the carved designs, and the inlay work. His natural genius was evident and his work instantly surpassed that of his teacher. 
With his super­ natural power the Buddha transformed himself into an ascetic. Leaning on a staff and holding his alms bowl, he came right up to him. 
In the land where the brahman came from, there was no Doctrine of the Path. He had not yet seen an ascetic and wondered who this man was. 
He would ask him at the right moment. 
“ I am someone who manages himself.” He again asked: 
the Path and his mind is pure and joyful. 
When the ascetic had spoken these stanzas, he ascended into the sky and manifested himself as the Buddha. The brightness of his thirty-two marks and eighty secondary marks was pervasive and illuminated heaven and earth. He descended from the sky and said to that man: “ The quality of the Path gives me the strength to transform and manage myself. 
” Thereupon the man fell pros­ trate in obeisance, kowtowed, and asked: 
” The Buddha informed the brahman: “The five precepts, the ten wholesome [paths of ac­ tion], the four immeasurables, the six perfections, the four trances, and the three deliverances: these are the methods of managing oneself. 
The wonderful skills of the six arts, of the bow-maker, the boatman, and the carpenter, these are all beautiful adornments elements of specious fame. 
He wished to be his disciple, and the Buddha informed him: 
“Welcome, ascetic!” His hair fell off of itself and he became an ascetic. 
The Buddha explained to him the essence of the four noble truths and the eight deliverances. He subsequently attained the path of arhatship. 
Once the Buddha was in the land of Sravasti. 
Five hundred li from the land there was a village of fifty or sixty families in the moun­ tains. A poor family lived in the village. The mother was pregnant, and in the tenth month she gave birth to twin boys. They were beautiful beyond compare. 
Fifty or sixty days after their birth, their father had been pasturing the cows and returned home worn out. He withdrew and lay down on his bed. Their mother had left for the field to gather firewood and had not returned. The two small boys looked around but did not see their parents. 
One said: “In a previous existence we were about to obtain the Path, but we were correctly punished for our foolish notion that life is permanent. We fell back into the cycle of birth and death for countless eons. Now we are born as sons in this poor family. 
We are being punished for our longing for riches and honor in a previous life, for letting ourselves go, and for spending some thought about momentary happiness. Ever since then we have been experienc­ ing suffering on our long journey. We feel sorrow now, but what can we resort to?” The other answered: “We were young then. 
What else is there to say?” The fa­ ther heard his two sons making such reproaches, and he was very surprised. “Ah, they must be evil spirits that have come to bring disaster. How can small children only several tens of days old say such words? 
I am afraid that they will later kill their parents and destroy the family. 
I must kill them while they are still very young, not yet grown up.” The father left in a state of fright. He shut the door and went to the fields to gather firewood. He wanted to start a fire to burn them to death. 
The mother was on her way back and she asked her husband what the firewood was for. 
The husband said: “Very weird! Such were the nature of their words. They were like demons, out to destroy their own family. 
I want to burn them to death while they are still young.” When the mother heard this, she was disconcerted. She was doubtful and did not believe it [and she said,] “It would be better to wait for a few days and listen together to what they are saying.” For a few days, she tried to listen to their talk. 
Subsequently, when husband and wife were leaving by the door, they overheard their sons inside making re­ proaches as before. When the husband and wife heard this again, they thought it very weird. And so they piled up firewood with the secret wish to burn them. 
The Buddha saw with his divine eye that the husband and wife wanted to burn their two children to death. He felt grieved. They were pitiable, but their former merits would save them. He went to their village, his luminous light shining everywhere. 
Great and small in the vil­ lage were startled and went to where the Buddha was. They did obeisance to the Buddha and there was none who was not glad. They knew that the Buddha was the highest spirit, unequaled in the three worlds. The Buddha arrived at the house of the twin children. 
When the two children saw the Buddha’s light, their joy was unbounded. The parents were startled too, and they each car­ ried one child to where the Buddha was. They asked the Buddha, the World-honored One: “Forty or fifty days after these children were born, they spoke wicked words. 
We do not know what kind of demons these children are. 
When the Buddha saw the children, he laughed heartily. From his mouth came a five-colored light, illuminating the whole of heaven and earth. 
The Buddha informed the parents of the chil­ dren, and also the young and old o f the village: “These two children are no demons but meritorious children. 
Formerly, at the time of the Buddha Kasyapa, they used to be ascetics. They had been friends and comrades as youngsters, and when they had gone forth each was zealous. When they were about to obtain the Path, a heterodox notion suddenly came up and they were checked, con­ tent with worldly splendor. Because of their merits, however, they were reborn in heaven, and they descended as kings, as lords, and as elders, but when this notion had suddenly arisen, they fell further and regressed. 
They did not obtain nirvana but expe­ rienced the cycle of birth and death. They were constantly dragged through a successive number of eons, and they were suddenly re­ born as twins. 
They have just now been reborn in my time. 
Be­ cause they have worshiped the Buddha ever since, they deserve salvation because of their remaining merits. Through the extinc­ tion of their evil and the rise of their merit, they are conscious of their previous lives. So I, the World-honored One, have deliber­ ately come to save them. If I did not save them, they would unrea­ sonably be burned by fire.” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: 
He does not aspire for son, wealth, or country. He constantly guards the path of moral conduct and wisdom, and does not covet false riches and honor. the sand. 
When a friend’s resolve is not yet strong, one follows beauty, tainted by its essence. 
When the Buddha had expounded this, the children saw the Buddha and immediately jum ped up with joy, just as eightyear-old children do. They became ascetics and attained arhatship. 
When the villagers young and old had seen the Buddha’s radiant appearance and had also seen that the children’s appearance had changed, their joy was great and they attained the path of the stream-enterer. The doubts of the parents were lifted and they also obtained the eye of the Doctrine. 
The Arhat Once there was a country, called Nadika, in the vicinity of the Southern Sea. The people’s normal occupation was gathering pearls and sandalwood. 
There was scarcity in the world at that time. Pos­ sessing only Purna, he was afraid they would not make ends meet and was very sad. 
The slave Purna said to his master: “ Please do not be sad! I, Purna, will deliberate on something, and within months I shall make you surpass your brother.” The master said: 
“If you can definitely achieve this, I shall set you free as a worthy person.” The wife of the master had some pearls and other things, and gave them to Purna as his capital. 
Then, when the tide came in, the people in the city went to the shores to gather firewood. 
In the firewood there was the fragrance of gosirsa sandalwood. It could cure serious ill­ nesses. One ounce was worth a thousand taels of gold. One could not always obtain it in the world at that time. 
Purna knew this. He bought it for two coins, took it home, and divided it into ten. 
There was an elder then who had contracted a serious illness. He had to have two ounces of this fragrant gosirsa sandalwood as his medicine. He had sought for it for a long while but could not obtain it. 
Purna took it to him and got two thousand taels of gold. 
When he had sold everything in this way, the wealth he had accumulated was ten times greater than the older brother’s. The master was grateful for Purna’s kindness. 
He did not break his word and set him free as a worthy person, to enjoy himself as he pleased. 
Thereupon Purna bade farewell and applied h i m s e l f to the Path. He went to the land of Sravasti, did obeisance to the Buddha, knelt deeply, and said to the Buddha: “The place I came from is insignificant, but I find happiness in the qualities of the Path. I hope that you, World-honored One, will show me your k i n d n e s s and save m e.” The Buddha said: 
“Welcome, Purna!” His hair fell off of itself. The robe o f the Doctrine covered him, and he became an ascetic. The Buddha expounded the Doctrine to him, and he subsequently attained arhatship. 
He sat down and thought to him­ self: “I now have the six superknowledges and the freedom of life or ruin, and all this because of my master’s kindness. 
“ The Buddha’s spiritual conversion is so fine! I would like to meet the World-honored One and receive his teach­ ing.” Purna replied: 
“Just wholeheartedly provide for food vessels. The Buddha has the three penetrating insights. He will certainly come himself. 
“I hope that you will condescend generously to save us all! ” The Buddha knew his intentions, and so he went with his five hundred arhats, each with his magic power, to his house. 
He came to where the Buddha was and fell prostrate in obeisance. He withdrew and sat down on his royal seat. When he had cleansed himself after the meal, the Buddha extensively explained his bright Doctrine to the master and to the king and his assembled officials. They all accepted the five precepts and became the Buddha’s disciples. 
” Thereupon, the World-honored One praised Purna and spoke the stanzas: behavior has ceased, and when one is delivered through what is right, one is at rest with everything extinguished. 
ment, when one has done away with the hindrance of the three realms, and when all aspirations have ceased, one is said to be a superior man. 
shore, wherever an arhat has passed there is none who is not saved. 
people do not. Delightfully without aspirations, they do not long for anything. 
After the Buddha had spoken the stanzas, the master and the king increased their joy. They worshiped for seven days and attained the path of the stream-enterer. 
An Account of Thousands Once the Buddha was in the land of Srâvastï. There was an aged monk called Panthaka who had only recently become a monk. He was ignorant by nature, and so the Buddha had five hundred arhats instruct him daily. In three years he still did not achieve under­ standing of even a single stanza. 
The Buddha had pity on him, and so he called him and gave him the following stanza: “Guard your mouth and control your mind! The body must not commit anything wrong! He who behaves thus can be delivered from the world. 
” Panthaka was moved by the Buddha’s kindness. He was glad, his mind opened up, and he was able to recite the stanza. 
The Buddha informed him: “Your age may now be advanced; you have achieved reciting the stanza. Everyone knows it. One must not think of it as odd. 
I shall now explain its meaning to you. 
Lis­ ten well and with all your heart!” As Panthaka listened to the teaching, the Buddha explained to him that the body is the basis for the three , the mouth for four, and the mind for three. He explained about the contemplation of their origin and their extinction, and that one ceaselessly revolves in the five des­ tinations and the three realms. Because of this, one either ascends to heaven or falls into the abyss, but also because of this one at­ tains the Path and nirvana comes naturally. He distinctly ex­ plained immeasurable wonderful things to him. 
Panthaka’s mind suddenly opened up and he attained arhatship. 
At that time there were five hundred nuns living in a sepa­ rate pure abode. Daily the Buddha sent a monk to expound the scriptural Doctrine. One day it was Panthaka’s turn to go. 
When the nuns heard this, they all chuckled in anticipation: “When he comes tomorrow, we shall say the stanza backwards and make him ashamed and speechless.” When Panthaka went to the nuns’ abode the next day, they all came forward, young and old, did obeisance, looked at each other, and laughed. When he sat down they gave him food, and after the meal he washed his hands and they invited him to expound the Doctrine. 
” When the young nuns wanted to say the stanza backwards, they could not open their mouths. They were frightened and reproved themselves. They kowtowed and repented their wrongdoing. 
Panthaka then one by one distinguished the elements, just as the Buddha had explained: the bases of body and mind, evil and merit, internal and external, the ascent to heaven and the obtaining of the Path, concentration of the spirit, annihilation of notions, and entering into concentra­ tion. 
When the nuns heard his explanation, they thought immedi­ ately it was peculiarly uncanny. They were wholeheartedly glad and they all entered the path of the arhat. 
Later, Prasenajit, the king of the land, invited the Buddha and his congregation for an assembly in his main hall. Wishing to demonstrate Panthaka s imposing spirit, the Buddha gave him his alms bowl to carry, and he followed behind. 
The doorkeeper recognized him and detained him. He did not allow him to enter. “You are an ascetic who does not understand a single stanza. Why would you be invited! 
I am a layman and yet I know the stanzas! How much more should an ascetic, but you are without knowl­ edge! There is no point in being charitable toward you. You can­ not enter. 
So Panthaka remained outside the gate while the Buddha sat down in the hall. When they had passed the water, Panthaka took the bowl, stretched his arms, and handed it from afar to the Buddha. 
The king, his ministers, his wife, the crown prince, and the four classes of the congregation saw the arms com­ ing in, but they did not see the body. In amazement they asked the Buddha whose arms they were. 
The Buddha said: “They are the arms of the monk Panthaka. He recently attained the Path. 
I let him take my bowl earlier, but the doorkeeper did not allow him to enter. That is why he stretches his arms, and gives me my bowl! 
” They immediately invited him in. His spirit was twice as imposing as usual. 
The king said to the Buddha: “I have heard that Panthaka is by nature ignorant. He just knows one stanza. Why did he at­ tain the Path?” The Buddha informed the king: 
Panthaka understands the meaning of one stanza. Its purity of reason has entered his spirit. His body, mouth, and mind are calm, pure as celestial gold. 
Someone may have studied much, but if he does not understand and practice it, he merely ruins his consciousness. What is the advantage?” There­ upon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: 
what is the advantage if they are meaningless? 
It would be better to learn a single meaningful thing so as to practice and be delivered. 
If one understands one verse of the Doctrine and practices it, one may attain the Path. 
After the Buddha had spoken the stanzas, two hundred monks attained arhatship. The king, his ministers, his wife, and the crown prince were all very happy. 
Once the Buddha was in the land of Sravasti, in a pure abode, and expounded the Doctrine to gods and men. 
Then there was a brahman in that land, an elder by the name of Ramadatta. He had limitless wealth. The possessions of his f a m i l y were immea­ surable. 
According to the rules of the brahman class, one must display extensive largesse in order to show one’s fame. Dispensing the family riches, he used them as gifts. Arranging for the pancavarsika , he established worship to more than five thousand brahmans. In five years he had offered clothing, bedding, medicine, rare precious objects, and implements for the sacrifices, all highly coveted things. 
For the elder Ràmadatta the brahmans conducted sacrifices dur­ ing the five years to the gods, the four mountains, the five sacred peaks, the constellations, water, and fire. There was nothing that was not complete. They made incantations asking that the elder would experience prosperity for a long time. 
When the five years were over, on the very last day he was most generous, following the rules of the elders. Golden bowls were filled with silver grain and silver bowls were filled with golden wheat. Elephants and horses, carriages, servants, valuables, personal adornments of the seven precious things, parasols, shoes, deerskin clothes, staffs, couches, washing pitchers and vessels, beds and sleeping mats, everything they had to have, eighty-four thousand things, he gave them all. On that very day they all came to the great gathering. 
When the Buddha saw this, he sighed: “Why is this brahman of noted family so foolish! 
His gifts are great, but the meritorious recompense is small. It is like sowing seeds in fire; what benefit can one obtain! 
If I do not transform myself, he will be barred from entering the Doctrine for a long time. 
Thereupon the World-honored One rose and arranged his clothes in a dignified way. He transformed himself and emerged from the earth, emitting a very bright light that shone all over the gathered multitude. Young and old were surprised at this wondrous sight. They were startled and terrified, not knowing what the spirit was. 
The elder Ràmadatta and the whole multitude touched the ground with their heads and did obeisance to the Buddha. 
The Buddha saw that everyone in the crowd had respect­ ful minds, and because of their reverential demeanor he then spoke the stanzas: uninterruptedly throughout one’s entire life, but it is better to be mindful of the Doctrine for a single moment. 
The merits one brings about in one such moment are superior to those of an entire life. 
The merits of one moment of homage are superior to those of a hundred years. 
Thereupon the World-honored One informed Ramadatta: “Giving is fourfold. 
What are the four? 
First, although one gives much, the meritorious recompense one obtains is small. Second, although one gives little, the meritorious recompense one obtains is great. Third, one gives much and the meritorious recompense one ob­ tains is also great. Fourth, one gives little and the meritorious recompense one obtains is also small. 
“What is meant by, one gives much and the meritorious rec­ ompense one obtains is small? 
It is when a person is foolish and makes sacrifices by killing living beings, when he drinks spirits and sings and dances, when he dissipates his wealth and does not have meritorious wisdom. 
What is meant by, one gives little and the recompense one obtains is small? 
When one gives scantily and with evil intention to a man of the Path. Both are foolish and there­ fore have no merits. 
What is meant by, one gives little and the merits one obtains are great? 
When one can serve a moral person with kindness. After the man of the Path has eaten, one strenu­ ously applies oneself to recitation. For one who does this, even though it is little, his merits are very great. What is meant by, one gives much and the merits one obtains are great? 
When for instance a farmer’s soil is rich or poor, what he gets as a yield is not the same.” At that moment, when the elder Ramadatta and the people gathered there had seen the Buddha s transformation and when they had heard his exposition of the words of the Doctrine, they were all very glad. All gods, people, and spirits attained the way of a stream-enterer. 
The five thousand brahmans all became ascetics and attained arhatship. 
Young and old who lived in the house of their master Ramadatta accepted the five precepts and also attained the Path. 
The king of the land and his high officials all accepted the precepts and took refuge , They became lay disciples and attained the eye of the Doctrine. 
Once, when the Buddha was in a pure abode in Sravasti teaching, there was a man in the land of Rajagrha who was terribly foolish. He was not pious toward his parents, he was rude to the good, and he was disrespectful toward his elders. As his house was in decay and things never went according to his wishes, he took to serving the fire in the hope of gaining good fortune. 
As for his way of serving the fire, just when the sun would go down he would light a large pyre. He knelt and did obeisance towards it sometimes until late at night. When the fire was extinguished, he stopped. 
He acted in this way for three years, but he did not gain any good fortune. He further served the sun and moon. 
As for his way of serving the sun and moon, in the daytime when the sun had risen and at night when the moon was bright, he did obeisance, respectively, toward the sun and the moon. When they had gone down, he stopped. 
He acted in this way for three years, but he again did not gain any good fortune. He then served the gods. 
He burned incense, knelt, and did obeisance. He offered fine fragrant flowers, spirits and dried meats, pigs and sheep, cows and calves. Consequently he became poor and thus did not obtain good fortune. He was distressed and downcast. 
He heard that in the land of SravastI there was a Buddha honored by all gods. “I must go and serve him, and I certainly expect to obtain good fortune. 
When he reached the gate of the pure abode and looked up to the World-honored One, the Buddha’s bright appearance was dazzling and his looks were extraordinary, just like the moon among the stars. Seeing the Buddha he was glad. He kowtowed, folded his hands, and said to the Buddha: “I have grown in foolishness, not aware of the Buddha, Dharma, and Sangha. 
That is why I have come from afar to seek ref­ uge, wishing to be saved with good fortune. 
” The Buddha informed him: “What you have served are all sorcery, bogeymen, and sprites. Your prayers and sacrifices are like a mountain, but your mis­ deeds are like the rivers and the sea. 
If you seek good fortune by killing living beings, you are far from good fortune! It just makes you suffer a hundred eons, without others’ respect. When one prays and sacrifices using the pigs and sheep of the whole world, the misdeed is like Mount Sumeru, and there is not even an iota of good fortune. How would you not be affected by knowing that your expenditures have been in vain! 
Furthermore, you have not been pious toward your parents. You have treated the worthy with unconcern, and you have no respect for your elders. You are proud and haughty, and your three poisons abound. As your wrongs be­ come more serious every day, why would you obtain merit? 
If you are capable of a change of heart, if you treat the worthy with respect, if your demeanor is dignified and reverential, if you serve your elders, if you reject evil and believe in good, and if you develop yourself and exalt kindness, four merits will increase day by day and you will never be ailing. 
What are the four? 
One, your appearance will be proper. Two, your strength will be strong. Three, you will be safe and without illness. Four, you will add years to your life and your end will not be untimely. 
If you prac­ tice unremittingly, you may obtain the Path too.” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: 
It is better to pay homage to the worthy. ful of your elders, the four merits will naturally take effect: appearance, strength, longevity, and happiness. 
When that man had heard these stanzas of the Buddha, he was very glad and gained pious understanding. He kowtowed and did obeisance. He again said to the Buddha: “Covered by the impurity of my misdeeds I have accumulated evil for nine years, but I was fortunate to be converted by kindness. 
I do wish that you, World-honored One, will let me be an ascetic.” The Buddha said, “Welcome, monk.” His hair fell off of itself and he became an ascetic. 
He internally reflected on anapana and attained arhatship. 
Evil Conduct Once the Buddha was in the land of Rajagrha. He sent an arhat called Sumana to the south of Kasmir with the Buddha’s hair and nails, to a temple with a stupa in the mountains. Five hundred arhats always stayed there. Morning and evening they burned incense, circled the pagoda, and offered prayers. 
In those moun­ tains there were five hundred monkeys. They witnessed the men of the Path worshiping at the pagoda, and so they immediately went together to the bank of a deep torrent. Carrying mud and pushing stones they likewise built a stupa. Erecting a tree as a flagstaff, they attached a silk banner at its tip. 
The moun­ tain waters then suddenly rose and the five hundred monkeys immediately drowned. Their spirits were reborn in the second or Trayastrimsa heaven, in a palace with the seven precious things. Clothing and food came naturally. 
“Where did we come from to be reborn in heaven?” With the heavenly eye each then saw his previous appearance, the body of a monkey. Just like the men of the Path, they were playfully building a pa­ goda. Although their bodies were drowned, their spirits had attained rebirth in heaven. “We must descend now to show our gratitude to our old corpses!” They all took their servants and with flowers, incense, and music they descended to their old corpses. 
They scat­ tered the flowers, burned incense, and went seven times around them. 
In the mountains at that time there were five hundred brahmans. With their heretical path and heterodox views they did not believe in demerit or merit. When they saw that the heav­ enly persons were scattering flowers, making music, and walking around the corpses of the monkeys, they asked in amazement: “Gods, your bright reflection is so imposing! 
Such is the merit gained by playfully building a pagoda! If you will earnestly serve the Buddha, your merit will be difficult to describe. 
You gentlemen hold heterodox views and do not believe in what is right. Toiling for a hundred eons you will not gain a thing. It would be better for you all to go to Mount Grdhrakuta. 
The merits gained by serving and offering prayers will be endless.” So they all rejoiced and went to where the Buddha was. 
The heavenly per­ sons said to the Buddha: “Recently we had the bodies of monkeys, but we experienced your kindness, World-honored One, and we attained rebirth in heaven. Regretfully we did not meet you, O Buddha. Therefore we now take refuge!” They again said to the Buddha: 
What evil conduct did we do in a previous existence that we experienced those monkey bodies? 
Even though we built a pa­ goda, our bodies drowned.” The Buddha informed the heavenly persons: This has a reason. It does not happen out of nowhere. I shall now explain to you how it came about. 
A long time ago, there were five hundred young brahmans. They all went to the moun­ tains in search of the path of an immortal. 
In the mountains at that time was an ascetic who wanted to mend his pure abode on the mountain with mud. He went down to get some water. His body was so light, that it seemed like he was flying. The five hun­ dred brahmans were envious and they all laughed at him : 
If he does not stop getting water in this way, he will shortly drown once the torrential mountain waters come.” The Buddha informed the heavenly persons: “The ascetic who was running up and down at that time was myself. 
The five hundred brahmans were the five hundred monkeys. 
They jestingly performed a misdeed and they personally experienced its retri­ bution.” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanza: 
The Buddha informed the heavenly persons: “Even though you were animals in your recent existence, you still could playfully erect a stupa. Now you have attained rebirth in heaven, your sins are extinguished, and you thrive in good fortune. 
Having returned to earth now, you have personally received the proper teaching. Because of this you will be free from any suffering for a long time.” After the Buddha had said this, the five hundred heavenly persons attained the Path. 
When the five hundred brahmans gathered on the riverbanks heard about the retribution of demerit and merit, they sighed: “We have applied ourselves to a seer for quite a number of years, but we have no results yet. The monkeys who playfully perform merit and obtain rebirth in heaven are much better. The qualities of the Buddha’s path are so truly wonderful!” Thereupon they kowtowed at the Buddha’s feet and wished to be­ come his disciples. 
When the Buddha said: “Welcome, monks!”, they became ascetics. 
After strenuous daily development they attained the path of the arhat. 
Once the Buddha was in a pure abode in the land of SravastI, expounding the Doctrine to gods and men. 
At that time the sec­ ond son of the king of the country was called Virudhaka. When he was twenty years old his attendants and officials forced out his father the king. He killed his older brother, the crown prince, and made himself king. 
An evil minister called Na-li said to King Virudhaka, “O king, at the time you were crown prince, you went to your family home in the land of the Sakyas. When you looked in on the Buddha’s pure abode, you were scolded by the sons o f the Sakyas, and thoroughly reviled [because of your mother’s lowly birth]. 
At that time, you announced that when you became king, you would see to this. Now the time has come. 
You should mobilize your troops and horses and exact revenge.” He made the necessary arrangements and, leading his soldiers and horses, was about to attack the land of the Sakyas. 
The Buddha had a second disciple, called Mahamaudgalyayana. The disciple saw that King Virudhaka was leading his troops to attack the land of the Sakyas and avenge an old grievance, and that he would destroy the four types of disciples. He felt great pity and went to where the Buddha was. 
” The Buddha informed Mahamaudgalyayana: “Even though I know that you have the knowledge and virtue that can relocate the people of the land of the Sakyas in a safe place, all things and beings have seven things from which there is no es­ cape. 
What seven? 
Seven, causality. Even though one may want to avoid these seven things, one cannot obtain free­ dom. 
If you can do this with your supernatural power, the burden of the demerit of the former retribution cannot be left behind.” Thereupon Mahamaudgalyayana did obeisance and left. 
Accord­ ing to his own idea he chose four or five thousand friends and danapatis of the people of the land of the Sakyas, placed them in a vessel, and moved them to the stars in the sky. 
When King Virudhaka had attacked the land of the Sakyas and killed three hundred thousand people, he led his army and returned to his country. 
Thereupon Mahamaudgalyayana went to where the Buddha was. He did obeisance to the Buddha, prided himself, and said: “King Virudhaka has attacked the land of the Sakyas. I, your disciple, have saved four or five thousand people o f the land of the Sakyas with your supernatural power, 0 Buddha. 
“Have you gone and looked at the people in the vessel?” He said: “I have not gone to look at them yet.” The Buddha said: 
“First go and look at the people in the vessel.” Mahamaudgalyayana let the vessel come down through his power of the Path, and he saw that the people there had all died. There­ upon Mahamaudgalyayana was depressed and mournful, and felt sorry for their suffering. He returned and said to the Buddha: “The people in the vessel are all dead now. 
My virtue and supernatural power were not able to counter the demerit of their former retri­ bution.” The Buddha informed Mahamaudgalyayana: “There are these seven things. The Buddha and the nobles, the seers and men of the Path may hide them or disperse their bodies, but none can avoid these seven things.” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: 
Only the kind and wise do not have thoughts of others’ wrong and evil. 
When the Buddha had said this, countless people sitting nearby heard the Buddha’s explanation of the doctrine of impermanence. They were all sad, knowing that retribution is hard to avoid. Then they joyfully attained the Path and realized the status of streamenterer. 
The Rod There once was a country called Hsien-t’i. An aged monk lived there who suffered from a long illness. He was emaciated and filthy. He was lying in a pure abode in Hsien-t’i but no one looked after him. 
The Buddha led five hundred monks to where he lived. He told the monks to look after him, to make rice gruel for him, but when they smelled his foul place, they despised him. 
The Buddha had Sakra, ruler of the gods, bring some hot water, and the Buddha himself washed the body of the sick monk with his vajra hands. The earth shook and there was a burst of sudden, bright light. Everyone was startled. 
The king of the land and his subjects, gods, dragons, spirits, and countless people went to where the Buddha was. They kowtowed, did obeisance, and said to the Buddha: “You, the three worlds, possessed of the virtues o f the Path. Why do you condescend to wash this sick and filthy monk? 
” The Buddha informed the king of the land and the whole gathering: “The reason why the Tathagata has appeared in the world is precisely because of this distressed one, who has no one to look after him. 
When honoring a sick ascetic, a man of the Path, or any poor and lonely old person, the merit is immeasurable. One’s wishes will be fulfilled. Merits will come, just as the five rivers keep flowing. As one’s qualities are gradually consummated, one may attain the Path.” The king said to the Buddha: 
“Now what misdeed did this monk previously do, that he is stricken by illness for many years, beyond any cure?” The Buddha informed the king: 
Conforming to the king’s sever­ ity, the officer personally displayed a chilling effect on all. When he wanted to whip someone, he demanded a price. When he ob­ tained something, the whipping was light, but when he obtained nothing, it was heavy. 
When the officer’s life ended, he fell into hell. He was very maliciously flogged, and when his demerit was extinguished, he appeared again, but only to be among animals and be constantly beaten for more than five hundred existences. When his demerit had ended he became a man and was constantly hampered by a grave illness. The pain did not leave him. 
The king of the land at that time is now Devadatta. 
The officer is the present sick monk. 
The sage is myself. 
In my previous existence I was treated with lenience. The whip did not touch me. That is why I, the World-honored One, personally washed him. 
When someone performs good or evil, mis­ fortune or good fortune follows him. 
Even in another birth and death cycle it cannot be avoided.” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: who are without offense, his misfortune is tenfold. His calamity is sudden and without pardon. broken. 
Then, when the sick monk had heard these stanzas of the Buddha and the events of his former lives, he acknowledged his former behavior. As he subdued his thoughts and reproved himself, his ailment was instantly cured in front of the Buddha. His person safe and his mind at rest, he attained arhatship. 
The king of Hsien-t’i was delighted and gained pious understanding. He subsequently received the five precepts and became a pure believer. He carried them out till his death and attained the path of a stream-enterer. 
Once the Buddha was in the land of Sravasti, in the pure abode of the garden of Anathapindada in the Jetavana, expounding the Doctrine to gods, men, dragons, and demons. 
In the east there was a land called Uttaravati. There were five hundred brahmans who were going together to the Ganges River. On its bank there were three sacrificial ponds. By washing away their impurities they sought to become immortals in their nakedness, in accordance with Nirgrantha law. 
Their way led through a vast marsh, and they got lost and could not pass it. They had become short on pro­ visions along the way, and looking from a distance they saw move­ ment in a tree which appeared as if alive with a spirit. They thought someone was there and rushed to the tree. 
When they realized there was nothing, the brahmans raised their voices and lamented loudly. They were distressed by hunger and thirst and dying of exhaustion in this marsh. 
The spirit of the tree appeared as a man and asked the brahmans: “Men of the Path, where do you come from and where do you want to go now ?” They replied with one voice: 
“We want to go to the divine ponds and cleanse ourselves, hoping to become immortals. Today we are hungry and thirsty. 
” The spirit of the tree then raised his hands, and food and drink of a hundred flavors abundantly flowed from his hands, giving them all the food and drink required. When they were all fully fed and satisfied, the remaining food and drink were adequate to keep them supplied for the rest of the way. 
When they were about to part, they went to the spirit and asked: “What virtuous deed did you previously perform that you bring about such loftiness? 
“I formerly lived in the land of Sravasti. The high official of the land was then called Sudatta. Providing food for the Buddha and his monks, he bought koumiss on the market, but there was no one to pick it up. He looked all over and finally en­ gaged me to pick it up. 
After they had passed around the water to cleanse them­ selves, I solemnly listened to the Doctrine. We were all glad, judg­ ing it to be immeasurably wholesome. 
I then fasted and did not eat upon my return in the evening. My wife asked in surprise: ‘I wonder what is bothering you!’ I answered: ‘Nothing. 
When I was walking in the market, I saw the elder Sudatta and we both gave food to the Buddha in the park. He invited me to fast, the fast being one of the eight prohibitions. ’ My wife became angry and said with indignation: ‘Gautama confuses the common . 
If you do not forget about him, trouble will come from it!’ As she kept pressuring me, I ate with her. 
Then, at night, my life’s fortunes ended at midnight. As a spirit I came to be born here. 
Because my foolish wife ruined my rules of fasting and because I did not complete those deeds, I came to be born in this marsh and became the spirit of this tree. 
As for the merit of picking up the koumiss, from my hands come food and drink. If I had completed the rules of fasting, I would have been reborn in heaven. 
They piously accepted it and turned around back to Sravasti. Their way led through a country named Kausambl. There was an elder, called Ghosila, who was kind to others and respected by all. 
“We want to go to SravastI and to where Sudatta is. Choosing the rules of fasting, we long to re­ ceive them and obtain merit.” Ghosila was in raptures of joy. 
He proclaimed that those of his kindred who could go with him and receive the regulations of fasting should unite with the five hundred men and answer his call. He vowed to lead them. They all talked it over and left with dignity. 
Before he had reached the Jetavana, he encountered Sudatta on this way. He looked back and asked his followers who this man was. 
They answered: 
“Sudatta.” The crowd of brahmans was glad. 
We were looking for him, and we found him.” They rushed to meet him and unanimously said in praise: “The spirit of the tree has praised your virtue. Respectfully and candidly he has fully explained his admiration. That is why we have come to place ourselves in your care. 
I have a revered teacher, called the Tathagata. He helps mankind. 
When they met with the Tathagata, their gladness was hard to measure. They fell prostrate in obeisance, withdrew, and sat aside. They all knelt deeply and said to the World-honored One: “We initially left home and wanted to go to the three ponds to cleanse ourselves and seek to be immortals. 
Please, show us your supreme spirituality!” Thereupon, because of their behavior, the World-honored One expounded the stanzas: and wear a coarse garment; one may cleanse oneself squatting on a rock; but how could his doubts be undone? 
does not seek to win but is kind and loving toward the world, there is no enmity where he goes. 
When the five hundred brahmans had heard the stanzas, they were very glad. They all became ascetics and attained the path of arhatship. 
The monks said to the Buddha: “What virtuous deed had the five hundred brahmans and elders previously done to obtain the Path so sw iftly?” The World-honored One informed them: 
“A long, long time ago, there was a Buddha in the world called Kasyapa. He explained to his disciples that I would come at the time of the five defilements. 
At that time there were a thou­ sand brahmans and elders who said these same words: ‘Let us meet the Buddha Sakyamuni!’ The brahmans of that time are now these brahmans. 
The elders of that time are now those with Ghosila. 
That is why they have met me and have understood.” The monks were very glad, did obeisance, and followed the instructions. 
Chapter XIX Similes with Old Age Once the Buddha was in the land of SravastI in the pure abode of the Jetavana. After his meal he expounded the Doctrine of im­ mortality to gods and men, to the ruler, to his ministers and his people, and to the four classes of disciples. 
Then there were seven elder brahmans from afar who had come to where the Buddha was. They kowtowed, folded their hands together, and said to the Buddha: “We strangers would humbly like to listen to your noble way of conversion. We should have taken refuge a long time ago, but there were many impediments. 
” When the Buddha had accepted them as ascetics, he told the seven men to stay together in one quarter. 
But after these seven men had seen the World-honored One, and subsequently were able to practice his Path, they did not reflect on the nature of impermanence. They sat together in their quar­ ters, just thinking of worldly things. They were speaking in a low tone or loudly laughing, not reflecting on success or failure. Their lives were daily nearing the end, time was running out. 
With his three penetrating knowledges, the Buddha knew that their lives were about to end. He felt sorry for them. He stood up, went to their quarters, and informed them: “Sirs, when you practice the Path, you must seek to surpass worldly things. 
All beings rely on five things. What are the five? 
One, they rely on their youth. Two, they rely on their upright appearance. Three, they rely on their great strength. Four, they rely on their wealth. 
While you, seven sirs, are speaking in a low tone or loudly laugh­ ing, what do you rely on?” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: 
always be ablaze! Profoundly shrouded in darkness, it would be better to seek for light. 
on it is considered to be safe, but it is the source of a great deal of imagining that brings forth illness. How could one know it is not real! luster. 
The skin slackens and muscles shrink. The fate of death is close. abandoning his chariot. When the flesh has dissipated and the bones are scattered, how can one rely on a body! 
After the Buddha had spoken the stanzas, the seven monks un­ derstood. Their expectations ceased and they attained arhatship in front of the Buddha. 
Once the Buddha was in a pure abode in SravastI, expounding the Doctrine to gods and men and to the ruler. 
Then there was a vil­ lage of brahmans. In the more than five hundred houses there were five hundred young brahmans, practicing their brahmanical arts. They were arrogant and did not respect their elders. They considered haughtiness and self-importance normal. 
The five hundred brahmans discussed among themselves: “The ascetic Gautama calls himself a Buddha, with the expedient knowledge of the three penetrating insights. There is none who dares argue with him. 
Let us question him on different points and we shall know how he is.” They then pre­ pared offerings and invited the Buddha. 
The Buddha went with his disciples to the village of the brahmans. They took their seats, passed the water around, and, after the meal, they washed their hands. 
They happened to be on their begging round in the village. The Buddha knew that formerly they had been very wealthy beyond compare, and that they had been high officials. So the Buddha asked the young brahmans: “Do you know the elder brahmans?” They all said yes. 
He further asked: 
“ They were high officials before, with countless riches.” “ Then why are they now on their begging round?” They all said: 
“Their wastefulness was unprincipled. That is why they remain poor.” The Buddha said to the brahmans: “In the world there are four things which men are unable to practice. But he who does them obtains prosperity and does not become poor. 
What are the four? 
One, when in the prime of life and strong, do not be arrogant! Two, keep zeal at an advanced age and have no desire for debauchery! Three, when you possess riches and precious things, be constantly mindful of giving! Four, take up studies with a teacher and accept his true words! 
He is like an old heron waiting by the empty pond, never catching anything.” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: 
As life goes by swiftly and abandonment is constantly present, regrets are useless. 
The Buddha informed the brahmans: “In a generation there are four periods during which one may gain merit by practicing the Path. In this way, one may obtain salvation and escape from any suffering. 
What are the four? 
One, the period in which one pos­ sesses strength in youth. Two, the period in which one possesses property when rich and honored. Three, the period in which one has experienced the fine field of merit of the Buddha, Dharma, and Sangha. Four, the period in which, when reflecting on things, one feels the sorrow of parting. 
When one experiences these four things, one’s wishes will all be fulfilled. One will certainly gain the Path.” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: 
Train yourself and seek wisdom! Be free from impurity and do not be tainted! Hold up a candle and contemplate the place of the Path! 
When the Buddha said this, he emitted a bright light, illuminating heaven and earth. The five hundred young brahmans then under­ stood. They straightened their clothes and hair, stood up, and did obeisance at the Buddha’s feet. They said to the Buddha. 
“Welcome, monks!”, and they immediately be­ came ascetics and attained arhatship. 
The villagers, young and old, all attained the Path, and there was none who was not glad. 
Holding Oneself Dear Once there was a land called Tamra. Seven li from the city there was a pure abode. Five hundred ascetics constantly dwelled there reading the scriptures and practicing the Path. 
There was an old monk called Mahallaka. As a person he was not bright. The five hundred men of the Path had to instruct him, but he did not master a single stanza in the course of several years. The whole community despised him and the people did not share their gather­ ings with him. 
Later, when the king of the land invited the men of the Path to come to his palace to conduct wor­ ship, the monk Mahallaka said to himself: “I was born into this world so dull that I do not know one stanza and I am held in contempt by the others. What a life this is! 
” So he took a rope and went underneath a big tree in the garden in the rear, intent on hanging himself. 
With his eye of the Path the Buddha saw this from afar. He transformed himself into the spirit o f the tree. He appeared half as a human being and reprimanded him, saying: “Oh monk! 
Why do you do this?” Mahallaka then fully informed him of his hardship. 
The transformed spirit reprimanded him, saying: “You cannot do this! Yes, listen to my words! 
Once, at the time of the Buddha Kasyapa, you were a Tripitaka as­ cetic with five hundred disciples. Because o f your great learn­ ing you despised all others. Sparing o f the meaning o f the scriptures, you initially would not teach anything. Therefore in every existence you were born into, your faculties were dull. 
You have only yourself to blame! Why destroy yourself?” Thereupon the World-honored One show ed his divinely b rillian t appear­ ance and spoke the stanzas: watch over what should be guarded. If in his aspirations he wants to understand, he should apply himself to what is right without resting. 
A well-regulated person acquires wisdom. 
When the mind is regulated and the body correct, what wish will not be fulfilled? 
The evildoer experiences evil himself, just as surely as a diamond pierces a pearl. 
When the monk Mahallaka had witnessed the Buddha’s brilliant personal appearance, he trembled with both grief and joy and kow­ towed at the Buddha’s feet. He reflected on the meaning of the stanzas and immediately entered the state of concentrative mind. In the presence of the Buddha he subsequently attained arhatship. He knew countless matters of his former lives, and penetrated the essence of all the scriptures of the Tripitaka. 
The Buddha told Mahallaka to don his robe, take his bowl, and have a meal in the king’s palace, where he was to preside over five hundred men of the Path. “ These men of the Path were your five hundred disciples in your previous existence. If you again expound the Doctrine to them, you will help them obtain the Path and make the king un­ derstand and believe in the nature of evil and merit.” He at once accepted the Buddha’s instructions. 
He went straight to the palace and sat down on the seat of honor. 
The assembled monks all became angry and wondered why, but they respected the king’s intention and did not dare scold him. They thought Mahallaka was foolish and did not have any under­ standing about donations and that thinking was too exhausting for him. 
Mahallaka then gave him a donation [of the Doctrine]. He sounded like the tremor of thunder, and his clear words came down like rain. The men of the Path who were sitting were startled. They repented and all attained arhatship. 
Expound­ ing the Doctrine to the king, there was nothing he did not explain. All ministers and officials attained the path of the stream-enterer. 
Once the Buddha was in the land of Sravasti. There were five hun­ dred brahmans who were constantly seeking advantage over the Buddha. 
They wanted to defame him, but the Buddha knew their thoughts by means of his three penetrating insights. He felt pity for them and wanted to save them, but their condition had not matured yet, and the causal condition was not yet at hand. When all their demerits and merits were in the proper condition, he natu­ rally would bring on the causal condition to match up with their demerit and merit. These brahmans had previously had some merit, and they deserved to be saved; their merit had led them on and brought about an appropriate way. 
The five hundred brahmans deliberated among themselves and said: “We shall make a butcher kill some living creatures and in­ vite the Buddha and his community of monks. The Buddha will most certainly accept the invitation and praise the butcher, at which point we shall come forward and deride him. 
” Thereupon the butcher invited the Buddha for them. The Buddha immedi­ ately accepted the invitation, and informed the butcher: 
“When a fruit is ripe it falls, and when merit has matured one is saved.” While the butcher went back to provide for food, the Buddha led his disciples to the village of the butcher, to the house of the danapati . The brahmans, young and old, were all glad. “Today we shall take advantage of the Buddha! If he praises the merit of the danapati, we shall use this to deride him, be­ cause, before and after, he has killed living beings and performed demerit. 
If the Buddha explains the original demerit, we shall re­ buke him for today’s merit. 
In either case we shall now have the advantage over the Buddha!” When the Buddha arrived, he sat down, passed around the water and put down the food. Thereupon the World-honored One contemplated the thoughts of the crowd. They deserved to be saved. So he stuck out his tongue, covering his face and licking his ears. 
By committing evil he becomes evil, just as sowing the seeds of bitterness , merit. 
They all have their own maturation, and they do not mutually cross each other. By practicing what is good, one obtains good, just as sowing something sweet [pro­ duces something sweet]. 
After the Buddha had spoken the stanzas, the minds of the five hundred brahmans opened up in understanding. They immedi­ ately came forward and did obeisance to the Buddha. They fell prostrate, folded their hands together, and said to the Buddha: “We were foolish and degraded. 
” The Buddha accepted them and they all became ascetics. 
When the villagers, young and old, had seen the Buddha’s transformation, there was none who was not delighted. They all attained the Path and were called noble ones, without any further reference to a butcher. 
When the meal was over, the Buddha returned to his pure abode. 
The World Once there was a brahman king called To-wei-hsieh. The king practiced ninety-six kinds of heresies. 
One day he suddenly had a wholesome thought that he wanted to practice extensive giving. As was the rule for brahmans, he accumulated the seven precious things mountain-high and used them for his giving. When some­ one came begging, he would allow him to take one handful and leave. This went on for several days, but the hoard did not de­ crease. 
The Buddha knew that this king deserved salvation for his previous merit. He changed into a brahman and went to his land. 
The king came out to meet him. They exchanged greetings, and he asked him how he was and said: “What do you seek? 
“I come from afar. I would like to beg for some precious jewels and use them to build my dwelling.” The king said: 
Take a handful and go! 
” The brahman took a handful, went seven steps, returned and put the handful back in its original place. 
The king asked: “Why do you not take them?” The brahman replied: 
That is why I do not take anything.” The king said: 
“Take three handfuls!” So the brahman took them, went seven steps, returned again, and put them back in their origi­ nal place. 
When the king asked the brahman why he had acted in this way again, he replied: 
“ This will do to take a wife. But then, I will not have any left for the fields, servants, oxen, or horses. I calculate that again it will not suffice. 
That is why I ceased to act.” When the king told him to take seven handfuls, the brahman took them, went seven steps, returned again and put them back. 
The king said: “What is on your mind now ?” The brahman answered: 
That is why I do not take anything.” The king said: “ Take the whole hoard of precious things! 
The king was utterly surprised and again asked why. The brahman answered: 
It would be better to appease one’s mind and seek for the unconditioned Path That is why I do not take anything.” The king’s mind opened up, and he wished to serve the illuminating teaching. 
Thereupon the brahman manifested the splendid luminous appearance of the Buddha. He leaped in the air and spoke the stanzas: heaven or even if they were to fill the world, it would still be better to experience the Path. 
What is painful appears to be pleasant, but the madman is destroyed by this. 
Then, when the king saw that the Buddha’s splendid appearance illuminated heaven and earth, and when he further heard these stanzas, he was in raptures of delight and joy. The king and his ministers then accepted the five precepts and they attained the path of stream-enterer. 
Speaking about the Buddha Once the Buddha was in the region of Magadha, underneath the tree of great joy , the most excellent spot of the Path. Having subdued Mara by the strength of his virtue, he was sitting and reflecting: “May the drum of the law of immortality be heard in the trichiliocosmos. Formerly, the king, my father, sent five men. 
The reward for their merit should be conferred!” These five men were in the land of Benares. 
When the Tathagata stood up under the tree, his majestic demeanor with the primary and secondary marks radiated across heaven and earth, and his imposing spirit caused to tremble, bringing joy to those who saw it. 
He had parted with his relatives and left his house in search of a teacher, applying himself to the Path. Looking up to His Revered Excellence, he felt a mingling of fright and joy. 
He descended by the side of the road, raised his voice and said in praise: “Your imposing spirit moves people and your dignified demeanor is outstanding. What teacher have you served, that you have obtained this countenance? 
myself! 
I am thus by myself, without receiving instruction from a teacher. my resolve I am alone, without companion. Having completed everything, I have become a Buddha, and thus have I understood the Noble Path. 
Upon hearing the stanzas Upaka was downhearted, for he did not understand. So he asked the World-honored One: 
“Gautama, where are you going?” The Buddha informed the brahman: “I want to go to the land of Benares, to beat the drum of the Doctrine of immortality and to turn its unsurpassed wheel. Among the multi­ tude of sages of the three worlds there has never been anyone who, as I will do now, has turned the wheel of the Doctrine, to lead the people to enter nirvana.” Upaka was overjoyed. 
“Excellent, excellent it is when you say so, O Buddha! 
As he had not yet reached his teacher, he spent the night along the way. Late at night his life suddenly ended. 
When the Buddha saw with his eye of the Path that he had died, he felt pity for him and said: “The world of beings is foolish in thinking that life has perma­ nence. Having met the Buddha and departed, he has perished alone. When the drum of the Doctrine reverberates, he alone will not hear it. 
Passing through a number of eons, when will he be saved?” The Buddha in his compassion spoke the stanzas: and having crossed the abyss o f the five predestinations, a Buddha has arisen, illuminating the world in order to do away with all suffering. 
It is difficult [i.e., rare] for the world to have a Buddha, and it is not easy to hear and grasp the Buddha’s Doctrine. 
When the Buddha had spoken these stanzas, five hundred gods and men in the sky heard them. They were delighted and all attained the path of the stream-enterer. 
Save us from this painful heat!” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: 
Happiness Once, three hundred li southeast of Rajagrha, there was a village of mountain people with over five hundred homes. They were un­ yielding as people and difficult to convert to the Path. 
Through their merits in a former world they deserved to be saved, and there­ upon the World-honored One transformed himself into an ascetic. 
After he had begged for alms, he left the village and sat down under a tree and entered samadhi on nirvana. For seven days he did not pant, breathe, move, or turn. 
When the villagers saw this, they thought his life had ended. They said to one another: “The ascetic is dead. 
We shall all give him a burial.” Each took a bundle of firewood for the pyre. When the fire was lit and the firewood used up, the Buddha rose from his seat and manifested his divine transformation of the Path. His light was brilliantly shining and moving in the ten directions. After he had manifested the transformation, he returned to his seat underneath the tree. 
We were ignorant of why you, O supernatural person, are free from any illness or grief, or why you are not hungry or thirsty, or why you did not suffer from heat!” Thereupon the World-honored One smiled with a peaceful complexion and spoke the stanzas: everyone has enmity, I conduct myself without enmity. 
everyone has illness, I conduct myself without illness. 
everyone has sorrow, I conduct myself without sorrow. 
Happiness is my food, just as for the Shining Gods. 
the fire from a countrywide heap of firewood burn me? 
Then, when the five hundred men in the village had heard him expound the stanzas, they all became ascetics and attained arhatship. All the villagers, young and old, believed in the Buddha, Dharma, and Sangha. 
The Buddha quickly went to the Bamboo Grove together with the five hundred men. 
When the sage Ananda had seen that the Buddha had come together with those who had attained the Path, he came forward and said to the Buddha: “What special qualities do these monks have that they make you, Worldhonored One, personally go to save them?” The Buddha informed the Reverend Ananda: 
“When I had not yet become a Buddha, there was in the world apratyekabuddha who usually stayed in these mountains. Under a tree not far from a village he wanted to enter parinirvana . 
The villagers took firewood and set fire to the pyre. They gathered his relics, put them in a precious urn, and buried it on a mountain top. They all had an earnest wish, which was to obtain the Path later. The nirvana of such an ascetic was a joyous event! 
That is why I, the Tathagata, went to save them!” When the Buddha had said this, countless gods and men all attained the Path. 
Once the Buddha was in a pure abode in Sravastl. There were four monks who were sitting under a tree. They asked one another: “What is most sorrowful in the whole world? 
” One said: 
“Among the sorrows in the world none surpasses lust.” One said: 
“Among the sorrows in the world none surpasses anger.” One said: 
“Among the sorrows in the world none surpasses hunger and thirst.” Another said: 
“Among the sorrows in the world none sur­ passes fear.” Their dispute about the meaning of sorrow went on without end. 
The Buddha knew what they were disputing and went to where they were. He asked the monks: “What are you arguing about?” They then stood up, did obeisance, and gave a full explanation of what they were arguing about. 
The Buddha said to the monks: 
“Your arguments do not measure up to the meaning of sorrow. Among the sorrows in the world none surpasses the possession of a body. 
Hunger and thirst, cold and heat, anger, fear, lust, and misfortune or enmity, all come from the body. The body is the source of all sorrows and the origin of calamities. 
It makes one’s thoughts weary and brings extreme anxiety. Its stress is ten-thousandfold. Wriggling in the three realms, one is mali­ cious to another. When one is attached to a self, the birth and death cycle does not cease. 
If one wants to leave worldly suffering, one must seek for quietude. If one prop­ erly guards the body and controls his thoughts, and is tranquil and without the rise of any vain imaginings, one may obtain nir­ vana. This is the utmost pleasure.” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke these stanzas: 
tion, and minimal wisdom. If one seeks what is great through contemplation, one obtains the great pleasure. what it is to be free from grief. 
I have rightly transcended the three realms and I alone have subdued the Maras. 
After the Buddha had spoken the stanzas, he informed the monks: “Formerly, countless ages ago, there was a monk with the five superknowledges called Atibalaviryaparakrama. In solitude un­ derneath a tree in the mountains he sought the Path. 
Then there were also four creatures who always maintained their security in his neighborhood. The first was a pigeon, the second a crow, the third a venomous snake, and the fourth a deer. 
These four crea­ tures went looking for food in the daytime, and in the evening they returned to spend the night. 
One night the four creatures asked each other: ‘What is the most serious cause of sorrow in the world?’ The crow said: ‘Hunger and thirst are the most serious. 
Its apprehensions are immeasurable. That is why I have left the worldly realm to apply myself to the Path. I extinguish my bad thoughts and do away with imaginings. I do not covet the four great elements. 
When one’s distress has forever ended, he will know great peace.’ When the four crea­ tures heard this, their minds opened up.” The Buddha informed the monks: “ The monk with the five superknowledges at that time was myself. 
The four creatures then are you four people now. 
In a previous existence, you had already heard the meaning of the root of suffering; why then did you argue again?” When the monks heard this, they felt ashamed and reproved themselves. 
Immedi­ ately they attained arhatship in the presence of the Buddha. 
Pleasure Once, when the Buddha was in a pure abode in SravastI, there were four monks in their first stages of study. 
“Drinking wine together during a happy occasion with relatives, and playing music, song, and dance, these are utmost pleasures.” Another said: 
“When one’s wives are just right, their ornamented garments fresh and new, when their perfume is fragrant, and when they give rein to the passions as one likes, this is utmost plea­ sure. 
” The Buddha knew that the four persons deserved to be saved, but that they had thoughts about the six desires without consid­ ering their own impermanence. So he called the four monks and asked them: “While you were sitting there together under a tree, what were you discussing? 
” When the four monks truthfully re­ lated what they were most happy about, the Buddha informed the four: “What you were discussing is completely in the path of dis­ tress and great danger. It is not the way of enduring peace and utmost pleasure. 
All things flourish in spring but decay in au­ tumn and winter. One’s relatives may mean joy and pleasure, but they will all go away. Riches, carriages, and horses become the shares of the five families. The beauty of wives rules love and hate. 
When a common man dwells in the worldly realm, he gives rise to the misfortune of enmity. He endangers himself and exterminates his own family. His sorrows are immeasurable. The suffering of the three woeful destinations and the eight hardships are enor­ mous. 
Therefore, monks, reject the worldly realm and seek for the Path! Set your mind on the unconditioned and do not covet splendor! Attaining nirvana is utmost pleasure.” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: 
Without love , wherewith the distress and wherewith the fear? 
Without any affection, wherewith the distress and where­ with the fear? brings fear. If one is freed from any covetousness, where­ with the distress and wherewith the fear? 
fulfilled, when one is utterly sincere and knows shame, and when one approaches the Path in one’s personal conduct, one is held dear by the crowd. 
thinks what is right and tells it so, and when one’s mind is free from covetousness, one is certain to cross the stream and be delivered. 
The Buddha informed the four monks: “Once there was a king called P’u-an. He was on friendly terms with the four kings of his neighboring countries. He invited these four kings to a feast, and for a whole month they wined and dined and amused themselves. 
On the day of parting King P’u-an asked the four kings: ‘Living in the world, what do you think is most pleasant?’ One king said: ‘Games are most pleasant. 
‘A happy meeting with relatives and music are most pleasant.’ Another king said: ‘When, while amassing many riches, one’s desires are in accord with one’s wishes, this is most pleasant.’ Another king said: ‘Giving reign to one’s passions in lust, this is most pleasant.’ King P’u-an said: ‘What you are dis­ cussing, sirs, is the basis of suffering, the origin of distress. 
It would be better to be at rest, without any longing or desires, and to be dispassion­ ate and keep one’s concentration. Obtaining the Path issues forth happiness.’ When the four kings heard this, they were delighted and gained pious understanding.” The Buddha informed the monks: “King P ’u-an at the time was myself. 
The four kings were the four of you. 
We had this discussion before. Therefore I shall not offer any explanation now. The birth and death cycle goes on as creepers grow. 
How can one rest at all?” Then, when the four monks had heard these meaningful words again, they felt shame and remorse for their error. But their minds opened up. They extin­ guished their evil thoughts, eradicated their desires, and attained arhatship. 
Anger Once the Buddha was on Mount G rdhrakuta in Rajagrha. 
Devadatta and King Ajatasatru were discussing how to destroy the Buddha and his disciples. The king ordered his countrymen not to serve the Buddha. When the Buddha’s community of monks went begging for alms, they could not receive any donation. 
The Venerable Sariputra, Maudgalyayana, Kasyapa, and Subhuti, and also the nuns, such as Mahaprajapatl, all led their disciples to another country. Only the Buddha and five hundred arhats stayed on Mount Grdhrakuta. 
Devadatta went to King Ajatasatru and consulted with the king: “ The Buddha’s disciples are scattered now, but there still are five hundred disciples in the Buddha’s presence. 
Please, O King, invite the Buddha to come to the city tomorrow. I shall make five hundred big elephants drunk. When the Buddha enters the city, I shall provoke the drunken elephants so that they will trample him to death and make an end to his kind. 
I shall be the Buddha instead and convert the world!” Upon hearing this, King Ajatasatru was happy, and he immediately went to where the Buddha was. He kowtowed and did obeisance, and said to the Buddha: “ Tomorrow I shall arrange for a modest gift. I would like humbly to invite you, World-honored One, and your disciples to a meal in my palace.” The Buddha knew his plan and answered: 
We shall go tomorrow morning.” The king withdrew and left. Upon his return he said to Devadatta: “The Buddha has accepted my invitation. In agreement with our previous plan you must make the elephants drunk. 
Look out and wait for him!” The next day at mealtime, the Buddha and his five hundred arhats entered the gate of the city. Five hundred drunken elephants came forward trumpeting. They rushed against the walls and knocked down the trees. People panicked and the whole city was terrified. 
The five hundred arhats flew up into the air. Only the Venerable Ananda stayed by the Buddha’s side while the drunk elephants all charged straight toward the Buddha. The Buddha merely raised his hand, and his five fingers appropriately changed to five lion kings. They all roared with the same voice and made heaven and earth tremble. 
The king and his subjects were all overawed. 
The Worldhonored One slowly came forward and arrived at the king’s pal­ ace. After he had eaten with his arhats, he recited a formula. 
The king said to the Buddha: “My nature is not bright. I believed in calumny and I started doing evil. My scheme was not right. 
Please have great mercy and forgive me for my foolishness.” Thereupon the World-honored One informed Ajatasatru and the whole great multitude: “In the world there are eight things that increase slan­ der, all stemming from fame. Furthermore, by coveting gain and honors one brings about great sins, unending for eons. 
Which eight? 
Gain and loss, defamation and fame, praise and ridicule, suffering and pleasure. 
From olden times to the present one sel­ dom is free from them.” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: 
When a wise man keeps the precepts, he is not ridiculed. 
After the Buddha had spoken the stanzas, he again informed the king: “Once there was a king who liked to eat the meat of wild geese. He used to dispatch a hunter to spread his nets and catch geese. The hunter presented a goose a day to provide for the king’s meal. 
Then there was a goose king who flew down at the head of five hundred geese to seek for food. The goose king fell into the net and was caught by the hunter. The other geese kept flying about in consternation and did not leave. 
There was a particular goose who kept fluttering about and followed, without avoiding bows and arrows. It cried in a piteous way, spitting blood, never ceasing, day and night. 
When the hunter saw this righteous behavior, he felt compassion. He then set the goose king free, so that he might go with the others. When the flock of geese had reclaimed their king, they surrounded him full of joy. 
The hunter then told every­ thing to the king. The king also sensed the righteous act and henceforth stopped catching geese.” The Buddha informed King Ajatasatru: “The goose king at that time is myself. 
The particular goose is the worthy Ananda. 
The flock of five hundred geese are the present five hundred arhats. 
The king who ate geese is you now, great king. 
The hunter then is Devadatta now. 
Since his former existence he has constantly desired to harm me. Because of the power of my great compassion, he was saved. Disregarding his enmity, I have brought about my becoming a Buddha. 
” When the Buddha explained this, the king and his ministers were all delighted. 
Defilements Once there was a man without brothers. When he was a child his parents loved him dearly. They were compassionate and diligent, and wanted him to grow up perfect. They took him to teachers and urged him to study writing. 
But the child was arrogant and never paid any attention. He discarded in the evening what he had received in the morning. He did not remember anything. Thus it was for several years and he did not know anything. 
His par­ ents called him back to let him manage the family’s affairs. But their child was boastful and was not diligent in his endeavors. The family consequently became destitute and everything seemed to slip away. 
The son was heedless and did not care to keep any records, selling off family possessions. He was buoyant and did as he pleased. He let his hair become disheveled, went barefoot, and wore unclean clothes. He was stingy and impudent, and did not heed shame and disgrace. 
First of all he harbored resentment against his parents, and then he reproved his teachers: “The spirits of my ancestors are unwilling to help me. They let me weep even though I am in such dire straits. It would be better to serve the Buddha and be able to obtain merit. 
” So he went to where the Buddha was and did obeisance. He came forward and said to the Buddha: “0 Buddha, your Path is vast, and it does not exclude anyone. I wish to be your disciple. 
I beg to receive your permission.” The Buddha informed him: “Well, if you want to seek for the Path, you must practice the pure ways. You bring common worldly taints if you enter my Path. 
” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: taint for the household. Want of dignity is a taint on appearance. Heedlessness is a taint of action. 
In this world and the next, evil is always a taint. foolishness. 
When the man had heard the stanzas, he understood his arro­ gance and foolishness. He accepted the Buddha’s instructions and responded with joy. 
Reflecting upon the meaning of the stanzas, he repented and reformed. He served his parents with filial piety and respected his teachers. He studied the path of the scriptures and diligently conducted his affairs as a layman. He followed the precepts and kept control of himself. 
Three years later he went back to where the Buddha was. He fell prostrate in obeisance and he related in good faith: My respect is utterly real and I have made my image complete. Rejecting evil and doing what is wholesome, I am congratulated by both high and low. 
“Welcome!”, his hair fell off and he immediately became an ascetic. Inwardly he reflected on tranquility and insight, the four truths, and the right path. As his zeal increased daily, he attained arhatship. 
The Righteous Once there was an elder brahman called Satyaka Nirgrantha. 
He had five hundred disciples but he was haughty and proud of himself, without any regard for the world. He plated his belly with a sheet of iron. When someone asked him why, he said: “Because I am afraid my knowledge may overflow.” When he heard that the Buddha had appeared in the world to convert people to the Path which has illuminated the world far and wide, he harbored jealousy and at no time was he at ease. 
He said to his disciples: “I hear that the ascetic Gautama calls himself a Buddha. I shall go now and ask him very profound and subtle questions that will make his heart palpitate and he will not know what to say.” He immediately went with his disciples to the Jetavana and lined up outside the gate. 
From a distance they saw that the World-hon­ ored One’s majestic splendor was as grand as the sun that has just risen. Their five feelings were aroused and their joy was mingled with fear. They then advanced to the front and did obeisance to the Buddha. The Buddha told him to sit. 
After they were seated, Nirgrantha asked the Buddha: “What is said to be a follower of the Path? W hat is said to be a learned one? 
W hat is said to be an elder? 
What is said to be a monk? 
What is said to be a sage? 
What is said to be the attainment of the Path? 
What is said to be the maintenance of the precepts? 
If you can explain these to me, I wish to become your disciple.” Thereupon the Worldhonored One contemplated the questions, and answered with the following stanzas: who behaves with right thoughts and cherishes precious wisdom, he is said to be in the Path. 
who is without fear and apprehension, and guards what is wholesome, is a learned one. 
Although his appearance is mature and his hair white, he may just be foolish. 
self-controlled and benevolent, and whose knowledge and understanding are pure, he is an elder. 
flower, or is one who jealously covets vain ornaments and whose words differ from his conduct, is wise and without hatred, he is said to be upright. 
taken the tonsure, while he continues to lie, covet, and desire like a common man. 
extensively, calms his thoughts by extinguishing his bad intentions, he is said to be an ascetic. 
begging while he continues to aspire for salvation with wrong conduct and seek fame for its own sake. 
practices clean living, whose wisdom enables him to destroy evil, he is a monk. 
entertaining impure thoughts, only externally controlled. 
internal behavior is pure, one who is tranquil here and everywhere, he is a sage. 
saves not a single being but the whole world, doing no harm in the Path. he is eloquent. 
He may have little learning, but if he personally relies on his conduct according to the Doctrine, and if he keeps the Path and does not forget it, he is versed in the Doctrine. 
When Satyaka Nirgrantha and his five hundred disciples heard these stanzas of the Buddha, they were delighted and their minds opened up. They rejected their haughtiness and all became ascetics. Nirgrantha alone manifested the mind of a bodhisattva, and his five hundred disciples all attained arhatship. 
Practicing the Path Once there was a brahman who had gone forth in his youth to study. Until the age of sixty, however, he was unable to obtain the Path. 
If at sixty one had not attained the Path, according to the rules of the brahmans, one should then return home, take a wife, and live at home. He had a son who was upright and lovely. At the age of seven he exhibited great intelligence in his study. He was eloquent and sometimes said things that were beyond people’s grasp. 
Exhausted, he fell prostrate on the corpse and when he rose again his relatives admonished him and took him away by force to prepare the corpse for burial outside the city. 
The brahman thought to himself: “I reckon that my weeping now will not do any good. It would be better to go to King Yamaraja and beg for my son’s life. 
” Thereupon the brahman cleansed himself, fasted, and offered flowers and incense. 
“Where is the place that King Yamaraja holds his court?” He kept going for several thousands of li, and when he arrived deep in the mountains he saw brahmans who had attained the Path. 
“What do you, sir, seek by asking about the place where King Yamaraja holds his court?” He answered: 
I want to go to King Yamaraja to beg him for my son’s life. I want to bring him back to his family and raise him, and prepare for my old age. 
“The place where King Yamaraja holds his court is not a place a living person can go to. We shall show you, sir, the right direction. If you go more than four hundred li westward from here, there is a large stream, and in it is a city. This is a city where divine spirits stay when they are on an inspection round in the world. 
When he arrived by the stream, he saw a marvelous city. Its palaces and houses were like those of the Trayastrimsa gods. 
The brahman went to the gate, burned incense, raised his feet, and recited incantations, wanting to meet King Yamaraja. 
When King Yamaraja gave the order to meet and question him, the brahman stated: “At a late moment in my life I had a son and wanted to prepare for my old age. I brought him up for seven years, but recently his life ended. Please, great king, be merciful and generous! 
Give me back my child’s life!” King Yamaraja said: 
Your son, sir, is now disporting in the eastern garden. 
He then went ahead, embraced him, and wept for him. He said: “While I was thinking of you night and day, my meals and sleep were not pleasant. Did you ever think of the suffering of your parents?” The small child was frightened and rebuked him, saying: 
“I have heard that the ascetic Gautama knows how to transform man’s spirit. 
I shall go and ask him.” Thereupon the brahman returned to where the Buddha was. 
The Buddha then was in the Jetavana of SravastI, expounding the Doctrine to his great multitude. When the brahman saw the Buddha, he kow­ towed, did obeisance, and gave a full explanation of the circum­ stances to the Buddha: “He is truly my son, but he does not want to be called so. On the contrary, he says that I am a foolish old man. 
Why is it so?” The Buddha informed the brahman: “You are really foolish. 
Father and mother, wife and child, they come together because of certain circumstances, just like a guest who rises and departs. Bound by foolishness one still reckons them to be one’s own. One does not recognize them as the basis of one’s sorrow and distress. Immersed in the cycle of birth and death, one does not rest yet. 
Only the wise do not covet affection. He is aware of suffering but rejects its cause as such. He diligently cultivates the scriptural precepts. Since he has done away w ith any imaginings, his cycle of birth and death has ended. 
” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: contemplate the principle of disease, death will come all of a sudden, just as quickly as swirling waters. 
there be for other relatives? Relying on a relative when one’s life has ended is like a blind man holding on to a torch. 
the scriptural precepts. Diligently practicing to cross the world, one may completely remove suffering. 
away the clouds. He who has extinguished his imaginings has insight. unconditioned nature. 
The wise one receives the right teaching and ends the cycle of birth and death. When the brahman heard the stanzas, he suddenly understood. 
He knew that life was impermanent and that wife and child are just like transient guests. He kowtowed and made an obeisance. Upon his wish to become an ascetic the Buddha said: 
“Excellent!” His hair fell off of itself and he donned the robe of the Doctrine. He immediately became a monk. By reflecting on the meaning of the stanzas, he extinguished his craving and did away with any imaginings. There on his seat he attained arhatship. 
Miscellaneous Once the Buddha was in Sravasti, expounding the Doctrine and making conversions. Gods and dragons, demons and spirits, and the ruler and the people went to listen at three moments. 
The king at this time was called Prasenajit. As a man he was arrogant and given to pleasure. His eyes were deluded by lust, and his ears were confused by sounds. His nose was attracted to fragrances, his mouth was unrestrained about the five flavors, and his body was conditioned to subtle, smooth things. 
He became fat, unable to ride in a carriage. W hether lying down or standing up, he was indeed short of breath. His breath was obstructed and his breathing interrupted, which constantly alarmed him. He was groaning whether sitting or standing, and constantly suffered from the weight of his own body. 
While his attendants supported him, he made inquiries, withdrew, and sat down, his hands folded together. 
“Worldhonored One, from a great distance I have humbly come to visit you, asking your counsel free from any procedure. I do not know what my crime is that my body has become so bloated. 
I myself cannot perceive why I have become so. 
” The Buddha informed the great king: “There are five things that make a person corpulent. One, frequent meals; two, fondness for sleep; three, merriment; four, absence of grief; five, uneventfulness. 
These are the five things, and being fond of them makes one cor­ pulent. 
If one does not want to be corpulent, one will become lean, having diminished one’s food, not caring for it.” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanza: 
When the king heard the stanza, his joy was immeasurable. He immediately called his cook and informed him: “Accept the recita­ tion of this stanza! At mealtime, expound the stanza to me before serving the meal!” The king took his leave and returned to the palace. 
When the cook offered a meal, he forthwith expounded the stanza. When the king heard the stanza he was glad, and he diminished his meal a spoonful each day. As his meals diminished little by little, his body consequently became lighter and he eventually became as lean as before. 
When he saw his condition, he was happy and remembered the Buddha. So he stood up, walked to where the Buddha was, and did obeisance. The Buddha told him to sit down, and asked the king: “Your horses and carriage and your followers are in their usual condition now. 
That is why I have come on foot. 
You know what is best.” The Buddha informed the great king: “People in the world are so ignorant about imperma­ nence! They keep desiring all their lives long, not thinking about performing merits. When someone has died, the spirit leaves and the body remains in the grave. 
grows and becomes fatter, without any wisdom. 
As one intently covets the body, one experiences unending suffering. 
They extinguish bad thoughts and do away with desire. When their craving has ended, they are free from rebirth. 
When the king had heard the stanzas, he was glad and readily understood the meaning. He then became intent on starting on the unsurpassed right Path. Those who had been listening were countless, and they all gained the eye of the Doctrine. 
Hell In the land of SravastI there was once a brahman teacher called Purana Kasyapa. He had a following of five hundred disciples. No one, whether the king or the people, failed to wait on him. 
The Buddha had recently attained the Path and arrived in SravastI from Rajagrha with his disciples. 
Thereupon Purana Kasyapa became jealous and wanted to de­ stroy the World-honored One. He expected to be respectfully served all alone. So he led his disciples to meet with King Prasenajit and made a plea: “We elders have applied ourselves to the old teachers of the land. 
Yet you, 0 King, forsake me and want to serve only him. Now I would like to probe the qualities of the Path with the Buddha and to know who will be victorious. 
May you, O King, serve the winner all your life!” The king said: 
“Very well!” So the king went to where the Buddha was in his majestic carriage. Having greeted him, he informed him: “Purana Kasyapa wants to thoroughly test the power of the Path with you, World-honored One. I wonder if you, World-honored One, would agree.” The Buddha said: 
After a period of seven days I shall test his transformation.” The king installed two high seats in a fine place in the wide plain east of the city. They were forty chang high and adorned with the seven precious things. He made a display of pendant streamers and adjusted the seats. The distance between the two seats was two li, and the disciples of the two schools sat below them. 
Thereupon Purana Kasyapa and his dis­ ciples arrived first at his seat and he was about to climb the steps. A demon king called Pancika saw Kasyapa’s vain jealousy and raised a big storm, blowing at his high seat. His seating turned over and the pendant streamers flew about. It rained sand and shingles, and their eyes were blinded. 
Meanwhile, the high seat of the World-honored One was stable and did not move at all; the Buddha and his great multitude came in a solemn way and they directed themselves toward the high seat. After he had mounted it, straightaway the whole community of monks quietly sat down. 
The king and his ministers kowtowed even more respectfully and they informed the Buddha: “Please, confer your divine transformation, suppress our wrong views, and let the people in the land clearly hold faith in what is right and true!” Thereupon the World-honored One all of a sudden was not visible on his seat. 
Purana Kasyapa knew there was no way out. He hung his head down in shame and did not dare lift up his eyes. 
Thereupon the adamantine hero raised his adamantine bolt, and fire came from the tip of the bolt. He pointed it at Kasyapa : “Why do you not show your transformation, sir?” Kasyapa was terrified. 
He abandoned his seat and left; his five hundred disciples also removed themselves and scattered. 
The majestic countenance of the World-honored One did not delight them in their distress. He returned to the Jetavana, to the garden of Anathapindada. On the other hand, the king and his ministers were very happy and withdrew. 
” Purana Kasyapa was ashamed for his disciples. When they reached the bank of a river, he lied to his disciples: “When I throw myself into the water now, I shall cer­ tainly be reborn in the brahma heaven. 
If I do not return, know that I am happy there!” His disciples waited for him, but he did not return. They discussed among themselves: “Our master has certainly gone to heaven. Why should we stay? 
One by one they threw themselves into the water, hoping to follow their master. Unknowingly led by their wrongdoing, they all fell into hell. 
Later, when the king heard about the event, he was quite startled and felt uncanny. He went to where the Buddha was and inquired: “Why did master Purana Kasyapa and his followers err so?” The Buddha informed the king: “ Master Purana Kasyapa and his fol­ lowers did two serious wrongdoings: 
Because of these two wrongdoings, they had to fall into hell. They were prompted by their misfortune and threw themselves into the river. Their bodies have died and their spirits have departed, but the suffering they experience is immeasurable. 
That is why a wise one controls his thoughts. Internally, he does not engender what is unwholesome, and externally, evil does not arise. 
When for instance a frontier town is in contact with bandits, there is nothing to fear if the defense is solid. People inside are safe and the bandits outside cannot come in. A wise one guards himself in the same way.” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: 
actions have not been correct, who finds fault with good people, and who administers the world on the basis of false accusations, such a man, led on by his own wrongdoing, throws himself into a pit. 
both outside and inside, just so guard your thoughts! What is wrong will not arise! If, however, one’s actions are deficient, one brings on sorrow, causing one to eventually fall into hell. 
After the Buddha had spoken the stanzas, he again informed the king: “A long time ago there were two monkey kings, each head­ ing five hundred monkeys. 
One king became jealous and wanted to kill the other king. He schemed to rule all alone, and went on the attack. He repeatedly failed, however, and retreated in shame. 
He arrived at the shore of a great sea. In a bay there was a heap of foam on the water, and as the wind was blowing, it was piling up, several hundred chang high. In his foolishness the monkey king thought it was the Snowy Mountain and he said to his group: ‘I have long heard that there is a great Snowy Moun­ tain in the sea. 
The others wondered why he did not come out. They thought he was certainly very happy and jumped in one by one, thus depleting the group in drowning.” The Buddha informed the king: 
“The jealous monkey king at that time was the present Purana Kasyapa. The group was Purana Kasyapa’s present five hundred disciples. 
That other monkey king was myself. 
Be­ cause Purana Kasyapa was involved with jealousy in his earlier existence, led on by his wrongdoing he threw himself into a heap of foam, bringing an end to his group and depleting his kind. He has now slandered me again and they have all jumped into the river. 
The retribution for his evil will make him burn for eons with­ out any limit.” When the king heard this, he gained pious under­ standing. 
Similes with the Elephant Once, when Rahula had not yet attained the Path, his nature was rude and his words untrustful. 
The Buddha ordered Rahula: “Go to Amrayastika and stay in its pure abode! Guard your mouth, control your mind, and diligently develop the scriptural precepts! 
” Rahula accepted the instructions, did obeisance, and left. He stayed there for ninety days and felt shame and regret. He could not rest night or day. 
He rushed forward and greeted the Buddha. He arranged a rope bed and adjusted his clvara . The Buddha occu­ pied the rope bed and told Rahula: “Take some water with your washing bowl and wash my feet for me!” Rahula accepted the in­ struction and washed the Buddha’s feet. 
When it was done, the Buddha said to Rahula: 
“Do you see the water to wash the feet in the washing bowl?” Rahula said to the Buddha: 
“Indeed, I see it!” The Buddha said to Rahula: 
“Can one use this water for food and drink, to wash the hands, or to rinse the mouth?” Rahula said: 
This water was originally clean, but having washed your feet it is defiled now. That is why one must not use it again.” The Buddha said to Rahula: 
“ The same applies to you. Even though you are my son and the grandson of the king, even though you have given up worldly splendor and emoluments to become an ascetic, you do not pay attention to strenuous pursuit while controlling your thoughts and guarding your mouth. The impurity of the three poisons fills your feelings, just like this water which cannot be used again.” The Buddha fur­ ther said to Rahula: “ Throw away the water in the washing bowl! 
” Rahula immediately threw it away, and the Buddha said to Rahula: “Even though the washing bowl is empty, may one not fill it again with food and drink?” He said: “One must not! 
Because it is known as a washing bowl that has been defiled.” The Buddha said to Rahula: “The same applies to you. Even though you are an ascetic, your mouth is not trustworthy. Your disposition is overbearing and you do not pay attention to strenuous pursuit. 
You have a bad reputation, just like the washing bowl that must not be filled up with food.” The Buddha kicked away the washing bowl with his toes, and it rolled of its own accord, jumping away several times before it stopped. 
The Buddha said to Rahula: “Would you be careful with this washing bowl, afraid it might break?” Rahula informed the Buddha: “A basin to wash the feet is something cheap. 
” The Buddha said to Rahula: “The same applies to you. 
Even though you are an ascetic, you do not control your body and mouth. Many are injured by your harsh words. You are not loved by the multitude and the wise do not cherish you. When your body dies and your spirit leaves, you will be twisting in the three woeful destinations. 
As you are born and die, your suffering will be im­ measurable, not pitied by any Buddha or noble one, just as you said not to care for the washing bowl.” When Rahula heard this, he felt shame and fear. 
The Buddha informed Rahula: “Let me explain it with a simile. 
Once a king had a huge elephant who was fierce and keen in battle. His strength was superior to that of any of the five hundred smaller elephants. 
That king raised an army and wanted to attack an opposing country. He dressed up the elephant with iron armor, and assigned an elephant master to control it. He tied a couple of halberds to the two teeth of the elephant. He also attached two double-edged swords to his two ears and tied curved swords to the four legs of the elephant. 
The elephant just hid his trunk, guarding it and did not use it to fight. The elephant master was glad, knowing that the elephant was protecting his life. 
An elephant’s trunk is soft, and if it is hit by an arrow the elephant will die. 
When the elephant had been fighting for a long time, however, he would thrust his trunk looking for a sword. The elephant master did not like it because he thought that this fierce elephant did not have any regard for his own life. Thrusting his trunk looking for a sword, he wanted to hold it with the tip of his trunk. The king and his ministers were concerned about this huge elephant and they decided not to let him fight again. 
” The Buddha informed Rahula: “Men commit nine evils, but they merely have to guard their mouth, just as this huge elephant guarded its trunk and did not fight. 
Why so? He was afraid to be hit by an arrow and die. 
That is why man likewise guards his mouth. He must fear the three woeful destinations and the suffering in hell. 
If he commits all ten evils and does not guard his mouth, he might lose his life like this huge elephant who thrust its trunk in a fight, not counting on being hit by an arrow! 
The same applies to man when all ten evils are committed and he does not reflect on the three woeful destinations and the suffering of the poisons. 
If how­ ever he performs the ten wholesome actions, controls his body, mouth, and mind, and commits no evil, he may obtain the Path and be free from the three destinations and the calamity of repeat­ ing the cycle of birth and death.” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: 
With trustworthiness I shall save people without moral precepts. mounted by a king. A well-regulated person is most respected and is bestowed trust. 
When Rahula heard the earnest admonitions of the Buddha, he was moved and encouraged. He remembered them and did not forget. He was full of zeal but mild, and his forbearance was like the earth. His imaginings quieted down and he attained the path of the arhat. 
Once the Buddha was in the pure abode of the Jetavana in the land of Sravasti, proclaiming the great Doctrine to the disciples of the four divisions, to gods, dragons, and spirits, and to the ruler and his subjects. 
At that time there was an elder layman called Ho-t’i-t’an . He came to where the Buddha was, did obeisance to the Buddha, withdrew, and sat aside. He folded his hands, knelt deeply and said to the World-honored One: “I have long been receiving your great teaching, looking up to you and serving you, but under the pressure of personal matters I have been incapable. 
Please be merciful!” The World-honored One had him take a seat and asked him where he had come from and his name. He knelt deeply and answered: 
My name is Hastidamaka, and at the time of the former king I was the king’s elephant tamer.” The Buddha asked the lay­ man how many principles are necessary in taming elephants, and he replied: 
“I always tame a big elephant by using three things. 
Which three? 
One, a firm hook. I hold its mouth with it and place the reins. Two, by diminishing its food I always let it grow lean. Three, I lash it with a rod, making it feel pain. 
With these three things I can tame it w ell.” The Buddha further asked: 
That is the right way to tame it.” “If you have subdued it, what can you use it for?” He replied: “If it is subdued, it may be mounted by a king, and one may let it fight. 
“Is there just this method? 
“ To tame an elephant, there is just this way!” The Buddha informed the lay disciple: “You can only tame an elephant. You must further be able to tame yourself! ” So he said: 
“I wonder what taming oneself may mean? 
Please, World-honored One, teach me what has not yet been made known!” The Buddha informed the lay disciple: “I also have three things by which I subdue everyone, and by means of subduing oneself, one gains access to the realm of the unconditioned. 
One, control one’s verbal actions in utmost sin­ cerity. Two, suppress one’s corporeal vigor through pure compas­ sion. Three, extinguish one’s cover of mental foolishness through wisdom. 
With these three things one may be delivered from every­ thing, be free from the three woeful destinations, realize the un­ conditioned, and not experience any sorrow or suffering caused by the cycle of birth and death.” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: and hard to restrain. It may be reined in and not given food, but it is still a very wild elephant. 
I have completely rejected its fetters and regulated it like an elephant restrained by a hook. 
and if one can always guard his thoughts, one may pull himself out of corporeal suffering, just like an elephant leaving a pitfall. 
When the lay disciple heard the stanzas, his joy was immeasur­ able. He understood deep inside, and immediately attained the eye of the Doctrine. Those who were listening were countless, and they all attained the Path. 
Craving Once the Buddha was in the land of Rajagrha, in a pure abode on Mount Grdhrakuta, expounding the great Doctrine for gods and men and for dragons and spirits. 
Then there was a man who had left his family, his wife and child, and who came to where the Buddha was. He did obeisance to the Buddha and asked to be an ascetic. The Buddha immediately accepted him as an ascetic. He instructed him to sit underneath a tree and reflect on the qualities of the Path. 
Having received his instructions, the monk went deep into the mountains, more than a hundred li from the pure abode. He sat alone among the trees and reflected on the Path for three years, but his thoughts were not firm and he wanted to return. He thought that to leave his family in search of the Path was difficult and it would be better to return quickly to see his wife and child. 
After he thought thus, he rose and left the mountains. 
With his noble penetrating insight, the Buddha saw that this monk deserved to obtain the Path, that he was returning because of his foolishness. 
With his supernatural power the Buddha trans­ formed himself into an ascetic. He went in the opposite direction and they met along the way. 
“ This place is flat. Let us sit down and talk.” There­ upon the two men sat down and talked at ease. 
We shall readily enjoy ourselves and later make plans again.” All of a sudden there appeared an old monkey who had left the forest. He was in a place without any trees and living there. 
The transformed ascetic asked the monk: “Why is this monkey all alone on the plains? 
There are no trees. 
How does he enjoy him self?” The monk replied to the transformed person: “I have been seeing this monkey for a long time. He has come to live here for two reasons. 
Which two? 
One, because of his wife and child and many relatives, he could not obtain sufficient food and drink, but it was his joy to give full rein to his mouth. 
Two, night and day he constantly went up and down the trees so that the soles of his feet were worn down and he could not find any rest. 
For these two reasons he left the trees to come and live here.” At the moment the two men were talking, they again saw the monkey going away and returning to the trees. 
The transformed ascetic said to the monk: “Did you see the monkey go back to the trees?” He answered: “I have. 
This animal is foolish. He left the trees, but then enters them again, while his group remains restive, and he is not wearied with the trouble.” The trans­ formed man said: “The same applies to you, sir. 
What is the difference this monkey! 
For two reasons you, sir, have come and entered these mountains. 
Which two? 
because your wife and dwelling were a prison. Two, because your child and relatives were shackles. 
That is why you, sir, have come in search of the Path to end the suffering attendant on birth and death. Now you want to return to your family, to renew your shack­ les and reenter the prison. Love and affection lead straight to hell.” The transformed ascetic, 1.6 chang tall, then showed his primary and secondary marks. 
His golden light shining everywhere, he moved the whole mountain. Flying birds and running animals came looking for the light. They all recognized their former lives and deeply repented their misdeeds. 
Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: although it is cut down it will still grow again. If one’s craving mind is not completely done away with, one will soon experience suffering again. 
delivered, hastens back to the trees, such acts are repeated by people. Having left their prison they reenter it. accompanied by arrogance. 
When one’s imaginings are set on desire, one is covered and does not see anything. craving acts like a creeper, one can eradicate the root of the intentions only by perceiving them distinctly through wisdom. 
When the monk saw the brightness of the Buddha’s light and heard the words of the stanzas, he was struck with fear. He fell prostrate in obeisance, confessed his sin, and apologized for his misdeed. Internally, he immediately removed himself, counted his breath, and, as a result of his tranquility and insight, attained arhatship in front of the Buddha. 
All the gods had come to listen, and they were all glad. They scattered flowers and worshiped, and their praises were immeasurable. 
Chapter XXXII Once, when the Buddha was in the land of SravastI, expounding the Doctrine to gods and men, there was a brahman elder in the city whose wealth was immeasurable. He was stingy and not fond of giving. He used to close the gate during meals and did not like to have guests. W hen it was m ealtim e he would order his gatekeeper to close the doors firmly and not let anyone enter the gate unless he had a good reason. 
The elder would immediately think of nice food, and order his wife to prepare food and drink. He instructed her to kill a plump chicken, blend it with ginger and pepper, and broil it. 
An arrange­ ment of dishes was made on the spot, and he ordered that the outside gate be closed. Husband and wife both sat down and their small child was placed in the middle. In this way, they drank and ate together. 
The parents took the chicken meat and fed the child. They did this a number of times and did not abandon the practice. 
The Buddha knew that this elder’s former merit should save him, and so he transformed himself into an ascetic. Watching while they sat down eating, he appeared in front of their seats. He uttered incantations and further mentioned that with some giving, one could obtain great merit. 
When the elder raised his head and saw the transformed ascetic, he immediately scolded him, saying: “You may be a man of the Path, but you are shameless. Why do you give offense while I sit eating with my household?” The ascetic answered: “You, sir, are foolish. 
Why would I be ashamed?” The elder asked: “I and my household, we are enjoying ourselves. 
Why would I be ashamed?” The ascetic replied: “You have killed your father and married your mother, and you worship your enemy, not knowing any shame. 
person does not consider them to be a prison. When a fool sees the adornments of wife and child, his mind is firmly attached to them. difficult to leave. 
When the elder heard these stanzas, he was startled, and asked earnestly: “Man of the Path, why do you expound these words?” The man of the Path answered: 
“The chicken on your table was your father in a previous existence. Because of his stinginess he was constantly reborn among chickens to be eaten by you, sir. 
This small child was a flesh-eating devil , and you, sir, were a trader. Your father had boarded a ship and gone to sea. A sudden current shipwrecked him in the land of the raksasas, and he was eaten by a raksasa. 
And so, when his life ended after five hundred existences, the raksasa came to be your son, sir. Because your re­ maining evil is not over yet, he came with the intention to harm you. 
Your present wife was your mother in a previous existence, sir. Because her love was so strong, she now is your wife still. 
You are foolish now and you do not know your previous lives. You killed your father and fed your enemy, and you have taken your mother as your wife. The wheel of birth and death in the five destinations turns without end. Going round in the five destinations, who can know? 
Only a man of the Path sees this world and observes the other. A fool does not know. How would he not be ashamed! 
The Buddha manifested his awesome supernatural power and revealed to him his former lives. When the elder saw the Buddha, he immediately recognized his former lives. He subse­ quently repented, apologized to the Buddha, and accepted the five precepts. The Buddha expounded the Doctrine to him, and he im­ mediately became a stream-enterer. 
Once the Buddha was in the Jetavana in Sravasti, expounding the Doctrine. 
There was a young monk then who had gone to the city on his alms round. He saw a young woman whose beauty was beyond compare. His thoughts kept longing for her. Bound by de­ lusion, he could not free himself. 
When the men of the Path who were his fellows in study went to ask him what was ailing him, the young monk ex­ plained all that was on his mind. 
“I want to do away with my thoughts of the Path and follow my craving, but my wish is not fulfilled. 
I am sick with grief.” His fellow students reproved him, but it did not enter his ears. So they forced him and helped him to go to where the Buddha was. They reported the whole matter to the World-honored One. 
The Buddha informed the young monk: “Your wish is easy to obtain. It is not worth any grief. I shall expe­ diently solve this for you. 
Stand up and eat and drink!” When the monk heard this, he gained confidence and was glad, and his sad­ ness was immediately over. 
Then the World-honored One led this monk and his great multitude to the city of Sravasti, to the home of the beautiful woman. The woman had died and they had laid her corpse out for three days. Her household was in mourning and could not stand to bury her. Her body was putrid and swollen, with impurities flowing out. 
The Buddha informed the monk: “ The beautiful woman you were longing for is now like this. Everything is impermanent. Change comes within a breath. 
worm weaving a cocoon. The wise one is able to give it up. Without ogling, he removes all suffering. 
craving mind increases and he consequently builds his own prison. 
always thinks that desire is impure, and he consequently leaves his evil prison. He can do away with the calamities of old age and death. 
Thereupon, when the young monk saw that this woman had been dead for three days, that her countenance was swollen and rot­ ting, and that the stench was hard to approach, and when he fur­ ther heard the stanzas with the W orld-honored One’s pure instructions, he was sorry and his mind opened up. He knew he had been wrong. He did obeisance to the Buddha, kowtowed, and repented his error. 
He took refuge in the Buddha and was led back to the Jetavana. Throughout his life he was full of zeal, and he attained arhatship. 
When the countless people in the crowd under­ stood that the desire for beauty was impure, their belief in the nature of impermanence was confirmed. Their coveting minds ceased and they attained the Path. 
Once the Buddha was in a pure abode of Sravasti, expounding the Doctrine to gods, people, and dragons. 
There was an elder there whose wealth was immeasurable. He had a son, twelve or thirteen years of age. 
When his parents died, he was young and did not know about livelihood and how to manage the affairs of the family. He wasted the riches and within a few years they were gone. He went begging some time after, but he still could not provide for himself. 
His father had a relative, an elder whose great riches were immeasurable. One day the elder met him and he asked him about his circumstances. The elder took pity on him, took him back with him, and regulated everything. He gave him his daughter in marriage and provided him with servants, carriages, and horses. 
But as a man he was lazy. He did not keep any accounts and could not provide for their livelihood. Squandering and depleting his wealth, they were more distressed by hunger every day. 
Because of his daughter the elder gave him more riches, but he squandered them as before. They consequently became destitute. 
The elder frequently gave him money, but he used it recklessly. Thinking that he could not get any result, he wanted to take the wife away and marry her to another. 
While he was talking it over with his kindred, the daughter overheard them and went back to tell her husband: “My family is powerful and can take me away from you because you cannot provide a living. What will you do? 
What plan will you make?” When he heard his wife’s words, he felt shame and thought to himself: “Yes, my merit is meager and I am full of mistakes. I am not versed in the ways o f a family livelihood or of making a living. I am going to lose my wife now and I shall be begging, just as before. 
After love one becomes covetous. 
How shall I cope with it!” He reflected and reflected and then he had an evil idea. He led his wife into their chamber and said: “I now want to die with you in the same place.” He stabbed his wife on the spot and then stabbed himself. Both were dead. 
The slaves panicked and ran to inform their elder. The elder and the young and old were alarmed, and when they came to have a look, they confirmed that they were dead. A funeral was held with their coffins and shrouds, as was the established custom in the land. 
They kept thinking about the woman and did not leave. A while later, the elder heard that the Buddha was in the world converting and expounding the Doctrine, and that those who saw him were very glad, as they forgot their sorrow and did away with their distress. He thus led the family, young and old, to where the Buddha was. They did obeisance to the Buddha, withdrew, and sat aside. 
The Buddha asked the elder where he came from. 
“Why are you so sad and unhappy?” The elder said: “My house is unfortunate. I gave my only daughter in marriage, but she happened to meet a foolish husband who could not provide for a livelihood. When I wanted to take away his wife, he killed his wife and himself. 
On our way back, we come to visit you, Worldhonored One.” The Buddha informed the elder: 
The poison of covetous­ ness destroys the self and one’s family. It even harms all beings, a fortiori man and wife. 
” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: does not seek to cross to the other shore. He longs for riches, hurting others and himself too. and delusion are the seeds. 
Therefore, when one gives to him who has passed beyond worldly things, the merits obtained are immeasurable. 
merchant is frightened and afraid. Exploiting his emotions, bandits will harm his life. That is why the wise do not covet anything. 
Then, when the elder heard the Buddha’s exposition of the stanzas, he was delighted and happy. He forgot his sorrow and removed his distress. Still in their seats, young and old, and all who were listen­ ing, destroyed their two million evil misdeeds and attained the path of the stream-enterer. 
Once the Buddha was in a pure abode in Sravasti expounding the Doctrine to gods, dragons, spirits, and the ruler and his subjects. 
Do give us your permission!” The Buddha accepted them and they then became ascetics. 
The Buddha ordered them to stay together in one room. 
While the two were staying together, they just thought of worldly desires and pleasures. Again and again they sighed for sensuous appearances. Talking about their seductive exploits, they were totally attached to them and did not forsake them. Their fondness did not cease. 
With his eye of wisdom the Buddha knew that their thoughts were disturbed and that their minds were rampant with desire. They were unable to settle down their thoughts and thus they could not be saved. 
The Buddha made one of them go away, and transformed himself into that man. He en­ tered the room and asked: “The ideas we have in mind do not go away. We might both go and have a look. 
The Buddha magically created a prostitute in the village. They both entered her dwelling and said to her: “We, men of the Path, have received the Buddha’s prohibitory precept not to perform any sexual act. It is our intention to have a look at a woman’s personal beauty. 
necessarily just five desires! If one can swiftly destroy the five desires, he is a brave one. 
After the Buddha had spoken the stanzas, he manifested his bril­ liant appearance. When the monk saw this, he was ashamed and repented of his wrongdoing. He fell prostrate and did obeisance to the Buddha, who again expounded the Doctrine to him. He was glad and gained understanding, and he attained arhatship. 
When the other man returned, he saw that his companion’s expression was happier than usual. So he asked his companion why he was like that. 
The companion then gave an explanation according to the facts. The Buddha’s great compassion had caused the rescue. Having received the World-honored One’s mercy, he had been able to escape from every suffering. 
Thereupon the monk further spoke the stanza: wanders, not giving any thought to curbing it, one will then long for her foul exposure on seeing a woman. When one’s imaginings are extinguished, one is free from sorrow. 
When his companion, the monk, heard this stanza, he immedi­ ately started reflecting. He did away with his desire, extinguished his imaginings, and attained the eye of the Doctrine. 
Nurturing by Gain Once the Buddha led his disciples to the pure abode of Ghosila in the land of Kausambi, and expounded the Doctrine to gods, men, spirits, and dragons. 
The king was called Udayana. He had a wife who practiced benevolence and was famous for her purity. He val­ ued her principles and respected her privately. 
When he heard that the Buddha had come to make conversions, he made prepara­ tions for both to go to where the Buddha was. They did obeisance to the Buddha, withdrew, and sat down according to their regular rank. 
The Buddha explained to the king, his wife, and the ladies in waiting the nature of the following: impermanence, suffering, the void, why man is reborn, that what comes together must sepa­ rate, that meeting with enmity is painful, that one is reborn in heaven because of one’s merits, and that one enters the abyss be­ cause of one’s evil. 
The king and his wife were happy and gained pious understanding. Each accepted the five precepts and became a man and wife with pure faith. They saluted the Buddha and withdrew, returning to the palace. 
There once was a brahman called Magandika who had a most lovely daughter unequaled in the society. When she was sixteen years old, no one could find fault with her. He offered a reward of a thousand taels over a period of ninety days to find that she was not an upright woman, the money would be given away, but no one complied. 
As she attained womanhood, she should find someone to marry. 
He pondered on the possible person: “If there is anyone who is as upright as my daughter, I shall give him my daughter. 
I have heard about the monk Gautama of the Sakya clan. His appearance is golden and rare in the world. 
“Your daughter’s beauty, sir, is considered good by her family, but my beauty is considered good by the Buddhas. My good appearance and beauty are in principle not the same. 
She is like a painted vase filled with excrement. What is particularly fine about that? 
Her beauty is local, attached to the great villains of her eyes, ears, nose, mouth, and body. The beauty of an outward appearance is a great per­ sonal calamity. It destroys one’s house and extinguishes one’s family. It kills relatives and harms children. 
I stand alone, all by myself. Although I am afraid of real danger, how much less would I accept your disastrous and villainous offspring! Go away, sir! I do not accept her. 
” Thereupon the brahman became angry and left. He went to King Udayana, praised the attractiveness of his daughter and told the king: “By her looks this daughter should be your con­ cubine. Because she is of age I present her to you now, O king.” When the king saw her he was happy, and immediately accepted her. 
She respectfully agreed to be his second, subordinate wife. He conferred his official seal, gold and silver, and precious things on Magandika, who respectfully agreed to be his councilor. 
When this woman obtained her rank, she was always jealous and her witch­ craft misled the king. She spoke ill of the first wife, and not just once. 
But the king put her to shame, saying: “You allure me, but your words are insolent. 
The deportment of that person [i.e., the first wife] is honorable, and yet you speak ill of her.” The thoughts of this woman were malicious as she still wanted to harm her. She kept on speaking ill, and the king was somewhat perplexed. 
His first wife kept her fast and she alone did not comply with the order. He repeated it and called her three more times, but she kept her fast and did not move. The king was in a great rage and sent someone to drag her out. He had her tied up in front of his palace and prepared to shoot her dead. 
But his wife was not afraid, as she wholeheartedly took refuge in the Buddha. The king himself shot at her, but the arrow returned to him. Another shot, and it returned at once. And so it was with several more arrows. 
The king had great fear by then. Untying her, he asked: “What artifice do you have that you bring this about?” His wife replied: 
How well said!” He immediately sent Magandika away and the second wife was returned to her parents. He correctly established his first wife in the palace. 
The king, his first wife, the women of the palace, and the crown prince made preparations to leave, and along with their ministers they all went to where the Buddha was. They did obeisance, withdrew, sat down, and listened to the Doctrine with their hands folded. 
The king then gave the Buddha a complete explanation of the event according to the facts. 
The Buddha said to the great king: “A bewitching woman has eighty-four attitudes, but there are eight main attitudes, detested by the wise. 
Namely, which eight? 
One, jealousy; two, false anger; three, insulting; four, imprecation; five, repugnancy, six, greediness; seven, fondness for embellishment; eight, a poison­ ous mouth. These are the eight main attitudes. 
The Buddha informed the great king: “The demerit and the merit performed by man has each its own real nature. The retribution reflected in each experience is ten-thousandfold, never equal. If one practices the six qualities and keeps the fast, the merits are numerous. 
Praised by the Buddhas, one will finally be reborn in the brahma heaven and the happiness based on merit will come naturally.” When the Buddha said this, the king, his wife, the ladies in waiting, and great ministers all opened up their minds and obtained the Path. 
The Ascetic Once the Buddha was in a pure abode in Sravasti, expounding the Doctrine to gods, dragons, spirits, the king, and his subjects. 
Then there was a young monk. At daybreak he donned his robe and with staff and bowl in hand, he went to a large village on his alms round. 
By the side of the main road, there was a vegetable garden cultivated by an official. At the edge of the garden he planted millet. In the outer grassy area of the garden, he had installed a net to discharge arrows. If an animal or thief were to disturb it, an arrow would be discharged upon touching the net, killing the intruder. 
A beautiful young girl guarded this garden alone. If someone wanted to go in, she called out from afar and showed the way to safely enter. Someone who did not know the way was sure to be killed by a discharged arrow. 
However, while this girl was on guard all by herself, she sang melancholy songs. Her voice was clear and bewitching. Of those who heard it, there was none who did not halt his chariot or horse. They turned around and, mincing their steps, they wanted to hurry to her, but they lingered about and did not go further. 
The Buddha saw with his three penetrating insights that if this monk went a little further, he would be killed by an arrow. Through his merit he deserved to obtain the Path, although he was misled by foolishness and over­ whelmed by the screen of desire. The Buddha had pity on his fool­ ishness and wanted to save him. He changed himself into someone clad in white and went to his side. 
thoughts and drive away desire! If one does not sever desire, a thought will accordingly run its course. When one has renounced home but is indolent, the m in d is still tainted. 
suspend it! If conduct is not clean or pure, how could it bring about the great treasures? 
tree withered by the wind. A person is of his own making. Why not be zealous? 
Having spoken these stanzas he returned to his own appearance. His primary and secondary marks were evident and his light illu­ minated heaven and earth. Anyone who saw it had his delusion cleared away and his confusion ended. They were all back in their element. 
When the monk saw the Buddha, his mind suddenly opened up, as when observing a light in darkness. He immedi­ ately fell prostrate and did obeisance to the Buddha. He kowtowed, repented his wrongdoing, confessed, and apologized to the Buddha. When he had deeply understood tranquility and insight, he at­ tained arhatship and followed the Buddha back to the pure abode. 
The countless who heard this all attained the eye of the Doctrine. 
The Brahm an Once, in the land of Ssu-ho-tieh, there were big mountains called Ssu-hsiu-che-t’o. In the mountains there were more than five hun­ dred brahmans who excelled in the superknowledges. They said to each other: 
“What we have attained is exactly nirvana.” Mean­ while, the Buddha had just appeared in the world to establish the Doctrine to open up the gate of immortality. The brahmans heard about it, but they did not go to meet him. They deserved to be saved, however, because of their previous merits. The Buddha went to them alone, without a companion. 
At the entrance of the road he sat down under a tree. As his mind concentrated in meditation C samadhi), light emitted from his body and illuminated the whole mountain. The whole mountain was ablaze as if it were on fire. 
They recited incantations over water and tried to extinguish it. They exhausted their divine pow­ ers and were unable to extinguish it. They felt strange and gave up, and then left the mountains following the road. In the distance they saw the World-honored One meditating under a tree, as if the sun had risen at the edge of the golden mountains. 
They wondered what kind of spirit he was. They approached him and gazed at him. 
The Buddha bade them sit down, and asked them where they came from. 
The brahmans replied: “We are stay­ ing in these mountains, and we have long been practicing the Path, but at dawn a fire suddenly started, burning the trees in the moun­ tains. 
We were frightened and left.” The Buddha informed the brahmans: “ This is the fire of merit. It does not harm anyone. It wants to extinguish your impurity, the fetter of delusion.” The brahmans, masters and followers, turned their heads and said to each other: 
Among the ninety-six kinds there never was this master.” They said : 
“We have heard that the son o f King Suddhodana, called Siddhartha, was not happy with his majestic position and that he has gone forth in search of Buddhahood. 
Might he not be the one?” The disciples asked the masters to question the Buddha on whether the practices of the brahmans were correct or not. 
The masters and the followers all rose and said to the Buddha: “ The scriptural doctrine of brahmans, called the four non-obstructions, including astronomy, geography, regnal rule, rules which govern the people, and the ninety-six kinds of magical arts, are the rules that should be practiced. Are these scriptural texts the way to nirvana? 
Please, O Buddha, explain and disclose what we have not yet heard!” The Buddha informed the brahmans: 
“Listen well and think about it! Countless eons of previous lives I have constantly been practicing these scriptures. Having attained the five superknowledges too, moving mountains and stopping currents, I still passed through countless cycles of birth and death. I neither attained nirvana nor did I hear of someone who had attained the Path. 
Such practices as yours cannot be those of brahmans. 
” Thereupon the World-honored One sighed and spoke the stanzas: Brahma and knows that the formations have ended, I call him a brahman. 
he is pure and has crossed the abyss and his fetters of desire are undone, I call him a brahman. 
When one sincerely practices in accord with the Doctrine, he is pure and wise. 
for what purpose is a simple coarse garment! 
When inwardly one is not free from attachment, what is the gain in one’s outward rejection! 
and all evil, like a snake casting off its skin, I call him a brahman. 
utter harsh words, and is mindful of the eightfold path, I call him a brahman. 
not fall into a gathering of gods, and does not revert back to any gathering, I call him a brahman. 
lives, where one has come from time and again, when one’s cycles of birth and death have ended, when one understands the profundity of the Path, and one is as wise as the one who is silent , I call him a brahman. 
A fter the Buddha had spoken the stanzas he inform ed the brahmans: “As for what you have practiced, you think that you have already attained nirvana. Just like fish in shallow water, how could you have lasting happiness! 
It is actually missing in your lives!” When the brahmans heard his teaching, an inner joy arose in their five feelings. They knelt deeply and said to the Buddha that they wished to be his disciples. 
Their hair fell off naturally and they immediately became ascetics. Because they had previously conducted themselves in purity, they attained the Path and became arhats. The gods, dragons, and spirits of the mountains all attained the Path. 
Nirvana Once the Buddha was on Mount Grdhrakuta near the city of Rajagrha, together with one thousand two hundred fifty monks. 
Should we rather raise troops to attack them?” In the land there was a wise lord, the prime minister, called Varsakara, who replied: 
“Yes, indeed.” The king said to Varsakara: “ The Buddha is not far from here. With his three insights of a noble sage there is nothing he does not see clearly. 
When he ar­ rived, he did obeisance to the Buddha, his head touching the ground. 
The Buddha bade him sit down and he took a seat. The Buddha asked the prime minister where he came from, and the minister replied: 
“ The king sends m e.” He kowtowed at the Buddha’s feet and asked how he was, whether he was taking his meals as usual. 
The Buddha then asked the lord: “Are the king, the people, and the subjects of his land all in peace?” The minister said that the sovereign of the land and the people were all receiv­ ing the Buddha’s grace. 
He informed the Buddha: “The king feels dislike toward the country of Vrji and wants to attack it. Can he, according to your noble opinion, 0 Buddha, gain a victory?” The Buddha informed the minister: 
“If the people of the country of Vrji are carrying out seven rules, one cannot have victory over them. 
The king must think carefully! He must not initiate any­ thing recklessly!” The minister then asked the Buddha what the seven rules were. 
The Buddha said: “The people of Vrji frequently gather together to discuss the right Doctrine. While developing merit they guard themselves and take this to be their norm. This is namely the first . 
The people of the country of Vrji, the ruler, and his ministers are in constant harmony. They are very loyal in their duties. Whether instructing or carrying out their duties, they do not offend anyone. This is namely the second . 
The people of Vrji are involved in observing the Law. There is nothing they do not attend to, and they also do not dare commit any violation. Superior and inferior comply with the rules. This is namely the third . 
The people of Vrji are courteous and re­ spectful. Men and women are separate, but the old and young are together. They do not commit any breach of the rules of proper deportment. This is namely the fourth . 
The people of Vrji piously care for their parents and are obedient to their elders. They receive instructions on the acceptance of the precepts and con­ sider this to be a national rule. This is namely the fifth . 
They venerate the gods of the soil and grain. They respectfully comply with the four seasons, and do not neglect farming. This is namely the sixth . The people of the country of Vrji honor the Path and respect virtue. 
When someone has come from afar, they worship him and provide clothing, bedding, and medicine. This is namely the seventh . 
Now, when the lord of a country acts according to these seven rules, he cannot easily be endangered. Even if all the people in the world went to attack him, they could not gain a victory.” The Buddha informed the minister: 
“If the people of Vrji were to observe even a single rule, one still must not attack them. How much less when they observe all seven such rules!” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanza: 
one wins, one shall suffer further yet. 
When Prime Minister Varsakara heard the stanza expounded by the Buddha, he immediately attained the Path. Young and old at the meeting all attained the path of the stream-enterer. 
The minister then rose from his seat and said to the Buddha: “ The affairs of the state are very troublesome. I wish to return. 
Please excuse me.” The Buddha said: 
“You may, but keep this event in mind.” He then rose from his seat, did obeisance to the Buddha, and left. Upon his return he reported everything to the king, who then gave up his attack. He upheld the Buddha’s majestic teaching and thereby transformed his nation. 
The people of Vrji then came and obeyed his orders. Superiors and inferiors were respectful to one another and the land consequently prospered. 
The Birth and Death Cycle Once the Buddha was in the pure abode of the Jetavana in the land of Sravasti, widely expounding the wondrous Doctrine to gods and men and to the king and his high officials. 
There was an elderly brahman who was dwelling along the road and his wealth was immeasurable. He had a son who was twenty years of age and who had recently married, not yet fully seven days. Husband and wife respected each other and their words were in harmony. The wife said to her husband: 
He fell to the ground, was injured badly, and died. The whole family, young and old, was in a frenzy as they ran to where the son was. Calling out to heaven they mourned but then stopped and came to their senses again. Kinsmen far and near came in countless numbers, and they were all very grieved. 
Thereupon the World-honored One was saddened by their foolishness. He went to ask how they were. When the household of the elder, young and old, saw the Buddha, they were moved and did obeisance. They stated their hardship in detail. 
Everything is impermanent and can­ not possibly remain long! Having come into existence, one will die, and evil and merit will follow. As for this son, in three places one weeps for him. The distress may cease, but still it is hard to over­ come. 
Whose son is it, after all? 
Having received a form, life moves like lightning, flowing night and day and difficult to halt. 
If life expires, it will be reborn, but evil and merit are not lost. but delusion remains longer as a result of desire. One creates and experiences one’s own suffering and happiness. Although the body dies, the spirit does not perish. 
When the elder heard the stanzas, he understood their meaning and forgot his sorrow. He knelt deeply and said to the Buddha: “What evil did this son commit in his previous life, that he met an untimely death in his wonderful life? 
Please explain the misdeed he committed previously!” The Buddha informed the elder: “Well, in the past there was a young child who played with bow and arrows among the divine trees. Nearby there were three other people. 
When they saw a sparrow high on a tree, the young child wanted to shoot it down. The three people urged him on: ‘If you can hit the sparrow, people will praise you as a hero.’ The young child thought it was fine. He drew his bow and shot the sparrow which died instantly, falling to the ground. 
They passed through the cycle of birth and death for countless eons. They encountered each other wherever they existed and all met and experienced their evil. One of the three people had merit, however, and he is now in heaven. One is reborn in the sea and has transformed there into a dragon king. 
This young child was previously reborn in heaven and was the son of a god. When his life ended he descended and was reborn as your son, 0 elder. He fell from the tree, and when his life ended he was immediately reborn in the sea as the son of the transformed dragon king. On the very day of his rebirth a transformed bird king with golden wings took him and ate him up. 
Now two are distressed and weep in three places, I would say. 
Because they joined him in their merriment the retribution of these three is to weep.” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: 
Just as a seed accords with its former appearance , retribution natu­ rally follows one’s shadow. 
When the Buddha had spoken the stanzas, he wanted to open up the mind of the elder. So he manifested his previous life with his power of the Path, fully showing the events in heaven and among the dragons. 
The elder’s mind opened up and he rose with joy. He knelt deeply, folded his hands, and said to the Buddha: “I and the young and old wish to be your disciples, O Buddha, dedicating ourselves to the five precepts and becoming upasakas.” The Buddha then conferred the precepts, and once again expounded the Doctrine and the meaning of impermanence to them. 
The Advantage of the Path Once there was a king who ruled according to the right Doctrine; and the people longed for a change. But he had no heir apparent and this was sad. 
When the Buddha came to his country, he went out to visit the Honored One. Listening to the scriptures, he was glad, and he immediately accepted the five precepts. He observed them respectfully with all his heart, but his only wish was to have a son. Night and day he was zealous, not lax during the three moments. 
He had a servant who was eleven years old and who constantly served him. The servant was faithful, trustful, served the Law, and did not lose the dignity of his demeanor. He was humble, forbearing, and zealous. With all his heart he applied him­ self to the recitation of scriptural stanzas. 
All of a sudden he fell seriously ill and it resulted in his death; but his spirit returned and became the king’s son. He was reared to adult­ hood and at fifteen years of age he was established as the heir apparent. 
When the life of the king, his father, had ended, by way of inheritance he became the king. He was arrogant and licen­ tious, lewd and lustful. Night and day he was indolent and he did not manage the affairs of the land. His officers of state gave up the court and the people suffered from calamity. 
The Buddha knew that this behavior was not in agreement with his office, and so he led his disciples to that country. 
When the king heard about the Buddha’s arrival, he did exactly as the late king. He welcomed him with a large crowd, kowtowed to the ground, withdrew, and sat on the king’s seat. The Buddha said to the king: “ The officers, the people, the officials, and ministers, are they all their usual selves?” The king said: 
In this land there is no one else.” The Buddha said to the king: “ Do you know now, O king, where you actually came from or what merit you have performed to obtain this royal posi­ tion?” The king said: “I wonder. In my ignorance I do not under­ stand. 
I do not know where I came from in the previous world.” The Buddha said to the great king: “Actually one becomes a king through five things. 
Which are the five? 
One, through giving one becomes a king. all people offer with reverence palaces and halls, and one’s wealth is without limit. 
Two, constructing temples, and worshiping the Buddha, Dharma, and Sangha with bedding and decorative hangings, through this one becomes king. 
Three, personally revering the Honorable Things and all venerables, through this one becomes a king. All people do obeisance to him. 
Four, forbearance of the three of the body and the four of the mouth, and seeing that the mind is without its three evils, through these one becomes a king. All who see this are glad. 
Five, in learning one always strives for wisdom. Through this one becomes a king. When making decisions about the affairs of the land, all respectfully apply them. 
When one practices these five things, one will be a king in every existence.” Then the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: ruler, his father, his teacher, and men of the Path; when he is trustful, moral, charitable, learned, and wise, he will finally be lucky and peaceful in his rebirth. 
When one brings peace to the world with the Path and serves the Doctrine, all will follow him. 
thinking is clear, his merit gradually increases. As for merit’s recompense, it does not matter whether one is revered or despised. 
The Buddha said to the king: “At the time of your previous exist­ ence, O King, you were a servant of the great king. You faithfully served the Buddha and the Doctrine with purity. You served the Sangha with respect, your relatives with piety, and your lord with loyalty. 
It was thus that your merit followed you and you became the king’s son, complementing the king’s splendor. 
Now you are honorable, but you are, on the other hand, indolent. 
If you are a king, you must practice the five things. 
What are the five things? 
One, guiding all people, without being condescending or abusive. 
Two, training the officers, and receiving and giving in timely fash­ ion. 
Three, mindfulness to the development of one’s actions, while the merits do not cease. 
Four, trust in the right admonitions of loyal ministers, and do not accept slandering words that will harm those in the right. 
Five, do not allow the mind to be negligent, covetous, and desirous for affection. 
If one practices these five things, one’s fame will extend to the four seas, and prosperity will come naturally. 
If one forsakes these five things, no principle will work. When people are in straits, their thinking is confused. When officers are weary, their authority does not function. 
When loyal ministers do not dare to ad­ monish, and their thoughts are heedless, the land is not managed. 
In such condi­ tions you will lose your good name, and later you will have no m erit.” Thereupon the World-honored One further spoke the stanzas: and refrains from wrong, and one controls his thoughts and overcomes all evil, such a one is a righteous king. 
kindness, and one is compassionate and likes to benefit others, benefiting them with impartiality, all feel close to such a one. 
When the Buddha had said this, the king was very glad. He rose and stood in front of the Buddha. He fell prostrate in obeisance, confessed, and apologized to the Buddha. He immediately accepted the five precepts. 
Once the Buddha was in the land of SravastI, in the pure abode of the Jetavana, expounding the unsurpassed great Doctrine to gods and men, to the king, high officials, and the four classes of dis­ ciples. 
In the south of the land of SravastI there were deep moun­ tains. A wild elephant often appeared there which had three colors: white, blue, and black. 
The king wanted to have a famous great fighting elephant. So he dispatched someone to catch it and bring it back to be tamed by an elephant master. Within three years the elephant could be mounted and ordered into battle. 
At that time there also was a divine elephant, brought forth by a dragon. Its body was as white as snow and its tail as red as cinnabar. The two tusks looked like they were gold colored. When the hunter saw this exceptionally fine elephant, he returned to inform the king that there was another big elephant of such an appearance and fit to be ridden by a great king. 
The king immediately called more than thirty elephant catchers and ordered them to catch this elephant. 
They all went to where the elephant was and set a snare to catch it, but the divine elephant knew what was on their minds. So it immediately came forward as if to fall into their trap. When they all came and wanted to catch it, the elephant became angry and rashly kicked and jumped at them. Those nearby were killed and those further away fled, but the elephant did not give up its pursuit. 
On the flanks of the mountain there were young men of the Path, full of vigor and daring. They had been applying themselves to the Path in the mountains for a very long time, but they had not yet attained a concentrated mind. When one of the men of the Path saw from a distance the elephant chasing after and killing people, he felt pity and wanted to rescue them, full of confidence and brave. 
When the Buddha saw this from afar, he was afraid that this monk would be killed by the divine elephant. So he went to the elephant’s side and emitted a great bright light. When the elephant saw the Buddha’s light, its anger ceased and its wrath was dispelled. It did not chase and kill people any longer. 
When the monk saw the Buddha, he drew back and did obeisance to him. 
The Buddha then spoke the stanza to the monk: only bring suffering and calamities on yourself. Evil intentions mean one’s death, and that one will never reach a wholesome place. 
When the monk had heard the stanza, he immediately kowtowed, confessed, and apologized for his wrongdoing. He inwardly and deeply rebuked himself and really felt himself to be wrong. In front of the Buddha he immediately attained arhatship. 
The men who had been catching the elephant came to their senses again. Those who had fled returned and they all attained the Path. 
Once the Buddha was on Mount Grdhrakuta in Rajagrha. 
King Bimbisara then had a high official who had committed an offense. He discharged him and moved him to the mountains in the south, a thousand li from his country. 
Moreover, nobody lived there and the five cereals did not grow. But when the high official arrived there, the spring water flowed in excess and the five cereals grew in abundance. Those who were suffering from hunger or cold in the countries in the four quarters all came to this mountain. Within a few years there were three or four thousand families. 
The three elders among them and the senior members deliberated among themselves: “A country without a ruler is like a body without a head.” They went to where the high official was, and installed him as their king. 
The high official replied to the elders: “If you take me as your king, it should be in conformity with the rules of a king! High officials, left and right, and both civilian and military leaders, high and low, should visit my court! One should present women to fill my palace! 
” The elders of the land said: “Indeed! We accept your commands. 
They should be in conformity with the rules of a king!” So they established him as their king. They placed in offices ministers as well as civilian and military leaders, high and low. They incited the people to con­ struct the city walls and build houses, a palace, and pavilions. But the people were subjected to suffering, and they could not take it any more. 
villainous ministers and associ­ ates took the king out hunting. They led the king into a marshy wilderness thirty or forty li from the city with the intention of killing him. 
The king asked those around him: “Why would you want to kill m e?” They replied: 
Families are in ruin; they plot against the state.” The king informed them: “Sirs, it is of your own making. It is not my doing. If you unjustly kill me, the spirits will know about this. 
Let me have one wish so that I shall have no animosity in dying!” So he made the wish: 
If you nevertheless kill me now, I go without any real crime against the people. Should I die, I wish to become a flesh-eating devil and enter my old body again. 
I shall avenge this grievance.” Thereupon they strangled him, abandoned his corpse, and left. 
After three days the king’s spirit became a flesh-eating devil and was in his old body again. He was called Atavaka. He then rose, entered the palace, and sucked up the new king, the ladies of his harem, and the villainous ministers around him. He killed them all. 
The devil left the palace in anger, and wanted to kill everyone. 
The three elders in the land tied themselves with a straw rope and went to the flesh-eating devil to surrender volun­ tarily. “ This was done by villainous ministers. The populace could not have known this. We implore your leniency. 
I have to obtain human flesh as nourishment. 
He is wrathful and does not consider what may be grievous.” The three elders said: “The land is yours, O king. Therefore it should be as before, but the nourishment you need will be a different matter.” The elders of the land issued an order that the people should all draw lots to determine the sequence in which the families should provide an infant to serve as live food for the devil king. 
Among the three or four thousand families there was just one household whose members were the Buddha’s disciples. They were zealous in their home, and did not violate the five precepts. They drew the lots with the rest of the people and obtained the first lot. 
They happened to have an infant who would be the first to be fed to the devil king. 
They went far away to Mount Grdhrakuta and did obeisance to the Buddha. They repented their wrongdoings and rebuked themselves. The Buddha saw their suffering with his eye of the Path, and he spontaneously declared: “Because of this infant, I shall save countless people.” He then flew alone to the devil’s gate. 
He manifested his bright form which illuminated the palace. 
He immediately went out and saw the Buddha. He became malicious, and wanted to spring forward and suck up the Buddha, but the light pierced his eyes. Shouldering a mountain and spitting fire, he changed everything to dust. Only when he became weary after a long while did he surrender. 
The Buddha expounded the scriptural texts to him, and after carefully listen­ ing to the Doctrine he accepted the five precepts and became an upasaka. 
The whole family loudly cried, and followed the child. Those who looked on were countless, grieving for them as the officer carried the child in his arms, lifted this food, and placed it in front of the devil. 
The devil then took this child, lifted the food, and went in front of the Buddha. He knelt deeply and said to the Buddha: “I am different from the people of the land if I take the child as my food. I have now accepted your five precepts, O Buddha, and I do not have to eat this child any more. 
I present him to you, O Buddha.” So the Buddha accepted him, expounded the Doctrine, and made an incantation. 
The Buddha placed the child in his bowl and took him out through the palace gates. He returned him to his parents and informed them: “Raise the infant in good health! Do not be sad any longer! 
” O f all the people who saw the Buddha there was none who was not startled. They wondered what spirit it was. 
“What merit does this child have that he was rescued, him alone? 
The devil’s food was taken away and returned to the parents. 
” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas among the great multitude: meritorious reward will always follow. He who sees the Doctrine is most respected among men. He finally keeps himself far from the three evil predestinations. 
Meritorious reward is most revered in the three worlds. Demons, dragons, or a snake’s poison cannot harm a person who maintains the precepts. 
When the Buddha had spoken the stanzas, countless people saw the Buddha’s radiant appearance; and they knew that he was the most honorable one, beyond compare in the three worlds. They were all converted and became the Buddha’s disciples. They were glad on hearing the stanzas and all attained the Path. 
Once the Buddha was in the Deer Park in the land of Benares expounding the Doctrine to a countless multitude, to gods and men, dragons and demons, and kings and their subjects. 
The crown princes of large kingdoms and their attendants, and the eldest sons of the princes of smaller kingdoms, more than five hundred people, went to where the Buddha was. They did obeisance to the Buddha, withdrew, and sat aside listening to the Doctrine. The crown princes then said to the Buddha: “Your Path, 0 Buddha, is fine, wondrous, and difficult to reach! 
Has there from of old ever been a king, a crown prince, a high official, or the son of an elder who has forsaken officialdom, love, and happiness to become an ascetic?” The Buddha informed the crown princes: 
“Happiness and love in the societies of the world are like an illusion, a mirage, a dream, or an echo. 
“Kings and crown princes, because of three things one cannot obtain the Path! 
What three? 
One, one is arrogant and does not have the mindfulness to study the fine meaning of the Buddha’s scriptures in order to save one’s spirit. 
Two, one is covetous and not mindful of being charitable to the poor and distressed. The wealth accumulated by officials and military officers is not shared with the people so that only their capital increases. 
Three, one cannot forsake lust and desire for affection and reject the distress of its prison-like confines in order to become an ascetic, extinguishing all hardships and developing one’s person. 
Therefore whosoever is born a bodhisattva is regal, and removing these three things one attains Buddhahood. 
There are three more things. 
What three? 
One, study when young and lead the people to transform while governing the land so that they will practice the ten wholesome . 
Two, in middle age give away your possessions to the poor and lonely, while your officials and military officers are as happy as the people! 
If you do not practice the three things, you simply will not obtain anything!” Thereupon the World-honored One stated: 
“Once, in a previ­ ous world, I was a noble universal sovereign, called Emperor Nemi, ruling with the seven precious things. There were palaces and pools, lodges and theaters, and also officials, crown princes, their wives and ladies, elephants and horses, and kitchen servants, each eighty-four thousand strong. 
Nemi had a thousand sons who were brave and skillful. One of them was worth a thousand men. He flew through the air and traveled throughout the four seas. He was sovereign in his actions, and no one was higher than he was. 
His lifespan was eighty-four thousand years. He governed accord­ ing to the Doctrine and did not do wrong to his people. 
The noble king then thought to himself: ‘Man’s life is short, impermanent, and hard to preserve. I should just perform acts of merit, and thereby seek the truth of the Path. 
’ So the king ordered his barber: ‘If you see that my hairs is white, inform me! ’ After a very long period, tens of thousands of years, the barber informed the king: ‘You have a white hair.’ The king ordered him to pull it out and put it on the table. 
When the king saw the white hair he wept and decreed: ‘The first messenger has suddenly come again. Now that my hair is white, I must go forth and become an ascetic to seek the natural Path.’ He lifted the hair in his palms and spoke the stanza: am depleted. 
Thereafter , he governed the world, simply as a great king. He again ordered his barber: ‘If you see that my hairs is white, inform me!’ After a very long period, the barber again informed him: ‘You white hair.’ The king ordered him to pull it out, held it in his hands, and spoke the stanza: 
These three noble kings again became fa­ ther and son. High above they were emperors of the gods, down below they were noble lords, and in the middle they were crown princes, thirty-six times each, to end and yet to begin, for several thousands of tens of thousands of years. When I practiced these three things, I realized Buddhahood. 
The father in those times is myself now. 
The crown prince is the worthy Sariputra. 
The king’s grandson is the worthy Ananda. 
Following one another, they were reborn, and in this process they became kings in order to transform the world. 
Therefore I am especially honored, and I am beyond compare in the three worlds.” When the Buddha said this, the king and his crown prince and all the other crown princes were very glad. They accepted the Buddha’s five precepts, became upasakas, and attained the path of the stream-enterer. 
Good Fortune Once the Buddha was on Mount Grdhrakuta in Rajagrha, turning the wheel of the Doctrine of the three vehicles for gods and men and for dragons and demons. 
Through the actions of a former Buddha, the brahman’s disciples deserved to obtain the Path. They all went together to the bank of the river. They arranged their seats and started a discussion by asking themselves: “As to the actions of the peoples in various societies, what can we consider good fortune in the world? 
We disciples do not understand!” They went to their teacher, did obei­ sance, and with folded hands said: “We disciples have been studying for a long time. We know well what we have studied, but we have not heard what the countries consider to be good fortune.” The nirgrantha inform ed them: 
In Jambudvipa there are sixteen great countries and eighty-four thou­ sand small countries. Each country has its own good fortune, whether it is gold or silver, crystal, lapis lazuli, the divine brightmoon gem, elephants or horses, chariots, beautiful women, coral, shells, line music, a phoenix or a peacock, the sun, the moon, the stars, a precious vase, the four classes , a brahman, or a man of the Path. These are the signs of good fortune, held dear by the countries. If they see them, their esteem is immeasurable. 
These are the signs, the good fortunes, of countries.” The disciples said: “Could there rather be another very special good fortune which is beneficial to oneself, by which one may finally be reborn in heaven?” The nirgrantha replied: “Since the time of former teachers there has never been anything that surpasses these. 
No book records anything superior.” The disciples said: “Recently we heard that someone of the Sakya clan has gone forth to practice the Path. He sat upright for six years, subdued Mara , and became a Buddha. His three penetrating insights are unhin­ dered. 
How about it, O great teacher?” The teacher and his followers, more than five hundred disciples, went along the moun­ tain roads to where the Buddha was. They did obeisance to the Buddha and took their positions as brahmans. They folded their hands, knelt deeply, and said to the World-honored One: “As for the good fortune in every country, such are what the people are fond of, but we wonder if there is still something else that excels these. 
The doctrine of good fortune, as I know it, is that if you practice prop­ erly, you will obtain merit and be forever free from the three worlds. You will bring about nirvana.” Thereupon the World-honored One spoke the stanzas: 
It is the utmost good fortune. quest for luck, and if one does not pray and sacrifice to the spirits, this is the utmost good fortune. 
ion, constant and foremost performance of merits, and acceptance of the truth with all one’s being, this is the utmost good fortune. 
some, if one avoids liquor, knows moderation, and does not lust after female beauty, this is the utmost good fortune. 
zealously applies oneself to the rules, and if one develops oneself, free from any strife, this is the utmost good fortune. 
parents, if one regulates one’s family and cares for wife and child, and if one’s conduct is not deficient, this is the utmost good fortune. 
faction and remembers to be thankful, and if one recites the scriptures properly and in a timely fashion, this is the utmost good fortune. 
one is happy to meet an ascetic and quickly heeds his every exposition, this is the utmost good fortune. 
one persists in meeting the wise and stays close to the sages, this is the utmost good fortune. 
faith, if one corrects one’s intentions and directs himself toward the removal of doubt, and if one wants to rid himself of the three evil predestinations, this is the utmost good fortune. 
one serves those who have attained the Path and respects gods and men, this is the utmost good fortune. 
delusion, and hatred, and if one is able to practice insight into the true Path, this is the utmost good fortune. 
oneself to the development of the Path, and if one con­ stantly resorts to matters that are of concern, this is the utmost good fortune. 
compassionate mind, and if this brings about benevolence and peace to all beings, this is the utmost good fortune. 
behavior reflecting good fortune, and when they bring about the perfection of their wise insight, this is the utmost good fortune. 
When the brahmans, teacher and disciples, heard the Buddha’s exposition of the stanzas, they were glad and their minds opened up. They were very happy, came forward, and said to the Buddha: “Very wonderful, World-honored One! 
Extraordinary in the world! There is a reason why we were deluded and unable to gain insight yet. 
We hope, World-honored One, that you will have compassion and save us. We wish personally to take refuge in the Three Honor­ able Things of the Buddha’s Doctrine. We need to become ascetics and long to behave as such from now on! 
” When the Buddha said: “Excellent! 
Welcome, monks!”, they immediately became ascetics. 
They internally reflected on anapana and attained arhatship. 
The countless listeners all attained the eye of the Doctrine. 

	
Preface to A Forest of Pearls from the Dharma Garden Composed by Li Yan, styled Zhongsi, of Longxi Grand Master for Court Council and Gentleman-Attendant of the Orchid Pavilion From the six lines of divination the arrangements of the eight hexagrams are formed. Then ideograms appear and the illumination of scriptures occurs. Phoenix calligraphy and dragon diagrams, golden tablets and jade letters— one hundred schools have different standards and their ten thousand volumes are divided into many categories.
Even though they investigate minutely and discuss the norms of things exhaustively, tracing and ordering human emotions and human nature, they do not go beyond matters of this world.
How could any of these apply to otherworldly matters?
Furthermore, there is the teaching of Cang Jie, the ancient court historian, and the discourse of , a minor country official.
Their treasure scriptures are frivolous and their embroidered books are strange.
They are like carving ice, which does not produce permanent shapes, or writing in the sky, which leaves no substantive .
If we compare these with the flower garlands of marvelous teachings and the leaves inscribed with mysterious words the broad teachings of the two vehicles and the eight types of Buddhist scriptures, in terms of their depth and superiority, it would be like comparing a small anthill to the high mountains Mount Song and Mount Hua, or the amount of water collected in a cow’s hoofprint to the amount of water in the Jiang or Han Rivers.
These Buddhist teachings reveal comprehensive truths, hidden norms, gates of liberation, and a garden of spells.
From beginning to end they tally with suchness.
From beginners to the advanced, all take refuge in true enlightenment.
The Buddhist teachings guide those who are lost, born in the ocean of desires, causing their senses and sense objects, along with their mind and mental defilements, to disappear; and they draw those who are at a loss to the chamber of compassion.
Both the treasure robe and the jewel topknot  arrived .
The influence of this teaching reaches as many worlds as there are grains of sand in the Ganges River, and the effects reach an infinite number of world ages.
How great are these teachings! How perfect they are!
They cannot be adequately praised!
Furthermore, comets fell like rain in the realm of the Zhou.
When the Buddha’s teaching reached the Han, the image of the sun accompanied .
Cai Yin traveled the west.
Zhu lan came to the east.
The words from the golden mouth of the Buddha and the teachings of the Jeweled Tower, transposed onto silk and bamboo, have become available in the central region of China.
They are contained in numerous scrolls and the accounts are deep and extensive.
It is difficult to study in detail the true origins of reality.
We are now under the rule of the Tang, and the Emperor, creator of things, reigns and proclaims the profound teaching .
Monastics gather and transmit the bright teaching, pouring it liquid that illuminates and moistens the realm under the rule.
The sounds of reciting scriptures and utterances of praise are heard quietly all over the realm. The prospering of the Buddhist teaching is truly indescribable.
The great monastic of Ximingsi Monastery, Dharma Master Daoshi, styled Xuanyun, is a leader of the Buddhist community.
Intelligent even as a young child, at a tender age he played with a stupa made of sand; he shaved his head while he was still wearing the colorful clothes of a youth.
His great compassion is such that it brings salvation even to ants.
Having completed his training he reached the ordination platform, where he received the complete precepts.
Each of the precepts is perfect, offering protection equal to  swallowing a gem.
Daoshi was well versed in the practice of self-control, taking delight in it in the same way one follows luminous mirrors.
He loves the Great Vehicle and penetrates and illuminates reality.
Because of his superior and broad learning he was called to reside at Ximingsi Monastery.
In the time outside of the cultivation of the fivefold teaching, he read the Tripi ṭaka extensively.
He thought that over many generations, from the ancient past to the present, many authors compiled these works.
Though elegant in meaning and beautiful in expression, they are not all worthy of recording.
Thus, Daoshi selected the best flowers from the field of these writings, sniffed out the fragrant blossoms of the great teaching, and organized them in altogether one hundred fascicles, filling ten boxes.
Though its language is economical its content is rich.
It strings together the essentials of extensive teachings, comparable to those of Yu , and the traces collected here proclaim the teaching as a mirror of the Way. Like the Collection for the Propagation and Clarification of Buddhism (T.
teaching]; its words are beautiful and the Way is presented clearly.
None of the profound teachings are left out; all essential teachings are included, without exception.
If a text is too long and detailed one soon becomes tired of it, but if the content is too abbreviated the scope of learning is limited.
Even though he wished not to fill scrolls with fiction and empty words, Daoshi could not eliminate substantive matters.
The writing seems to be extensive; if one studies it over a long period, one gets to know the essential teachings.
In the first year of the Zongzhang period , on the thirtieth day of the third month, the compilation was completed.
It is our hope that authors of philosophical writings will find in these fascicles jewels that fit their needs perfectly, and that those who follow the correct path will open this work and drink the sweet dew of immortality.
Investigating these pages, one comes to know the subtle; in contemplating reality with the teachings presented here, one comes to see the hidden.
Everything that surrounds us is equally illuminated.
Circling around the sky one continues to coexist forever with all things.
the Dharma Garden Compiled by Shi Daoshi of Ximingsi Monastery Measurement of world ages; the three realms; the sun and moon; the six realms; one thousand buddhas; paying respect to the Buddha; paying respect to the Dharma; paying respect to the Sangha ; the practice of paying respect; the field of merit; turning to faith; men and women; entering the Way; repentance; providing guidance; preaching and listening to the Dharma; understanding; fate; sincerity; supernatural feats; miraculous response; upholding the teaching; seclusion; anomalies; transformation; dreams; meritorious work; controlling thoughts; vows; the Dharma robe; the lamp; the banner; incense and flowers; chanting; paying respect to a stupa; temple building; relics; offerings; accepting invitations; the cakravartin king; rulers and ministers; accepting remonstrance; investigating the truth; caution; parsimony; punishments for faults; obedience; admonition; loyalty and filial piety; unfiliality; returning kindness; failing to return kindness; good friends; evil friends; choosing associates; attendants; measurement; debating skill; stupidity; deception; laziness; refuting wrong views; wealth; poverty; debt; court cases; reviling; magic; sacrifice; divination; praying for rain; the fruits of the garden; fishing and hunting; compassion; releasing living beings; rescue; suffering; karmic causes; retribution; punishment and happiness; desire; the four kinds of birth; the ten dispositions; the ten evil deeds; the six perfections; repentance; receiving precepts; violating precepts; receiving a feast; breaking the rule of offering a feast to monks; reward and punishment; benefit and harm; wine and meat; defilement; illness; giving up one’s body; sending one to death; destruction of the Dharma; other miscellaneous matters; scriptural records. The Measurement of World Ages Lesser Calamities and Three Great Calamities. Introduction, Epidemics, Warfare, Famine, Successive Generations, and Treatments.
A kalpa is the designation for a time period, like the term “year.” Though time is not a separate entity, the meaning of this designation becomes clear in the light of the Buddhist Dharma.
The holy teaching is preached widely and contains many different kinds of records that include not only the profound norms of principle and contemplation but also the mysterious teachings on reward and punishment.
If one roams afar lost in the consciousness of the past, it is easy to exhaust the number of minute dust .
If one returns to the starting point on the path of enlightenment , it is possible within the limit of the asaṃkhya period.
This may result in the difference between being lost or becoming enlightened.
Even in the massive city in the Hell of Incessant Punishment the life span is limited and sinners move on to further rebirths.
a rock used for clothes, people are born in heaven.
Here the teaching is illustrated in contrasting cases of good and evil rebirths.
In this sahā world one brief moment is experienced as a hundred years; in the land of the monastics an infinitely long world age constitutes one calendrical cycle of ten days.
Here is the distinction between the defiled and the pure.
To speak in broad terms, there is nothing beyond the greater and lesser kalpas, and each of them contains three items.
In the greater kalpa there are the calamities of water, fire, and wind.
In the lesser kalpa harm comes from warfare, famine, and epidemics.
Thus, we know that beautiful buildings  in the end are burned to ashes.
The jewel terrace of a thousand brahmans in the end floats away in a sudden downpour.
Furthermore, divinations will not produce any signs; prayers will have no effect.
The shining blades of weapons meet each other, and the pointed swords of starlight cross each other.
Living people are harmed and almost entirely destroyed.
Yet fear of the three realms does not lead to awakening.
Lamenting over the six realms of rebirth, one is filled with sorrow. The Dazhidu lun says:
What is meant by jie ?
Answer:
The Sanksrit term in correct transcription is jiebo batuo .
Jiebo means a division of time; batuo means good.
The Lishi apitan lun says:
The Buddha, the World-honored One, said, “One minor kalpa is called one kalpa.
Twenty kalpas are also called one kalpa.
Forty kalpas are also called one kalpa.
Sixty kalpas are also called one kalpa.
Eighty minor kalpas are also called one major kalpa.
Why is one minor kalpa called one kalpa?” At the time the monk Devadatta was in hell, suffering from karmic retribution, the Buddha said that the period he will remain there is one kalpa.
If the Buddha said that the period is one kalpa, why are twenty kalpas also called one kalpa?
When the Brahmā god is born in heaven, his life span is twenty minor kalpas.
The Buddha said that it is one kalpa.
Why are forty minor kalpas also called one kalpa?
The life span of the Brahmakāyika god is forty minor kalpas.
The Buddha said that it is one kalpa.
Why are sixty kalpas also called one kalpa?
The life span of the Mahābrahmā god is sixty minor kalpas.
The Buddha said it is one kalpa.
Why are eighty kalpas called one large kalpa?
The Foshuo Jiezhong shijie jing says:
twenty minor kalpas of destruction.
Then, when the twenty minor kalpas of destruction are finished, the twenty minor kalpas of arising and formation come.
These twenty kalpas of arising and formation have already started.
How many of them have already passed, and how many are yet to come?
Eight minor kalpas have already passed; eleven minor kalpas are yet to come. The ninth minor kalpa is the present kalpa, which has not yet come to an end.
In this ninth kalpa how much has already passed and how much is yet to come?
There are still six hundred and ninety years to come. This is calculated taking the last yi-mao year of the Liang as the basis.) In the course of these twenty minor kalpas three kinds of minor calamities occur one after another:
first the calamity of epidemics, second the calamity of warfare, and third the calamity of famine.
The names of these three calamities are given differently in different scriptures.
The Chang ahan , the Zhong ahan , and the Qishi first list warfare, then famine and epidemics; the Jushe apidamo and the Posha lun first lists warfare, then epidemics and famine.
The Yüqie (Yogacārabhūmi, T.
1579) and the Duifa list famine and then warfare.
As for the length of the years and months and the order, the view of the Yüqie and the Duifa is the correct one.) Following the Lishi apitan lun :
This ninth kalpa is the time for the third calamity.
This kalpa comes to an end because of famine.
The Buddha the following.
In the course of the twenty kalpas of arising and formation, in the first of these kalpas, when a lesser calamity occurs there will be a great epidemic.
All kinds of illnesses will spread everywhere in all the lands of Jambudvīpa.
People everywhere will experience a great epidemic.
All supernatural beings will become angry and harm the people of the world.
Human life span will be shortened to only ten years.
People will become short in stature; some will be two hands tall, some three hands.
If they measure themselves with their own hands they will be eight hands tall.
The best food available will be inferior millet.
They will consider clothing made of human hair the best and have only swords and sticks for decoration.
At that time people will fail to follow the correct teaching; they will deviate from the teaching and indulge in greed; wrong views and other evil behaviors will increase day and night.
Evil ghosts will harm people everywhere.
At that time the lineages of great kings will be terminated and the kingdoms’ territories will gradually become abandoned.
Only small local government offices, scattered in places at great distances from each other, will remain.
In this way people will suffer greatly from epidemics, with no one to offer them medicine, food, and drink.
For this reason there will be many who die pointlessly before their life span is exhausted.
Each day and night innumerable sentient beings will die from illness.
People will receive this result because of having committed evil deeds in previous lives.
The disturbance of the kalpa occurs; after death people are reborn in the three inferior realms.
At that time local governments will be abandoned; only a small number of families will exist, separated from each other by great distances.
When people die of epidemics, there will be no one to bury them.
The ground will be covered by white bones.
Eventually, more and more houses will be abandoned.
During the last seven days of the kalpa an innumerable number of sentient beings will fall victim to the epidemic and die.
Those who happen to survive this will be scattered in different places.
Then, someone will gather together all the men and women in Jambudvīpa.
There will only be ten thousand people left; these people will become the human race for the coming age. These ten thousand people are capable of good deeds.
Supernatural beings, not wishing to let the human race be completely exterminated, will protect them, pouring good nourishment through their hair follicles.
Because of karmic conditions the human race will not be exterminated, and after seven days the great epidemic will suddenly disappear.
All evil ghosts will be banished.
In response to sentient beings’ needs, food, drink, and clothing will come down from the sky like rain.
The seasons will follow in proper order and a good harvest will be produced.
The physical appearance of the people will be attractive, and they will be free of illness.
They will be filled with the joy felt by relatives and close friends who have not seen each other for a long time when they are suddenly reunited.
They will stay together all the time and be unwilling to be separated from each other.
In the previous kalpa the human life span was ten years.
These people will give birth to those who are born in the following kalpa, whose life span may be as long as twenty thousand years.
Such benefits are obtained spontaneously, without any effort.
In accordance with good teachings their actions of body, speech, and mind will be good, and after their life span is completed they will be reborn in superior realms of existence.
Then, after finishing their lives as gods, they will be reborn among human beings.
Without any effort they will be naturally good and observe the precepts fully.
After their life span as human beings is over they will be reborn as gods.
This will go on forever and ever.
In the transitional period following the first kalpa epidemics and illnesses will be completely absent.
This period that connects with the subsequent second kalpa will last for twenty thousand years.
During the transitional period people have the same life span as the first kalpa; people then are born from the people of the previous first kalpa with a life span of twenty thousand years.
In the subsequent kalpa people have supernatural powers at their command and are supplied with everything they need.
Their life span is forty thousand years.
Sentient beings are reborn as human beings and as gods, over and over.
This is called the second kalpa.
In the following transitional period people have the second kalpa’s life span of forty thousand years.
In the following kalpa people will be provided with everything they need, and their life span will be sixty thousand years. They will be reborn as humans and gods, over and over.
This is called the third kalpa.
In the following transitional period people have the third kalpa’s life span of sixty thousand years.
During the periods with sixty thousandto eighty thousand-year life spans, women marry at the age of five hundred years.
People have only seven kinds of discomfort, namely excreting, urinating, feeling cold, heat, sexual desire, hunger, and old age.
In these periods all kingdoms are wealthy and are well provisioned.
Robbers, rebels, and thieves are absent.
Neighboring villages hear each others’ roosters crow.
Though they cultivate little the harvest is great.
Supplies of clothing and other property and treasures are sufficient.
Sitting in peace, people enjoy pleasures and do not have to run around in search of anything.
The period when the life span is eighty thousand years lasts for an infinite number of years; sentient beings then will not commit any of the ten evil deeds.
When they begin committing the ten evil deeds, after one hundred years their life spans will be reduced by ten years.
In the subsequent one hundred years the life span will again be reduced by ten years. Human life span is thus gradually reduced until it is only about ten years.
At the last stage, when it becomes ten years, the life span will no longer be reduced.
From the maximum of eighty thousand to the minimum of ten years, the life span will change if the Buddha does not appear in the world.
If the Buddha appears, the true Dharma will stay, and the reduction of sentient beings’ life span will stop for a while.
As the true Dharma begins to disappear, the life span will also begin to be reduced.
The Lishi apitan lun says:
The Buddha said, “One minor kalpa is called one kalpa.” The text continues in this way similar to the above, up to the point of saying that “eighty minor kalpas are called a large kalpa.” This large kalpa begins with the first twenty minor kalpas of arising.
In the subsequent twenty kalpas of abiding the second lesser calamity occurs due to great warfare.
When the human life span is ten years the three poisons of greed, anger, and ignorance, as well as evil views, grow day and night.
Parents, children, siblings, and relatives fight with each other; how much more so do people who are strangers to each other.
At this time people repeatedly treat each other with contempt; they threaten each other with bricks and stones or with swords and sticks.
Kingdoms in all four directions send expeditions to conquer each other.
An uncountable number of deaths occur in the course of a single day and night.
Such faults occur spontaneously.
People behave in evil ways, and their karmic consequences are born in the midst of this period, when the pollutions of the kalpa arise.
At this time people’s houses collapse, and even those who survive are scattered in different directions.
This period of the end of the kalpa lasts for a little over seven days.
In the last seven days, when people take hold of grasses and trees they all turn into swords and sticks.
With these weapons they harm each other; afraid, they die in distress.
At this time the people, fearing  swords and sticks, flee into the bushes or cross rivers to hide on remote islands.
Some go into caves to avoid disaster.
Sometimes they see another person and they run away from each other, overcome with fear.
Sometimes they fall to the ground, like a deer confronted by a hunter.
After seven days of this, countless people lie dead, killed by swords and soldiers.
Even those who survive are scattered in different places.
Then, someone will gather together all the men and women in Jambudvīpa.
There will only be ten thousand people left; these people will become the human race for the coming age.
These ten thousand people are capable of good deeds.
Supernatural beings, not wishing to let the human race be completely exterminated, will protect these people, pouring good nourishment through their hair follicles.
Because of karmic conditions, in the intermediate period between the kalpas the seeds of the human race will be preserved and not allowed to be exterminated.
After seven days the great warfare will suddenly cease.
All the evil ghosts will be banished.
In response to sentient beings’ needs food, drink, and clothing will come down from the sky like rain.
The seasons will follow in proper order and a good harvest will be produced.
These people’s physical appearance will be attractive, and their features will be restored to their original condition.
All good dharmas will spontaneously arise.
There will be comfort in coolness, quietude, happiness, and freedom from illness.
People will be compassionate and free from harmful intentions.
They will be delighted when they see each other, just as those who have not seen their loved ones for a long time and are suddenly reunited are delighted, stay together, and cannot be separated from each other.
The evolution continues, as people perform good deeds and are born in heaven and then again among humans, from the period when the life span is ten years through the period of the life span of twenty thousand years, eventually to that of the life span of eighty thousand years, which lasts for an uncountable number of years.
The rest of the passage is identical to what is given above. I will not bother to reproduce it here again.
The Lishi apitan lun says:
In the course of the evolution from the first minor kalpa to the eightieth minor kalpa, in the middle of the kalpa of abiding the third lesser calamity occurs due to a great famine.
When this calamity is about to occur there will be drought and people will suffer from a great epidemic.
All supernatural beings will become angry and harm the people of the world.
Human life span will be shortened to only ten years.
People will become short in stature; some will be two hands tall, some three hands.
They will eat inferior millet.
They will make clothing with human hair and consider it superior.
Having only swords and sticks for decoration, they will not treat each other respectfully.
They will suffer from poverty and ignorance, and wrong views will grow day and night among them.
When those who are more powerful see others with food, they will immediately seize it and eat it themselves.
For this reason countless people will die of hunger.
When sentient beings are born at this time, in the midst of the kalpa of defilements, they automatically commit evil deeds.
When there is no rain for four or five years in a row, a great drought will occur.
Even when people search they will not find weeds and trees, much less rice or other kinds of grain.
All sorts of animals will have already eaten them.
In the course of a single day and night an innumerable number of people will die from hunger, leaving commanderies and districts empty.
Only a small number of houses will remain but these will be separated from each other by great distances.
No one will practice the true Dharma and the three poisons of greed, anger, and ignorance will flourish.
While people suffer in great poverty, the days and nights are filled with evil. Then for six or seven years there will be no rain, and because of the great drought people will long to see water, but it cannot be found.
How much less so cooked rice?
The intermediate period following this kalpa lasts only for seven days.
Each day and night innumerable people die.
Even those who survive will be scattered in many different places.
Then, someone will gather together all the remaining men and women in Jambudvīpa, adults and children, altogether ten thousand people, who become the human race for the coming age.
They are capable of good deeds.
Supernatural beings, not wishing to let the human race be completely exterminated, will protect these people, pouring good nourishment through their hair follicles.
Because of karmic conditions the seeds of the human race will not be exterminated.
After seven days the famine will suddenly disappear.
All the evil ghosts will be banished.
In response to sentient beings’ needs, food and clothing will come down from the sky like rain.
The seasons will follow in proper order and a good harvest will be produced.
The people’s physical appearance will be attractive and their features will be restored to their original condition.
All good dharmas will spontaneously arise.
There will be comfort in coolness, quietude, happiness, and freedom from illnesses.
People will be compassionate and free from harmful intentions.
They will be delighted when they see each other, just as those who have not seen their loved ones for a long time and are suddenly reunited are delighted, stay together, and cannot be separated from each other.
The evolution continues as people perform good deeds and are born in heaven and then again among humans.
Their life span will grow longer, to twenty thousand years and eventually to eighty thousand years.
Other developments are similar to those described above for other calamities.
according to the description in the Lishi apitan lun the three calamities last for seven days each.
According to other scriptures and treatises famine lasts for seven years, seven months, and seven days; epidemics last for seven months and seven days, and warfare lasts for seven days.) The Yüqie lun says:
begin at the time when the human life span is thirty years.
At that time good food and drink are no longer obtainable.
Only fried and cooked dried bones are served at banquets.
If a grain of rice, wheat, or millet is found, it is valued like a maṇi jewel, placed in a box, and guarded carefully.
Sentient beings are weakened; if they fall to the ground they cannot get up.
Because of hunger sentient beings almost completely disappear.
This calamity of famine lasts for seven years, seven months, seven days, and seven nights.
Sentient beings gather together and begin the activity of lesser renunciation.
For this reason the life span is no longer reduced and the calamity of famine ceases.
At the time human life span is twenty years the activity of renunciation undertaken earlier is abandoned.
Then many kinds of epidemics spread wildly.
People are struck by these diseases and most die.
This calamity of illness lasts for seven months, seven days, and seven nights.
Sentient beings gather together and begin the activity of middle renunciation.
For this reason the life span is no longer reduced and the calamity of illness ceases.
Then at the time when human life span is ten years the activity of renunciation undertaken earlier is again abandoned.
Then, sentient beings constantly feel a fierce impulse to harm each other.
For this reason, they take a blade of grass, a tree branch, bricks, or stones and turn them into sharp swords, and with these they kill each other.
This calamity of warfare lasts for seven days.
The Zhong ahan jing says:
In the past a wheel-turning king appeared in the world. His name was Mūrdhajarāja.
He upheld the rules of purity and cultivated the virtue of giving.
To the poor in his kingdom he gave from his wealth so that their needs were met.
After a long while, though there were still poor people in his kingdom, he could no longer give from his wealth to provide for their needs.
One person was then greatly distressed and consequently stole from someone else.
His master captured him and sent him to the kṣatriya king Mūrdhajarāja, saying, “Heavenly king, this man stole my property.
Please pass judgment.” The king asked the accused man, “Did you in fact steal?” He said, “Yes, in fact I did steal.
The reason I did so was because I was in dire straits and I could not survive without stealing.” The king then brought out his own possessions and gave them to the thief, saying, “You may go but do not steal again.” Because of this turn of events others thought, “We should also steal from others.” Then everyone stole as if in competition.
Consequently, people became poorer and had nothing to give out of compassion.
The result was that people became even more impoverished and stole more frequently.
This caused human life span to be reduced and people’s appearances to become unattractive.
The father’s life span was eighty thousand years, while the son’s life span was forty thousand years.
At the time when human life span was forty thousand years, another man stole and was sent to the king.
Having heard about this, the king thought, “If people in my kingdom steal from others, and if I give to them everything that I own, then my storehouse will become empty and theft will become even more frequent.
Instead I should now make a very sharp sword and if there is a thief in my kingdom, I should capture him and, placing him under a tall platform, chop off his head.” Having thought this, issued an edict to this effect.
From then on, people made copies of the sharp sword and carried it around with them to rob others of their possessions.
They captured the owners of these possessions and cut their heads off.
Consequently, poverty became intense and murder by the sword increased.
This caused human life span to be reduced and people’s appearances worsened.
The father’s life span was forty thousand years, while the son’s life span was twenty thousand years.
At the time when human life span was tewenty thousand years, a thief thought, “If the king knew the truth, he would bind me with a rope, or fine me, or line me up on a platform.
I would rather lie to the king.” Having thought this, he said to the king , “I did not steal.” For this reason, people became impoverished and their possessions disappeared.
They were not able to provide for others out of compassion. Theft and murder became more frequent and people lied to each other.
This caused human life span to be reduced and people’s appearances worsened.
The father’s life span was twenty thousand years, while the son’s life span was ten thousand years.
At the time when human life span was ten thousand years, some became jealous of virtuous people and slept with their wives.
This caused human life span to be reduced and people’s appearances worsened.
The father’s life span was ten thousand years, while the son’s life span was five thousand years.
At the time when human life span was five thousand years, three things increased—deviation from the teaching, desire for evil, and greedy attachment to evil teachings.
Therefore, while the father’s life span was five thousand years, the son’s life span became two thousand five hundred years.
At the time when human life span was two thousand five hundred years, again three things increased: lying, harsh speech, and frivolous speech.
This caused human life span to be reduced and people’s appearances worsened.
Therefore, while the father’s life span was two thousand five hundred years, the son’s life span became one thousand years.
At the time when human life span was one thousand years, one thing increased, namely, following wrong views.
Because this one thing increased, people’s life spans were reduced and their appearance worsened.
Therefore, while the father’s life span was one thousand years, the son’s life span became five hundred years.
At the time when human life span was five hundred years, people were unfilial to their parents and failed to respect monks and brahmans.
They were not obedient, did not perform meritorious deeds, and failed to see the punishment they would receive in later lives.
Therefore, while the father’s life span was five hundred years, the son’s life span became two hundred and fifty or two hundred years.
Today those who enjoy longevity live as long as one hundred years or so.
The Buddha said to the monks, “Sometime far in the future human life span will be ten years.
Women will marry five months after birth.
At the time when human life span is ten years, millet will be considered the tastiest food and unpolished grain the greatest delicacy.
Ghee, oil, salt, honey, and sugarcane will all have disappeared.
Only those who commit the ten kinds of evil deeds will be respected by others, none of whom has ever performed a good deed.
Mothers will vehemently wish to harm their children, and children will vehemently wish to harm their mothers.
Fathers and sons, brothers, sisters, and relatives in their turn will wish to harm each other, in the same way that hunters who see a deer vehemently wish to harm it.
“During the time when the human life span is ten years, for seven days the activities of the soldiers with swords will become intense.
Whenever they take hold of a blade of grass it immediately becomes a sword.
When they grasp a dead branch, it also immediately becomes a sword.
With these swords soldiers murder each other.
After seven days the activities of the soldiers with swords will come to an end.
“At that time, when soldiers harm each other, there will also be those who know embarrassment and shame, who dislike worldly life and are free from attachment; these people will go into the mountains or fields and hide there for those seven days.
After the seven days are over they will come out of hiding and, on seeing each other, they will feel compassionate and affectionate toward them, in the way that mothers love their only child, or those who have been separated for a long time feel happiness when they find each other again.
With great affection for each other, they will say to each other:
‘Wise ones, we now see each other. We have now obtained peace.
We sat and gave rise to intentions that were not good and let all of our relatives die.
We should together perform good deeds and reject all murderous deeds.’ As they perform good deeds, human life span will begin to increase and appearances improve.
People with a life span of ten years will give birth to children with a life span of twenty years.
“Those with a life span of twenty years will think, ‘If we seek to perform good deeds our life span will be lengthened and our appearance will improve.
We should do more good deeds and together refrain from the act of taking without giving.’ They will do this good deed and their life span and appearance will improve.
People will give birth to children with a life span of forty years.
These then will refrain from licentious deeds; they will do this good deed and their life span and appearance will improve.
People will give birth to children with a life span of eighty years.
They then will refrain from telling lies; they will do this good deed and their life span and appearance will improve.
People will give birth to children with a life span of one hundred and sixty years.
With the life span extended to one hundred and sixty years, they then will refrain from telling divisive lies; they will do this good deed and their life span and appearance will improve.
People will give birth to children with a life span of three hundred and twenty years.
They then will refrain from harsh speech; they will do this good deed and their life span and appearance will improve.
People will give birth to children with a life span of six hundred and forty years.
They then will refrain from frivolous speech, and doing this good deed their life span and appearance will improve, and they will give birth to children with the life span of two thousand five hundred years.
They then also will refrain from jealousy; they will do this good deed and their life span and appearance will improve.
People will give birth to children with a life span of five thousand years.
They then again will refrain from anger; they will do this good deed and their life span and appearance will improve.
People will give birth to children with the life span of ten thousand years.
They then again will refrain from evil views; they will do this good deed and their life span and appearance will improve.
People will give birth to children with a life span of twenty thousand years.
They then will again refrain from deviating from the teaching, desire for evil, and greedy attachment to evil teachings.
‘We will refrain from these three evil conduct.’ They will do this good deed and their life span and appearance will improve.
People will give birth to children with a life span of forty thousand years.
“At the time human life span is forty thousand years, people will become obedient to their parents, and they will honor and treat with respect the monks and brahmans.
Respectfully following their orders, they will cultivate meritorious deeds, anticipating the possibilities of punishments in future lives.
Having done these good deeds, people will give birth to children with a life span of eighty thousand years.
“At the time human life span is eighty thousand years, this Jambudvīpa will become prosperous, with a large population.
Villages will be close to each other, at a distance that a pheasant can cross in one flight.
Women will marry at the age of five hundred.
There will be seven kinds of discomfort, namely, cold, heat, excreting, urinating, sexual desire, hunger and thirst, and old age.
There will not be any other kind of trouble.
At that time there will be a king called Śaṅkha, who will become a universal monarch .
He will be intelligent and wise and will govern the four realms under heaven with four kinds of orderly armies.
The seven jewels will be abundant and he will have a thousand sons.
Handsome and ferocious, he will be fearless and conquer other groups.
He will govern the great earth all the way to the great ocean.
He will rule not by the sword but by moral teachings and ordinances.
There will be peace.” (Note: epidemics and famine serve to encourage people to follow the Dharma in the same way as above.) According to the new translation of the Apidamo da piposha lun :
There is a holy teaching that serves as the treatment to this problem.
If a person can uphold the precept of not killing for a single day and night, in future lives this person will not encounter the calamity of soldiers with swords .
If the person can present one piece of harītakī fruit, that is, if someone takes one harītakī fruit and, with a truly pure mind, offers it to the sangha, in future lives will not encounter the calamity of pestilence .
If a person gives one portion of food to another sentient being, in future lives he or she will not encounter the calamity of famine.
Question: Do these three calamities exist on other continents?
Answer: They are absent in their basic forms but similar phenomena do exist.
These are increasing anger, the decline of physical powers, and frequent hunger and thirst.
These apply to two of the continents.
In the continent of Uttarakuru such similar phenomena are also absent, because no sins are committed there and there is no increase of anger there.
Sentient beings by nature form attachments and lack the will to reform.
They are greedy, jealous, and increasingly indulge in evil deeds.
Thus, human emotions become intense and the evil poisons follow them.
Once we are into the last stage of the decline of the teaching, all people and everything else become evil.
Both primary and secondary karmic retributions, or one’s body and mind as well as the environment in which one is born, decline day and night.
The Fu fazang jing says:
At the time King Aśoka was personally making offerings of alms to the monks, Piṇḍola-Bhāradvāja pouring ghee over rice.
The king said, “Great Sage, ghee is hard to digest.
Does it not make one ill?” The Honored One said, “Do not worry.
When the Buddha was present, water and ghee were identical.
Therefore, one does not become ill by eating it.” Then, wishing to demonstrate the truth of the matter, PiṇḍolaBhāradvāja put his hand into the ground, to a depth of over forty-two thousand li, and scooping up the rich soil showed it to the king.
“The king should now know that because sentient beings lack merit, rich and nourishing tastes have all flowed into the ground.
Consequently, the merits and fortunes of the world have declined.” Having finished making the offering, the king was delighted and withdrew.
Even less than a hundred years after the appearance of the Buddha there was already such a sign of decline.
Today, almost two thousand years after the Buddha’s appearance, how could such nourishing tastes still exist?
The Yüqie lun says:
sentient beings also experience three kinds of extreme decline:
the decline of life span, the decline of primary and secondary karmic retributions, and the decline of material resources.
The decline of life span leads ultimately to a life span of ten years.
The decline of primary and secondary karmic retributions leads to the size of the body being reduced to the measure of one hand or one knuckle.
When the reduction of material resources occurs, people take millet as the best kind of food, human hair as the best clothing, and iron as the best material for decoration.
The five kinds of delicacies all disappear, namely such delicacies as ghee, honey, oil, salt, and the unusual taste of sugarcane.
Calamities Length of Time, Units of Time, The Kalpa of Destruction, and The Kalpa of Formation. According to new translation of the Apidamo da piposha lun :
There are three kinds of kalpas:
first, the antarakalpa; second, kalpa of formation and destruction; and third, the major kalpa.
There are also three kinds of antarakalpas:
the kalpa of decrease, the kalpa of increase, and the kalpa of increase and decrease.
During the kalpa of decrease the human life span decreases from infinite to ten years.
During the kalpa of increase the human life span increases from ten years to eighty thousand years.
During the kalpa of increase and decrease the human life span increases from ten years to eighty thousand years and then decreases from eighty thousand years to ten years. One kalpa of decrease, one kalpa of increase, and eighteen kalpas of increase and decrease constitute twenty antarakalpas.
Having passed through twenty antarakalpas, the world is formed.
Having been formed, it remains for twenty antarakalpas. Together these two periods are called the kalpa of formation.
Having passed through twenty antarakalpas, the world is destroyed.
Having been destroyed, it remains empty for twenty antara kalpas.
Together these two periods are called the kalpa of destruction.
Altogether these forty antarakalpas are called the major kalpa.
During the twenty antarakalpas of abiding that follows the antarakalpa of formation, the first kalpa is simply of decrease and the last simply of increase; the eighteen kalpas between these are of both increase and decrease.
Therefore, the Duifa lun says, “On the basis of this calculation of kalpa numbers the life spans of gods in the realm of form and the formless realm are shown.” According to the Xiguo zhuan by Dharma Master zang :
The progression of yin and yang and the turning of the sun and the moon are called by different names, even though the conditions of the yearly changes remain the same .
The names of the months are established by lunar stations.
The shortest unit of time is called a kṣaṇa. According to new translation of the Apidamo da piposha lun :
How does one know the duration of a kṣaṇa?
The following is said.
According to the Prajñapti-śāstra , when a middle-aged woman weaves wool she shakes off the fine threads and evens out the material so that it is not too long or too short.
The time she takes to do this is called a tat-kṣaṇa.
It does not matter whether the piece of wool thread is long or short, simply the time it takes to draw the thread out between the fingers is a tat-kṣaṇa.
Question: I asked earlier about a kṣaṇa.
Why do you quote the Prajñaptiśāstra passage on tat-kṣaṇa?
Answer: Here I used the coarse to explain the fine, because the fine is difficult to know about and cannot be made tangible.
One hundred and twenty kṣaṇas is one tat-kṣaṇa.
Sixty tat-kṣaṇas forms one lava, which contains seven thousand two hundred kṣaṇas.
Thirty lavas forms one muhūrta, which contains two hundred and sixteen thousand kṣaṇas.
Thirty muhūrtas forms one day and night, which contains twenty thousand less than six million five hundred thousand kṣaṇas.
Each day and night this body of five skandhas undergoes a certain series of ceaseless coming into being and going out of being. According to one opinion, this is too broad and does not describe a kṣaṇa.
According to what it holds, when a strong man snaps a finger the duration of sixty-four kṣaṇas has passed. According to another opinion, this again is not right.
According to what it holds, when two strong men pull and cut a bundle of fine Kāśī threads, as so many of them have been cut, so many kṣaṇas have passed.
According to another opinion, this again is not right.
According to this opinion, when two strong men grab a bundle of Kāśī threads and one man cuts it with a sharp sword from the kingdom of Cīna ; as many threads as are cut, so many kṣaṇas have passed.
According to another opinion, this is still too broad and does not describe a kṣaṇa.
The World-honored One did not describe the true duration of a kṣaṇa.
The World-honored One said, “Imagine that four archers, each holding a bow and arrow and standing back to back, were to shoot in the four directions and a fast runner came up to them and said, ‘You should now shoot simultaneously.
I can run and catch all the arrows without letting any of them fall to the ground.’ Would this not be quick?” The monks replied to the Buddha, “That is very quick, World-honored One.” The Buddha said, “That man is not as quick as a ground-traveling yakṣa.
The ground-traveling yakṣa is not as quick as the flying yakṣa.
The flying yakṣa is not as quick as the four heavenly king deities.
These deities do not travel as quickly as the sun and moon.
The two wheels of the sun and moon do not travel as quickly as the gods who guide the sun and moon.
These deities move around quickly, but not as quickly as the coming into being and going out of being caused by the later-life-producing power .
The succession of kṣaṇas does not stop even for a moment.” From this we know that the World-honored One did not describe the true duration of a kṣaṇa.
Question: Why did the World-honored One not describe the true duration of a kṣaṇa for the benefit of others?
Answer: Because no sentient beings would be able to understand it.
The Anpan jing says, “In the period of time it takes to snap a finger the mind undergoes nine hundred and sixty .” The Renwang jing says, “One thought moment contains ninety kṣaṇas.
One kṣaṇa in turn contains nine hundred comings into being and goings out of being.” The Pusa chutai jing  says:
The period of time it takes to snap a finger contains three billion two hundred million and one hundred thousand thought moments.
The succeeding thoughts produce material forms, and succeeding material forms produce consciousnesses.
The power of the Buddha enters each of the fine consciousnesses and lets them achieve salvation.
The Abhidharma-śāstra says:
There are twelve items.
The first is called kṣaṇa.
The second is called tatkṣaṇa.
The third is called lava.
The fourth is called muhūrta.
The fifth is called day and night.
The sixth is called half-month.
The seventh is called month.
The eighth is called season.
The ninth is called ayana , The tenth is called year.
The eleventh is called pair.
The twelfth is called kalpa.
One kṣaṇa is translated as “one thought moment.” One hundred and twenty kṣaṇas is called one tat-kṣaṇa, which is translated as one moment.
Sixty tat-kṣaṇas is one breath.
One breath is one lava.
Thirty lavas is one muhūrta, which is translated as one short period.
Thirty muhūrtas is one day and night, which consists altogether of six million three hundred and eighty thousand kṣaṇas.
The Sengqi lü
Twenty thought moments constitute one moment.
Twenty moments constitute one period of time in which it takes to snap a finger.
Twenty such periods of time constitute one lava.
Twenty lavas constitute one short period.
One day and night contains thirty short periods.
During the time when the day is longest there are eighteen short periods during the day and twelve during the night.
When the day is shortest, there are twelve short periods during the day and eighteen during the night. During the spring and fall equinoxes day and night are equal in length.
The Zhidu lun says:
One day and night is divided into six divisions and thirty time periods .
At the spring and fall equinoxes the day and the night each have fifteen time periods. At other times there are increases and decreases.
In the fifth month the day has eighteen time periods and the night twelve.
In the eleventh month the night has eighteen time periods and the day twelve.
According to the Xiguo zhuan by Dharma Master zang :
Among ordinary people the day is divided into eight time periods . (Note in the original: four in the day and four in the night; each time period is further divided into four segments.) The period of the moon’s waxing up till the full moon is called the white portion , and the period of the moon’s waning up till the disappearance of the moon is called the black portion .
The black portion may be fourteen days or fifteen days.
This is because the length of a month varies.
The black portion followed by a white portion constitutes one month .
Six months together form one ayana.
The period when the course of the sun remains inside to the north of the equator is the uttarāyaṇa; the period when the course of the sun is outside to the south of the equator is the dakṣnāyana.
The two ayanas together form one year .
The year is also divided into six seasons .
From the sixteenth day of the first month to the fifteenth day of the third month is the season of “increasing warmth.” From the sixteenth of the third month to the fifteenth of the fifth month is the season of “excessive heat.” From the sixteenth of the fifth month to the fifteenth of the seventh month is the rainy season.
From the sixteenth of the seventh month to the fifteenth of the ninth month is the season of “rich growth.” From the sixteenth of the ninth month to the fifteenth of the eleventh month is the season of “increasing cold.” From the sixteenth of the eleventh month to the fifteenth of the first month is the season of “excessive cold.” In the holy teaching of the Tathāgata the year is divided into three parts.
From the sixteenth of the first month to the fifteenth of the fifth month is the hot season.
From the sixteenth of the fifth month to the fifteenth of the ninth month is the rainy season.
From the sixteenth of the ninth month to the fifteenth of the first month is the cold season.
The year is also sometimes divided into four seasons:
spring, summer, fall, and winter.
To summarize all these explanations, fifteen  nights form a half-month.
Two half-months form a month.
Three months form a season.
Two seasons form an ayana.
One ayana is six months or a half-year.
Two ayanas form one year.
Two and a half years form a pair.
This is because of intercalary months.
When the intercalary month is added to the original month there is a pairing of months, not a pairing of intercalary months.
If a pair of intercalary months occurs every five years, this would mean that one intercalary month occurs every two and a half years. How could we posit a pair of intercalary months in this same period?
The matter becomes clear once we make this calculation of the time duration. There are four kinds of kalpas:
the antarakalpa, the kalpa of formation, the kalpa of destruction, and the major kalpa.
A long time passes between the time when the human life span is ten years and the time when it is eighty thousand.
Add to this the time it takes for human life span to decrease to ten years. The total is called the antarakalpa.
In contrast to other sums of time periods it is called the antarakalpa.
The calculation is made on the basis of the facts.
According to the Za ahan jing :
If a city, one yojana on all sides and in height, were filled with dust and one particle of dust taken out every one hundred years, when all the particles of dust had been taken out in this way a kalpa would still not yet be over. I take this to refer to one antarakalpa.
In the case of the major kalpa the comparison would be with a city that is eighty yojanas in all directions.
The Loutan jing says: To discuss kalpas with two comparisons, first, take a large city one thousand li from east to west and four thousand li from north and south.
If this city were filled with dust, and every one hundred years gods were to come and take a single particle of dust, even when all the particles of dust had been taken away , a kalpa would still not have been exhausted.
Second, take a large rock, forty li on all four sides.
If every hundred years gods were to come down and touch this rock with their fine clothes, even when the rock has been worn down due to this repeated contact, a kalpa would still not have been exhausted.
This too an antarakalpa.
The Loutan jing continues: Second, the kalpa of formation consists of forty kalpas; the kalpa of destruction likewise consists of forty kalpas.
This is because when the world comes into being it takes twenty kalpas, it stays in existence for twenty more kalpas.
The period of destruction is twenty kalpas, and the period of absence is twenty kalpas.
Here the period of abiding is combined with that of formation and the period of absence with that of destruction, and each of these two periods consists of forty kalpas.
The periods of formation and destruction combined last eighty kalpas, and this is called a major kalpa.
To describe the matter yet again, there are six kinds of kalpas: antarakalpa, kalpa of formation, kalpa of abiding, kalpa of destruction, kalpa of absence, and major kalpa.
Or, there are three kinds of kalpas:
minor kalpa, medium kalpa, major kalpa.
The minor kalpa refers to an antarakalpa.
The medium kalpa refers to those of formation and destruction .
The major kalpa refers to those of formation and destruction together.
In the heavens in the realm of desire the life span is one minor kalpa.
In the three heavens of the first meditation the kalpa of the life span is the medium kalpa.
In the heavens of the second meditations and above the kalpa of the life span is major kalpas.
The worldly arithmetic in foreign countries speaks of sixty ranks.
Beyond these ranks counting is not possible and such numbers are called asaṃkhya .
One to sixty ranks may be used to count the number of kalpas; the asaṃkhya kalpa refers to the major kalpa.
Thus, when the Dazhidu lun uses the city of one hundred yojanas as the measure, speaking of taking one particle of dust once in each one hundred years, or takes as a measure the metaphor of the light heavenly cloth of Kāśī brushing a rock measuring a hundred yojanas on each side once every hundred years, all of these refer to the major kalpa.
In the sahā world in the course of a one major kalpa a thousand buddhas appear.
Since what is called a kalpa cannot be calculated in finite numbers, the metaphors of the rock, dust, and the city are used to describe its duration.
As described above, there are four kalpas of formation, abiding, destruction, and absence.
As noted above, the life span increases from ten years to eighty thousand years, and then decreases from eighty thousand years to ten years.
Twenty repetitions of this constitute one minor kalpa.
Twenty minor kalpas constitute one kalpa of formation.
If we are to calculate this in years eight trillion one hundred billion and eight million years corresponds to one minor kalpa.
At present the kalpa of formation has been completed and we are now in the kalpa of abiding and have finished eight minor kalpas there.
Śākyamuni Tathāgata is the fourth buddha in the kalpa of abiding.
Another nine hundred and ninetysix buddhas will appear successively after him.
According to the Xiguo zhuan by Dharma Master zang :
The unit of measurement of distance is a yojana .
One yojana is the distance that a sage king’s army can travel in one day.
According to an old tradition one yojana is forty li.
In the customary usage in India it is thirty li.
In the opinion of holy scriptures it is only sixteen li.
The Abhidharma-śāstra says, “Four hastaka is one dhanu .
Five hundred dhanus is one krośa.
Eight krośas is one yojana.” one dhanu is equivalent in length to eight chi, five hundred dhanus is equivalent in length to four hundred zhang.
, four hundred zhang is one krośa.
One li, on the other hand, is three hundred and sixty bu .
One bu is six chi.
[Since ten chi is one zhang, altogether two hundred and sixteen zhang is one li.
Two li will be four hundred and thirty-two zhang.
If we calculate on the basis of the equation that] five hundred dhanus is four hundred zhang, one krośa is still thirty-two zhang short of two li.
Thus, we conclude that one krośa is less than two li, and that eight krośas, which is identical to one yojana, is less than sixteen li.
According to the Zabaozang jing , “One krośa is five li.” If we combine this with the Abhidharma’s thesis that eight krośas is one yojana, then the latter will be forty li.
According to the Chang ahan jing :
How far do the effects of the three calamities reach upward into the heavens?
When the calamity of fire occurs its effects reach as far as Ābhāsvara Heaven.
When the calamity of water occurs its effects reach as far as Śubha kṛtsna Heaven.
When the calamity of wind occurs its effects reach as far as Bṛhatphala Heaven.
When the three calamities are about to occur, all the people of the world are practicing the correct teaching, following the correct view, and cultivating the ten good deeds.
In this way a person achieves the second state of meditation .
Immediately he jumps up into the sky, and dwelling in the realm of holy ones, or of a deity, or of Brahmā, he says loudly, “Wise men and women, you should know the delight of the second state of meditation, which is free of sensation and viewing.” People, hearing this, cultivate the state free of sensation and viewing, and when their bodies are destroyed they achieve rebirth in Ābhāsvara Heaven .
At that time the sentient beings in hell, having finished their punishment, their bodies there having been destroyed, are reborn among human beings. They also cultivate the state free of sensation and viewing and obtain rebirth in Ābhāsvara Heaven.
Animals, hungry ghosts, asuras , and other beings in the heavens of the six realms of desire all attain rebirth in Ābhāsvara Heaven.
At this time hell is emptied first, then the realm of animals is emptied.
Subsequently the realms of hungry ghosts and asuras and further the heavens in the realm of desire, up to Paranirmitavaśavartin Heaven, are emptied.
And then the human realm is emptied, leaving no traces.
This world is destroyed and the calamity then occurs.
The Shunzhengli lun says:
And so there will be no sentient beings left in hell.
At this point it is said that the hell is destroyed.
Those who are meant to receive karmic consequences in hell will, by the power of karma, be placed elsewhere.
The cases of the realms of animals and of ghosts may be inferred from this.
At that point no living being is found in a human body and human bodies are identical to the Buddha’s body.
At that time, in the human realm in this continent a person without a teacher but who is in accord with the teaching can attain the first state of meditation.
Coming out of this meditative state, he says loudly, “Leaving life produces delight and pleasure, which is very enjoyable and calming.” On hearing this, other human beings all go into meditation, and when their lives end they all are reborn in the world of Brahmā.
Consequently, in this continent sentient beings disappear.
This is said to be “the disappearance of people from the Jambudvīpa continent.” The case of the eastern and western continents can be inferred from this.
In the northern continent, when their lives are finished beings are reborn in the heavens of the realm of desire. Because their sense organs are inferior they cannot abandon desires, and they are reborn in the heavens of the realm of desire.
There they realize a meditative state and, achieving superior karmic conditions, they transcend desires.
After this no sentient beings are left in the human realm and the human realm is destroyed.
If in the heavenly realm, in the six heavens of the realm of desire, gods follow the teaching and achieve the first state of meditation, they will be reborn in the world of Brahmā . Then it is said that the six heavens of the realm of desire have been destroyed.
In this way no sentient beings will be left in the realm of desire, and it is said that sentient beings in the realm of desire have been destroyed.
In the world of Brahmā, if a sentient being without a teacher but who is in accord with the teaching attains the second state of meditation and coming out of this meditative state he says, “Meditative concentration produces delight and pleasure, which is greatly enjoyable and calming.” Hearing this, other gods all go into meditation, and when their lives end they are reborn in Ābhāsvara Heaven .
Consequently, in the Brahmā world sentient beings disappear.
This is said to be “the disappearance of the world of sentient beings.” Only the insentient world of the environment is left; this world is vast and empty.
In universes elsewhere all sentient beings sense that karmic processes have ceased in this world-system of threefold one thousand worlds.
Then seven suns appear.
All the oceans dry up and the mountains become empty.
Continents and islands and the three cosmic wheels on which they stand are all burned.
Ferocious winds and flames rise up to the heavenly palaces, turning the Brahmā palace into ashes.
flames that rise in a given realm burn the palaces of that realm.
calamities that are not of that realm wreak destruction on that realm.
This is caused by the interaction between the realms.
Thus, it is said, “Lower fire, driven by wind, burns up a higher realm.” Thus, the fire of the realm of desire rises and causes fire in the realm of form, which proves calamitous.
One should thus know that the development that begins with the gradual disappearance of the hells results in the disappearance of the insentient world of the environment.
This entire development is called the kalpa of destruction.
The Guanfo sanmei jing says:
The period from the beginning of heaven and earth to its end is called one kalpa.
When a kalpa is about to end the calamity of fire occurs.
All people turn against the correct and turn to evil , rushing toward the ten evil deeds.
Rain will stop coming from the sky and plants will not grow.
Beginning with the spring where the streams originate down to the four great rivers, all water sources dry up.
After a long time the wind goes into the bottom of the ocean, bringing the sun palace up and placing it in its original location on top of Mount Sumeru. The Chang ahan jing, T.1:137c14–138b16, says:
After a very long time a great black wind blows over the ocean, causing the ocean to a depth of eighty-four thousand yojanas to separate into two banks.
The wind takes the sun palace  and places it halfway up Mount Sumeru, forty-two thousand yojanas above the ground and securely in the orbit of the sun. [In this way the second sun appears.
.] In a similar way the appearance of the seven suns is explained one by one.
The Zaxin lun says:
At the time a kalpa is destroyed, seven suns, like wheels, appear  Mount Yugaṃdhara.
According to another opinion one sun is divided into seven suns.
According to yet another opinion the suns come from Avīci Hell, brought out by the karma of sentient beings.) When one sun comes out, a hundred plants and trees suddenly die.
When two suns come out the water of the four great oceans, to a depth of one hundred to seven hundred yojanas, spontaneously dries up.
When three suns come out the water of the four great oceans, to the depth one thousand to seven thousand yojanas, begins to decrease.
When four suns appear the water of the four great oceans, to the depth of one thousand yojanas, is completely exhausted, and when the five suns appear the water of the four great oceans, seven thousand yojanas long and wide, is completely exhausted.
The Chang ahan jing, T.1:138a10–b1, says that it after five suns come out the water in the ocean begins to change depth.
The ocean water becomes like cows’ hoofprints after a spring rain.
In the end the ocean dries up so that not even a finger can be dipped in it.) When six suns come out the ground, as deep as sixty-eight thousand yojanas, is covered with smoke.
From Mount Sumeru through the entire cosmic world-system numbering one thousand to the power of three, as well as the eight great hells—everything is burned up.
When the smoke settles nothing is left.
The lives of all people have ended.
For all beings on Mount Sumeru and in the six heavens of the realm of desire life comes to an end, and their palaces are emptied.
All is impermanent and cannot remain forever.
When the seven suns come out the great ground and Mount Sumeru will gradually begin to crumble in an area measuring one hundred thousand yojanas wide, and in the end there wil be nothing left.
Everywhere in the mountains jewels explode and smoke and flames reach Brahmā’s heavens.
All realms of inferior births will disappear.
There will be no more punishments; only merits arise.
All will gather in the fifteenth heaven and above.
Everything below the fourteenth heaven is destroyed.
Newly born gods have not seen this and are afraid.
Gods born earlier come to console them, saying, “Don’t be afraid.
does not reach here.” When people’s lives are finished they are reborn in Ābhāsvara Heaven.
Thought is their food, light shines spontaneously, and they have the supernatural power to fly.
Some are reborn elsewhere.
If they are reborn in hell, when their punishment in hell is completed they are reborn in heaven. If their punishment is not finished they are born elsewhere.
There is no sun, moon, or stars; there are also no day or night.
There is only great darkness. This is called the fire kalpa.
The karmic retribution of the fire kalpa brings this destruction.
When the kalpa is about to completed the fire goes out by itself.
A great cloud forms and gradually drops rain.
Each drop is shaped like the axle of a chariot.
At that time the entire cosmic world-system numbering one thousand to the power of three will be filled with water, up to Brahmā’s heavens.
The Yüqie lun says:
Because sentient beings respond to the karmic powers that produce phenomenal appearances, and because there is the matter of the six kinds of burning, six suns also gradually appear.
Compared with the earlier suns, the heat of these suns is four times stronger.
When they become seven, the heat is increased seven times.
What are the objects of the six kinds of burning?
Canals and moats of different sizes.
These are dried up by the second sun.
Smaller and larger rivers.
These are dried up by the third sun.
The Great Pond Free of Heat, which is dried up by the fourth sun.
The great ocean.
It is dried by the fifth and a part of the sixth sun.
Mount Sumeru and the ground are firm and solid; they are burned up by a part of the sixth and the seventh sun.
The flames of these fires are intensified by wind and spread with increasing strength, reaching as far as Brahmā’s heavens.
In this way the world is burned up and reduced to ashes and charcoal.
Nothing else is left, even in shadowy forms.
This is called the destruction of the environment world.
This process takes twenty kalpas; the condition lasts for another twenty kalpas.
What is called the calamity of water?
After the calamity of fires has taken place seven times, in the heavenly realms of the second meditative state a calamity occurs spontaneously from the water element.
It destroys the world in the way water melts away salt.
The water and the environment world disappear simultaneously.
After the destruction the condition lasts for another twenty kalpas.
What is called the calamity of wind?
After the calamity of water has taken place seven times, the calamity of fire again occurs seven times.
Then, immediately in the heavenly realms of the third meditative state, a calamity occurs from the wind element.
It destroys the world in the way wind dries out the joints of limbs and makes them disappear.
This wind and the environment world disappear simultaneously.
After the destruction the condition lasts for twenty kalpas.
Here the destruction of the world is described briefly.
The Shunzhengli lun says:
These three major calamities of water, fire, and wind oppress sentient beings, making them abandon the lower ground of earth and gather together in the heavens.
The calamity of fire is caused by the appearance of seven suns.
According to one opinion the seven suns travel in a way similar to the way geese travel, following their separate paths in a circular motion.
According to another opinion the seven suns travel at different heights following their respective paths in a circular motion.
The distance between these paths is five thousand yojanas.
Then the calamity of water is caused by a torrential rainfall.
Some explain this as follows:
In the sky, in the region corresponding to the third state of meditation, rain heats up and congeals into water.
Another explains that the cosmic waterwheel comes up from below and shoots up water, which in turn floods everything.
What is certain is that it occurs in this world.
Later, the calamity of wind is caused by a strong, striking wind. Some explain this as follows:
In the sky, in the region corresponding to the fourth state of meditation, wind suddenly arises.
Another explains that the cosmic wind wheel shoots up air, which causes a windstorm.
What is certain is that wind calamities work in the same way as the above case .
What is the sequence of the three calamities?
First, the seven calamities of fire occur one after another.
Then one calamity of water occurs.
Immediately after that the seven calamities of fire occur again.
After these seven calamities of fire one calamity of water takes place again.
In this way seven calamities of water occur.
Then the seven calamities of fire take place and then a calamity of wind occurs.
In this way eight sets of seven calamities of fire, one set of seven calamities of water, and one calamity of wind occurs.
Each occurrence of a calamity of water or wind follows a calamity of fire.
After the calamity of water or wind there is always a calamity of fire.
In this way there is a principled order in the occurrences of calamities.
Why must the seven calamities of fire occur before one calamity of water occurs?
This pattern is determined by the life span of the gods in Ābhāsvara Heaven, which is as long as eight major kalpas.
So it is in the eight kalpas that the calamity of water occurs.
The reason why seven calamities of water and eight sets of seven calamities of fire must occur before one calamity of wind occurs is because this pattern is determined by the life span of gods in Śubhakṛtsna Heaven, which is sixty-four kalpas long.
Therefore, it is only after eight times eight calamities that the calamity of wind occurs.
Depending on how high the level of meditation that is cultivated by sentient beings, karmic effects mature at different times and their life spans become longer.
Thus, the places where they reside become more permanent.
Thus, verses from the Abhidharma-śāstra (Za apitanxin lun, T.1552:959c22– Seven calamities of fire pass in order, And then one calamity of water.
Seven times seven calamities of fire and seven calamities of water, And again seven calamities of fire, and after that the calamity of wind. The Duifa lun says:
Thus, in the eastern direction, one after another, without interruption, an infinite number of worlds exists:
some are about to be destroyed and some are about to come into being; some are in the process of being destroyed and some remain in the state of having been destroyed; some are in the process of coming into being and some remain in the state of having come into being.
As in the eastern direction, so too in all ten directions is the situation the same.
In this way, whether it is the world of sentient beings or the world of their environments, all have been produced by the power of karma and desires.
They have resulted from the increase of the karmic power of desire.
For this reason they are all called the truth of suffering The Zaxin lun says:
Question: Why does the kalpa of destruction not affect  the fourth meditative state?
Answer: This realm consists of the Śuddhāvāsa Heavens.
These are the highest heavens . If beings are born there, they are bound to achieve nirvana there.
They will not be reborn in any of the lower realms.
The cessation of things is not achieved through wisdom; it is only due to the lack of causal conditions that things do not arise there .
The situation for those beings who dwell and experience the kalpa of destruction is different, because they are reborn there through the power of increased merits.
Because internal disturbance is bad, in these levels internal disturbances lead to external calamities.
In the first meditative state, coarser and finer mental disturbances of fire occur internally, and for that reason the calamity of fire results externally.
In  the second meditative state, internal disturbances of taking delight in water occur, and for that reason the calamity of water takes place externally.
In the third meditative state, internal disturbances of the wind of the exhalation and inhalation of breath occur, and for that reason the calamity of wind takes place externally. Question:
If mental disturbances are absent in the fourth meditative state, how could it be not permanent?
Answer: kṣaṇa is affected by impermanence.
Therefore, the fourth meditative state lack the fixed character of continuity.
The moment a being is born in that heaven a heavenly palace also appears simultaneously.
When the being’s life span ends there, the heaven also disappears.
The Qishi jing says:
Then, again after infinite and incalculable days and months, a great cloud appears and covers the entire Brahmā world.
Having covered it, it pours down a floodlike rain.
The raindrops are large, some are like a chariot’s shaft, others are shaped like a hammer.
After hundreds of thousands of millions of years the rainwater gradually accumulates and all the places where the gods reside are filled with it.
This body of water is supported by four wheels of wind.
What are these called?
The first is called “holding,” the second “safely holding,” the third “not falling,” and the fourth “firmly holding.” After the rain stops the water recedes spontaneously and its level goes down by an infinite number of hundreds of thousands of millions of yojanas.
Then great winds appear simultaneously in the four directions.
The name of the wind is Anapiluo.
It blows into the body of water and agitates it incessantly.
Great bubbles appear spontaneously in the water and the great wind blows it up into the sky, and above this the palace of Brahmā Heaven is built.
It is beautiful and attractive, filled with the seven jewels of gold, silver, lapis lazuli, crystal, red pearls, musāragalva shells, and agate.
Into this world Brahmā gods are born.
That water recedes further and the water level goes down by an infinite number of hundreds of thousands of millions of yojanas.
As before, the winds called Anapiluo arise in the four directions.
This great wind blows up bubbles and forms a heavenly palace.
Māra gods appear and live around the walls, in the same way as do the Brahmā gods.
Only the degree of refinement of the jewels is different.
In the same way, other heavens, from Paranirmitavaśavartin Heaven to Yama Heaven, are formed one after another.
The six heavens are completed one after another in the same way as Brahmā Heaven; only the degrees of refinement are different.
Then the water again decreases and the water level goes down further by an infinite number of hundreds of thousands of millions of yojanas.
The water then remains calm. From the body of water bubbles go up in the four directions to a distance of sixty-eight myriad yojanas.
The circumference  is infinitely vast.
A great wind blows up bubbles and forms Mount Sumeru, made of four jewels.
The wind blows bubbles again and forms the Heaven of the Thirty-three Gods , made of seven jewels.
Again, the wind blows up bubbles and in the middle of Mount Sumeru, at the height of forty-two thousand yojanas, they form the palaces of the sun and the moon gods, made of seven jewels.
It is for this reason that there are seven sun palaces in a single palace, securely kept even today; these palaces are all made of seven jewels.
The wind again blows up bubbles from the ocean water to the height of a myriad yojanas to form a similar crystal palace and city for the sky-dwelling yakṣas.
The wind also blows up bubbles on the four sides of Mount Sumeru, each at the distance of one thousand yojanas from the mountain.
Under the great ocean, on the four sides, asura cities, decorated with seven jewels, are formed.
Again the wind blows up bubbles to form other great jewel mountains.
Continuing in this way, the wind blows up bubbles, passing through the four great continents and the eight myriad smaller continents outside of Mount Sumeru and the other great mountains, and securely stations a boundary there called the Great Surrounding Mountain Range.
Its height and width are both six hundred eighty myriad millions of yojanas.
The boundary range is solidly formed out of diamond and can only be destroyed with the greatest difficulty.
In a similar way, the great wind digs into the ground to an increasing depth and places the great body of water inside it. The water remains calm and unmoving.
Thus, the great ocean is brought into existence.
Again, the Qishi jing says:
Why is the water of this great ocean so salty and bitter, unsuitable for drinking?
There are three reasons for this.
What are the three?
First, for an infinite period of time after the calamity of fire, a heavy cloud covers the world and does not move.
Then the cloud pours down rain all over the world.
This great rain washes over all the palaces in Brahmā Heaven, and then the palaces of Māra’s heaven, then the palaces in Paranirmitavaśavartin Heaven, Nirmāṇarati Heaven, Tuṣita Heaven, and Yama Heaven.
When these palaces are inundated all kinds of salty, sharp, and bitter tastes flow down from the .
The rain then washes over Mount Sumeru, the four great continents, the eight myriad smaller continents, and many mountains.
When these places are inundated flow into the ocean.
For this reason the water of the great ocean is salty, unsuitable for drinking.
Second, inside this great ocean live many great deities with massive bodies.
All the excrement and urine go into the ocean.
For this reason the water of the great ocean is salty, unsuitable for drinking.
Third, ancient sages cast spells that cursed the water of the ocean, vowing to make it salty and unsuitabl for drinking.
For this reason the water of the great ocean is salty, unsuitable for drinking.
Also, according to the Shunzhengli lun :
The kalpa of formation refers to the period from the rising of wind to the time when sentient beings are born in hell.
After this world is destroyed by calamities, for twenty antarakalpas there remains only empty space.
After this long period of time another equally long period of time .
When this kalpa of formation arrives, the karmic power of all sentient beings increases.
In the sky a breeze gradually arises.
This is the sign that the environment world , which forms the container for the world of sentient beings, is about to be formed. The wind gradually becomes stronger and causes, as was said earlier, the wind wheel, the water wheel, and the the metal wheel to be formed.
Then the heavenly palace of great Brahmā gods, and so on up to the heavenly palace of the Yama gods, are established. Then the wind rises again.
This is how the external environment world is formed.
This is due to the power of sentient beings.
In other words, for a long time sentient beings are gathered in Ābhāsvara Heaven.
Because of the number of gods there the residence becomes crowded.
Those beings whose merits have decreased must spread out into the lower heavens.
This is how this environment world works.
First one sentient being dies in Ābhā svara Heaven and is reborn in the palace of the highest of the Brahmā heavens, the Mahābrahmā Heaven.
Later, other sentient beings die there and are reborn in the second highest of the Brahmā heavens, Brahmā purohita Heaven.
Some are born in the Brahmā heaven.
Others are born in Paranirmitavaśavartin Heaven.
Gradually being reborn in lower realms in this way, we get to the human realm, and later beings are born in the realms of hungry ghosts, of animals, and of hell.
It is a matter of principle that if there is later destruction, there must be formation before that.
When one sentient being is reborn in Avīci Hell, it is known that the twenty antarakalpas of formation has been completed.
After this a period of twenty antarakalpas, called “abiding after formation,” follows in an orderly fashion.
The Lishi apitan lun says:
When the entire environment world has been formed, two kinds of realms grow, namely the realm of earth and the realm of fire.
The realm of wind arises and blows on the realm of fire, which heats and refines the earth realm.
The realm of wind constantly blows and make all things become firm.
When things have been made firm all kinds of jewels become visible.
In this way the long period of sixty kalpas is ultimately completed.
The Chang ahan jing says: These three plus earth make the four calamities and the four kalpas.
Excluding earth, the remaining three are called the major kalpa.
do not reach the fourth meditative state, because these realms are the Śuddhāvāsa Heavens.
These are the highest heavens . If beings are born there, they achieve nirvana there.
They are not to be reborn in any of the lower realms. The cessation of things is not achieved through wisdom; it is only due to the lack of conditions that they do not arise .
In the course of the transformation of heaven and earth, when heaven is formed anew, there is nothing in it.
The sun and moon are also absent.
In the ground a sweet spring opens up, the water of which has the taste of honey.
At that time some gods of Ābhāsvara Heaven, having exhausted their merit, are reborn in this newly formed world.
Some of them love this new ground and, being frivolous in temperament, dip their finger in the spring to taste the water.
After three attempts they taste the sweetness, and as they keep tasting it their skin gradually becomes coarse, losing the heavenly and miraculous light .
The world plunges into darkness.
Later, a great black wind blows on the ocean water and taking the sun and moon that are floating on it, places them securely on the side of Mount Sumeru in the orbit of the sun.
They circle Mount Sumeru and illumine the four realms under heaven.
People at that time are delighted when they appear and are frightened when they disappear.
From this point on the cycles of day and night, the end and the beginning of the month, the seasons of the year repeat themselves.
When the kalpa of formation first begins, gods come down and become people. They are all born by transformation.
Their bodies shine as they wish and they have the miraculous ability to fly.
There are no distinctions of male and female or of higher and lower social rank.
Many are born together.
For this reason they are called “many born” .
The earth has the natural taste of butter or fresh ghee. It is sweet like honey.
Later, sentient beings try to taste it by scooping it in their hands, and eventually they become attached to its taste and make balls of it to eat.
The light they emit gradually dims and they lose their supernatural powers.
The faces of those who eat a lot of earth look haggard; the faces of those who eat little remain shiny.
This leads to the rise of the distinction between winning and losing.
Because of the distinction between winning and losing the distinction between right and wrong appears.
The taste of the earth gradually disappears and all are distressed, cursing this development as a disaster.
Then the earth loses its taste completely and forms a skin , thin like a pancake.
This skin also disappears and another surface appears.
This thicker surface also disappears.
According to the Zengyi jing , “Also rich earth appears spontaneously.
It tastes like sweet wine.” Again, the Loutan jing says:
The sweet earth disappears and a two-branched vine appears.
The taste is also sweet.
People eat a lot of it over a long period of time and they all begin to look as if they are always laughing.
The two-branched vine disappears and rice without husk appears.
Without cooking it contains all tasty flavors.
Sentient beings eat it and the physical distinction between male and female appears. Again, the Zengyi jing says:
Then, those among the gods who have stronger sexual desires become female human beings, and in this way the distinction between husbands and wives appears.
Later, the sexual desires of sentient beings increase, and so husbands and wives come to live together.
After the remaining effects of the merits of sentient beings that support their life spans are exhausted, a god of Ābhāsvara Heaven comes here and stays in a mother’s womb.
In this way birth from the womb appears in the world.
At that time if one goes to the great city of Campā or to any other residential city quarters, one sees rice plants growing spontaneously. If one harvests the rice crop in the morning, another crop is ripe by evening.
If one harvests it in the evening, another crop is ripe in the morning.
As one crop is harvested, new crops appear immediately.
The Zhong ahan jing (T.26:675c24–676a19; ref. Chang ahan jing, T.1:148c10–29) says:
Rice plants grew four cun long and had no stalks.
Sentient beings then harvested what they needed each day.
They taught each other to follow this practice.
They took five days worth of rice.
Then the rice plants that grew back gradually did not revive and became dead stumps.
Then people cried in distress.
They assigned to each a field, residences, and rice plants, and marked out boundaries.
People then hid their own rice and stole grain from other people’s fields.
Failing to settle such disputes, they voted to establish an unbiased chief, who was to protect people, rewarding the good and punishing the evil.
Some people used swords, sticks, and other similar weapons to beat and kill others.
birth, old age, illness, and death.
The possession of fields and land led to disputes.
Therefore, each took some of his property and provided it .
Choosing one person of distinguished and elegant appearance, who was endowed with a great deal of property, they asked him to be the ruler.
This was how the name “people’s ruler” appeared.
His fields and residences were called by this name.
The realm under heaven prospered in ways that cannot be described in detail here.
The ruler honored and practiced the ten good deeds and showed compassion for people in the way that parents love their children.
People respected the ruler just as a son respects his father.
Human life span became very long and people enjoyed unsurpassed prosperity.
The Shunzhengli lun says:
From taking the ordinary food their bodies become gradually heavy.
The light disappeared and darkness appeared.
The sun, moon, and many stars appeared from this point on.
As people indulged in consuming it, the tasty earth disappeared.
At this point on the thin cakes of earth skin appeared.
As they rushed to eat them, the earth cakes disappeared.
Then fine rice plants appeared.
As they rushed to eat the fine rice plants, these plants disappeared.
Then unplanted fragrant rice plants appeared spontaneously.
The crowd grabbed these and ate them till they were full.
Because this food was coarse residues remained in the body.
Because the people wanted to get rid of the residues, the two excretory organs appeared.
For this reason male and female organs appeared.
Because these organs looked very different in appearance, due to the power of karmic influences, they looked at each other.
This is how immorality eventually came into existence.
Further developments led to the rise of theft.
So, the community chose one moral person, and each person took one-sixth of his income and hired the moral person as the guard, designating him as the ruler of the fields.
In this way the name kṣatriya was established.
People accepted his rule and his care spread over all the land.
For this reason, he was further called the great king.
There were no kings .
He was the first king; many kings appeared following him.
The Chang ahan jing says: The Buddha said to the monks, “There are four things that last for an incalculable and infinite period of time.
This time period cannot be measured by the sun and moon, or by the annual progress of Jupiter.
What are the four?
First, as the calamities of the world occur in sequence, the period between the destructions of this world is extremely long, and cannot be measured by the sun and moon, or by the annual progress of Jupiter.
Second, when this world is destroyed there will be a period in which it is empty and deserted.
For an extremely long time there will be no world.
This period cannot be measured by the sun and moon, or by the annual progress of Jupiter.
Third, the period from the time when heaven and earth come into being until the formation of the world is extremely long.
This period of time cannot be measured by the sun and moon, or by the annual progress of Jupiter.
Fourth, after heaven and earth have been formed, this world will remain for a very long time.
This period of time cannot be measured by the sun and moon, or by the annual progress of Jupiter.
These four things last for incalculable and infinite periods of time. These time periods cannot be measured by the sun and moon, or by the annual progress of Jupiter.” verses say: The distance of one hundred yojanas is easily covered by mustard seeds. The three calamities naturally exhausts themselves. The fire struck from a stone does not form a permanent flame. The lightning from thunder does not remain long. When hunger is extreme people eat each other. With swords and weapons they conquer each other. Against pestilence no doctor is effective. Their labor in vain, people cry out in hatred and suffering. Close relatives cannot help each other. Cruel violence leaves behind its echoes. A boxful of writings left behind is in vain. The enjoyment of plentiful wealth and valuables is pointless. There is a great sigh at the swiftness of the river of waves. And grief at this entanglement of painful karma.
With birth and destruction pressing hard, The situation is urgent and no peace has been secured. The Three Realms Explanation of the Four Continents and Explanation of the Heavens. Four Continents Introduction, The Name, Measurement of the Earth, Measurement of Mountains, Measurement of Different Realms, Locations, Size of the Body, Life Span, Size of Clothing, and Comparative Merits. The three realms have a fixed ranking and the six realms of existence are divided into separate sectors.
Those that are refined have different appearances from those that are coarse; pain takes different manifestations than pleasures.
If we contemplate the origins , we are led to material form and mind; these appearances and manifestations are ultimately matters of transient phenomena that come into and go out of existence.
The wheel of coming into and going out of existence is called impermanence.
Shadowy illusions of material form and mind are the origin of suffering.
Thus, the Nirvana Sutra compares them to a great river; the Lotus Sutra compares them to a burning house.
The Sage is enlightened and, stopping the carriage , returns to the origin; he transcends the three realms of existence and proceeds steadily through the ten stages of the bodhisattva’s path.
The world is constituted by the combination of four basic elements; when primary and secondary conditions are combined, then at the appropriate time, it is formed. After undergoing many calamities it returns to nonexistence.
Those with short life spans consider the time period between the world’s formation and destruction to be long; by calling it long they reveal the brevity of their own lives.
Empty space is nonexistent, and therefore its size is unlimited.
The world has no ultimate boundaries and therefore it has no fixed shape.
The Dharma King rules over the great chiliocosm; the Brahmā king governs the small chiliocosm.
Śakra resides at Mount Sumeru.
The Iron Mountains form the encircling wall.
The great ocean fills the eight directions with water.
The sun and moon are the lights for the four quarters.
All kinds of sentient beings live in this world as their home; numerous minute conscious beings do not even think of it as unclean as mud and charcoal.
They look at it from the viewpoint of those sunk in worldliness; false and excessive talk is offered.
Those who investigate matters in the light of the Great Way grasp truth as something familiar.
The world honors the Duke of Zhou and Confucius and always follows their scriptures.
The discourse on the universe remains incomplete, however.
The Book of Changes speaks of “dark heaven” but this does not go beyond naming it as a profound and deep realm.
The Zhuangzi speaks of the “blue sky” but this refers only to the color of distant objects.
Daoist recluses, blindly accepting the Zhuangzi’s “clarity,” believe that the world viewed  is blue like jade pieces.
Confucian scholars, following scripture, say that heaven is black like lacquer paint.
Different colors of blue and green are both inappropriate to describe the reality that is one and the same.
Con fucian scholars and Daoist recluses offer different descriptions, ignorant of the fact that reality is one.
In this way worldly people honor the name of Heaven but know nothing about its reality.
How could they know anything about the marvelous beauties of the six heavens of the realm of desire or of the light that illumines Brahmā’s ten heavens in the realm of form?
Knowing nothing of the visible matters in the lower realms, how could one fathom the profound truth about these higher realms that is beyond our understanding?
Mahayana scriptures frequently speak of seeking “emptiness” .
Such scriptures as the Chang ahan jing and the Loutan jing describe the world in detail.
Their descriptions, both in prose and verse, are extensive, and cannot be discussed fully.
Here I only summarize them briefly and present their essence.
According to the Chang ahan jing , the Qishi jing , and other sources:
At the heart of the four continents is Mount Sumeru.
Around this mountain there are also eight other mountains.
Mount Sumeru is surrounded by the great ocean, which is eighty-four thousand yojanas deep.
The ocean surrounding the first of the eight mountains is eight thousand yojanas wide, and contains the water of eight merits  Each ocean around each of the subsequent mountains is smaller than the preceding one to the same measure, so that the water under the seventh mountain is one thousand two hundred and fifty yojanas wide.
The saltwater ocean around these is infinitely wide.
Outside of this ocean is a mountain called Iron Mountain .
This mountain surrounds the ocean, and one sun and one moon circle around day and night and illumine the four realms.
All this is called one land.
One thousand of these, surrounded by an iron wall, are called one small thousand–worldsystem.
One thousand of these world-systems, again surround by an iron wall, are called one middle thousand –world-system.
One thousand of these middle thousand–world-systems, also surrounded by an iron wall, are called one great thousand–world-system.
Within it there are millions of four continents, kings of mountains, suns, moons, and peaks. It has been noted from olden times that there is a miscalculation in numbers here.) When the universe is formed, these worlds are formed at the same time; when it is destroyed, they are destroyed at the same time.
All of these constitute the one location under control of one preaching buddha.
This is called the threefold thousand–world-system.
It is also called the sahā world.
The Zishi sanmei jing says:
As for the sahā world (Compiler’s note:
things of this world are hard and difficult to bear, so it is designated by the word “to bear.”), the buddha there is called Nengren .
The world is divided into three realms:
the realm of desire, the realm of form, and the formless realm.
The desires in the realm of desire are of four kinds:
desires of emotions, desires of forms, desires of food, and sexual desires.
The desires in the realm of form are of two kinds: desires of emotions and desires of forms.
In the formless realm there is only one kind of desire: desire of emotions.
In the first, the realm of desire, all four kinds of desires are present; desires are strong and forms are weaker.
Therefore, it is called the realm of desire.
In the second, the realm of form, forms are strong and desires are weaker.
Therefore, it is called the realm of form.
In the third, the formless realm, forms have disappeared and desires are inferior. Therefore, it is called the formless realm.
The Huayan jing discusses the threefold thousand–world-system and lists many categories, but because the discussion is cumbersome it is not reproduced here.) The Huayan jing says:
The threefold thousand–world-system comes to be formed from infinite numbers of causes and conditions.
The great earth is based on the wheel of water; the wheel of water is based on the wheel of wind; the wheel of wind is based on the wheel of space.
The wheel of space is not based on anything.
Thus as the karma of sentient beings matures, the world is securely constructed.
The Zhidu lun says, “The base of the threefold thousand–worldsystem is the wheel of wind.” The new translation of the Pusazang jing says:
The buddhas and tathāgatas have attained the wisdom beyond discursive thought.
Therefore they know about wind and rain.
They know of the existence in this world of a great wind called Ulubojia.
All perceptions on the part of sentient beings are due to the movement of this wind.
The wheel of this wind is three krośas in height.
Above this wind in the sky is another wind, called Wheel of Cloud.
The wheel of this wind is five krośas in height.
Above this wind in the sky is yet another wind, called Zhanbojia.
The wheel of this wind is ten yojanas in height.
Above this wind in the sky is yet another wind, called Vairambhaka.
The wheel of this wind is thirty yojanas in height.
Again, above this wind in the sky is another wind, called Qulai .
The wheel of this wind is forty yojanas in height.
Thus, Śāriputra, one after another there are sixty-eight thousand koṭis of wheels of wind.
The tathāgatas with their great wisdom know all of them thoroughly.
Śāriputra, the wheel of wind at the top is called Zhoubian .
On it rests the wheel of water in the higher realm.
That water six million eight hundred thousand yojanas in height.
On it rests the great earth.
This earth is sixtyeight thousand yojanas in height.
Śāriputra, on the surface of this earth is one threefold thousand–world-system.
The Loutan jing says: This earth is twenty billion li deep.
Below it are golden grains, also twenty billion miles deep.
Under this are again diamonds, again twenty billion miles deep.
Under this is water, eighty billion miles deep.
Under this is unlimited great wind, five hundred twenty billion miles deep.
Here there are six levels:
the first four are wheels of the earth, the fifth is a wheel of water, and the sixth is a wheel of wind.
The Jinguangming jing says:
The earth is one hundred and sixty-eight thousand yojanas deep.
Under it are golden sands.
“Golden sands” refers to golden grains.
Under this is diamond ground.
The commentary says:
“The front wheel of wind is hard and indestructible.
A person hit it with a vajra hammer but the hammer broke into pieces and the wheel of wind suffered no damage.
The great strength is the strength the fourth king of the Brahmā Heaven, Narāyana.
It is also the strength of the buddha body.
The wheel of wind is called the Narāyaṇa wind wheel.
Above the wheel of wind is the wheel of water.” The Lishi jing says:
is eleven million three hundred thousand yojanas deep, three hundred and eighty thousand yojanas less than the wheel of wind.
The water does not scatter because of the power of sentient beings’ karma.
Just as a storage house containing rice is held up by external objects, the wheel of water is similarly held up by the wind outside and does not scatter.
Just as milk is refined into cream, so water is refined into gold with the turning of this wind.
The water is eleven million three hundred thousand yojanas deep.
When refined into gold, the water is only eight hundred thousand yojanas deep.
The difference of three hundred and thirty thousand yojanas has become part of the ground of gold.
If one moves within the wheel of gold, from the part of lesser density to that of greater density the thickness of the wheel is twelve lakṣas.
One lakṣa is equivalent to one hundred thousand yojanas.
The diameter of this wheel is the same in all directions.
The buddhas, world-honored ones, all appear and teach in this threefold thousand –world-system.
They appear and then disappear in order to teach both monastics and laypeople.
In the four realms under heaven, which is illuminated by the sun and moon, Mount Sumeru is situated at the center (Note: In the Tang dynasty it is called Miaogaoshan.
Earlier it was called Xumishan.
It is also called Miliu or Miloushan.
These are all variant renderings.) The height of this mountain is three million three hundred and sixty thousand li.
It is made of four kinds of precious material:
the eastern side of gold, the southern side of blue jade, the western side of silver, and the northern side of crystal.
Inside the great ocean it reaches to the depth of three million three hundred and sixty thousand li.
It is based on the wheel of gold.
The Qishi jing says: Mount Sumeru is surrounded by eight layers of mountains.
The name of the first mountain is Khadiraka.
It is forty-two thousand yojanas in height, and the width of the higher parts of this mountain is the same.
It is made of seven precious materials.
The distance between Mount Sumeru and Mount Khadiraka is eighty-four thousand yojanas.
The circumference  is beyond measure.
Outside of Mount Khadiraka is another mountain, called Īṣādhara.
It is twenty-one thousand yojanas in height, and the width of the higher parts of this mountain is the same.
It is made of seven precious materials.
The distance between the two mountains is forty-two thousand yojanas.
The circumference is beyond measure.
Outside of Mount Īṣādhara is another mountain, called Yugaṃdhara.
It is twelve thousand yojanas in height, and the width of the higher parts of this mountain is the same.
It is made of seven precious materials.
The distance between is twenty-one thousand yojanas. The circumference is beyond measure.
Outside of Mount Yugaṃdhara is another mountain, called Sudarśana.
It is six thousand yojanas in height and the width of the higher parts of this mountain is the same.
It is made of seven precious materials.
The distance between is twelve thousand yojanas. The circumference is beyond measure.
Outside of Mount Sudarśana is another mountain called Asāvakarna.
It is three thousand yojanas in height, and the width of the higher parts of this mountain is the same.
It is made of seven precious materials.
The distance between is six thousand yojanas. The circumference of is beyond measure.
Outside of Mount Aśvakarna is another mountain, called Nimin dhara.
It is one thousand two hundred yojanas in height, and the width of the higher parts of this mountain is the same.
It is made of seven precious materials.
The distance between is two thousand four hundred yojanas. The circumference of Mount Nimin dhara] is beyond measure.
Outside of Mount Nimindhara is another mountain, called Vinataka.
It is six hundred yojanas in height, and the width of the higher parts of this mountain is the same.
It is made of seven precious materials.
The distance between is one thousand two hundred yojanas. The circumference  is beyond measure.
Outside of Mount Vinataka is another mountain, called Cakravāḍa.
It is three hundred yojanas in height, and the width of the higher parts of this mountain is the same.
It is made of seven precious materials.
The distance between  is six hundred yojanas. The circumference is beyond measure.
Between each of the mountains listed above is always an ocean.
In the water are blue lotus flowers, red lotus flowers, yellow lotus flowers, and white lotus flowers.
The water is covered with various fragrant objects.
Not far from Mount Cakravāḍa is an empty space covered with green grass, which is a great ocean.
To the north of this ocean is a great tree, called Jambu.
Its circumference is seventy yojanas.
Its roots extend into the ground to a depth of twenty-one yojanas.
It is four hundred yojanas in height and its branches cover the ground in all four directions as far as fifty yojanas.
The Chang ahan jing says:
Inside the empty ground of the mountain is a great ocean, called Yuchanna.
Below this water is the passage of the universal monarch .
It is twelve yojanas wide, and flanked on both side by seven walls, seven balustrades, seven jeweled nets, and seven lines of trees.
It is covered with decorations of seven jewels.
When a universal monarch appears in Jambudvīpa the seawater spontaneously disappears and the road appears.
Not far from this ocean is a mountain called Mount Yuchanna.
Not far from this mountain is another mountain called Golden Wall.
Beyond this mountain is the Snow Mountain , five hundred yojanas long and wide and five hundred yojanas in depth.
In the middle of Snow Mountain is Treasure Mountain, twenty yojanas in height.
The peak of Snow Mountain is one hundred yojanas in height.
At the top is Anavatapta Pond, fifty yojanas long and wide.
The water of this pond is clear and unpolluted.
Its bank is constructed from bricks of seven precious materials.
The bottom is filled with golden sand.
The flowers are like wheels of chariots; their stems are like their axles.
From the hub of the flowers a milky white liquid comes out, sweet like honey.
To the east of the pond is the Ganges River, which flows out of Oxen Mouth and follows five hundred rivers to flow into the Eastern Ocean.
To the south of the pond is the Sindhu River, which flows out of Lion’s Mouth and follows five hundred rivers to flow into the Southern Ocean.
To the west of the pond is the Bocha River, which flows from Horse’s Mouth and follows five hundred rivers to flow into the Western Ocean.
To the north of the pond is the Śīta River, which flows out of Elephant’s Mouth and follows five hundred rivers to flow into the Northern Ocean.
Dharma Master zang’s Record of the Western Regions (T.2087:
In the middle of Jambudvīpa is Anavatapta Pond.
It is located south of Fragrant Mountain and north of Great Snow Mountain.
Its circumference is eight hundred li.
Its banks are decorated with blue jade and crystal.
It is filled with golden sand; its clear waves are like shining mirrors.
Because of the power of his vow a tenth-stage bodhisattva became a dragon king and resides in the pond, pouring forth clear water for the use of Jambudvīpa.
For this reason, from the silver mouth of an ox on the eastern side of the pond flows the Ganges River. The old transliterations are based on vernacular renditions.) The river circles around the pond once and flows into the eastern part of the South Sea.
From the golden mouth of an elephant on the southern side of the pond flows the Sindhu River. The old transliteration is based on a vernacular rendition.) The river circles around the pond once and flows into the western part of the South Sea.
From the blue jade mouth of a horse flows the Cakṣu River. The old transliteration Bocha is based on a vernacular rendition.) The river circles around the pond once and flows into the western part of the North Sea.
From the crystal lion’s mouth flows the Śīta River (Note: The old transliteration is based on a vernacular rendition.) The river circles around the pond once and flows into the eastern part of the North Sea.
Some say that the stream that goes underground and appears at Mount Jishi is a tributary of the Śīta River, and that this is the origin of China’s Yellow River.
At the present time the cosmic conditions are such that there is no universal monarch.
In Jambudvīpa there are four kings.
To the south is the elephant king; the warm climate suits elephants.
To the west is the king of treasures; the area facing the ocean is filled with treasures.
To the north is the king of horses; the cold climate suits horses.
To the east is the king of human beings; the climate is mild and there is a large population.
Thus, the kingdom of the elephant king is extremely noisy. People are diligent in learning and are particularly learned in unusual skills.
The land of the treasure king lacks morality and bribery is common.
The customs of the horse king are naturally violent and include killing.
The land of the human king is civilized and moral principles are made clear.
The culture of the king in the eastern realm is superior among those of the four kings.
The residences there have doors that open to the east, and when the sun rises people face east and worship .
In the land of the human king the southern direction is honored.
The cultures of these kingdoms vary but they may be summarized as follows.
As for the norms and decorum governing the hierarchical relationship between ruler and subject and the observance of law and properly composed writings, the land of the human king cannot be further improved.
In the instruction for calming the mind and removing greed as well as in techniques that lead one beyond life and death, the land of the elephant king possesses superior principles.
These are all clearly presented in scriptures, which are based on local customs gathered from past and present and critically examined.
However, the Buddha appeared in the west and his teachings moved eastward.
In the course of this transmission the pronunciation became distorted and words got mixed up.
Consequently, the meaning of these writings was often lost.
Therefore, “We must have the rectification of names.” It is important to be free of mistranslation. The Qishi jing (ref.
T.24:312c28–313b7; Chang ahan jing, T.1:116c29– In the middle of Anavatapta Palace is a hall of five pillars.
The dragon king Anavatapta always stays there.
The Buddha said, “Why is he called Anavatapta?
What is the meaning?
All dragon kings in this realm of Jambudvīpa have three afflictions.
Only the Anavatapta dragon king is free from these three afflictions.
What are these three?
First, all dragons suffer when hot wind and sands buffet their body, burning their skin, flesh, and bone marrow.
Only the Anavatapta dragon is free from this suffering.
Second, in all dragon palaces violent winds arise and blow away their bejeweled clothing.
With their bodies exposed, the dragons suffer.
Only the Anavatapta dragon is free from this suffering.
Third, when dragon kings are amusing each other in their palaces, great garuḍa birds enter the palaces and seize them.
As soon as these birds are born they wish to eat dragons, so the dragons are frightened and constantly in distress.
Only the Anavatapta dragon is free from this suffering.
If a garuḍa king wishes to go to this dragon it immediately dies.
For this reason it is called anavatapta .” The Buddha said to the monks, “To the right of Snow Mountain is a city called Kapila .
To the north of this city are the Seven Black Mountains.
To the north of the Black Mountains is Fragrant Mountain.
The sound of music and dance is heard constantly on this mountain.
There are two caves on the mountain:
one is called Jin and the other Shanjin.
These caves are made of the seven precious materials and are as soft and fragrant as the robes of gods.
A beautiful-sounding gandharva king lives there, accompanied by five hundred gandharvas.
The Shunzhengli lun says:
Among the four continents only Jambudvīpa has the vajra seat.
It reaches the upper limit of the earth above and the Gold Wheel below.
Bodhisattvas in their last birth about to achieve the highest true insight all sit upon this seat and enter the vajra samādhi.
With all the strength of the state of nirvana, both with or without karmic remainder, they uphold the seat.
The Chang ahan jing says:
The Buddha said to the monks, “There are the deities of the four elements.
What are the four?
The first is the earth god.
The second is the water god.
The third is the wind god.
The fourth is the fire god. Each of these elements contains the other three.
Therefore, once when the earth god held a wrong view and said that water, fire, and wind are absent in earth, I knew what this god was thinking.
So I went to him and asked, ‘Have your ever thought and said that water, fire, and wind are absent in earth?’ He answered, ‘Indeed water, fire, and wind are absent in earth.’ At that time I said, ‘You should not entertain the thought that water, fire and wind are absent in earth.
Why is this so?
Water, fire, and wind are present in earth.
Because earth is dominant it is called element .’” The Buddha said to the monks, “For the benefit of the earth god, I removed his mistaken view and instructed him. He was delighted and, having obtained truth, his eyes were opened.
earth, fire, and wind are present in water; earth, water, and wind are present in fire; earth, water, and fire are present wind.
One of these elements is dominant, however, and names are assigned accordingly.” According to the Lishi apitun lun :
Outside the salty ocean is a mountain called Cakravāḍaparvata.
It reaches to a depth of three hundred twelve and a half yojanas to the bottom of the ocean and its height above the surface of the ocean is the same.
Its width is also the same.
Its circumference is three trillion six hundred million ten thousand three hundred and fifty yojanas.
The distance between the southern boundary of Jambudvīpa and the base of Cakravāḍaparvata is three hundred million sixty thousand six hundred and sixty-three yojanas.
From the center of Jambudvīpa eastward to the center of Pūrvavideha is three hundred million sixty thousand six hundred yojanas.
From the center of Jambudvīpa westward to the center of godāniya is three hundred million sixty thousand six hundred yojanas.
From the northern boundary of Jambudvīpa northward to the northern boundary of Uttarakuru is four hundred million seventy-seven thousand five hundred yojanas.
On the western side the distance between the further and closer boundaries of the water around Cakravāḍaparvata Mountain is one million two hundred thousand eight hundred and twenty-five yojanas. The circumference of the boundary of the water surrounding Cakravāḍaparvata Mountain is three billion six hundred million eight thousand four hundred and seventy-five yojanas.
From the peak of this Mount Sumeru to the peak of the other Mount Sumeru is one billion two hundred million three thousand four hundred and fifty yojanas.
From the center of this Mount Sumeru to the center of another Mount Sumeru is one billion two hundred million eighty-three thousand four hundred and fifty yojanas.
From the base of this Mount Sumeru to that base of the other Mount Sumeru is one billion two hundred million three thousand and fifteen yojanas.
This teaching was given by the Buddha, the Worldhonored One.
According to the Chang ahan jing, T.1:115b13–21, Jam budvīpa is seven thousand yojanas long and wide, the western continent godāniya is eight thousand yojanas long and wide, the eastern continent Pūrvavideha is nine thousand yojanas long and wide, and the northern continent Uttarakuru is ten thousand yojanas long and wide.) There are two kinds of human beings:
ordinary and holy.
If we speak in terms of location, there are four kinds, namely, people in the realms under the four heavens.
In terms of places of residence there are altogether four thousand and eight places in the realms under the four heavens, and consequently, there are four thousand and eight kinds of people.
We will confine our discussion to the location of Jambudvīpa.
The Loutan jing says:
Altogether there are thirty-six large kingdoms. There are corresponding numbers of different kinds of people.
To speak in further details, there are two thousand five hundred smaller kingdoms. There are again corresponding numbers of different kinds of people.
Furthermore, each kingdom has several different kinds of people, such as the Hu, the Han, the Qiang, the Lu, the Fan, the Yi, the Chu, and the Yue, who differ reflecting variations in locality.
I will not go into details here.
Again, the Loutan jing says:
In this southern Jambudvīpa there are six thousand four hundred different kinds of people. I refer to them as a group, not naming each of the different subgroups.
The Chang ahan jing says:
The Buddha said to the monks, “Surrounding the four realms under heaven are eight thousand realms under heaven.
Then there is the great ocean surrounding the eight thousand realms.
Then there is again the great diamond mountain surrounding the great ocean.
Outside the great diamond mountain is again the second diamond mountain.
The area between the two mountains is dark.
Even though the deities such as the sun and moon are very powerful, they cannot illuminate with their light the eight great hells that are located there.” Uttarakuru in the North The Chang ahan jing says:
To the north of Mount Sumeru is a realm under heaven called Uttarakuru.
Its ground is square, ten thousand yojanas long and wide.
People’s faces are also square, just like the shape of the land.
There is a great tree, called Āmra, seven yojanas in circumference and a hundred yojanas in height.
Its branches spread fifty yojanas in the four directions.
There are many mountains and bathing ponds.
Flowers and fruit are plentiful.
Innumerable birds sing in harmony.
Soft grasses grow on the ground, in clockwise circles, jade in color and with the fragrance of vārṣika flowers that bloom in the rainy season.
They are as soft as the garments of gods.
The ground is so soft that when people step on it the ground sinks down four inches but when one lifts one’s foot it returns to its original position.
The ground is flat like the palm of the hand.
On each of the four sides of the area are Anavatapta Ponds, each one hundred yojanas long and wide.
Four large rivers, each ten yojanas wide, are made of seven jewels.
Birds sing in harmony.
There are no ditches or holes, sharp-needled bushes or tree stumps.
Mosquitoes, flies, and other poisonous creatures are also absent.
The ground is made of pure jewels.
The climate is mild and well-balanced.
Hundreds of plants grow yearround and there is neither summer nor winter.
Grains grow naturally, without the need for planting.
The rice looks like white flowers, without rice bran and grounds.
Like the gods’ food in Tuṣita Heaven, all different tastes are present in it.
Pots and pans appear spontaneously.
There is also a maṇi jewel, called “light of flame,” that when it is placed under the pot its light dims when the food is cooked.
There is no need for firewood, and no human effort is required.
In this place trees called “bent back” grow; their leaves cover over each other in layers and heavenly rain does not pass through.
Men and women here spend the night under these trees.
A fragrant tree, seventy miles in height and covered with flowers and fruits, also grows there.
When its fruit ripens the skins of the fruit open spontaneously and give off a fragrant smell.
Some trees are sixty or fifty li tall.
There is a small tree, five li tall, and when its fruit ripens the skin opens spontaneously and various pieces of clothing appear.
Sometimes pieces of bodily ornaments, various utensils, or various kinds of food appear.
Sometimes people there play in the river with many treasure boats.
Before going into the water the people leave their clothing on the riverbank, and then board the boat. After they finish playing , they return to the bank and put on their clothing.
Whoever comes out first puts on the first piece of clothing they find and those who come out later put on whatever clothing is left. They do not look for the particular pieces of clothing they originally wore.
When they come to the fragrant tree called “bent back” the people take up musical instruments, tune the strings, and with beautiful voices they sing in harmony with the music as they walk around the garden, amusing themselves.
In this place during the night Anavatapta dragons frequently go up to gather the pure clouds that cover the world and bring down sweet rain.
Like milk drawn from a cow, the water of eight qualities nourishes the ground everywhere.
After midnight the sky is clear and cool breezes blow from the ocean. The people there are comfortable and pleased.
The ground of this place is fertile and it is densely populated.
When food and drink are needed rice grains appear spontaneously in the cooking pot.
When the maṇi jewel called “light of flame” is placed under the pot the food is spontaneously cooked and the light of the jewel dims .
Everyone comes and eats as much as they wish.
So long as the host does not have to get up the food is never exhausted.
If the host must get up then the food is finished.
The food is as white and fresh as bouquets of white flowers, and its flavor is like that of the food of gods. There is no illness.
People are filled with vital energy and their complexions are healthy. No one shows any signs of decline.
The people in this place have identical bodies and faces and are indistinguishable from each other.
They look as vigorous as people in their twenties in Jambudvīpa.
Their teeth are white and perfectly aligned.
Their hair is dark and clean and falls to a length of eight fingers to above their eyebrows, neither too long nor too short.
When the people in this land feel desire, they gaze at  and walk away.
The woman then follows him to the garden.
If the woman happens to be a relative of the man’s parents and is not suitable to be his wife, the tree will not provide shade for them, and the two go their separate ways.
If they are not related, the tree then provides shade, and they indulge in pleasure at their will day after day for seven days. Then they leave each other.
According to the Lishi apitun lun, T.1644:201b23–28, c9–10; women and welcome them as their wives, nor do they buy or sell women.
When a man wishes to marry a woman he simply gazes at her.
If the woman thinks of a man as desirable, she also simply gazes at him.
If a woman has not realized that a man has gazed at her, the other women tell her, “That man has looked at you.
You two are now husband and wife.” If a man does not realize that a woman has gazed at him, the other men tell him, “That woman has looked at you.
You two are husband and wife.” When a man and woman gaze at each other, they then follow each other and go somewhere else.
Those whose desires are strong marry no more than five spouses; those whose desires are of medium strength marry four or three.
There are also those who engage in spiritual cultivation and are free from desire until death.
Pregnant women there do not wish to eat.) In this place women give birth after seven or eight days of pregnancy.
They couple take the infant to a busy crossroads and leave him or her there.
Passers-by offer the infant a finger to lick, from which sweet milk flows and the baby’s hunger is sated.
After seven days the infant is fully grown to an adult. A male infant joins the community of men; a female infant that of women.
When someone dies here people do not cry.
They decorate the corpse, take it to busy crossroads, and leave it there.
A bird called youwei chanqie takes the corpse elsewhere.
According to the Lishi apitun lun, T.1644:201a10, a bird takes the corpse to a place outside the mountain and devours it.) Furthermore, in this place whenever people urinate or defecate, the ground spontaneously opens up , and when they have finished the ground closes over again.
The people in this place are not obsessive, nor do they accumulate property.
Their life span is fixed and when they die they are reborn in heaven.
Why is their life span fixed?
In their previous lives they have practiced the ten good deeds.
When their lives ended they were reborn in Uttarakuru.
Their life span is one thousand years, never longer or shorter.
Therefore, the life span of the people here is exactly the same for everyone.
If a person gives to brahmans, to the poor, the ill, and others in distress, providing them with food and clothing, offering rides on carriages, decorative headwear, perfume, beds, or residences, or by building stupas, lighting candles, and making offerings, when that person’s life comes to an end will be reborn in Uttarakuru, where their life spans will be one thousand years, neither more nor less.
In this place the teaching of the ten good deeds is not offered, yet everyone’s conduct is in accord with that teaching.
When their life there ends, the person is reborn in heaven.
For this reason, people here are praised as being superior.
This is the highest among the three continents under heaven.
Uttara means highest.
The Lishi apitun lun says:
The people in this land are white and clean.
They decorate their hair and beards in dark green and black.
After they have shaved, in five days their hair grows back to the length of seven fingers, with a strip of the same length, neither more nor less.
The Shunzhengli lun says:
Uttarakuru to the north is shaped like a square seat.
Each of its four sides is of the same length, two thousand yojanas.
n two sides are medium-sized continents, the first called Kurava and the second Kauravā.
People live on both these continents.
Pūrvavideha in the East The Chang ahan jing says:
To the east of Mount Sumeru is a realm under heaven called Pūrvavideha.
Its ground is a perfect circle, nine thousand yojanas long and wide.
The shape of the people’s faces there is round, just like the land.
There is also a massive tree called Jialanfu, seven yojanas in circumference and one hundred yojanas in height.
Its branches spread fifty yojanas in the four directions.
The Zaodiandi jing says, “People in the eastern regions are superior to those in Jambudvīpa.
People use cotton and silk and trade them at market.” The Chang ahan jing says:
The life span of the people is generally less than two hundred years. The Loutan jing, T.23:296c1, says that the life span is three hundred years.) They eat rice, fish, and meat.
The Lishi apitun lun, T.1644:201a2–3, says that they do not themselves kill living beings, nor do they let others kill.
Only if a creature dies on its own do they then eat the meat.) The people there trade grain, silk, jade, and jewels at market.
There is a marriage ceremony that people follow when taking wives.
According to the Lishi apitun lun, T.1644:201c27–28; 200a20–21, b17–19, among the people in Pūrvavideha those whose sexual desire is strong marry as many as seven wives in their lifetimes; those whose sexual desire is of average strength as many as five or six.
There are also those who engage in spiritual cultivation and are free of desire throughout their lives.
In the eastern and western continents the bodies of people are never black; otherwise they are like those in Jambudvīpa with bodies of a variety of colors. People in the eastern continent have a distinct hair style:
the front is cut while the back is left long.
They wear two pieces of clothing, a bottom piece and a top piece that simply wraps around the body.) The Shunzhengli lun says:
Pūrvavideha in the east is narrow on the eastern side and wide on the west; three of its four sides are the same length, so its shape is like a half-moon.
The eastern side is three hundred and fifty yojanas in length and the other three sides are each two thousand yojanas long.
The eastern side of the Pūrvavideha is wider than the southern side of the southern continent, Jambudvīpa.
Thus, Pūrvavideha is the shape of a half-moon.
On two sides of Pūrvavideha are medium-sized continents, the first called Deha and the second Videha.
People live on both these continents.
Aparagodānīya The Chang ahan jing says:
To the west of Mount Sumeru is the realm under heaven called godānīya.
Its ground is round, like a full moon, eight thousand yojanas long and wide.
People’s faces are , just like the land.
There is also a massive tree called Jinti , seven yojanas in circumference and one hundred yojanas in height.
Its branches spread fifty yojanas in the four directions. According to the Qishi jing, T.24:311b26–28, under this tree is a stone cow, one yojana tall.
This is why the continent is called godāniya, which means “giving to the cow.”) The life span of the people is three hundred years.
They trade cows, horses, jade, and jewels at market.
People there are superior to the people in Jambudvīpa.
The Lishi apitun lun says:
People either kill living beings themselves or eat meat from those that have been killed by others. In this regard they are like the people in Jambudvīpa.
When a relative dies they take the corpse into the mountains and cremate it, or they place the corpse in a body of water, bury it in the ground, or leave it in an empty space.
In this regard people in the eastern and western contents are like those in Jambudvīpa.
Their marriage are also similar.
Those whose sexual desire is strong marry as many as twelve wives in their lifetimes; those whose sexual desire is of average strength marry ten.
There are also those who engage in spiritual cultivation and are free of desire throughout their lives.
People wear their hair long in both front and back. They wear two pieces of clothing, a top and a bottom.
The Shunzhengli lun says:
Aparagodānīya to the west is shaped like a full moon, two thousand five hundred yojanas in diameter and seven thousand five hundred yojanas in circumference.
On two sides are medium-sized continents, the first called Śāṭha and the second Uttaramantriṇas.
People live on both these continents.
Jambudvīpa The Chang ahan jing says:
To the south of Mount Sumeru is the realm under heaven called Jambudvīpa.
Its ground is narrow to the south and wide to the north, seven thousand yojanas long and wide.
People’s faces are shaped just like the land.
There is also a massive tree called Jambu, seven yojana in circumference and one hundred yojanas in height.
Its branches spread fifty yojanas in the four directions.
According to the Qishi jing, T.24:311b29–c2, under this tree is a deposit of Jambūnada gold.
The tree is twenty yojanas in height.
Because this superior gold is mined under this tree, it is called Jambūnada gold.) There is also the tree of the king of the garuḍas, called Julishanpoluo, seven yojanas in circumference and one hundred yojanas in height.
Its branches spread fifty yojanas in the four directions.
There is also the tree of the king of the asuras, called Shanjin, seven yojanas in circumference and one hundred yojanas in height.
Its branches spread fifty yojanas in the four directions.
There is a tree in Trāyastriṃśa Heaven called Huadu, seven yojanas in circumference and one hundred yojanas in height.
Its branches spread fifty yojanas in the four directions.
People in Jambudvīpa live for one hundred years.
Many die young.
For the first ten years they are ignorant.
At twenty they begin to have some knowledge but they are not yet wise.
At thirty their emotional and intellectual powers are strong.
At forty there is no limit to what they can practice.
At fifty they do not forget what they have learned.
At sixty they become stubborn.
At seventy they become physically slow.
At eighty they lose their physical beauty.
At ninety their illnesses cause much pain.
At one hundred all their sense organs decline. By then they have experienced three hundred winters, summers, and springs, and taken thirtysix thousand meals.
There are also handicapped people there.
The Lishi apitun lun (T.1644:200b10–16; ref.
200b29–c1, 22–24; 201b21– People in Jambudvīpa wear a variety of clothing and jewelry.
Some wear their hair long, divided into two knots.
Some shave their hair and beard.
Some leave the hair at the top of their heads and shave everything else.
This is called cūḍā hair.
Some pull out their hair and beards.
Some have their hair and beards trimmed.
Some weave their hair.
Some leave their long hair loose.
Some trim their loose front hair and let the back hair form a circle .
Some go about naked.
Some wear clothes that cover the top but leave the bottom exposed, or that exposes the top but covers the bottom.
Some cover both top and bottom and others simply cover the front and back.
The wide variety of food the people of this continent eat cannot be described in detail here.
We know about their marriage ceremonies and ways of trading at market from what we see.
The same treatise says :
In their lifetimes people in Jambudvīpa desire an infinite number of things.
They are unlike the people of the three other continents, who have only limited desires.
There are, however, also those who engage in spiritual cultivation and are free from desire throughout their lives in Jambudvīpa.
The Shunzhengli lun says, “Jambudvīpa to the south has two peripheral continents, the first called Cāmara and the second Cāmarāvarā.
People live on both these continents.” The Lishi jing says:
Before the age of ten years old people in Jambudvīpa are very small, some only about two or three hands tall.
When they grow to normal size they are eight hands tall.
The Pitan lun says:
When people in Jambudvīpa become one hundred years old, their height is three and a half zhou tall; some are eight zhou.
The Chang ahan jing, T.1:133a10, speaks of “three and a half zhou tall.” There may have been some uncertainty or this text speaks in loose terms.) People in Pūrva videha are eight zhou tall.
People in Aparagodānīya are sixteen zhou tall.
People in Uttarakuru are thirty-two zhou tall.
According to the Abhidharma, the life span of the people in Jambudvīpa is indeterminate.
There are three categories:
a superior life span of one hundred and twenty-five years, a medium life span of one hundred years, and an inferior life span of sixty years.
There is also an innumerable number of people who die without completing their life spans.
These categories apply in the period of the declining world age.
At the beginning of a world age the life span is infinite, or eighty-four thousand years.
The Chang ahan jing says:
The life span of people in Jambudvīpa is one hundred and twenty years, though many die young .
The life span of the people in Pūrvavideha to the east is two hundred years.
The Loutan jing, T.23:296c2, says that the life span of the people is three hundred years.) The life span of the people in Apara godānīya to the west is three hundred years.
The life span of the people in Uttarakuru to the north is one thousand years.
In the other three continents people also die young; only in the northern continent do people always live out their fixed life span of one thousand years.) The Qishi jing says:
The height of people in Jambudvīpa is three and a half zhou.
Consequently, their clothing is seven zhou long and three and a half zhou wide.
The people in Apara godānīya and Pūrvavideha are the same size as those in Jambudvīpa, and both the length and width of their clothing is the same.
The people in Uttarakura are seven zhou tall and their clothing is fourteen zhou in length and seven zhou wide at both top and bottom.
The asuras are one yojana tall; their clothing is two yojanas long and one yojana wide, and weighs half a kārṣāpana. In Chinese measure, one-half liang.
Other scriptures give different sizes for the asuras’ clothing.
For example, the asura Vemacitra is four times taller than Mount Sumeru.) The Chang ahan jing says:
The Buddha said to the monks, “The people in Jambudvīpa are superior to those in Aparagodānīya in three ways.
What are the three?
First, they are courageous, have a good memory, and are capable of conduct that produces karma; second, they are courageous, have a good memory, and are diligent in spiritual cultivation; third, they are courageous, have a good memory, and buddhas appear .
The people in Aparagodānīya are superior to those in Jambudvīpa in three ways.
What are the three?
First, they have more cows; second, they have more sheep; third, they have more jewels.
Jambudvīpa is superior to Pūrvavideha in three ways.
What are the three?
First, people there are courageous, have a good memory, and are capable of conduct that produces karma; second, they are courageous, have a good memory, and are diligent in spiritual cultivation; third, they are courageous, have a good memory, and buddhas appear .
Pūrvavideha is superior to Jambudvīpa in three ways.
What are the three?
First, the land is extremely wide; second, the land is extremely large; third, the land is extremely beautiful.
Jambudvīpa is superior to Uttarakuru in three ways.
What are the three?
First, the people there are courageous, have a good memory, and are capable of conduct that produces karma; second, the people there are courageous, have a good memory, and are diligent in spiritual cultivation; third, they are courageous, have a good memory, and buddhas appear .
Uttarakuru is superior to Jambudvīpa in three ways.
What are the three?
First, people there have no family relationships; second, they have no possessions; third, they all live for one thousand years.
The people in Jam budvīpa are superior to the hungry ghosts in the above-mentioned three ways.
Hungry ghosts are superior to the people in Jambudvīpa in three ways.
What are the three?
First, they live long lives; second, the bodies are large; third, they benefit from actions of others.
The people in Jambudvīpa are superior to garuḍas in the above-mentioned three ways.
Garuḍas are superior to people in Jambudvīpa in three ways.
What are the three?
First, they live long lives; second, their bodies are large; third, they have a palace.
The people in Jambudvīpa are superior to the asuras in the above-mentioned three ways.
Asuras are superior to people in Jambudvīpa in three ways.
What are the three?
First, their palaces are tall and wide; second, their palaces are beautifully decorated; third, their palaces are clean and pure.
The people in Jambudvīpa are superior to the four heavenly kings in the above-mentioned three ways. The four heavenly kings are superior to the people of Jambudvīpa in three ways.
What are the three?
First, they live long; second, they are good-looking; third, they enjoy many pleasures.
The people in Jambudvīpa are superior to the gods of Trāyastriṃśa Heaven, Yama Heaven, Tuṣita Heaven, and Nirmāṇarati Heaven in the above-mentioned three ways.
The gods of these heavens are superior to the people of Jambudvīpa in three ways.
What are the three?
First, they live longer; second, they are good-looking; third, they enjoy many pleasures.
the Heavens Ranking, Names , Karmic Causes, Birth, Measurement of Realms, Measurement of Bodies, Measurement of Robes, Life Span, Dwelling Place, Spaciousness, Adornment, Presenting the Memorial, Supernatural Powers, Bodily Halo, Commerce, Marriage, Food and Drink, Servants and Vehicles;, Attendants, Distinction of Classes, Wealth and Poverty, and Funerals. According to the teaching in the Posha lun :
There are thirty-two kinds of heavens:
the realm of desire has ten, the realm of form has eighteen, and the formless realm has four.
First, the ten heavens in the realm of desire consist of Ganshou , Chihuaman , Changfangyi , the heaven of the sun, moon, and stars, the heaven of the four heavenly kings, the thirty-three heavens , Yama Heaven, Tuṣita Heaven, Nirmāṇarati Heaven, and Paranirmitavaśavartin Heaven.
(Note the heaven of the sun, moon, and stars, etc.
and the last four heavens are in the sky.
The other five are situated on the mountain.
Details are found below in the section on locations). Second, the eighteen heavens in the realm of form consist of the three heavens of the first meditative state .
(Interlinear note:
These three heavens do not constitute separate realms of residence.
The Brahmapurohita deities are higher and awe-inspiring and the Mahābrahmā king rules over them.
Of the three heavens, Brahmakāyika refers to the common deities, Brahmapurohita to ministers, and Mahābrahmā to the ruler.
Only at this first level of meditation do distinctions among ruler, minister, and commoner exist.
Distinctions are absent above this level.), the three heavens of the second meditative state , again the three heavens of the third meditative state , and the nine heavens that exist only in the fourth meditative state (Punyaprasava, Fuai , Bṛhatphala, Asaṃjñika (Note:
This “no-thought” heaven again is not a separate place; it is the same place as the preceding one, but because non-Buddhists live here it is given a separate name.), Abṛha, Atapa, Sudṛśa, Sudarśaṇa, and Akaniṣṭha). Third, the four heavens in the formless realm consist of Infinite Space , Infinite Consciousness , Nothingness , and Neither Thought nor No-thought .
These three realms altogether contain thirty-three kinds of heavens.) Question:
I do not know how many among these thirty-two heavens are for ordinary beings and how many are for holy beings. Answer:
In two of these heavens only ordinary beings live, and in five only holy beings live.
In the remaining twenty-five heavens both ordinary and holy beings live.
The two in which only ordinary beings live are the Mahā brahmā Heaven of the first meditative state and the Heaven of Nothought of the fourth meditative state.
These are both places where non-Buddhists live.
Question:
Why do only ordinary beings live in these two heavens?
Answer:
The king of Mahābrahmā Heaven is deficient in positive karmic causes.
He says that only he can produce heaven, earth, and all beings, and because of this they arrogantly despise all holy beings and refuse to live in the same place as these beings.
In the Heaven of No-thought only nonBuddhists who have practiced the no-thought meditation are born and receive the karmic reward of being in the state of no-thought for five hundred world ages.
Non-Buddhists cannot achieve nirvana.
When their rewards have been exhausted they are bound to follow wrong views and be reborn in hell.
For this reason holy beings are never born there.
The abovementioned five heavens where only holy beings live refer to the five heavens of pure beings , above Bṛhatphala through Abṛha, Atapa, .
This is where nonreturners and arhats live.
If an ordinary being is born there, they proceed to obtain a nonreturner’s body, achieve the four meditative states, and issue forth untainted wisdom and meditative work filled with good perfuming effects.
Some engage in the five kinds of practices and are reborn there.
Ordinary beings lack these meditative works filled with good perfuming effects, and for this reason they are not reborn there.
It is correct and without doubt that nonreturners are born there.
Question:
Arhats are free from rebirth.
How is it that they are said to be born there?
Answer:
One should say that nonreturners of the realm of desire are born there and achieve arhatship.
It is not that they are first arhats and are then reborn there.
The abovementioned remaining twenty-five heavens where both ordinary beings and superior beings live together cannot be discussed in detail here.
Generally, according to the teachings of the Small and Great Vehicles, there are four categories of heavens.
The Niepan jing says:
There are four kinds of heavens:
the worldly heaven, the heavens of rebirths, the pure heaven, and the heaven of truth.
worldly heaven are like kings.
The heavens of rebirths refer to the various heavens from the heaven of the four heavenly kings to the heaven of Neither Thought Nor No-thought.
The pure heaven is for stream-winners through pratyekabuddhas.
The heaven of truth is for bodhisattvas of the ten stages.
Why is it called “truth”?
Bodhisattvas of the ten stages are called the heaven of truth because they understand the truth of the teaching well and see into the truth of the emptiness of all beings.
Discussing the heavens of four heavenly kings, the Chang ahan jing (ref. T.1:79c28–80a8) says:
The eastern heavenly king is called Dhṛtarāṣṭra; the name is translated into Chinese as Governed Realm Ruler. The Dazhidu lun, ref.
T.1509:443b10, gives a slightly different transcription.) He rules over the gandharva and piśāca generals, guarding people in Pūrvavideha against invasion.
The southern heavenly king is called Virūḍhaka; the name is translated into Chinese as Increase Heaven Ruler. The Dazhidu lun, ref.
T.1509:443b11, gives a slightly different transcription.) He rules over the kumbhāṇḍa and preta ghost generals, guarding people in Jambudvīpa against invasion.
The western heavenly king is called Virūḍhaka; the name is translated into Chinese as Mixed Words Ruler.
The Dazhidu lun, T.1509:443b12 gives a slightly different transcription.) He rules over the dragon and pūtana ghost generals, guarding people in Apara godānīya against invasion.
The northern heavenly king is called Vaiśravaṇa; the name is translated into Chinese as Wide Hearing Heaven Ruler.
the Dazhidu lun, T.1509:443b13, gives a slightly different transcription.) He rules over the yakṣa and rākṣasa generals, guarding people in Uttara kuru against invasion.
The Dazhidu lun says:
The god Śakra’s full name in Sanskrit is Śakra-devānam Indra.
Śakra is translated in Chinese as “able,” deva is translated as “god,” and indra is translated as “lord.” Together the name means “able lord of gods.” The name of the god Suyāma is translated in Chinese as “very good.” Tuṣita is translated in Chinese as “well-satisfied.” Nirmāṇarati is translated in Chinese as “enjoying transformation.” vaśavartin is translated in Chinese as “enjoying freely what others produced by transformation.” The king of Brahmā Heaven is called Sikhi, which is translated in Chinese as “great top” or “great vessel.” Śuddhāvāsa is translated in Chinese as “pure dwelling.” (Note: The Dazhidu lun explains the meaning of each name, one after another.
The names of higher heavens are the same as those listed in the Posha lun. For the sake of concision they are not reproduced here.) The Zhong ahan jing says:
At one time another monk approached the Buddha and paid respect by bowing to the Buddha’s feet.
After withdrawing to a corner, he addressed the Buddha, “World-honored One, why is Śakra  called by this name?” The Buddha replied to the monk, “In a previous life Śakra was a human being and performed spontaneous giving.
He gave drink, food, money, goods, and lamps to monks and brahmans who were poor and in distress.
Because he was strong enough to do this, he is called “Śakradevānām Indra.” “Why is he called Puraṃdara?” The Buddha said, “When he was a human being in a previous life he frequently  and performed giving, offering clothing, drink, food, lamps, and so on.
For this reason he is called Puraṃdara.” “Why is he also called Maghavā?” The Buddha said, “When he was a human being in a previous life, his name was Maghavā.
So, he is called by his original name.” “Why is he also called Vāsava?” The Buddha said, “When he was a human being in a previous life he offered a gift of robes .
So he is called Vāsava.” “Why is he also called Kauśika?” The Buddha said, “When he was a human being in a previous life his surname was Kauśika.” “Why is he also called Sujāṃpati?” The Buddha said, “Because Sujā is the first empress of this heavenly emperor.” “Why is he also called Thousand Eyes ?” The Buddha said, “When he was a human being in a previous life, he was intelligent and wise.
In one sitting he could consider a thousand matters, observing and investigating them.” “Why is he also called Tili?” The Buddha said, “Because this heavenly emperor is the ruler of the thirty-two heavens.” The Buddha said to the monk, “When Śakra-devānām Indra was a human being in a previous life he practiced seven kinds of virtuous deeds, and because of this he was able to become this deity.
What are the seven?
The list begins with serving one’s parents and ends with making offerings to everyone equally.
The content of these deeds are described in the verse in the scripture . Question:
What deeds produce the karmic effects leading to each of the six realms of existence?
According to the Dazhidu lun :
The karmic causes of the six realms of existence are none other than good and evil deeds.
Each has three subcategories.
The higher category leads to birth in heaven; the middle to birth as human being; and the lower to birth in the four inferior realms.
According to this theory, only the higher subcategory of good deeds leads to birth in heaven.
no distinction is made between general practice and meditation.
The Yebao chabie jing discusses the ten good deeds that lead to rebirth in heaven in detailed terms of the distinctions between general practice and meditation and the distinction of three realms.
The scripture says: There are also ten good deeds that lead sentient beings to birth in the heavens of the realm of desire.
If they practice the superior ten good deeds they can be reborn in the heavens of the realm of desire.
This refers to general good deeds of the realm of desire.
There are also ten good deeds that lead sentient beings to birth in the heavens of the realm of form.
If they practice the tainted ten good deeds they can be reborn in the heavens of the realm of form.
These correspond to meditation.” This refers to the meditative good deeds of the realm of form.
There are also the four karmic deeds that can lead sentient beings to rebirth in the formless realm:
first, the meditation of emptiness that goes beyond all thoughts of forms and destroys all dualistic thought; second, the meditation of consciousness that goes beyond all meditations of emptiness; third, the meditation of nonexistence that goes beyond all meditations of consciousness; fourth, the meditation of no-thought and its negation that goes beyond all meditations of nonbeing.
By means of these good deeds they obtain rebirth of the formless realm.
If someone asks why the ten good deeds are not mentioned in regard to this last realm, one should reply that one in the formless realm has transcended form and disregards such things as the body and speech .
For this reason, one only speaks of four karmic deeds and not of the ten good deeds.
However, the views expressed above are all the teaching of the Tathāgata. He distinguished the different retributions for different kinds of deeds. Causes and effects match each other without error .
According to the Shanjie jing:
Monks uphold two hundred and fifty precepts and nuns uphold three hundred and seventy-eight precepts.
There are also deeds that lead to birth in heaven.
Thus, a verse in the Sifenlü
jieben (T.1429:1022c12–13; T.1430:1030b11– happiness: fame, wealth, and birth in heaven after death.” This refers to the heaven in the realm of desire.
The Zhengfanian jing says: Some uphold the precepts of not killing, not stealing, and not engaging in immoral sexual conduct; for these three good deeds they are reborn in heaven.
This also refers to rebirth in a heaven in the realm of desire.
In the teachings given by the Buddha on different occasions, such heavenly rebirth is not attributed solely to these three causes.
According to the Wenshi jing , by bathing a monk as an act of spiritual purity, one can be reborn in heaven or in higher realms.
This too is the Buddha’s teaching on a different occasion.
It is not that by bathing a monk one can be reborn in all higher realms; one can be reborn only in the heavens of the realm of desire.
Furthermore, according to the Nirvana Sutra :
A loving mother tries to save her child in the Ganges River, but both the mother and child die and are reborn in the Brahmā Heaven.
This refers to general worldly love, and it is not supported by other good deeds of Buddhist meditation.
How can lead to rebirth in heaven?
It must have resulted from other distant causes and was not mere worldly love that caused rebirth in heaven.
The teaching that by simply hearing once the word “nirvana” one can avoid falling into the four inferior realms of rebirth is also intended in the same way.
Therefore, the Zhenfanian jing teaches:
By following the seven precepts of not killing, not stealing, not engaging in immoral sexual conduct, not telling lies, not engaging in insincere flattery, not uttering slanderous words, and not speaking harshly one can be reborn in the heaven of the four heavenly kings.
By upholding seven kinds of precepts, one can be reborn in the heavens. There are three kinds.
By upholding the precept of not killing one can be reborn in the place of the four heavenly kings. By upholding the precepts of not killing and not stealing one can be reborn in the Heaven of the Thirty-three Gods .
By upholding the precepts of not killing, not stealing, and not engaging in immoral sexual conduct one can be reborn in Yama Heaven.
By upholding the precepts of not killing, not stealing, not engaging in immoral sexual conduct, not lying, not uttering slanderous words, not speaking harshly, and not engaging in insincere flattery, one can be reborn in Tuṣita Heaven.
Accepting worldly precepts and having faith in Buddhist precepts, not killing, not stealing, not engaging in immoral sexual conduct, not lying, not uttering slanderous words, not speaking harshly, and not engaging in insincere flattery, one can be reborn in Nirmāṇarati Heaven and Paranirmitavaśavartin Heaven.
The Chang ahan jing says:
had earlier engaged in spiritual cultivation under the Buddha and when their lives here ended they were born in the Heaven of the Thirty-three Gods , causing the deities in that heaven to increase their five benefits:
first, their life span in heaven; second, their appearance in heaven; third, their reputation in heaven; fourth, their pleasures; fifth, their power in heaven.
The Za ahan jing says:
Then the World-honored One said to the monks, “In the past, in the kingdom of Kosalā, there was a lute player called Guttila.
He wandered among the people of Kosalā and rested in a field.
Six heavenly maidens from the great heavenly palace came to the where the lute player Guttila was staying in the kingdom of Kosalā and spoke to him, saying, “Uncle, play the lute for us.
We will sing and dance.” The lute player Guttila said, “Sisters, it should be this way.
I will play the lute for you, and you will tell me who is born in heaven and for what reason they are born there.” The heavenly maidens said, “As you play the lute we will sing and dance, and the song we sing will explain the conditions for being born in heaven.” then played the lute and the six heavenly maidens sang and danced.
The first maiden sang these verses: As a man I gave a woman the gift of a beautiful robe. Because of this gift of a robe, I obtained this superior rebirth . For giving something that I cherished, I was reborn in heaven and have everything as I wish. I live in a palace, fly up and travel in the sky. With the body of a heavenly being, made of gold, I am the best among a hundred heavenly maidens. Observe this merit, which is the highest example of redirected merit. The second maiden sang these verses:
As a man I gave a woman the gift of quality perfume. Because of this gift of something I cherished, I was reborn in heaven and have everything as I wish. I live in a palace, fly up and travel in the sky. With the body of a heavenly being, made of gold, I am the best among a hundred heavenly maidens.
Observe this merit, which is the highest example of redirected merit. The third maiden sang these verses: As man I gave a woman the gift of food. Because of this gift of something I cherished, I was reborn in heaven and have everything as I wish. I live in a palace, fly up and travel in the sky.
With the body of a heavenly being, made of gold, I am the best among a hundred heavenly maidens. Observe this merit, which is the highest example of redirected merit. The fourth maiden sang these verses: As I recall a previous life, I was someone’s maidservant. I did not steal, nor was I greedy. Tirelessly, I engaged in spiritual cultivation.
Taking for myself only a measured amount of food, I divided my food and offered assistance to the poor. Now I live in a palace, fly up and travel in the sky. With the body of a heavenly being, made of gold, I am the best among a hundred heavenly maidens. Observe this merit, which is the highest example of making offerings. The fifth maiden sang these verses: As I recall a previous life, I was someone’s wife. My mother-in-law had a violent temper, Constantly criticizing me.
I upheld the moral principles, and cultivated the proper ways of behaving as a woman, humble and obedient. Now I live in a palace, fly up and travel in the sky. With the body of a heavenly being, made of gold, I am the best among a hundred heavenly maidens. Observe this merit, which is the highest example of making offerings. The sixth maiden sang these verses:
I once encountered some monks and nuns. I heard from them the correct teaching, and after a short while received the lay precepts. Now, I live in a palace, fly up and travel in the sky. With the body of a heavenly being, made of gold, I am the best among a hundred heavenly maidens. Observe this merit, which is the highest example of making offerings. Thereupon the lute player Guttila of Kosalā kingdom uttered the following verses:
Luckily I came here, to the forest of Kosalā, And was able to see these heavenly maidens, with most beautiful heavenly bodies. Having seen them and heard them teach, I should with increased effort cultivate good deeds. Because of the merits of this new effort I will be able to be born in heaven. When had finished saying this, the heavenly maidens disappeared.
Birth in the Heavens of the Four Heavenly Kings According to the Chang ahan jing and the Dazhidu lun, the gods in the heavens of the four heavenly kings all marry and satisfy their desires, just as do human beings.
But they are born by transformation.
Their newborns are like two-year-old human children and sit on laps.
According to the Shunzhengli lun, as noted below, they are like five-yearold human children.
According to another scripture, a newly born male child sits on his mother’s right knee, and a female child sits on her mother’s left knee.) Shortly after a newborn has arrived, they become thirsty and hungry.
Spontaneous jeweled vessels filled with a hundred different kinds of food appear.
In the case of those with greatest amount of merit, the color of the rice is white; in the case of those with an average amount of merit, it is blue; in the case of those with smallest amount , it is red.
If they are thirsty the jeweled vessel fills with sweet juice.
The color varies, as in the case of the food.
They do not keep what is left of the drink but throw it into fire, just as in the case of ghee.
By the time they finish eating they are the same size as the other gods.
When they are first born they still remember their previous lives, but as they play they forget them.
Birth in the Heaven of the Thirty-three .
The Piyeposhenrenwen jing says:
The Great Sage should know this.
In the Heaven of the Thirty-three the gods play and have fun.
Going through the forest, if the mind  sees a male deity and a female deity sitting together, it is overjoyed and is quickly reborn there.
Just like a bead threaded on a string will run straight along the string when one end of the string is pulled, that sentient being will not be reborn elsewhere.
When the sentient being is about to be born there a flower appears in the hand of the female deity.
When she sees it, she realizes that she is pregnant.
She then takes the flower and gives it to her husband, saying, “I am going to have a child.
Be happy!” Seeing this, the male deity is delighted, knowing that his wife is bearing a divine child.
The two deities are pleased, and after seven days have passed, the sentient being, with long hair, pure and uncontaminated, endowed with a god’s clothing, is born in that heaven.
During the seven days he entertains the thought, “I withdraw from such-and-such place to be born in this heaven. I will perform good deeds for my parents.” he is filled with joy.
With joy desire appears, and the sentient being immediately goes to that place in heaven, just as a drunken elephant stumbles.
His nose is like an elephant, round and long, and his chest is flat and gold in color. His upper and lower body is large, while it is narrow in the middle.
His gait is cautious. He is thoughtful and courageous.
His waist bends like a bow and his back is straight.
His thighs are large, like banana plants.
He knows the laws of heaven well. His beard is very short. He has the strong fragrance of the gods.
His nails are thin, and his body is clean.
Without help from anyone, he dresses and adorns himself.
There is no illness in heaven.
He gradually grows up in the palace, where there is no master.
When the heavenly maidens see him, they gather around him, saying “Holy child, welcome!
In this palace we have no husband who is our master.
We have long been separated from our husband and have only children.
We are young, endowed with beautiful features.
We will provide milk, just as if it were to come from a golden jar.
Our faces are of the color of a newly opened lotus flower.
We move like lightning. We are attractive and pleasing.
We are heavenly maidens.
We will now serve you.
This is a place for seeking pleasure.” In this way the women approach the child and serve him.
In the Heaven of Thirty-three Gods is the Hall of Good Teaching, the place where the gods gather together.
It has eighty-four thousand pillars, each made of jewels.
Within it is free of troublesome vermin such as mosquitoes and flies.
Nor are there any difficulties such as sleepiness and exhaustion.
Infinite numbers of heavenly maidens offer fun and pleasure as one wishes.
Such troubles as jealousy and fighting are absent.
The cheeks of the heavenly maidens are pure and spotless, like the mirror of the round moon.
With their own methods, using perfume and colors, they decorate their faces.
These maidens sing and entertain each other. The Qishi jing says:
In that heaven, either from a male or female deity, as they sit, the newborn suddenly appears near the knees or between the thighs.
When the new creature has just been born, he or she looks like a twelve-year-old human child.
If a male child, he is born somewhere around the knees of the sitting male deity.
If a female child, she is born between the thighs of a female deity.
As soon as the child is born, the deity says that he or she is his or her child.
When the child is born, because of his or her previous karma the child entertains three kinds of thoughts:
first, the child recalls where he or she died; second, the child realizes where he or she has just been reborn, third, the child realizes that this rebirth is the fruit of his or her previous karma, that it is the reward for merit.
Having entertained these thoughts, the newborn thinks of eating.
Immediately many jeweled vessels appear in front of the newborn, each spontaneously filled with heavenly food of different colors.
The Shunzhengli lun says:
What is the size of the bodies of the gods who have just been born in the six heavens in the realm of desire?
When gods are born in these heavens, their bodies are the same size as those of five-, six-, seven-, eight-, nine-, or ten-year-old human beings respectively.
After birth they quickly grow to their full sizes.
When the deities of the heavens in the realm of desire are born, their bodies are fully grown and they are wearing beautiful heavenly robes.
All the gods speak the holy language .
Thus, their language is identical to that of Central India.
Therefore, they understand the language of the scriptures without studying it.
The Qishi jing says: At the foot of Mount Sumeru are three levels of areas in which gods live.
The lowest level is sixty yojanas wide and deep, the second level is forty yojanas wide and deep, and the highest level is twenty yojanas wide and deep.
Each has seven layers of walls surrounding the palace.
Numerous birds sing beautiful songs, and nothing anyone might wish for is lacking.
In each of these levels yakṣas also live.
In the middle part of Mount Sumeru, at the height of forty-two thousand yojanas, is the palace where the four heavenly kings live.
At the top of Mount Sumeru is the palace of the Heaven of the Thirty-three Gods. This is where Śakra lives.
Above the Heaven of the Thirty-three Gods is Yama Heaven.
Above that is Tuṣita Heaven.
Above that is Nirmāṇarati Heaven.
Above that is Paranirmitavaśavartina Heaven.
Above that is Brahmakāyika Heaven.
Below Brahmakāyika Heaven, in the space between it and the heaven below, is the palace of Māra, the Evil One.
Above Brahmakāyika Heaven is Ābhāsvara Heaven.
Above Ābhāsvara Heaven is Śubhakṛtsna Heaven.
Above Śubhakṛtsna Heaven is Bṛhatphala Heaven.
Above Bṛhatphala Heaven is No-coarse-thought Heaven.
In the space below this heaven are the palaces of other deities, called no-thought beings.
Above Asaṃjñika Heaven is Abṛha Heaven.
Above Abṛha Heaven is Sudarśana Heaven.
Above Sudarśaṇa Heaven is Sudṛśa Heaven.
Above Sudṛśa Heaven is the palace of Akaniṣṭha Heaven.
Above Akaniṣṭha Heaven are further heavens:
the of Unbounded Emptiness, the Heaven of Unbounded Consciousness, the of Nonexistence, the of Neither Thought Nor No-thought.
These names all refer to places where gods live.
In these differently marked areas different sentient beings live, coming and going, appearing and disappearing.
All beings in this world undergo birth, aging, illness, and death and are reborn in different realms. The highest realm in which they can be reborn are these heavens.
This world is called the sahā world.
Innumerable worlds in all directions are also like this world.
The Lishi apitun lun says:
Two hundred thousand yojanas below Jambudvīpa is Avīci Hell.
One hundred thousand yojanas below Jambudvīpa is the location of the hell of Yama’s world.
Between these two are other hells. This treatise does not discuss the distances among these hells.) Four hundred thousand yojanas above here is the place where the four heavenly kings live.
Eight hundred thousand yojanas above here is the location where the thirtythree gods live.
One million six hundred thousand yojanas above here is the location where the gods of Yama Heaven live.
Three million two hundred thousand yojanas above here is the location where the gods of Tuṣita Heaven live.
Six million four hundred thousand yojanas above here is the location where the gods of Nirmāṇarati Heaven live.
Twelve million eight hundred thousand yojanas above here is the location where the gods of Paranirmitavaśavartin Heaven live.
A monk asked the Buddha, “How far is it from Jambudvīpa to Brahmā’s place?” The Buddha said, “The distance between Jambudvīpa and Brahmā’s place is very far.
Suppose on the fifteenth day of the ninth month, when the moon is full, a person in Brahmā’s place dropped a rock measuring one hundred square zhang downward, which fell without obstruction through the space in between, it would not reach the ground of Jambudvīpa until the full moon in the ninth month of the following year.
Apramāṇābha Heaven is still further by the same distance.
From Apramāṇābha Heaven to Ābhāsvara Heaven is again the same distance.
From Ābhāsvara Heaven to Parīttaśubha Heaven is again the same distance.
From Parīttaśubha Heaven to Apramāṇaśubha Heaven is again the same distance.
From Apramāṇaśubha Heaven to Śubhakṛtsna Heaven is again the same distance.
From Śubhakṛtsna Heaven to Anabhraka Heaven is again the same distance.
From Anabhraka Heaven to Punyaprasava Heaven is again the same distance.
From Punyaprasava Heaven to Bṛhatphala Heaven is again the same distance.
From Bṛhatphala Heaven to Āsaṃjñika Heaven is again the same distance.
From Āsaṃjñika Heaven to Sudṛśa Heaven is again the same distance.
From Sudṛśa Heaven to Sudarśana Heaven is again the same distance.
From Sudarśana Heaven to Abṛha Heaven is again the same distance.
From Abṛha Heaven to Atapa Heaven is again the same distance.
From Atapa Heaven to Akaniṣṭha Heaven is again the same distance.
From Akaniṣṭha to the ground of Jambudvīpa, If one were to throw a dense rocky mountain, After sixty-five thousand five hundred and twenty-three years, with no obstacles in the space in between, The rocky mountain will reach Jambudvīpa. The Dazhidu lun says:
If someone were to throw a one square-zhang rock from the edge of the heavens of the realm of desire, it would take eighteen thousand three hundred and eighty-two years before it reached the ground here.
The Three Realms The Zaxin lun says: Seven subatomic particles form an atom .
These are the smallest units.
divine eyes can see them, and bodhisattvas and universal monarchs can also see them.
Seven atoms form a molecule of metal.
Seven molecules of metal form a molecule of water.
Seven molecules of water form a molecule of the tip of a rabbit’s hair.
Seven molecules the size of the tip of a rabbit’s hair form a molecule  of a sheep’s hair.
Seven molecules the size of the tip of a sheep’s hair form a molecule of a cow’s hair.
Seven molecules the size of the tip of a cow’s hair form a particle of dust ; seven dust particles form a lice egg.
Seven lice eggs form a lice.
Seven lice form a particle of wheat.
Seven wheat particles form one aṅgula .
Twenty-four aṅgulas is a hastaka .
Four hastakas is a dhanu .
Five hundred dhanus is one krośa.
Eight krośas is one yojana. Thus, a verse says:
Seven paramāṇus forms one aṇu. Seven aṇus forms one metal molecule. A particle of water, the hairs of a rabbit and cow, Each follows as the preceding is multiplied by seven.
Thus, in the treatises the sizes of the gods, from the four heavenly kings to the gods in Akaniṣṭha Heaven, are measures by krośas.
Thus the Posha lun says, “The bodies of the four heavenly kings are a quarter krośa in height.” According to the Zhengfanian jing :
The size of gods of the four heavens is the same as that of their kings. The Abhidharma also says the same.) The size of the gods in the Heaven of Thirty-three Gods is one-half krośa in height.
That of Śakra is one krośa.
The size of the gods in Yama Heaven is two quarter-krośas in height. The body of Śakra is taller than that of Yama because in a past life he singlemindedly devoted himself to pious works.) The gods in Tuṣita Heaven are one krośa tall, just like the gods in Śakra’s heaven.
The gods in Nirmāṇarati Heaven are one and one-quarter krośas in height.
The gods in Paranirmitavaśavartin Heaven are one and one-half krośas in height.
Second, as for the sizes of the gods in the realm of form, the Za apitanxin lun says:
The gods in Brahmakāyika Heaven are one-half yojana in height.
The gods in Brahmapurohita Heaven are one yojana in height.
The gods in Mahā brahmā Heaven are one and half yojanas in height.
The gods in Parīttābha Heaven are two yojanas in height.
The gods in Apramāṇābha Heaven are four yojanas in height.
The gods in Ābhāsvara Heaven are eight yojanas in height.
The gods in Parīttaśubha Heaven are sixteen yojanas in height.
The gods in Apramāṇaśubha Heaven are thirty-two yojanas in height.
The gods in Śubhakṛtsna Heaven are sixty-four yojanas in height.
The gods in Fuqing Heaven are one hundred and twenty-five yojanas in height.
The gods in Puṇyaprasava Heaven are two hundred and fifty yojanas in height.
The gods in Bṛhatphala Heaven are five hundred yojanas in height.
The gods in the Heaven of Nothought are the same.
The gods in Abṛha Heaven are one thousand yojanas in height.
The gods in Atapa Heaven are two thousand yojanas in height.
The gods in Sudarśana Heaven are four thousand yojanas in height.
The gods in Sudṛśa Heaven are eight thousand yojanas in height.
The gods in Akaniṣṭha Heaven are sixteen thousand yojanas in height.
Third, the formless realm transcends physical shapes and cannot be described in words.
Question:
What are the heavenly robes like?
According to the scriptures, the gods in the six heavens of the realm of desire wear heavenly robes and freely fly about everywhere.
Their clothing looks like robes but emits light, and it is not like the ordinary brocade of our world.
The clothing of the gods in the realm of form is also called heavenly robes, but its light constantly changes, sometimes brighter and sometimes more beautiful, and it cannot be described.
The Qishi jing says:
The four heavenly kings are one-half yojana tall; their robes are one yojana long and one-half yojana wide, and they weigh one-half liang.
The gods in the Heaven of the Thirty-three are one yojana tall; their robes are two yojanas long and one yojana wide, and weigh one-half liang.
The gods in Yama Heaven are two yojanas tall; their robes are four yojanas long and weigh one-quarter of one-half liang.
The gods in Tuṣita Heaven are four yojanas tall; their robes are eight yojanas long and four yojanas wide, and weigh one-eighth of one-half liang.
The gods in Nirmāṇarati Heaven are eight yojanas tall; their robes are sixteen yojanas long and eight yojanas wide, and weigh one-sixteenth of one-half liang.
The gods in Paranirmitavaśavartin Heaven are sixteen yojanas tall; their robes are thirty-two yojanas long and sixteen yojanas wide, and weigh one thirtysecond of one-half liang.
The gods in Māra’s heavens are thirty yojanas tall; their robes are sixty-four yojanas long and thirty-two yojanas wide, and weigh one sixty-fourth of one-half liang.
In the many heavens above these the size of the gods’ bodies and their robes are no different.
The Qishi jing says: The robes of the gods in the various heavens of the realm of desire are decorated in many different ways and cannot be described in detail.
In the two heavens of Nirmāṇarati and Paranirmitavaśavartin, however, the sizes of the gods’ robes follow what is in their minds, and the weight of their robes is likewise.
The gods in the realm of form do not wear robes but look as if they do.
Their heads do not have hair and look like heavenly crowns.
There is no distinction between male and female forms; there is only one gender. The Chang ahan jing says:
The robes of the gods in the Heaven of the Thirty-three weigh six zhu .
The robes of the gods in Yama Heaven weigh three zhu.
The robes of the gods in Tuṣita Heaven weigh one and a half zhu.
The robes of the gods in Nirmāṇarati Heaven weigh one zhu.
The robes of the gods in Paranirmitavaśavartin Heaven weigh one-half zhu.
The Shunzhengli lun says, “The moment the gods of the realm of form are born their bodies are fully developed and covered by clothing.” The Za apitanxin lun says:
As for the life spans of the gods, fifty years for human beings is one day and night for the four heavenly kings.
Calculating in terms of days and months, five hundred years, the life span of the four heavenly kings equals nine million human years, based on the calendar of the sun and moon.
Similarly, taking one day and one night in Revivifying Hell and calculating the time period in terms of days and months, five hundred years, the life span in Revivifying Hell, equals one hundred years for human beings.
Taking one day and night in the Heaven of the Thirty-three Gods , and calculating in terms of days and months, one thousand years, the life span of the thirty-three gods, equals three hundred and six million human years.
Taking one day and night in Black Rope Hell  and calculating in terms of days and nights, one thousand years in Black Rope Hell equals two hundred human years.
Taking one day and night in Yama Heaven and calculating in terms of days and months, two thousand years, the life span of the gods in Yama Heaven, equals one billion four hundred and four million human years.
Taking one day and night in Multiple Punishment Hell , and calculating in terms of days and months, two thousand years, the life span in Multiple Punishment Hell, equals four hundred human years.
Taking one day and night in Tuṣita Heaven , and calculating in terms of days and months, four thousand years, the life span of the gods in Tuṣita Heaven, amounts to fifty-seven billion sixty million human years.
Taking one day and night in Shouting Hell and calculating in terms of days and months, four thousand years in Shouting Hell equals eight hundred human years.
Taking one day and night in Nirmāṇarati Heaven  and calculating in terms of days and months, eight thousand years, the life span of the gods in Nirmāṇarati Heaven, equals two hundred and thirty billion human years.
Taking one day and night in Loud Shouting Hell , and calculating in terms of days and months, eight thousand years, the life span in Loud Shouting Hell, equals Paranirmita vaśavartin Heaven , and calculating in terms of days and months, sixteen thousand years, the life span of the gods in Paranirmitavaśavartin Heaven, equals ninety-two billion sixty million human years.
Taking one day and night in Heat Hell , calculating in terms of days and months, the life span in Heat Hell is sixteen thousand years.
The life span in Multiple Heat Hell is one-half a world age .
The life span in Avīci Hell is one world age.
The maximum life span in the realm of animals is also one world age.
As for earth-upholding dragons and hungry ghosts, the longest life span among them is five world ages.
Second, the life span in the realm of form is calculated in terms of world ages.
The life span of the gods in Brahmakāyika Heaven is onehalf a world age.
The life span of the gods in Brahmapurohita Heaven is one world age.
The life span of the gods in Mahābrahmā Heaven is one and a half world ages.
For the gods in Parīttābha Heaven it is four world ages.
For the gods in Ābhāsvara Heaven it is eight world ages.
For the gods in Parīttaśubha Heaven it is sixteen world ages.
For the gods in Apramāṇaśubha Heaven it is thirty-two world ages.
For the gods in Śubha kṛtsna Heaven it is sixty-four world ages.
For the gods in Fuai Heaven it is one hundred and twenty-five world ages.
For the gods in Puṇyaprasava Heaven it is two hundred and fifty world ages.
For the gods in Bṛhatphala Heaven it is five hundred world ages.
For the gods in the Heaven of Nothought it is the same.
For the gods in Abṛha Heaven it is one thousand world ages.
For the gods in Atapa Heaven it is two thousand world ages.
For the gods in Sudarśana Heaven it is four thousand world ages.
For the gods in Sudṛśa Heaven it is eight thousand world ages.
For the gods in Akaniṣṭha Heaven it is sixteen thousand world ages.
Third, the life span in the formless realm in the Heaven of Emptiness is twenty-thousand world ages; in the Heaven of Consciousness it is forty thousand world ages; in the Heaven of Nothingness it is sixty thousand world ages; in the Heaven of Neither Thought Nor No-thought it is eighty thousand world ages.
In all the three realms some beings die without fulfilling their life spans.
Only in Uttarakuru, for the final-body bodhisattvas in Tuṣita Heaven, and in the Heaven of No-thought is the life span fixed and there is no such thing as not fulfilling one’s life span. In other cases some die before fulfilling their life spans.
The Shunzhengli lun also agrees, though it says:
In the realm of human beings people in Uttarakuru are endowed with the strongest powers of merit, and even those of inferior capacities who indulge in physical pleasures do not receive punishment and after death are reborn in heaven without fail. Otherwise this work agrees with the views cited above.
Question:
At the time of the world age of fire, when the great conflagration marks the end of the world, the fire reaches the heavenly realm of the first meditative state and burns up everything.
Why does the Za apitanxin lun cited above claim that the ruler of Mahābrahmā Heaven, survives for a period of one and a half world ages? Answer:
The “one and a half world ages” here refers to the theory that takes sixty minor world ages as one and a half world age.
This world age is not a major world age.
According to the theory that speaks of the major world ages of water, fire, and wind, the major world age consists of eighty minor world ages.
The life span in the sixty minor world ages is still shorter by twenty minor world ages than this major world age that includes destruction by fire.
There is no contradiction between this theory and the comment about the life span of “one and a half world ages.” How do we know this?
The old Jushe lun calls an anatarkalpa a “special world age” .
The Lishi apitan lun calls it the “minor world age” .
The new Jushe lun (T.1558:
world age.” These three names refer to the same thing, and the duration involved is the same.
According to the Āgamas , the human life span was at first eighty-four thousand years.
Every one hundred years it decreased by one year until it became ten years.
Then it began to increase  until it again became eighty-four thousand.
One cycle of this increase and decrease is called a medium world age  According to the Jushe lun, the period that comes to an end when heaven and earth undergo the three calamities and their course is exhausted is called a “greater world age.” Going through the calamities of water, fire, and wind one by one takes eighty medium world ages.
As one medium world age comes to an end, another medium world age comes into being.
In the course of nineteen medium world ages, different kinds of sentient beings gradually come to exist.
For a period of twenty medium world ages all things exist.
Then in the course of the next nineteen medium world ages things are gradually destroyed.
Then in one medium world age fire, water, and wind destroy the environment.
In the course of nineteen medium world ages hunger, illness, and destroy sentient beings. The comment about the life span of one and a half world ages can be accommodated within this theory.
The Abhidharma also speaks in the same vein, speaking of the place that “exists” and the place that is “emptied” first (ref.
Za apitanxin lun, T.1552:
This is the place that becomes “empty” at the very end.
The realm in which the sentient beings first come to “exist” is not fixed.
In the world age of fire it is the realm of the first .
In the world age of water it is the realm of the second meditative state.
In the world age of wind it is the realm of the third meditative state.
If we follow this theory, then one great world age includes these sixty medium world ages plus twenty special world ages of emptiness.
Altogether there are eighty special world ages.
The major world age and its subdivisions are distinguished in this way.
Let us now show how there is no contradiction.
It is said above that the life span of the gods in Brahmakāyika Heaven is one-half a world age.
You should know that this means “half a world age” in reference to  special world age; thus it means twenty medium world ages.
Second, the life span of the gods in Brahmapurohita Heaven is one world age.
This means one special world age, or forty medium world ages.
Third, the life span of the gods in Mahābrahmā Heaven is one and a one-half world ages.
You should know that this refers to one and a half special world ages, or sixty medium world ages.
Given this way of calculation, there is no contradiction.
This explains the matter with regard to the first meditative state.
From the second meditative state on, you should calculate in terms of the major world ages of the three calamities and not use medium or special world ages as units of calculation.
In the second meditative state, the life span in the first heaven called Parīttābha is two world ages, in the second heaven called Apramāṇābha it is four world ages, and in the third heaven called Ābhāsvara it is eight world ages.
If someone asks, “Since the calamity of water reaches the realm of the second meditative state, how can the gods in Ābhāsvara Heaven have a life span of eight world ages?”, we should remind him of the following.
After seven calamities of fire the calamity of water occurs and this reaches the realm of the second meditative state.
Therefore, the Ābhāsvara gods can have a life span of eight major world ages.
In the third meditative state, the life span in the first heaven called Parīttaśubha is sixteen world ages, the life span in the second heaven called Apra māṇaśubha is thirty-two world ages, the life span in the third heaven called Śubhakṛtsna is sixty-four world ages.
If someone asks, “Since the calamity of wind reaches the realm of the third meditative state, how can the gods in Śubhakṛtsna Heaven have a life span of sixty-four world ages?”, we should remind them of the following.
After sixty-three calamities, either of water or of fire, the calamity of wind occurs.
Therefore, the Śubhakṛtsna gods can have a life span of sixty-four world ages.
How do we know that this is the case?
According to the Abhidharma seven calamities of fire occur one after another and then the calamity of water occurs.
Thus, by the time the sequence of seven times seven, or forty-nine, calamities of fire is completed, seven calamities of water would have occurred. Altogether fifty-six world ages would have passed.
Then after these fifty-six world ages seven calamities of water occur again, and it is after these seven calamities of fire that the calamity of wind occurs and its destruction reaches the realms of the third meditative state.
Altogether, including the preceding ones, this takes sixty-four world ages.
Following this reasoning, the Śubha kṛtsna gods can have a life span of sixty-four world ages .
Thus, a verse in the Abhidharma says:
Seven fires pass one after another. And then one calamity of water occurs. After seven times seven fires and seven waters, And still another seven fires, the calamity of wind occurs. Question:
In the case of the four heavens of the formless realm, the life span in the Heaven of Consciousness is twice as long as that in the Heaven of Space.
Why is it that for the even higher two heavens the life span is not doubled?
Answer:
The Posha lun reproduces three different explanations of this matter offered by doctrinal masters.
The first explanation is as follows:
In the two heavens of Infinite Space and Infinite Consciousness there exist the practice of infinitude and the rest of the allsense-fields meditative practices. This is the reason the life span is doubled in the latter.
In the Heaven of Infinite Space the infinitude practice results in a life span of ten thousand world ages; other practices result in an additional life span of ten thousand world ages.
Altogether a life span of twenty thousand world ages is obtained.
In the Heaven of Infinite Consciousness the infinitude practice results in a life span of twenty thousand world ages; other practices result in an additional life span of twenty thousand world ages.
Altogether the life span of forty thousand world ages is obtained.
In the heavens above these there is no infinitude practice and consequently the life span is not doubled.
This is the first explanation.
A second explanation by another doctrinal master is as follows:
In these two heavens of Space and Consciousness there exist the two kinds of practices, namely, meditation and wisdom.
This is the reason why the life span is doubled in the latter.
the practice of meditation results in a life span of ten thousand world ages; the practice of wisdom results in an additional life span of ten thousand world ages.
Altogether the life span of twenty thousand world ages is obtained.
In the Heaven of Infinite Consciousness the practice of meditation results in a life span of twenty thousand world ages; the practice of wisdom results in an additional life span of twenty thousand world ages.
Altogether the life span of forty thousand world ages is obtained.
In the two heavens above these there exists only the practice of meditation; the practice of wisdom is absent.
For this reason the life span is not doubled.
This is the second explanation.
The third explanation by a yet another doctrinal master is as follows:
The fixed life span in each of the four heavens of the formless realm is only twenty thousand world ages.
Through rejecting or failing to reject desires the life span is doubled or not doubled in the different heavens.
In the Heaven of Infinite Space the gods fail to reject the desires that belong to this realm.
Therefore, their life span is only twenty thousand world ages.
In the realm of Infinite Consciousness the fixed life span is twenty thousand world ages.
Due to rejecting the desires of the Heaven of Infinite Space another twenty thousand world ages are added.
This doubles the former and results in a life span of forty thousand world ages.
In the Heaven of Nothingness the fixed life span is twenty thousand world ages.
Due to rejecting the desires of the heavens of Infinite Space and Infinite Consciousness another forty thousand world ages are added.
In the Heaven of Neither Thought Nor No-thought, twenty thousand world ages is the fixed life span.
Due to rejecting the desires of the lower three heavens another sixty thousand world ages are added.
Because of this calculation, the life span in the realm of Neither Thought Nor No-thought is eighty thousand world ages.
These are the three explanations.
The truth is revealed in these. Question:
Describe the places where the gods live.
Answer:
According to the Posha lun :
Although there are thirty-two heavens there are only twenty-eight dwelling places.
The four heavens of the formless realm transcend forms, there are no dwelling places there.
These gods dwell everywhere in the two realms of desire and form.
When their lives end sentient beings who have completed the work that leads to rebirth in the four heavens of the formless realm immediately receive the karmic retribution of rebirth in the formless realm.
Although there are no specific places, this rebirth is different from that in the realm of form taught in the Great Vehicle.
The twenty-eight dwelling places are located on Mount Sumeru.
Four thousand yojanas above the ground level, in the space around the mountain that is ten thousand yojanas long and wide, is the place where the Karoṭa pāṇi gods dwell.
Going up further the same distance, at eight thousand yojanas is the place where the Mālādhara gods dwell.
Going up further the same distance, and surrounding the mountain at a distance of four thousand yojanas, is the place where the Sadāmatta gods dwell.
Going up further the same distance and surrounding the mountain at a distance of four thousand yojanas is the place where the gods of the sun, moon, and stars dwell.
Going up further the same distance and surrounding the mountain at a distance of four thousand yojanas is the place where the four heavenly kings dwell. Inside this place are seven golden mountains.
The residential areas of the cities of the four heavenly kings are all situated inside these mountains.) Going up further forty thousand yojanas, one reaches the top of Mount Sumeru, forty thousand yojanas wide and long; this is the place where Indra’s city, called Sudarśana, is situated; it is ten thousand yojanas long and wide, and equipped with one thousand gates.
This is the place where the thirty-three gods dwell.
Going up further forty thousand yojanas above this mountain is a place, cloudlike and made of seven jewels, that is shaped like the ground.
This is the place where the god Yama dwells.
Going up further the same distance is a ground, cloudlike and made of seven jewels, where Tuṣita Heaven is located.
Going up further the same distance is a ground, cloudlike and made of seven jewels, where Nirmāṇarati Heaven is situated.
Going up further the same distance is a ground, cloudlike and made of seven jewels, where Paranirmitavaśavartin Heaven is located.
In this way, up to Akaniṣṭha Heaven, the highest heaven of the realm of form, each heaven has a ground that is cloudlike and made of seven jewels. The heavens are separated from each other by the same distance.
The repetitive comments for these heavens are not reproduced here.
The Shunzhengli lun says:
The Heaven of the Thirty-three Gods is located at the summit of Mount Sumeru.
The four sides of the peak are each twenty thousand long.
Thus, the entire circumference equals to eighty thousand .
Some doctrinal masters say that each side is eighty thousand long.
The lengths of the bottom and top of each side are identical.
In each of the four corners at the top is a peak that is five hundred in height and width.
A yakṣa called Vajrapāṇi lives there and protects the heavens.
At the top of this mountain is also a palace called Sudarśana, twenty-five thousand long on each side, altogether ten thousand in circumference.
The golden wall is one and half high.
Its ground is flat and is also made of pure gold, decorated with one hundred and one different kinds of jewels.
The floor is as soft as cotton, and when one steps upon it it cushions the impact.
This is where the Indra’s city is located.
The city has a thousand gates, which are beautifully decorated. Five hundred blue-robe yakṣas, fearsome in appearance and each one yojana tall, armored and bearing weapons, guard the city gates.
Inside the city is the Vaijayanta Hall, decorated with various beautiful jewels. The jewels cover this heavenly palace, and so this palace is called Vaijayanta .
Each side is two hundred and fifty long; the circumference is one thousand .
Within this city are many lovely things; outside, along all four sides, are beautifully decorated gardens, where the gods play together:
Chariot Garden , in which different kinds of chariots appear in accordance with the power of each god; Roughness Garden , where when the gods are about to go to battle, weapons appear according to their needs; Mixed Grove Garden , in which the gods enter to play the same game and have a lot of fun; and Pleasure Grove Garden , in which different kinds of very subtle objects of desire appear together and one never tires of seeing them one after another.
These four gardens are all differently shaped, but each has a circumference of one thousand .
Inside each is a magical pond; each side of the pond measures fifty yojanas.
The pond is filled with the water of eight meritorious qualities.
These four gardens are copiously decorated with flowers, filled with birds and fragrant groves.
The fruit of karma is difficult to understand; the happiness of the gods .
Outside of the city, near the southwestern corner, is the Great Hall of the Good Dharma.
The gods of the Thirty-three Heavens gather here and debate with the asuras, determining what conforms to the Dharma and what does not.
The Qishi jing says:
The Buddha said to the monks, “Why is the place where gods gather called the Hall of Good Dharma ?
When the gods of the Thirtythree Heavens gather there they discuss only the deep meaning of good statements on subtle matters, carrying out inferences and visualizations; these matters all involve the most essential facts, or the truly correct principles.
Therefore, the gods call this place the Hall of Good Dharma.
Why is it called the Parūṣakavana Garden ?
On entering this garden, the gods of the Thirty-three Heavens sit on two rocks called ‘wise’ and ‘good and wise’ and discuss only worldly statements, which are rough , not good or playful.
This is why the garden is called Parūṣakavana.
Why is it called ‘the carriage garden of miscellaneous colors’?
On entering this garden the gods of the Thirty-three Heavens sit on two rocks called ‘miscellaneous colors’ and ‘good miscellaneous colors’ and discuss only worldly statements regarding various miscellaneous colors.
This is why the garden is called ‘the carriage garden of miscellaneous colors.’ Why is it called ‘the garden of messy disorder’?
On the fourteenth and fifteenth days of the eighth month, the gods of the Thirty-three Heavens bring all the palace ladies into this garden.
The gods and women sport with each other without hindrance, indulging freely in their delights.
Enjoying the five sensory pleasures of the gods, they roam around happily.
This is why the gods all call this garden ‘the garden of messy disorder.’ Why is there a garden in this heaven called ‘delight’ ?
On entering the garden, the gods of the Thirty-three Heavens sit on two rocks called ‘delight’ and ‘good delight.’ Their minds are filled with delight and extreme pleasure.
This is why the gods all call that garden ‘delight.’ And why is the tree given the name Pārijātaka Kovidāra?
A deity, called Moduo, lived under this tree.
Because enjoyed the five sense pleasures of the gods, playing happily with others, the gods called the tree Pārijātaka Kovidāra.” Question:
How spacious are the heavens?
Answer:
According to the Posha lun :
The peak of Mount Sumeru is eighty-four thousand yojanas long and wide.
In the middle is a flat place where one can live, only forty thousand yojanas .
Yama Heaven is double of this; its area is eighty thousand yojanas long and wide.
In this way the lengths and widths double from one heaven to another and the area of Paranirmitavaśavartin Heaven is sixty-four thousand yojanas .
The sizes of the heavens of the four meditative states  are not determined.
There are two theories.
According to the first theory, the heavens of the first meditative state are the same size as the four continents; the heavens of the second meditative state are the size of a smaller chiliocosm; the heavens of the third meditative state are the size of a middle chiliocosm; and the heavens of the fourth meditative states are the size of a greater chiliocosm.
According to the second theory, the heavens of the first meditative state are the size of a smaller chiliocosm; the heavens of the second meditative states are the size of a middle chilio cosm; the heavens of the third meditative state are the size of a greater chiliocosm; and the heavens of the fourth meditative states are infinite in size and their structure is indescribable. Doctrinal masters consider the second theory to be correct.) Question:
If the heavens of the first meditative state are of the size of one smaller chiliocosm, and so on, and the heavens of the fourth meditative state are infinite in size, then I do not know whether the heavens from Brahma kāyika Heaven of the first meditative state to Akaniṣṭha Heaven are situated above the greater chiliocosm and shared by all the worlds, or if above each of the four continents there are separate heavens, beginning with Brahma kāyika all the way up to Akaniṣṭha.
Answer:
According to the Loutan jing:
separately above each of the worlds consisting of the four continents, and these heavens are not the same.
Thus, it is said there that inside each of the greater chiliocosm are ten billion Mount Sumerus, great oceans, Cakravāḍaparvata Mountains, and so on, including ten billion Akaniṣṭha Heavens.
This statement leaves no room for doubt .
However, according to the Shunzhengli lun :
The word “small” implies the inferiority of the lower; this expression is used because .
“You may collect many cows whose horns have been cut off; you still will not get the missing horns.” Question:
If each of the worlds consisting of the four continents has its own separate set of heavens above, all the way up to Akaniṣṭha, each of these sets occupy a separate place.
Don’t they get in each other’s way?
Answer:
Even though ten billion heavens happen to be in the same place, they do not get in each other’s way.
Rays of light that cross each other all reach their goals and do not interfere with each other.
The gods and the heavens are also like this.
This is because they are all made of subtle matter.
Just as it is said in scriptures the gods from the realm of form came down to listen to the Dharma.
Even if sixty gods all sit together on the tip of needle they do not find themselves crowded and they do not get in each other’s way.
The textual evidence from this passage leaves no room for doubt.
According to one analogy, the heavens of the first meditative state are like villages; those of the second are like districts; those of the third are like regions; and those of the fourth are like states.) According to the Dazhidu lun :
Mount Sumeru is thirty-three billion six hundred million li high and is made of four jewels:
the eastern side is yellow gold, the western side of white silver, the southern side of lapis lazuli, and the northern side of crystal.
Surrounding the mountain on its four sides are the Yugaṃdhara Mountains, each forty-two thousand yojanas high.
The rulers of the four heavenly realms reside on each of these mountains.
The Chang ahan jing says:
The northern side is made of heavenly gold, and its light illumines the northern direction; the western side is made of crystal, and its light illumines the western direction; the eastern side is made of heavenly silver, and its light illumines the eastern direction; the southern side is made of lapis lazuli, and its light illumines the southern direction.
The Dazhidu lun (ref. T.1509:443b9–14; ref.
Chang ahan jing, T.1:130b2– Each of the rulers of the four heavens resides in his own city:
the city to the east is called Dhṛtarāṣṭra; the city to the south is called Sudarśana; the city to the west is called Zhouluo; there are three cities to the north, one is called Viṣāṇā, the second Gavāṃpati, and the third Āṭavaṭa.
The Chang ahan jing says:
Pañcaśikha said, “When the gods of the Thirty-three Heavens gather at Sudarśana Hall to hold discussions, the rulers of the four heavens sit according to the respective directions of their heavens.
The god Dhṛtarāṣṭra sits to the east, facing west.
Śakra is in front of him.
The god Virū ḍhaka sits to the south, facing north.
Śakra is in front of him.
Virūpākṣa sits to the west, facing east.
Śakra is in front of him.
Vaiśravaṇa sits to the north, facing south.
Śakra is in front of him.
Only after the rulers of the four heavens have been seated will I take my seat.
The Lishi apitan lun says:
As for the great city of Sudarśana of the gods of the Thirty-three Heavens, the circumference is ten thousand yojanas.
The surrounding wall is made of pure gold and is ten yojanas high.
The upper fortification is half a yojana high; the gate is two yojanas high.
Outside of this gate are further gates that are one and a half yojanas high.
There is a gate every ten yojanas, thus going around the four sides of the city there are one thousand gate towers.
These gates are all made of jewels and decorated with a variety of maṇi jewels.
The great city is divided into four parts.
In the center is a golden estate where Śakra lives.
Every twelve yojanas is a gate; going around all four sides there are four hundred and ninety-nine gates.
Because there is another small gate there are five hundred gates altogether.
This estate looks like an independent city set off by itself. It is also guarded by four troops of guards.
The palace is protected by fences, trenches, trees, ponds, and mixed-growth forests; inside performances of plays, music, and other kinds of games take place.
Details of the numerous jewel decorations cannot be given here.
In the middle of this estate is a multistoried jewel palace building called Vaijayanta.
It is five hundred yojanas high and two hundred and fifty yojanas wide.
Its circumference is one thousand five hundred yojanas.
On the four sides of this building are jewel military towers at twenty-six places on the eastern side and twenty-five places on the other four sides, altogether one hundred and one towers.
Each of these towers are two yojanas wide on each side; the circumference is eight yojanas.
On top of these towers is another jewel tower, one-half yojana high, which is used as the viewpoint.
In each of the military towers are seven heavenly maidens; in the palace of each of these seven heavenly maidens are seven court ladies.
Inside the palace building are seventy thousand seven hundred chambers, in which there are seven heavenly maidens, who in turn are accompanied by seven court ladies.
Each of these heavenly maidens is the principal queen of Śakra.
In the military towers and inside the chambers there are altogether four hundred million ninety-four thousand and nine hundred queens and three billion four hundred million sixty-four thousand and three hundred court ladies.
The queens and court ladies together there number three billion nine hundred million fifty-nine thousand and two hundred.
At the center of the highest point in the multistoried Vaijayanta palace building is a round room, thirty yojanas wide, ninety yojanas in circumference, and forty-five yojanas high.
This is the place where Śakra lives.
It is made of lapis lazuli inlaid with various jewels.
The Za ahan jing says:
Vaijayanta Hall, which consists of one hundred pavilions.
Each pavilion has seven levels; each level consists of seven chambers.
Seven queens live in each chamber and each queen is assisted by seven court ladies.
Venerable Mahāmaudgalyāyana traveled through the smaller chiliocosm but never encountered anything as beautiful as Vaijayana Hall.
The Qishi jing (T.
24; ref. Lishi apitan lun, T.1644:183a5–b2; 185b21– Inside the palace is decorated with carvings, and the sensual pleasures one receives there cannot be described in detail.
In this place Śakra lives with the daughter of the asura Śācī.
Śakra’s transformation bodies live with various queens.
All the queens think as follows:
“Śakra lives with me.
The true body lives with Śācī.” Inside the palace city there are residential quarters situated in all four sides and markets on the street corners, all thoughtfully designed and built.
In heavenly cities the merits determine the number of buildings, which are all made of jewels and are symmetrically shaped and handsome.
In this heavenly city there are five hundred roads, in a clear pattern formed by straight and parallel streets crossing at right angles.
The four gates are connected by these streets and the east and west sides face each other.
The stores in the markets at the street corners are filled with goods.
In the heavens there are seven kinds of markets:
first a rice and grain market, second a clothing market, third an incense market, fourth a food and drink market, fifth a flower headdress market, sixth a market of skillful artisans, seventh a market of prostitutes.
At each of these there are market officials.
Gods and goddesses come to these markets to trade, discussing the value of the merchandise, debating quantities, and discussing measurements, all according to the market rules.
Although the gods and goddesses engage in these activities, they do so as games.
There is no taking or giving, and no sense of ownership.
Free from selfish desires, they take only what is needed.
If the objects give them pleasure, the gods take them freely; if they don’t, they say, “This is very valuable but it is not what I need.” The passageways inside the markets are smooth-surfaced and lovely, with decorations made of various jewels, hanging heavenly cloth, and raised flags and banners.
The sound of music is heard incessantly.
A voice can also be heard, saying, “Welcome!
Welcome! Whatever you wish to eat or drink I now present as an offering.” This great palace city is where Śakra lives.
The central offices of the heavenly prefectures, commanderies, districts, and villages are found here. Other heavenly sites are decorated with jewels and filled with pleasurable fragrances.
The wonderful karmic rewards enjoyed in these places cannot be recorded here in detail.) Outside of the north gate of the great city of Sudarśana, at a distance of twenty yojanas, is a great garden called Nandana , whose circumference is one thousand yojanas.
Inside the garden is a pond, also called Nandana, one hundred yojanas long on each side and one hundred yojanas deep, filled with heavenly water, and the sides and bottom are tiled with bricks made out of the four precious gemstones.
Outside of the east gate is a garden called Caitraratha, with a pond called Citra.
Outside of the southern gate is a garden called Parūṣakavana, with a pond of the same name.
Outside of the western gate is a garden called Miśrakāvana, with a pond of the same name.
The size of each of these pond is the same as the one described earlier.
Many different kinds of flowers, fruits, birds, and trees in the forests are found there, and birds fly around singing.
Its beauty is beyond description.
The Lishi apitan lun says:
At that time Śakra led other gods and wishing to play in the garden, he came to the Hall of Good Dharma .
Surrounded by the gods, he respectfully entered the garden.
On the side of the central pillar of the Hall of Good Dharma was a lion seat.
Śakra went up to that seat.
To the right and left there were sixteen gods sitting in a line on each side.
The other gods sat according to their rank.
At that time Śakra had two princes, one called Candana and the other Xiupiluo.
The two generals of the Thirty-three Heavens sat on both sides of the gods of the Thirty-three Heavens.
At that time heavenly king Dhṛtarāṣṭra sat near the eastern gate, accompanied by his ministers and soldiers, who paid respect to the gods and were allowed to sit among them.
At that time heavenly king Virūḍhaka sat near the southern gate, accompanied by his ministers and soldiers, who paid respect to the gods and were allowed to sit among them.
At that time heavenly king Virūpākṣa sat near the western gate.
At that time heavenly king Vaiśravaṇa sat near the northern gate (Note:
Both of these two latter heavenly kings, as in the first two cases, were accompanied by their attendants who were allowed to sit among the gods.) The four heavenly kings were at the Hall of Good Dharma to memorialize the good and evil events in the world to the god Śakra and the gods of the Thirty-three Heavens.
Then the Buddha, the World-honored One, said, “On the fourth day of this month the four heavenly kings will travel in the world and examine the following conditions, one after another, saying, ‘Today how many observe the eight precepts?
How many practice giving?
How many cultivate meritorious deeds?
How many honor their parents, monks, brahmans, and the elders in the family?’ On the fourteenth and the fifteenth day of the month do the same.
If there are not many people who have accepted the eight precepts, practiced giving, and honored these people, the four heavenly kings will go to the Hall of Dharma and report to the god Śakra on the condition of the world.
When the many gods and the god Śakra hear this, they are distressed and say, ‘This situation is not good and is not in accord with the Dharma.
The followers of the gods will decrease in number and the company of demons will increase daily.’ If people accept the eight precepts, practice giving, and cultivate meritorious deeds, when the four heavenly kings make their report the many gods and the god Śakra will be overjoyed and will say, ‘This situation is very good and is in accord with the Dharma. The followers of the gods will increase daily and the company of demons will decrease in number.’” Then the Buddha uttered the following verses: On the eighth day the ministers of the four heavenly kings travel around the realm under heaven. On the fourteenth day the princes of the four heavenly kings observe the world. On the fifteenth day, at the best time, the four heavenly kings, having heard good reports, Will themselves travel in the world, observing good and evil deeds. The intentions of the people in this world agree with the Way and the Dharma.
Many honor their superiors and practice giving to bodhisattvas. Conquering anger, they cultivate the Way; the merits of these men and women increase. Then the gods of Thirty-three Heavens, hearing this, are overjoyed.
Frequently taking delight in others’ good deeds, the four kings speak well.
The followers of the gods increase over and over. The company of demons decrease day by day.
Recalling the Enlightened One, the Dharma is preached to the holy assembly. Gods dwell in peace and happiness; joy is born in the heart. Worldly fruits and otherworldly fruits—those born in the realm of human beings can obtain both. Being good to the Buddha, Dharma, and Sangha, they dwell in the realm of the Three Jewels. I now preach to you about the three good realms of rebirth. If people see truth and reality, abandoning evil and cultivating good, With a little of the valuable currency obtained in this way, they can obtain a great deal. Like the gods of the Thirty-three Heavens, who performed a few good deeds and are born in the heavens.
As for the god Śakra and the other deities, their great merits are widely admired. They gather at the Hall of Good Dharma and other locations. For men and women who perform good deeds, the four heavenly kings present their report. These people are loved by the pure deities and their karmic effects perfume the many heavens.
The Loutan jing says: In the space between the two realms of desire and of form is Māra’s palace.
Consumed with jealousy, Māra grinds down merit just as one grinds down a stone.
The palace is six thousand yojanas on each side and is surrounded by seven walls. All of the decoration is like that of a lower heaven. The deities who come here have the following characteristics:
They can fly over incalculable distances; they can fly back incalculable distances they go freely; they come freely; the bodies of the gods have no skin, muscles, blood, or flesh; their bodies do not produce impure feces or urine; their bodies do not become fatigued; female deities do not give birth to children; the eyes of the gods do not blink; according to their wishes, their bodies become blue if they like blue, yellow if they like yellow, or any other color that they like.
Here is another list of the ten characteristics:
they can fly endlessly; they can go away from and return to places at whatever distance; in the heavens there are no thieves; they do not speak to each other about whether their bodies are good or bad; they do not invade each other; the gods’ teeth are of equal length and are sensitive; their hair is dark blue, seven zhi long; if the body of a god is blue, his hair is also blue; if a god wishes to be white his body becomes white; if a god wishes to be black, his body becomes black.
The Qishi jing says:
All the gods have ten distinct characteristics. What are these?
When the gods fly back and forth they have no limits; when gods fly back and forth they fly freely; when the gods fly they are neither late nor early; when the gods walk they leave no traces; the bodies of the gods never become fatigued; the bodies of the gods have shapes but they do not cast shadows; no god produces feces or urine; no god produces saliva; the bodies of the gods are pure and subtle, and do not have skin, flesh, muscles, veins, fat, blood, marrow, or bones; the bodies of the gods may appear to be tall, short, blue, yellow, red, white, large, small, crude, or subtle, just as they wish, and they are always beautiful, handsome, and striking; people love them.
All the gods have these ten mysterious characteristics.
Furthermore, the bodies of gods are substantial; their teeth are white and set closely together; their hair is dark blue and neat, soft, and moist; their bodies emit light.
They also have supernatural powers, they can fly, and their eyes do not blink.
Necklaces appear spontaneously and their clothing is free of dirt.
The Shunzhengli lun says:
For those in the realm of the four heavenly kings to go up and see the Heaven of the Thirty-three Gods is not the same as for those in the realms of the thirty-three gods to go up and see Yama Heaven. If supernatural powers are activated through meditation, however, anyone can go up and see higher realms.
Some rely on another’s power to go up and see higher heavens; they obtain supernatural powers to go up, guided by heavenly beings, and reach the heavens to which they are entitled.
Having arrived in the heavens, some can also look down and see the lower realms.
When they have come to higher realms and then turn downward, they must transform themselves into bodies of lower realms in order to be seen.
This is because they are in different realms.
Similarly, beings in one realm do not feel it when they are touched by beings in a different realm.
When those in higher realms turn to lower realms, they must transform their bodies in order to see the gods who live at the lower levels.
The Lishi apitan lun says:
People in Jambudvīpa cannot see forms outside the limit of this continent except by means of supernatural powers or other meritorious powers.
Those in the other three continents cannot see forms outside the limits of their respective continents except by means of supernatural powers or other meritorious powers, gods in the six heavenly realms of desire cannot see from their respective heavens forms outside the limit of those heavens except by means of supernatural powers or other meritorious powers.
Even when they look afar they can only see objects inside Mount Cak ra vāḍa.
They cannot see objects that lie beyond this mountain.
Gods in the Great Brahmā Heaven cannot see from their own palace forms outside the limit of this heaven except by means of supernatural powers or other meritorious powers.
Even when they look afar they can only see objects inside the chiliocosm.
The Dazhidu lun says:
As retribution from earlier karma the body emits light.
The bodies of the gods in the realm of desire constantly emit light.
This is due to gifts  of lamps and candles, as well as purification from upholding precepts and meditation.
Their bodies constantly emit light that is visible even when the sun and moon are not shining on them.
The gods of the realm of form practice meditation and remove desires.
They cultivate the concentration of fire.
For this reason their bodies constantly emit light that is more beautiful than the light of the sun and moon or the light that appears in the realm of desire as karmic retribution. This light is unlike anything in the heavens of the realm of desire.
In summary, all of these lights result from the purification of mind.
The light emitted by the buddhas extends to one zhang in all directions.
The light emitted by the gods may reach as far as an infinite number of yojanas.
Yet if it is placed next to the light emitted by the buddhas it is overwhelmed and disappears.
The Yupoyi jingxing jing says: The Buddha told Viśākhā, “The Tathāgata has six kinds of lights.
What are the six?
They are blue light, yellow light, red light, white light, crimson light, and purple light.
These lights of different colors illuminate objects.
These are called the Tathāgata’s six kinds of light.” The Chang ahan jing says:
The Buddha said to the monks, “The light of a firefly is not as bright as that of a candle.
The light of a candle is not as bright as a torch.
The light of a torch is not as bright as that a large fire.
The light of a large fire is not as bright as that of the four heavenly kings.
The light of the clothing and bodies of the four heavenly kings is not as bright as that of thirty-three gods.
Continuing in this way, the light of the Akaniṣṭhabhavana gods is not as bright as the god Maheśvara’s light.
Maheśvara’s light is not as bright as the Buddha’s light.
Even if the light of a firefly and so on, up to the Buddha’s light, are brought together is not as bright as the light of the truth of suffering, the truth of the cause of suffering, the truth of the cessation of suffering, and the truth of the path.
For this reason, monks who seek light should seek the light of the Four Noble Truths of suffering, the cause of suffering, the cessation of suffering, and the path.” Furthermore, the same source says:
Human beings may be of seven colors.
What are the seven?
Some are of golden color.
Some are of the color of fire.
Some are blue.
Some are yellow.
Some are red. Some are white.
Some are black.
Gods and demons are also similarly of seven colors.
The Lishi apitan lun says: The sentient beings in Jambudvīpa are of various colors.
With the exception of the color black the people in Pūrvavideha in the east and Aparagodānīya in the west are of the same various colors as the people of Jambudvīpa.
The human beings in Uttarakuru in the north are all a clean white color.
The beings in the heavens of the four heavenly kings are of four different colors:
blue, red, yellow, and white.
The beings in all the heavens of the realm of desire are similar.
How do the gods acquire these four colors?
At the time of their births if they see blue flowers, they become blue.
The situation with the other colors is likewise.
The Qishi jing says:
In trade the people of Jambudvīpa sometimes use money, sometimes grain and silk, and sometimes people.
In trade, the people of Aparagodānīya sometimes use cattle and sheep and sometimes maṇi jewels.
In trade, the people of Pūrvavideha sometimes use goods and silk, sometimes the five kinds of grain, and sometimes maṇi jewels.
In Uttarakuru there is no trade; whatever people wish to have spontaneously appears.
Furthermore the Qishi jing says:
In the heavens of the realm of desire, such as those of the four heavenly kings and the thirty-three gods, trade and tourism that lifts people’s spirits also exist but they take different forms from those among human beings.
This has been discussed earlier.
The Qishi jing says:
The other three continents also have their respective ways of marriage between men and women.
People in Uttarakuru have no homes.
Men and women copulate under the hanging branches of trees and there is nothing like marriage.
Dragons, garuḍas, and asuras all have their own procedures for marriage, roughly similar to those of human beings.
Marriage exists among the gods in the six heavens of the realm of desire and in the realm of māras.
These have been briefly explained earlier.
In all of the heavens above marriage does not exist, because the distinction between male and female does not exist.
When human beings in the four continents engage in the sexual act, two organs are brought together and impure liquid substances flow.
When dragons, garuḍas, and all others engage in the sexual act, two organs are brought together but only gases are released, giving pleasure, and nothing impure is involved.
When the gods in the thirtythree heavens engage in the sexual act, as the organs are brought together pleasure is realized, and again only gases are released.
The process is no different from that of the dragons and garuḍas described above.
In Yama Heaven the gods take hold of each other’s hands as the sexual act; in Tuṣita Heaven gods only think of each other; in Nirmāṇarati Heaven the gods gaze at each other; in Paranirmitavaśavartin Heaven the gods talk to each other; the gods in Māra’s heaven also gaze at each other.
In all these cases pleasure is realized and the sexual act is consummated. The Lishi apitan lun says:
When the gods in the heavens of the four heavenly kings look for a woman , only after the women’s families give permission do they take them as wives.
Gifts and money are offered.
Gods in the other heavens of the realm of desire do something similar.
Human beings in Jambudvīpa and the other continents, the gods in the heavens of the four heavenly kings and in the Heaven of Thirty-three Gods must engage in copulation to perform sexual acts.
Gods in Yama Heaven embrace to perform the sexual act.
Gods in Tuṣita Heaven hold hands to perform the sexual act.
Gods in Nirmāṇarati Heaven laugh to perform the sexual act.
Gods in Para nirmitavaśavartin Heaven gaze at each other to perform the sexual act.
Human beings in the continent of Aparagodānīya in the west receive pleasure that is two times greater than that of those in Jambudvīpa.
Continuing in this way, the gods in Paranirmitavaśavartin Heaven receive pleasure that is two times greater than that of those in Nirmāṇarati Heaven.
Among human beings in the four continents are who eat badly and those who grow fetuses in their wombs.
Among the female gods in the heaven of the four heavenly kings none of the female deities eats badly or grows a fetus in her womb; they do not give birth nor do they hold babies.
Male and female deities give birth either from the knees or in their sleep.
When a baby is born to a female deity, she says “This is my child”; the male deity also says “This is my child.” The child has one father and one mother.
When a baby is born from the knees of a sleeping father, there is only one father and all his wives and mistresses become mother.
There are spiritual practices that enable them to remain free of desires until death.
For the gods born in the heaven of the four heavenly kings there are infinite ways of satisfying desires.
There is also spiritual cultivation for remaining free of desire until death.
The situation in all of the heavens of the realm of desire is similar.
For all women touch is the source of pleasure.
For all male beings releasing impurities is the source of pleasure.
For all of the gods in the realm of desire the release of gases is the source of pleasure.
The newly translated Posha lun says:
According to the sutra, at the beginning of the world age human beings did not have male and female organs, and men and women looked the same.
Later, after people began eating food, male and female organs appeared, and consequently the distinction between male and female developed.
In the realm of form there is no physical food. For this reason the two organs are absent.
According to one view, the male and female organs are useful in the realm of desire but not in the realm of form.
Therefore, they do not exist there. The two organs of nose and tongue have their use in the realm of desire, but they do not exist in the realm of form.
Following this line of enquiry further, the following question arises:
Are the gods in the realm of form male or female?
Answer: The following must be said:
these gods are all male.
Even though they do not have male organs they have the appearance of men.
Also, because these gods are free of defilements they are male.
The Qishi jing (T.24:345b24–c27; ref.
Qishi yinben jing, T.25:400b29– For all sentient beings there are four kinds of food, which sustain their constitutive elements .
What are the four?
Gross and subtle physical food, sense perception as nourishment, thought as nourishment, and consciousness as nourishment.
Which sentient beings take gross and subtle physical food?
The people in Jambudvīpa eat rice, barley, beans, and meat as gross physical food, and massage, bathing, and anointing the skin as subtle physical food.
People in the other continents and the gods in the six heavens of the realm of desire all take gross and subtle food.
The gods in the heavens higher than these take the pleasure of meditation and the joy of learning the Dharma as food and no longer consume gross and subtle physical food.
Question:
Which sentient beings take sense perception as food?
Answer:
All creatures whose bodies are born from eggs take sense perception as food.
Which sentient beings take thought as food?
Sentient beings that nourish their sense organs with thought and lengthen their lives, such as fish, turtles, snakes, frogs, and kalākuṭa , as well as all other sentient beings that nourish their sense organs with thought and lengthen their lives—all these use thought as food.
Which sentient beings take consciousness as food?
Sentient beings in the hells and the gods in such heavens as Infinite Consciousness take consciousness as food.
Gods in the heavens of the four heavenly kings all eat sudhā , taking it once in the morning and again in the evening .
Once inside the body transforms itself into a bodily substance.
This sudhā grows naturally around gardens and ponds.
This heavenly food can also be turned into the eight kinds of food and drink, such as hard khādanīya food.
This is the situation with all the gods in all the heavens of the realm of desire.
The gods in the realm of form, from the heaven of the first meditative state up to Śubhakṛtsna Heaven  take joy as food.
The gods in the heavens in the formless realm take thought as food.
Question:
How do the gods eat and drink?
Answer:
According to the scripture , the gods in the realm of desire differ in terms of their nobility and attractiveness.
To those endowed with a good deal of merit everything is provided as they wish.
If they wish to drink, their cups are filled with the drink of immortality; if they wish to eat a hundred different dishes arrive.
Those endowed with little merit are never offered food and drink that satisfies them.
Because they are not satisfied they come down to the human world looking for food.
Thus, the scripture says that while the gods share their jeweled eating vessels, the color of their food differs according to their accumulated merit.
To those in the highest category the food appears white; to those in the middle category, it appears yellow; and to those in the lowest category it appears red.
The gods in the realm of desire take the pleasure of meditation as food.
If we were to describe it in terms of the theory of the four kinds of food , then they take only sense perception as food.
Question:
What about the servants and vehicles of the gods?
Answer:
A scripture says, “The gods in the six heavens of the realm of desire have servants and vehicles.” “Servants” refers to attendants.
“Vehicles” refers to the animals that they ride.
The gods in the six heavens of the realm of desire are distinguished in terms of rulers, ministers, wives, mistresses, and those who are of humble or noble or those who are higher or lower in the hierarchy.
The humble must obey the noble.
The lower must follow those who are higher.
As for vehicles, the gods in the six heavens of the realm of desire all have various kinds of animals that they ride when they go out.
Some ride horses and elephants, some ride peacocks, some ride dragons.
According to the Posha lun :
Below Trāyastriṃśa Heaven elephants, horses, owls, geese, waterfowl, peacocks, and dragons exist.
Above Yama Heaven no four-legged creatures, such as elephants or horses, exist.
Only birds, such as Teaching the Undisciplined, Truth-speaking, and Red Water, reprimand the gods and keep them from undisciplined behavior.
Question:
If elephants, horses, and other four-legged creatures are absent, what do the gods in those heavens ride?
Answer:
As the commentary to the treatise says, though there are no elephants and horses when the gods wish to go out, because of the power of their merit elephants and horses appear miraculously, following the gods’ minds, and the gods ride them freely as they wish.
When they have finished riding the animals disappear.
Birds such as Teaching the Undisciplined exist everywhere in the six heavens, and as teachers to the gods they reprimand them for their lack of discipline.
They are not confined to heavens higher than Yama Heaven.
Question:
These birds are still only animals.
How can they serve as teachers to the gods?
As the Zhengfanian jing says: When they were human beings in earlier lives these birds served as teachers who taught in the realm under the three heavens.
The gods in their earlier lives were sentient beings who received their instruction.
Faithfully receiving the instruction, they gave and upheld the precepts, and they have now been reborn in the heavens.
When they were teachers in their previous lives the birds were called Violating Precepts for Profit.
Their hearts were not sincere, and now they have been reborn as heavenly birds.
Due to the power of their limited goodness derived from their teaching efforts they were reborn in the heavens.
Because they originally were teachers they now serve as teachers to the gods, and when the gods are undisciplined, they come and reprimand them.
When the gods see and hear these birds, they all repent and refrain from undisciplined acts. Question:
How numerous are the gods’ attendants?
Answer: According to the treatise, the gods in the realm of form cannot be said to be many.
These gods are neither male or female, and they do not become coupled as husband and wife.
When they are born they come into being through transformation; when they die they go out of being through transformation.
Through primary and secondary causes their palaces appear, following them.
They derive pleasure from meditation.
It is not possible to say how many attendants they have.
The gods in the realm of desire have the distinction of the male and female gender and are coupled as husband and wife.
Thus, the Dajiyi shenzhou jing says:
The four heavenly kings, world-protectors, govern the four directions.
The heavenly king Dhṛtarāṣṭra governs over the gandharvas.
The heavenly king Virūpākṣa governs over the kumbhāṇḍa ghosts.
The heavenly king Virūḍhaka governs over the dragons .
The heavenly king Vaiśravaṇa governs over the yakṣas.
Each of these heavenly kings has ninety-one sons, handsome in appearance and very powerful.
All of them are called emperors.
These heavenly kings altogether have four hundred and sixty-four sons, who guard the four directions.
Śakra governs the four intermediate directions.
The heavenly king Great Brahmā governs the upward direction.
The Dazhidu lun says:
Supernatural beings in the mountains, rivers, trees, grounds, and cities are all subject to the four heavenly kings. When the four heavenly kings came they all appeared, following them.
Those among these beings who had not been able to obtain the Perfection of Wisdom scriptures thus come to the place of the Perfection of Wisdom scriptures, worship them, and realize their benefits.
The attendants in the heavens higher than the Heaven of the Thirty-three Gods are numerous and cannot be listed in detail.
The many attendants in the heavens lower than that of the Thirty-three Gods include heavenly maidens, numbering nine billion nayutas, who belong to Śakra.
Each of these maidens has ten sons and an infinite number of ministers.
Together they form the group of attendants.
As a verse says:
Śakra responds equally to each of the heavenly maidens, Ninety-two billion nayutas in number; Each of these heavenly maidens says to herself, “It is with me only that the heavenly king entertains himself.” As for the gods with the smallest number of attendants, even they have ten thousand heavenly maidens as their attendants. This is the absolute minimum number .
Question:
What is the distinction of classes among the gods like?
First, in the six heavens of the realm of desire the ruler, ministers, and people, and the king’s wife and concubines, are differentiated.
In Śakra’s heaven Śakra is the ruler, the thirty-two gods are the ministers, and the other gods are the people.
Among women, Madame Śācī is the empress and the other heavenly maidens are concubines.
The situation is similar in the other five heavens.
In the realm of form the distinction of classes exists only in the three heavens of the heaven of the first meditative state:
Great Brahmā is the ruler, Brahmapurohita is the minister, and the assembly of Brahmā gods is the people.
In the heavens above these all the gods receive the same karmic retribution and the distinction of classes does not exist.
Question: What are wealth and poverty among the gods like?
Answer:
According to the Zhengfanian jing , above Yama Heaven, including all the heavens of the realm of form, all the gods possess equal wealth.
Below the Heaven of the Thirty-three Gods karmic retribution differs and the distinction of wealth and poverty exists.
Those with rich karmic retribution are provided with everything and the result of their karmic retribution is abundant.
Those with poor karmic retribution are given clothes and palaces; their food is constantly insufficient.
Therefore, the scripture says that the gods with poor karmic retribution were once hungry, and for that reason they came down to Jambudvīpa to pick sour dates and ate them.
People were puzzled by their appearance and questioned them.
They answered, “We are not human beings but gods with poor karmic retribution.
Though we live in palaces and wear beautiful clothes, our food is always insufficient.
That is why we have come here to pick dates and eat them.
You should not find this strange.” The details of this story are in the scripture.
In their previous lives these gods had upheld the precepts and practiced patience but did not practice giving .) In the heavens of the four heavenly kings up to Akaniṣṭha Heaven , when gods die their bodies are not cremated, or exposed, or buried.
Like a flame, they disappear without leaving a corpse behind.
This is because these gods are born through transformation.
Gods in the heavens of the four heavenly kings kill and let others kill but they do not eat the flesh of the dead.
The same is true in the Heaven of the Thirty-three Gods.
From Yama Heaven upward to Akaniṣṭha Heaven the gods do not kill living beings nor let others kill, and they do not eat the flesh of the dead.
This is because these beings are born through transformation and do not leave any substance after death. verses say: The three realms are entangled. The six realms of rebirth are filled with activities. Creatures ceaselessly come and go, Suffering endless pain. Retribution presses upon them And their pain spreads and increases. From evil deeds These dangers arise in response. How could one have known about the water in which one might drown? Who could know how to navigate it with a boat? Carrying heavy burdens, Beings cannot fly up high. We wish to leave this polluted world, And rest in the Pure Land. Singlemindedly turning ourselves to the correct path, We will achieve unlimited longevity.
The Sun and Moon Introduction, Lunar Mansions, The Sun Palace, The Moon Palace, Climate, Illumination, Waxing and Waning, Rising Clouds, Thunder, Lightning, Rainfall, Irregular Weather, and Earthquakes.
Before the universe came into being, the two foundations of yin and yang had not yet manifested.
After sentient beings accumulated grain the three lights shone on them, activating the deep compassion of jewel-like will and issuing forth the mysterious thought of auspiciousness.
Harnessing the yang spirit, they let the light flow.
Clarifying the yin soul, they make the stars rise.
Like galloping windhorses, they move in their courses.
In accordance with the measurements of astronomical instruments, they travel in the right degrees.
They order heat and coldness properly for the three time units of the year.
They move from morning to evening through the four continents.
Even though the patterns are above, in the sky, they serve as signs below on earth.
Just as if their virtue matches the Original Goodness , they travel along the ecliptic circle .
Their logic differs from that of human relationships and is comparable to that of fish and water; mirrors are transported along the profound paths and circle around the three lunar stations.
Praising good words, they demonstrate their effects with auspicious events that appear at the fivefold turning points of the year.
Showing evil omens, they discipline the evil ones.
By looking up at the mysterious mirrors we look upon our own lives in terms of reward and punishment.
Great is the use of the sun and moon!
The Daji jing says:
Then the dragon king Sāgara said to Jyotirasa Bodhisattva, “Great being, who has spoken about the lunar stations?
Who made the larger and smaller stars?
Who made the sun and moon?
Who placed them in empty space?
Thirty days form a month and twelve months a year. How are these time units determined?
To which location do they belong?
What are their clan names and personal names?
What are their good and evil qualities? What do they eat and what should we give them as offerings?
How are their days and how are their nights?
The sun, moon, and lunar stations—at what pace do they move?
You rank as the first among sages.
Take pity on us dragons and explain these matters fully.
Having heard your explanation, we who seek release from suffering will serve these stars.” Jyotirasa Bodhisattva replied to the dragons, “In the past, at the beginning of the present age of the wise, there was a god called Mahāsammata.
He was unusually handsome and intelligent.
He governed with correct conduct and always took pleasure in quiet meditation.
Staying away from love and attachment, he always kept himself pure.
The king had a queen, who was greedy with sexual desire.
Because the king no longer cared for her, she had no way to satisfy her need.
One time she saw a donkey with an erect penis; sexually aroused, she took off her clothes and approached it.
The donkey saw her and they had sexual intercourse.
Consequently, she became pregnant and at the end of one month gave birth to a child.
His head, ears, mouth, and eyes were all like those of a donkey; only his body was shaped like a human body, but it too was covered with coarse hair, just like the body of an animal.
When she saw this creature she was frightened and immediately threw him into the toilet.
Due to his power of merit, however, he hovered in the air and did not fall.
At that time a female demon , called Donkey God, saw that the child had not been soiled and said to herself, “He must be a child of extraordinary merit.” She took hold of the child in the air and washed him.
She then went to the Himalayas, fed the child milk and raised him, treating him exactly the same way as she did her own children.
When the child grew up she made him take the drug of immortality; he played with the other children of the gods day and night.
Another great deity came and loved this child, feeding him tasty meals, candies, and herbs.
The child’s body was transformed:
it was decorated with meritorious effects and illuminated with bright light, and the other gods all praised him, calling him Kharoṣṭhī, which means Donkey-lipped Great Sage.
For this reason, wherever Donkey-lipped Sage went, in the Himalayas and elsewhere, various beautiful flowers, good fruit, medicines, fragrances, clear streams, and different kinds of birds appeared by transformation.
Wherever he stayed the place was filled with a rich harvest.
Benefiting from the medicines and fruit, his crude appearance gradually changed and he became handsome.
Only his lips were still like those of a donkey.
For this reason he was called Donkey-lipped Sage.
Donkey-lipped Sage studied the holy teaching.
For sixty thousand years he stood on one leg, not putting his other foot down, day and night, never becoming fatigued.
The gods saw the great sage undergoing this austerity.
Then the gods of Brahmā Heaven and Śakra Heaven, as well as those in the higher realms of the realm of desire, gathered and came to pay respect.
Dragons, asuras, and yakṣas all gathered together like a cloud.
All the sages and practitioners of the holy path came to the place of Donkey-lipped Sage.
Placing their offerings, they held the palms together and asked, “Great sage, whatever you are searching for, would you please speak of it to us gods?
If it is within the range of our capabilities we will immediately give it to you.
We will not begrudge it.” When Donkey-lipped Sage heard these words, he felt delighted in his heart and answered the gods, “You can satisfy what I truly want.
I will explain briefly.
I recall that in one of my previous lives in a past world age I saw in space many lunar stations, the sun and the moon traveling day and night at a fixed speed and illuminating the realm under heaven.
I want understand this matter thoroughly.
Out of pity for the beings who live in darkness, these lunar stations, the sun, and the moon work tirelessly.
At the beginning of the present world age of the wise such efforts were not expended.
You, gods and dragons, took pity on me and came here.
I ask you to describe the working of these stars and the sun and moon, so that they can be set up ; in the past some stars are good and some evil, some are good-looking and some ugly.
Just as I have requested, please describe them exhaustively.” All the gods said, “Great sage , this is a very profound matter, and it is outside of our own sphere .
Taking pity on all sentient beings, please quickly describe how the matter stood in the past world age.” Then the sage Kharoṣṭhī said to all the gods (Fayuan zhulin, T.2122:
Mao as the leading lunar station.” , “The stars revolve and travel in the sky.
Is it not true that Mao is the leading lunar station?
” Then the sun deity said, “This Mao lunar station constantly travels around the empty sky, going through the four realms under heaven, always performing good deeds and generously benefiting us.
I know that this lunar station is a fire god.” At that time a sage called Great Virtue, said, “This Mao lunar station is the son of my sister.” The lunar station has six corners and is shaped like a shaving knife.
In one day and night it travels through the four realms under heaven. proceeds for thirty muhūrtas .
It is a fire god.
Its clan name is Biyeni.
To those that belong to this lunar station an offering of ghee is made.
, “Then placed Bi as the second lunar station.
It is a water god.
Its clan name is Poluotuo.
The Bi lunar station has five stars and is shaped like a standing hairpin.
In one day and night moves for forty-five muhūrtas .
To those belonging to the Bi lunar station an offering of deer meat is made.
“Then placed Zi as the third lunar station. It is a moon god.
It is the moon’s son.
Its clan name is Piliqieyeni.
There are three stars and the lunar station is shaped like the head of a deer.
In one day and night moves for fifteen muhūrtas .
To those that belong to the Zi lunar station an offering of roots and fruit is made.
“Then placed Shen as the fourth lunar station.
It is a sun god.
Its clan name is Posishichi.
Its nature is evil and it is frequently angry.
It consists of one star, like a woman’s mole.
In one day and night moves for forty-five muhūrtas .
To those belonging to the Shen lunar station an offering of ghee is made.
“Then placed Jing as the fifth lunar station.
It is a sun god.
Its clan name is Posishichi.
It consists of two stars and is shaped like a footprint.
In one day and night moves for fifteen muhūrtas .
To those belonging to the Jing lunar station an offering of rice flour and honey is made.
“Then placed Gui as the sixth lunar station.
It is the god of the planet Jupiter.
It is Jupiter’s son.
Its clan name is Paobonapi.
Its nature is gentle and it takes pleasure in cultivating the good teaching.
There are three stars, which together look like the Buddha’s mark of a broad torso.
In one day and night moves for thirty muhūrtas  .
To those belonging to the Gui lunar station an offering of rice flour and honey is made as well.
“Then placed Liu as the seventh lunar station.
It is a snake god.
Its clan name is Sheshi .
It consists of only one star, like a woman’s mole.
In one day and night the moon moves for fifteen muhūrtas .
To those that belong to the Liu lunar station an offering of milk gruel is made.
“These seven lunar stations correspond to the Eastern Gate.
“Then placed the first lunar station in the southern direction.
It is called Qixing .
It is a fire god.
Its clan name is Binqie yeni.
Its five stars are shaped like a riverbank.
In one day and night  moves for thirty muhūrtas .
To those that belong to the lunar station of Qixing one should prepare an offering of gruel made of rice powder and black sesame.
“Then placed Zhang as the second lunar station.
It is a god of moral virtue.
Its clan name is Jutanmi.
It consists of two stars and is shaped like footprints.
In the course of one day and night moves for thirty muhūrtas .
To those belonging to the Zhang lunar station an offering of bimba fruit is made.
“Then placed Yi as the third lunar station.
It is a forest deity.
Its clan name is Jiaochenru.
It consists of two stars and is shaped like footprints.
In the course of one day and one night moves for fifteen muhūrtas .
To those belonging to the Yi lunar station an offering of cooked green and black beans is made.
“Then placed Zhen as the fourth lunar station.
It is a Shapilidi god.
Its clan name is Jiasheyan.
It is the son of the Scorpion Sage.
It consists of five stars and is shaped like a human hand.
In one day and night moves for thirty muhūrtas .
To those that belong to the Zhen lunar station an offering of cooked tare and millet is made.
“Then placed Jue as the fifth lunar station.
It is a god of delight.
Its clan name is Zhituoluoyani.
It is the son of a gandharva.
It consists of only one star, shaped like a woman’s mole.
In the course of one day and night moves for fifteen muhūrtas .
To those belonging to the Jue lunar station an offering of flour and rice is made.
“Then placed Gang as the sixth lunar station.
It a Moduluo god.
Its clan name is Jiazhanyanni.
It consists of only one star, shaped like a woman’s mole.
In the course of one day and night the moon moves for fifteen muhūrtas .
To those belonging to the Gang lunar station one should offer green beans, fermented milk, and honey cooked together.
“Then placed Di as the seventh lunar station.
It is a fire god.
Its clan name is Xiejiltuoyeni.
In the course of one day and night moves for forty-five muhūrtas .
To those belonging to the Di lunar station one should offer different kinds of flowers.
“These seven lunar stations correspond to the Southern Gate.
“Then placed the first lunar station in the western direction.
Its name is Fang .
It is a god of compassion.
Its clan name is Alanpoyeni.
The Fang consists of four stars and is shaped like a necklace.
In the course of one day and night moves for thirty muhūrtas .
To those belonging to the Fang lunar station an offering of wine and meat is made.
“Then placed Xin as the second lunar station.
It is a Śakra god.
Its clan name is Luoyanna.
The Xin consists of three stars and is shaped like barley.
In the course of one day and night moves for fifteen muhūrtas .
To those belonging to the Xin lunar station an offering of unrefined rice gruel is made.
“Then placed Wei as the third lunar station.
It is a hunter god.
Its clan name is Jiasheyeni.
The Wei consists of seven stars and is shaped like a scorpion’s tail.
In the course of one day and night moves for thirty muhūrtas .
To those belonging to the Wei lunar station an offering of fruit and roots is made.
“Then placed Ji as the fourth lunar station.
It is a water god.
Its clan name is Mochajiazhanyanni.
The Ji consists of four stars and is shaped like a cow’s horn.
In the course of one day and night moves for thirty muhūrtas .
To those belonging to the Ji lunar station an offering of the juice from a fig’s skin is made.
“Then placed Dou as the fifth lunar station.
It is a fire god. Its clan name is Mojialuoni.
The Dou consists of four stars and is the shape of a man clearing the ground.
In the course of one day and night moves for forty-five muhūrtas .
To those belong to the Dou lunar station an offering of unrefined rice, rice flour, and honey is made.
“Then placed Niu as the sixth lunar station.
It is a Brahmā god.
Its clan name is Fanlanmo.
The Niu consists of three stars and is shaped like a cow’s head.
In the course of one day and night  moves for six muhūrtas .
To those belonging to the Niu lunar station an offering of purified butter and cooked rice is made.
“Then placed Nü as the seventh lunar station.
It is a Viṣṇu god.
Its clan name is Dilijiasheyeni.
consists of four stars and is shaped like a grain of barley.
In the course of one day and night moves for thirty muhūrtas . To those belonging to the Nü
lunar station an offering of bird meat is made.
“These seven lunar stations correspond to the Western Gate.
“Then placed the first lunar station in the northern direction.
Its name is Xuxing .
It a Śakra god.
It is Shapo’s son.
Its clan name is Jiaochenru.
The Xuxing consists of four stars and is shaped like a bird.
In the course of one day and night moves for thirty muhūrtas .
To those belonging to the Xuxing lunar station an offering of the juice from cooked black beans is made.
“Then placed Wei as the second lunar station.
It is a Tuoluonu god.
Its clan name is Dannani.
In one day and night moves for fifteen muhūrtas .
To those belonging to the Wei lunar station an offering of unrefined rice gruel is made.
Then placed Shi as the third lunar station.
It is a snake-head god.
It is the scorpion god’s son.
Its clan name is Shedu jianiju.
The Shi consists of two stars and is shaped like a footprint.
In one day and night moves for thirty muhūrtas .
To those that belong to the Shi lunar station an offering of meat and blood is made.
“Then placed Bi as the fourth lunar station. It is a forest god.
It is Varuṇa’s son.
Its clan name is Tuonanshe.
The Bi consists of two stars and is shaped like a footprint.
In the course of one day and night moves for forty-five muhūrtas .
To those belonging to the Bi lunar station an offering of meat is made.
“Then placed Kui as the fifth lunar station.
It is a Fushe god.
Its clan name is Asepaini.
The Kui consists of one star and is shaped like a woman’s mole.
In the course of one day and night moves for thirty muhūrtas .
To those belonging to the Kui lunar station an offering of refined butter is made.
Then placed Lou as the sixth lunar station.
It is a gandharva god. Its clan name is Ahanpo.
The Lou consists of three stars and is shaped like a horse’s head.
In the course of one day and night moves for thirty muhūrtas .
To those belonging to the Lou lunar station an offering of cooked barley and meat is made.
“Then placed Wei as the seventh lunar station.
It is a Yama god.
Its clan name is Baqiepi.
The Wei consists of three stars and is shaped like the legs of a tripod.
In the course of one day and night it covers forty time units.
To those belonging to the Wei lunar station an offering of unrefined rice and black sesame is made.
“These seven lunar stations correspond to the Northern Gate.
“Among these twenty-eight lunar stations there are five that cover forty-five time units, namely Bi, Shen, Di, Dou, and Bi.
There is a lot to be said about the twenty-eight lunar stations, and it is difficult to come to understand them deeply.
I will not discuss the matter in detail here.
Here I discussed the lunar stations briefly.
” The gods who heard the discussion were delighted.
Then, facing the assembly, the sage Kharoṣṭhī held his palms together and said, “Arrange the sun, moon, the year, and time units in this way.” (Note: The Zhi riyue nianshi jing, Scripture of Placing the Sun, the Moon, the Year, and the Time Units, belongs here.
It is not included here due to its length.) What are the six seasons of the larger and smaller star mansions?
Answer:
The first and second months are called the season of moderate warmth.
The third and fourth months are called the season for planting.
The fifth and sixth months are called the season for praying for rain.
The seventh and eighth months are called the season for the ripening of fruit.
The ninth and the tenth months are called the cold and freezing season.
The eleventh and twelfth months are the season of snowstorms. In this way the twelve months are divided into six seasons.
Furthermore, there are eight larger star mansions:
Suixing , Ying huoxing , Zhenxing , Taiboxing , Chenxing , the sun, moon, and Heluohouxing.
There are twenty-eight smaller star mansions, which refer to the set of lunar stations starting with Mao and ending with Wei.
I placed them in this way in an orderly fashion.
You have all heard the explanations.
At that time all the gods, sages, asuras, dragons , and human beings, with palms joined, said, “Now, this heavenly sage is to be honored to the highest degree among gods and humans and none among the dragons and asuras is superior to him.
In wisdom and compassion he is the first.
For the duration of innumerable kalpas he has not failed to take pity on sentient beings and he has obtained meritorious rewards.
Among all the gods and human beings there is none who has comparable wisdom.
He makes the cosmic laws function in this way. There are none among the sentient beings who can make the laws work in this way.
All beings are delighted, and he brings comfort to us. It is good, most virtuous one.
You bring peace to sentient beings!” Then the sage Kharoṣṭhī spoke again, saying that the twelve months constitute one year.
In a moment he finished speaking about these matters regarding the larger and smaller stars.
He also placed the four heavenly kings in each of the four directions around Mount Sumeru to bring benefit to sentient beings in each direction.
Then everyone in the assembly praised the sage, saying, “It is good!” They were boundlessly delighted.
Then the gods, dragons, yakṣas, and asuras presented offerings, day and night.
After innumerable ages another sage, called Qieli, will appear in the world.
He will again speak about the arrangement of the star mansions, small and large, and the calculations of the lunar periods and seasons. I have now listed the twenty-eight lunar stations.
Each has different affiliates and spiritual guards.
Thus, according to the Daji jing :
The Buddha said to the ruler of the sahā world, the heavenly king Brahman, Indra, and the four heavenly kings, “In the past how did the heavenly sage place the lunar stations, the sun, moon, and planets in order to protect the land and nurture sentient beings?” The great king Brahmā and others replied to the Buddha,“In the past the heavenly sage placed the lunar stations, the sun, moon, and planets in order to protect the land and nurture sentient beings.
In the eastern direction are seven lunar stations:
the Jue lunar station, in charge of birds; the Gang lunar station, in charge of those who have renounced the householder’s life and seek the holy path; the Di lunar station, in charge of sentient beings born from water; the Fang lunar station, in charge of those who drive vehicles for profit; the Xin lunar station, in charge of women; the Wei lunar station, in charge of sentient beings in the continents and islands; and the Ji lunar station, in charge of potters.
“In the southern direction there are seven lunar stations:
the Sei lunar station, in charge of metal workers; the Gui lunar station, in charge of all kings and ministers; the Liu lunar station, in charge of dragons in the Himalayas; the Xin lunar station, in charge of the wealthy; the Chang lunar station, in charge of thieves; the Yi lunar station, in charge of merchants; and the Chen lunar station, in charge of the kingdom of Suraṣṭra .
“In the western direction there are seven lunar stations:
the Kui lunar station, in charge of boatmen; the Lou lunar station, in charge of merchants; the Wei lunar station, in charge of the kingdom of Po lou jia; the Mao lunar station, in charge of water buffaloes; the Bi lunar station, in charge of all sentient beings; the Zi lunar station, in charge of the kingdom of Vaideha; and the Shen lunar station, in charge of the kṣatriyas.
“In the northern direction there are seven lunar stations:
the Dou lunar station, in charge of the kingdom of Jiaobusha; the Niu lunar station, in charge of the kṣatriyas and the kingdom of Anduobojiena; the Nü
lunar station, in charge of the kingdom of Yangqiemoqietuo; the Xu lunar station, in charge of the kingdom of Nasheluo; the Wei lunar station, in charge of those who wear flower crowns; the Shi lunar station, in charge of the kingdoms of Gandhāra and Shuluna, as well as all creeping creatures such as dragons and snakes; and the Bi lunar station, in charge of those who are happy among the gandharvas, Bhagavats of great virtue, and past heavenly sages.
“In this way the lunar stations were placed in the four directions in order to protect the land and nurture sentient beings.” Then the Buddha said to the Brahmā king and the others, “You must listen carefully.
Among the heavenly sages in the world I am the most superior with regard to all knowledge.
It is also I who causes the stars and star mansions to protect the land and nurture sentient beings.
You must announce to them how I divided the land and sentient beings so that each is protected and nurtured according to this division.
The divided kingdoms belong separately to the twenty-eight lunar stations.” Question:
What are the sizes of the stars?
Answer:
According to the Zengyi ahan jing , the larger stars are one yojana in diameter and smaller stars are two hundred steps in diameter.
According to the Loutan jing, the circumference of a large stars is seven hundred li; that of a mid-sized star is four hundred and eighty li; and that of a small star is twenty li.
According to the Yüqieshidi lun , the larger among the star mansions are eighteen krośas; the midsized ones are ten krośas; and the smallest ones are four krośas.
Compiler’s comment:
According to Buddhist scriptures these star mansions are all residences of the gods, who live inside them; due to their karmic powers light is emitted.
According to secular books, they are said to be simply pieces of rock.
Thus, during Song period a star fell; the meteor was like a piece of rock.
Some said it was not the star but rather a stone that fell from the Heavenly River.
Thus, according to one secular book, the Heavenly River is connected with the Earthly River, and thus stones sometimes fall from the river.
The Xumi xiangtu shan jing says, The river in heaven is called Yemaluo; it travels in the sky; over a long time large rocks and small sand have occasionally come off it; these have been fixed as stars.
This work is not an authentic scripture but rather an arbitrary composition by a secular author.
Though it has been in circulation it does not represent the Buddha’s teaching.
In the eighteenth year of the Zhenguan period of Tang , in the tenth month, on the day of bingshen there was a great thunder in the sky at the boundary between Fenzhou and the Wenshui district of Bingzhou.
A stone fell from a cloud in the sky.
It was of the size of a pheasant’s beak, with a raised back and a flat bottom.
Zhang Xiaojing, Aide of the Wenshui district, along with the official of Fenzhou, presented a memorial.
At that time an elder from Mahābodhi Temple in Magadha came to the Western Capital.
He was very knowledgeable about all sorts of things.
The emperor asked him about this occurrence.
The elder answered, “Two dragons fought with each other and consequently dropped down like stones.” If we are to speak on the basis of this exchange, it is not necessarily the case that what falls from the sky is a star.
The matters of the distant heavens cannot be fathomed by ordinary beings.
Heaven and earth are the hardest to know for human beings.
It is said among people that heaven is the ether of essence; the sun is the yang essence; stars are the essence of myriad things.
According to what Confucian scholars teach to reassure us, when a star falls it becomes a stone.
If its essence is that of a stone it cannot possibly emit light.
It would also have a heavy mass.
To what would it have been attached?
The diameter of one large star is one hundred li.
The distance between the head and tail of one lunar stations is several tens of thousand li.
Objects one hundred li in diameter are arranged at distances of several tens of thousand li, and as they move the distances between the stars do not change.
Furthermore, the light emitted by the stars, the sun, and the moon is similar; only the sizes varies.
How can the sun and moon be stones?
Stones are solid and dense. How could a crow or a hare reside within it?
How can stones move in the qi by themselves?
Suppose that the sun, moon, stars, and lunar stations were all qi.
The substance of qi is light, and qi merges with the sky.
Their movement and turning cannot diverge from one another.
How then can the sun, moon, the five planets, and the twenty-eight lunar stations all have different degrees and move unevenly, rather than move uniformly?
How could qi fall and suddenly turn into stones?
If the earth is the accumulation of dregs, it should sink at the bottom.
Yet, when we dig in the ground springs open up. The earth floats upon water.
What lies under the water?
Streams in a hundred valleys gather into the Yangzi River and the Yellow River. Where do these streams originate?
The rivers flow to the east into the ocean. Why does the ocean not overflow?
To where does the water of the Guitang Gorge and the Weilü Deeps  eventually lead?
What gas continues to burn in the rocks of Wujiao ?
Who controls the ebb and flow of the tides?
Why doesn’t the Milky Way that hangs in the sky not fall down?
How come water, which by nature flows downward, rise up there?
As soon as heaven and earth were established there were lunar stations.
The nine continents had not been marked and many states were not divided. Marking boundaries of the territory is like traveling through lunar stations.
After the feudal system is established who controls the borders?
states change but the stars are steady in their course of progress.
Calamities and good fortune never miss the right time.
Patterns in the sky are large; stars are numerous.
How could the divisions of the ground be confined to China?
The lunar station Mao is Maotou , which is the protective star of the Xiongnu tribes.
How would it abandon the western Hu, the eastern Yi, the Diaozhi or Jiaozhi?
As we explore exhaustively, we cannot treat human affairs as being beyond cosmic .
People believe only what they see with their own eyes and hear with their ears; they doubt everything that lies beyond this limit.
Yet the Confucians have several astronomical theories, such as huntian and gaitian, and speak of the “conformation of the heavens” and the “vastness of heaven” . These theories are quite comprehensive and unlike the viewpoint of those who only accept what they themselves see.
Yet their calculations are not reliable.
Why should we believe the speculation of worldly people and doubt the superior teaching of the Great Sage?
Why are we tempted to deny the existence of worlds as numerous as grains of sand in the Ganges River, and of world ages as numerous as minute dust particles?
Zou Yan spoke of the nine continents.
Those who live in the mountains do not believe that a fish can be as large as a tree.
Those who live near the ocean do not believe that a tree can be as big as a fish.
Emperor Wu of the Han did not believe in the existence of a bowstring made of glue; King Wen of Wei did not believe in the existence of fire-resistant cloth.
Foreigners see embroidered silk and do not believe that it is made of fibers secreted by worms that eat tree leaves.
People of the Wu region, living south of the Jiang River, do not believe in the existence of a tent that can hold one thousand people.
When we come to the region north of the Ho River the people there do not believe in the existence of a boat that can hold twenty thousand shi.
These things have real proof of their existence.
In the world there are such things as magicians and different magical techniques, such as walking on fire, stepping on swords, harvesting melons , and moving wells; suddenly a thousand changes and ten thousand transformations take place.
It is within the power of human beings to do these things.
Why, then, could not miraculous cosmic responses beyond the limits of our understanding actually happen; for example, a seat decorated with a jeweled banner one hundred yojanas long, or the miraculous appearance of the Pure Land, or the emergence of a marvelous stupa from the ground?
Wang Xuance’s Xiguoxing zhuan says:
In the fourth year of Xianqing the king’s emissary reached Polishe.
For the Chinese visitors the king there arranged to have five women perform. These five women handled three swords, adding more swords until they had ten.
They also performed rope tricks.
Going up in the air on top of the rope, they put on their shoes and then threw them, while handling a sword, a shield, and a spear in their hands.
They performed various other kinds of tricks, cutting off their tongues and pulling out their intestines.
These cannot be described in detail here.
The Qishi jing says:
The Buddha said to the monks, “The palace of the sun god is fifty-one yojanas in depth, width, and height.
The palace looks square, like an ordinary residence, but from a distance it appears round.
It is made of two materials, gold and glass.
Two parts of each side are made of heavenly gold, pure and luminous; one part is made of heavenly gold, clean and luminous.
Five kinds of winds blow and make the sun move: a holding wind, a dwelling wind, an adaptive turbulent wind, a Poluohejia wind, and a future wind.
“In front of the sun palace are innumerable gods.
As they move to the front they each experience pleasure. These gods are called ‘Steadily Moving.’ (Note:
According to the Chang ahan jing the structure of the sun palace and its walls are thin like flower petals.
They are supported by the five kinds of winds.) “Furthermore, inside the sun palace is a carriage made of Jambūnada gold.
It is sixteen yojanas tall and eight yojanas square, and is decorated most beautifully.
The god and his attendants are inside the carriage, enjoying the pleasures that satisfy the five desires.
The sun god has the life span of five hundred years.
His son and grandson succeed him from generation to generation and rule in this palace.
The palace remains for the period of one world age.
The light that shines from the body of the sun god illumines the carriage.
The light that shines from the carriage in turn illumines the palace.
The light is thus passed on and illumines beyond the four continents and the many worlds.
There are one thousand light rays on the body of the sun god, the carriage, and the palace.
Five hundred light rays shine sideways; five hundred rays shine downward.
The palace of the sun god moves constantly.
For a period of six months it moves northward; it keeps moving gradually all day and travels a distance of six krośas in a day. It never departs from the sun’s path.
For the next period of six months it moves southward; it keeps moving gradually all day and travels a distance of six krośas in a day.
It does not fall off the sun’s path.
As the sun palace keeps moving with the cycle of six months, the moon palace moves in similar fashion in a cycle of fifteen days.” The Qishi jing says:
The Buddha said to the monks, “The palace of the moon god is forty-nine yojanas wide and deep, forming a perfect square.
It is surrounded by fences on all four sides and the palace is made of seven jewels.
The palace building of the moon god is made only of heavenly silver and heavenly blue jade, pieces of which are placed side by side.
Two parts are of heavenly silver, clear and untarnished and which shines brightly. The remaining part is of heavenly blue jade, also very clear and transparent.
The light shines through it and illuminates far and wide.
Again, five kinds of wind support the moon.
As the moon palace moves in the sky it is preceded and pulled by the palaces of numerous gods; these gods all receive pleasure.
This palace also has a large carriage, made of blue jade, eighteen yojanas in height, and eight yojanas wide.
The moon god and heavenly maidens are inside this carriage.
The desires of each of the gods’ five sense organs are satisfied in various combinations, and these deities move about freely.
The life span of the moon god is five hundred years.
Generations of his descendants rule there.
The palace lasts for a period of one world age.
The light that shines from the body of the moon god illuminates the blue carriage.
The light that shines from the carriage in turn illuminates the moon palace.
The light from the moon palace illuminates the four continents.
The moon god emits five hundred rays of light directed downward.
It also emits five hundred light rays that shine sideways.
For this reason the moon god is called One Thousand Rays of Light.’ It is also called Cool Light.” Why does the moon palace appear gradually?
The Buddha answered, “There are three reasons:
it rotates; for half a month blue-colored deities, whose clothing and necklaces are all uniformly blue, hide in their palace and because of this hiding the moon appears gradually; and sixty rays of light shine simultaneously from the moon palace and obstruct the light from the moon.
For these reasons the moon appears only gradually.
“Why is the moon palace perfectly round?
Again, there are three reasons for this.
At the right time the moon rotates and the moon palace appears.
The blue-colored deities hide for half a month but on the fifteenth day the form of the moon palace is perfectly round and its light brightest.
If one lights a torch in a pool of fuel, all smaller lamps is overwhelmed and disappears.
Similarly, on the fifteenth day the moon palace overcomes all other sources of light.
As for the sixty rays of light that are simultaneously emitted from the sun palace and that obstruct the light of the moon palace, on the fifteenth day the moon palace is fully empowered.
There is no shadow anywhere.
At that time even rays of light from the sun cannot obstruct the light of the moon.
“Again, why does the moon palace completely disappear on the fifteenth day of the waning period?
The moon palace is closest to the sun palace on the fifteenth day of the waning period.
It is covered by the sun’s light and therefore becomes completely invisible.
“Again, why is the moon palace designated by the same term as ‘month’?
During the waning period the moon palace gradually disappears day by day, until it is entirely gone at the end of the month.
The strength of the light decreases gradually .
For this reason, it is designated by the term ‘month.’ (Note: in the Western Region the month is divided into black and white.
From the first day to the fifteenth day is called the white month.
From the sixteenth day to the day the moon disappears is called the black month.
In China the black month is included and together they are called a month.) “Why do shadows appear in the moon palace?
The jambu tree exists on this continent.
Because of this tree the continent is called Jambudvīpa. The jambu tree is tall and large and its shadow appears in the moon.” The Yüqie lun says:
The shadows of the fish and turtles in the ocean are reflected in the moon.
For this reason black patterns appear there.
According to the Xiguo zhuan , once in the past a rabbit was cultivating the bodhisattva practice.
The Heavenly Ruler wanted to test  and asked for some meat to eat.
The rabbit threw itself into a fire .
The Heavenly Ruler took pity on it and placed the burned rabbit on the moon so that all future beings would see the rabbit’s body and know that it had cultivated the bodhisattva practice.) According to the Qishi jing :
Again, why is heat generated in the summer?
The Buddha said, “For six months the sun palace travels northward.
In one day it steadily travels the distance of six krośas, without fail.
There are ten reasons why heat is generated.
Its light touches upon ten kinds of mountains and generates heat.” Again, why are there cold areas?
After six months the sun palace gradually turns to the south.
There are again twelve reasons why coldness is generated.
Between Mount Sumeru and Mount Khadiraka is the Sumeru Ocean, eighty-four thousand yojanas wide with an immeasurable circumference.
The ocean is filled with flowers that have a powerful fragrance.
The light of the sun reaches this ocean.
This is the first reason why there is coldness.
Second, Mount Īṣādhara; third, Mount Yugaṃdhara; fourth, Mount Sudarśana; fifth, Mount Aśvakarṇa; sixth, Mount Nimindhara; seventh, Mount Vinataka; and eighth, Mount Cakravāḍa.
Ninth, the sun reaches the places where rivers flow in Jambudvīpa, and for this reason there is coldness.
Tenth, there are twice as many rivers in godānīya.
Eleventh, there are twice as many rivers in Pūrvavideha.
Twelfth, there are twice as many rivers in Uttarakuru.
The light of the sun reaches these twelve groups of rivers and coldness results.
In addition to the eight mountains, the opening section on generating heat mentions, as the ninth reason, the demigods’ palace in the sky, ten thousand yojanas above the ground.
The tenth reason is the mountains in each of the four continents. Altogether ten reasons are listed.) The Lishi apitan lun says:
Question:
Why is it cold in winter?
Why is it hot in spring?
Why is it some times hot and sometimes cold in summer?
In winter the water element is dominant and has not begun its downward trend.
Vegetation is moist and has not begun to dry up.
The earth element is damp; the fire element is turned downward; the water element rises upward. We know this because deep water is warm and shallow water is cold.
When the cold season arrives the sun moves along the outside path, and the daylight is shorter.
The yang force is inside. Food is digested quickly.
For this reason it is cold in winter.
Why is it hot in spring? During this season the strength of the water element declines.
Vegetation dries up and the ground splits from the lack of moisture.
The water element is directed downward and the fire element rises upward.
We know this because deep water is cold and shallow water is warm.
Having passed through winter, the sun travels along the inside path and the daylight is longer.
The fire inside the body declines. Therefore, it is hot in spring.
Why is it sometimes hot and sometimes cold in summer?
The ground is constantly scorched in the eighth month.
When a large cloud sends down rain, the ground steams with vapor.
When the wind blows the vapor disappears.
Then, it becomes cold.
If there is no wind, then it is hot.
For this reason, it is sometimes hot and sometimes cold in summer. In the Western Region four months constitute a season.
There is only spring, summer, and winter; there is no autumn.
For this reason there are three residences three seasons.) The Qishi jing says:
Why do rivers flow in the world?
The Buddha said to the monks, “The sun generates heat; the heat causes scorching; scorching causes steam; steam causes sweating .
This moisture in the mountains forms the rivers.” The Chang ahan jing says:
At the beginning of the world age heaven and earth were in great darkness.
A great black wind blew over the great ocean.
The sun was then installed to illuminate the world.
It was placed halfway up Mount Sumeru, along the solar route.
It turns around the four continents and shines on sentient beings.
The Qishi jing says: At that time the world became dark.
Suddenly the sun, moon, and stars appeared, and there were days, nights, years, and seasons.
Then the sun went up to the great palace.
It arose from the east, circled around the middle of Mount Sumeru, and went westward. After it sets there, it returns to appear again in the east.
When sentient beings saw the sun rise from the east again, they said to each other, “The sun rose from the east, and circled around Mount Sumeru.
It will set in the west.” When they saw it a third time, they said to each other, “This is the heavenly light that travels.” This is how the sun got its name The Zhidu lun says, “The diameter of the sun and the moon is five hundred yojanas, and yet they appear to be no bigger than a fan when we see them.” The Chuchu jing says, “The Buddha told Ānanda, ‘The limit of what the human eye can see is known to be four hundred and twenty thousand yojanas.’” The Lishi apitan lun says:
Why are there nights?
Why are there days? There is night because of the sun, and because of the sun there is day.
The realm of desire is itself dark.
Because the sunlight is covered there is night.
Because the sunlight is exposed, there is day.
The Qishi jing says:
When the sun is at its highest point on the continent of Jambudvīpa , it is beginning to set on the continent of Pūrvavideha , it is beginning to appear on the continent of Aparagodānīya , and it is midnight on the continent of Uttarakuru .
When the sun is at its highest point on the continent of Aparagodānīya it is beginning to set on this continent of Jambudvīpa, it is beginning to appear on the continent of Uttarakuru, and it is midnight on the continent of Pūrvavideha.
When the sun is at its highest point on the continent of Uttarakuru, it is beginning to set on the continent of Aparagodānīya, it is beginning to appear on the continent of Pūrvavideha, and it is midnight on the continent of Jambudvīpa.
When the sun is at the highest point on the continent of Pūrvavideha, it is beginning to set on the continent of Uttarakuru, it is beginning to appear on the continent of Jambudvīpa, and it is midnight on the continent of Aparagodānīya.
The Buddha said to the monks, “West to the people in Jambudvīpa is east to the people in Aparagodānīya.
West to the people in Aparagodānīya is east to the people in Uttarakuru.
West to the people in Uttarakuru is east to the people in Pūrvavideha.
West to the people in Pūrvavideha is east to the people in Jambudvīpa. The same relationship applies in the north-south direction.” The Lishi apitan lun says:
Why is the one part of the moon black and the other part white?
It is because of the sun that one part is black and the other part white.
The course of the sun follows that of the moon.
Each day the distance between them either decreases by forty-eight thousand and eighty yojanas or increases by the same amount.
When they come closer , the sun covers three and one-third yojanas of the moon each day; in fifteen days the sun covers the moon completely.
On that day the black part is complete.
The sun also leaves the moon at the rate of forty-eight thousand and eighty yojanas.
The moon opens up by three and one-third yojanas each day; in fifteen days the moon is completely exposed.
The people in the world say that the moon is completely white .
When the sun and moon are furthest apart, the moon is full; the people in the world say that the moon is completely white.
When the sun and moon are in the same place, they are said to be moving together; the people in the world say that the moon is completely black .
When the sun follows the moon, the light of the sun illuminates the light of the moon.
Because the light of the moon is coarse a shadow appears, and this shadow covers the moon.
This is why the back part of the moon is missing.
In this way, larger and larger parts of the moon are covered, and in fifteen days the moon is covered completely.
The period when the sun follows the moon is designated as the “black part.” When the sun precedes the moon, each day new parts are exposed in the same way, and in fifteen days the entirety of the moon becomes completely visible.
The period when the sun precedes the moon is called the “white part.” The Qishi jing says:
Question:
Why is the night long and the day short in winter?
The Buddha answered the monk, “After six months the sun palace begins to gradually travel south.
Each day it moves precisely six krośas.
In this season the sun palace is at the southern end of Jambudvīpa, where the land is narrow.
The sun passes this end very quickly, and therefore in winter the days are short and the nights are long.” Again, why are the days longer and the nights shorter in spring and summer?
The Buddha answered, “After another six months the sun palace begins to gradually travel north.
Each day it moves precisely six krośas.
During these seasons the sun travels over Jambudvīpa where the land is wide and its passage takes a long time. Therefore, the days are long.
For this reason, in spring and summer the days are long and the nights are shorter.” The Zhidu lun says:
The “Nonretrogression” chapter  speaks of the division of the day and month , which should be understood as follows:
The day begins at dawn and ends at , consisting of the first part, middle part, and last part.
The night is also divided into three parts.
The day and the night together consist of thirty time units .
At the spring and fall equinoxes, fifteen time units belong to the day and fifteen to the night.
At other times there are increases and decreases.
At the summer solstice in the fifth lunar month the day consists of eighteen periods and the night of twelve; at the winter solstice in the eleventh lunar month the day consists of twelve periods and the night of eighteen.
The month may consist of thirty and one-half days, or of thirty days, or of twenty-nine and one-half days, or of twentyseven and one-half days.
There are four kinds of months:
first is the month of the sun, second the worldly month, third the month of the moon, and fourth is the month of the lunar stations.
The month of the sun is thirty and one-half days; the worldly month is thirty days; the month of the moon is twenty-nine days plus thirty sixty-seconds of a day; the month of the lunar stations is twenty-seven days plus twenty-one sixtieths of a day.
The intercalary month results from the combination of the month of the sun and the worldly month, and is called the thirteenth month.
Sometimes thirteen months forms one year.
The year contains three hundred and sixty-six days, and repeats itself.
The bodhisattva knows that in the middle of a day, the former half of the day has already gone out of existence and the latter half of the day has not yet come into existence.
The middle point does not remain; there is no specific and fixed characteristic that marks this point.
The day thus is “empty”; there is no existence to which it corresponds.
When the thirtieth day of the month has arrived, the preceding twenty-nine days have already disappeared.
How can one gather all of the disappeared days in the one day that is present and form a month? If a month does not exist in this way, how can one gather these months and form a year?
Therefore, the Buddha said that worldly dharmas are like an illusion or a dream.
They are nothing but the delusive product of the mind.
A bodhisattva is capable of forming worldly days, months, and years; he or she is also capable of deconstructing them into nonbeing.
This is called skillful distinction.
The Qishi jing says:
There are four kinds of clouds in the world: white, black, red, and yellow clouds.
Of these four kinds of clouds, the white one is common in the realm of earth; the black one is common in the realm of water; the red one is common in the realm of fire; the yellow one is common in the realm of wind.
The clouds rise above the ground into space. Some reach one krośa and stay there.
Others reach two, three, and so on up to seven krośas and stay there.
Some clouds go up into empty space to the height of one yojana, and so on up to seven yojanas and stay there.
Some clouds go up one hundred yojanas and so on up to seven hundred yojanas and stay there.
Some clouds rise above the ground to the height of one thousand yojanas, and so on up to seven thousand yojanas.
This continues until the end of the world age.
The Chang ahan jing says, “At the beginning of the world age clouds appear and reach Ābhāsvara Heaven.” (Note:
According to scripture, there are many kinds of clouds—sometimes five-colored and auspicious clouds appear, at other times red clouds, black clouds, and other kinds of clouds appear. These cannot be described exhaustively.
Details can be found in such scriptures as the Renwang jing .) The Qishi jing says:
The Buddha said to the monks, “Someone following non-Buddhist teachings may come and ask you, ‘Why is there sound in the sky?’ You should then answer as follows:
‘For three reasons of mutual contact sound appears in cloudy skies.
What are the three?
First, the wind realm and the earth realm come into contact inside the cloud, and for this reason sound occurs.
Second, the wind realm and the water realm come into contact inside the cloud, and for this reason sound occurs.
Third, the wind realm and the fire realm come into contact inside the cloud, and for this reason sound occurs.
Why is this so?
For example, if the branches of a tree rub against each other fire may be created. The contact  described above work in a similar way.’” (Note:
According to scriptures there are many kinds of thunder—sometimes supernatural beings are said to hit the drum on the thunder chariot.
Thus, popular sayings speak of the “heavenly drum.” Those with many sins and evil deeds are hit and die. Here we see karmic retribution.) The Qishi jing says:
The Buddha said to the monks, “Someone following non-Buddhist teachings may come and ask you, ‘Why does electric lightning appear suddenly in the sky?’ You should then answer as follows:
‘For reasons that will be described in two parts electric lightning appears in the sky.
What are the two ?
First, the electricity of lightning in the eastern direction is called “no thickness.” The electricity of lightning in the southern direction is called the stream.” The electricity of lightning in the western direction is called “fallen light.” The electricity of lightning in the northern direction is called “one hundred growing trees.” Second, if the electricity called “no thickness” that appears in the eastern direction and the electricity called “fallen light” that appears in the western direction come into contact with each other, they scrape and hit against each other and for this reason a bright light appears in the clouds in the sky.
This is called electric lightning.
Again if the electricity called “following the stream” that appears in the southern direction and the electricity called “one hundred growing trees” that appears in the northern direction come into contact with each other, they scrape and hit against each other and for this reason electric lightning occurs.
This may be compared to the process of the wind blowing two trees into contact with each other.
Suddenly fire appears and spreads through the two trees.” (Note: According to scripture, sometimes there is first thunder but no lightning, other times there is lightning but no thunder.
From the contact of electric currents fire results and then thunder may be heard by people and animals.) The Fenbie gonde lun says:
There are three kinds of rain:
the rain of the gods, the rain of the dragons , and the rain of the asuras.
The rain of the gods is fine and misty. The rain of the dragons is coarse with large raindrops.
When the dragons are happy the rain is mild and nourishing; when they are angry thunder and lightning appear.
The asuras, who fight with the gods in Indra’s heaven, are also capable of causing rainfall.
Their rain is sometimes coarse and sometimes fine. There are also many other kinds of rain. Sometimes there are no clouds yet it rains.
Sometimes there is first a cloud and then it rains.
Sometimes the dragons bring down the rain.
Sometimes it rains independent of the dragons. The karmic conditions of sentient beings determine this.
Details can be found in the scriptures.) The Qishi jing says:
The Buddha said to the monks, “There are five conditions that create obstacles to rainfall.
Diviners cannot fathom these and become increasingly confused.
They predict rain yet the rain does not come.
What are these five?
First, a cloud rises in the sky and thunder is heard, or lightning may be seen and a cold wind may begin to blow.
These are all signs of approaching rain, and all diviners of weather and astronomers determine that it will rain at that time.
Then the asura king Rāhu comes out of his palace, takes the cloud in his two hands, and throws it into the ocean.
This is the first condition that creates an obstacle to rainfall.
Diviners are not aware of this, and yet the rain does not come .
“Second, a cloud rises in the sky and the sound of thunder is heard in the cloud; lightning also appears, and the wind brings cold air.
Diviners see these signs and determine that rain will come.
Then the power of the fire realm increases and burns up the cloud that had appeared.
This is called the second condition that creates an obstacle to rainfall.
Diviners are not aware of this, and yet the rain does not come in the end .
“Third, a cloud rises in the sky and the sound of thunder is also heard in the cloud; lightning appears as well.
In addition, the wind brings in cold air.
When diviners see these signs, they determine that rain will definitely fall.
But the power of the wind realm increases and blows away the cloud, and it goes into the riverbank in Kaliṅga, or in a desert, or into the riverbank in Molianna.
This is called the third condition that creates an obstacle to rain.
Diviners are not aware of this, and yet the rain does not come in the end .
“Fourth, because sentient beings are licentious and defile the pure practices, rainfall becomes irregular.
Fifth, because the people of Jambudvīpa do not follow the teaching they are stingy, jealous, and hold the mistaken opinions of heterodox views, and for this reason rain does not fall.” (Note:
These last two points are described in the original passage in the same way as the earlier three points.
The Chang ahan jing also has a similar passage.) The Zengyi ahan jing says:
There are four kinds of shadows that cover the sun and moon and prevent their light from reaching us.
What are these four?
They are first clouds, second dust in the wind, third smoke, and fourth the asuras.
These all cover the sun and moon and prevent their light from reaching us.
Monks also have four kinds of bondage that cover the human mind and keep them away from understanding—first the bondage of desire, second anger, third ignorance, and fourth materialism.
These all cover the human mind and keep it from understanding. The Sifen lü
also presents a similar list of four— first, licentious desire; second, drinking wine; third, amassing money and valuable objects; and fourth, wrong kinds of livelihood.
These four things also prevent the Buddha’s teaching from being clear.
Thus, verses say:
The fire element causes smoke to rise up. The cloud element takes the form of towering clouds. The divine dragon spits out mist. The rising dust falls on the world of human beings. Wine is the gate of licentiousness. Licentiousness is the source of life and death. Gold and silver give rise to grave illness. Wrong kinds of livelihood destroy the root of the precepts. The Fo banniyuan jing says:
Ānanda brought his palms together and asked the Buddha, “I would like to learn about earthquakes.” The Buddha said to Ānanda, “There are three conditions .
The first is that the earth sits on a body of water, and the water rests upon the wind, and the wind rests upon the sky.
When a great wind rises the water is disturbed, and when the water is disturbed the earth moves.
The second is that when a monk who has attained the Way or a mysterious god wishes to cause a cosmic response, the earth moves as a consequence.
The third is the power of the Buddha. Before and after achieving the buddhahood the Buddha moves, and the suns, moons, and heaven and earth all respond.
Many among the gods and human and supernatural beings achieved understanding.” The Da fangdeng daji nianfo sanmei jing  says:
The entire earth shook in six ways:
moving everywhere, shaking everywhere, swelling up everywhere, roaring everywhere, rising up everywhere, and awakening everywhere.
Each of these six ways had three aspects, thus there were eighteen manifestations.
In this way the east swelled up and the west sank; the west swelled up and the south sank; the south swelled up and the north sank; the north swelled up and the south sank; the middle swelled up and periphery sank; the periphery swelled up and the center sank.
The Lishi apitan lun says:
The Buddha told Purāṇa, “There is also a great deity whose powers are known in all the heavens.
If this god wishes to make the earth shake then he can make the earth shake.
Some monks have great supernatural abilities and powers, and during visualization they can make the size of the earth change from large to small and from small to large.
These monks can also make the earth shake.
There is wind called Vilambā. This wind blows constantly and upholds the movement of the earth.
Sometimes the wind blows upward and sometimes downward.
Sometimes the wind blows from the side, and sometimes it blows in a balanced way and holds up the earth as it turns.” The Zhidu lun says:
There are four kinds of earthquakes:
the first kind is caused by fire, the second by dragons, the third by garuḍas, and the fourth by the gods and the twentyeight lunar stations.
Rākṣasas and gods can also cause earthquakes.
The Zengyi ahan jing says: The Buddha was at Śrāvastī and said to the monks, “There are eight reasons for the quaking of the earth.
The earth is sixty-eight thousand yojanas deep and is held up by water.
The water in turn is supported by empty space.
Sometimes the wind in the empty space moves, and the water also moves.
When the water moves the earth shakes.
This is the first kind of earthquake.
If a monk acquires supernatural powers he can move about freely and regards the earth as if it were the palm of his own hand.
He can make the earth shake.
This is the second kind of earthquake.
Again, the gods who have great supernatural and miraculous powers can make the earth shake.
This is the third kind of earthquake.
Again, at the time when I, as a bodhisattva in Tuṣita Heaven, was about to be born into this world the earth shook.
This is the fourth kind of earthquake.
When I, as a bodhisattva, realized that I was in my mother’s womb the earth shook greatly.
This is the fifth kind of earthquake.
When I, as a bodhisattva, realized that ten months had passed and that I was about to come out of my mother’s womb the earth shook greatly.
This is the sixth kind of earthquake.
When I, as a bodhisattva, having renounced the householder’s life, sat on the seat of enlightenment, conquered Māra, and finally achieved enlightenment the earth shook greatly.
This is the seventh kind of earthquake.
When in the future I, as a bodhisattva, enter nirvana without remainder the earth will shake.
This is the eight kind of earthquake.” (Note: Elsewhere the scriptures also talk about many different kinds of earthquakes.
Sometimes when the earth quakes holy beings come into the world; when mountains quake holy beings who have attained the fourth fruit, or arhats, come into the world.
Or when buddhas and bodhisattvas are said to come into the world.
Some speak of the shaking of one world-system, other of many world-systems. Sometimes it is said that sentient beings endowed with little merit can feel the earth quaking and being damaged.
Details, in terms of the primary and secondary karmic effects, are described in the scriptures.) Compiler’s Comment:
Below I will summarize briefly the descriptions in non-Buddhist sources of the first differentiation of heaven and earth, yin and yang, and the appearance of forms and their transformations.
There are five levels of discussion:
Original Substance, Primal Simplicity, Primal Commencement, Primal Beginnings, and Primal Material.
According to the Hetu, “The Original Substance has no shape; it is noisy and active.
As it comes to rest, it becomes earth; as it looks down, it becomes heaven.” The Litong says, “Heaven and earth are produced by the Original Substance; they are the ancestors of the myriad things.” The Diwang shiji by Huangfu Shian says, “The Primary Substance, when it begins to sprout, is called the Primal Commencement.” The Sanwu liji says:
When heaven and earth have not yet come into being, they are undifferentiated like a chicken’s egg.
begins in the undifferentiated state and becomes differentiated step by step.
The planet Jupiter begins its movement from the neighborhood of the Sheti stars. The Original Substance is then opened up.
The Dixi pu says:
When heaven and earth first arise, all is undifferentiated.
Then, the heavenly emperor is born and governs for a period of eight thousand years, with the virtue of wood as the ruling principle.
The Liezi says: If that which has shape is born from that which is without shape, then from where are heaven and earth born?
(Zhang Qian ’s commentary says:
heaven and earth have no origin from which they emerge; they emerge spontaneously.) For this reason there was Primal Simplicity, Primal Commencement, Primal Beginnings, and Primal Material.
These transformed into the One; the One transformed into the Seven; the Seven transformed into the Nine.
The Nine is the ultimate point of transformation, and on reverting it transforms into the One.
The One is the beginning of the transformation.
What is clear and light rises and forms heaven; what is muddy and heavy falls and forms earth.
The substance that is harmoniously blended forms human beings.
For this reason heaven and earth contain intelligent essences, while the myriad things are born by transformation. The Xici zhuan chapter of the Book of Changes, Part I, says:
For this reason in change there is the Great Ultimate, from which the Two Principles of yin and yang emerge.
These Two Principles give rise to the Four Images; the Four Images give rise to the Eight Trigrams.
The Eight Trigrams determine the auspicious and the inauspicious.
The Chunqiu wei, Ganjingfu chapter, says:
The ruler of human beings is equally luminous as the sun and moon, and accords perfectly with the four seasons.
Therefore, heaven is his father, earth his mother, the sun his elder brother, and the moon his elder sister.
The ruler treats heaven as his father in the ceremony performed at Round Hill; he treats earth as his mother in the sacrifice of the Square Marsh; he treats the sun as his elder brother at the Eastern Suburb; and he treats the moon as his elder sister at the Western Suburb.) The Chunqiu wei, Shuotici chapter, says:
The speech of heaven is pervasive.
Residing high, it is principle; below it is the scriptures for people. It is the essence of all yang .
Containing all, it is the Great One; differentiated it takes on different names.
For this reason the character of the One is established heaven.
The Chunqiu fanlu says:
There are five elements in heaven.
Heaven is one element.
Earth is one element.
Yang is one element.
Yin is one element.
Soil is one element.
Human being is one element.
Metal is one element.
Wood is one element.
Water is one element.
Fire is one element.
Altogether there are ten elements.
Heaven also has the energy of delight and anger, as well as the heart of sadness and happiness.
Heaven and human beings go side by side, harmonizing with each other in terms of the same categories.
Heaven and human beings are one.
Spring brings life into being because of its energy of delight.
Fall kills because of its energy of anger.
Summer nourishes because of its energy of happiness.
Winter stores because of its energy of sorrow.
These four are shared by heaven and human beings.
The Erya says:
Qiongcang refers to the blue sky. Li Xun says:
In ancient days people looked up and saw the shape of the sky, rising high in the middle like an arch. Its color is blue.
Therefore, they called it “arching blue.”) Spring is called cangtian . Li Xun says:
In spring myriad things are born.
Their color is blue-green.
Therefore, spring is called “blue sky.”) Summer is called haotian . Li Xun says:
In summer the energy of myriad things is strong and their energy thrives.
Therefore, summer is called “thriving sky.”) Fall is called mintian . Li Xun says:
In fall myriad things ripen and show patterns.
Therefore, fall is called “patterned sky.” “Pattern” refers to the natural pattern given by sky.
Guo Jingchun says: The character min means to take pity.
One takes pity on myriad things that decline in fall.) Winter is called shangtian . Li Xun says: In winter the energy of yin stays above and myriad things fall over and are stored below.
Therefore, winter is called “higher sky.” Guo Jingchun says:
“This means that at this time Nonbeing remains high above and looks down upon the world.”) The Guangya says:
The sky is round. Its north-south diameter is two hundred million thirtythree thousand five hundred and seventy-five bu long.
Its eastwest diameter is four bu shorter.
Its periphery is six hundred million one hundred thousand seven hundred and twenty-five bu long.
The distance between the ground and the sky is one million one thousand six hundred seventy-eight and one-half li.
The thickness of the ground is the same as the height of the sky.
The Xiaojing says:
There are seven barriers and six intermediate points all around heaven.
The distance between the inner barrier to the middle barrier is altogether one hundred and nineteen thousand li, each separated by nineteen thousand eight hundred and thirty-three and one-third li.
From the middle barrier to the outer barrier, each is separated by fifty-nine thousand five hundred li.
The Luoshu zhenyaodu says:
The circumference of the sky is three hundred and sixty-five and onequarter degrees.
One degree is one thousand nine hundred and thirty-two li long.
The distance between the sky and the ground is one billion seven hundred million eight thousand five hundred li. The Lunheng says:
Each day it proceeds by one degree.
One degree is two thousand li.
In the course of one day’s time it proceeds one thousand li.
It moves as fast as the mythical animal qilin.
The Baihutong says:
The sun moves slowly.
The moon moves quickly.
While the sun moves one degree, the moon moves thirteen and seven-nineteenth degrees.
The diameter of the orbit of the sun and the moon is one thousand li.
Furthermore, to measure the course of the sun, there is a distinction between the inside and the outside.
The distance between the extreme northern point to the extreme southern point is nine hundred and ninety yojanas.
The sun takes one hundred and eighty days to move from the inside to the outside.
It also takes one hundred and eighty days to move from the outside to the inside.
This is called the movement.
It is said that the sun travels sixty li each day— the wheel of the sun’s orbit is large and the sun travels slowly in the sky.
Because it travels slowly, it only covers sixty li.
For this reason the year has twelve months.
Six months for northward moving; six months for southward moving.
Altogether it travels a course of three hundred and sixty degrees. The Baihutong says :
How is the waxing and waning of the moon effected by the sun?
It takes three days to form the outline of the moon ; it takes eight days to fill it with light .
In sixteen turns, twice eight, the cycle is completed.
As the last day of the month changes to the morning of the first, the moon receives the order again and the process repeats itself. A month may be longer or shorter.
The sky turns leftward; the sun and moon turn rightward.
The sun moves slowly while the moon moves quickly.
The period for the moon to catch up with the sun is called a month.
After twenty-nine days the moon is short by seven degrees, but after thirty days it is in excess by seven degrees.
Days cannot be divided and so the shorter months are formed.
This explains the effects of yin and yang. Why is the intercalary month formed?
The sky contains three hundred and sixty-five and one-quarter degrees.
In the course of twelve months the sun falls short by twelve degrees.
Therefore, one intercalary month is inserted in the third year; another is inserted in the fifth year.
In these cases yin is insufficient and yang is in excess.
The intercalary month results from the excess of yang.
Xuzheng’s Changli says:
The diameter of the orbit of the sun and the moon is one thousand li.
Its circumference is three thousand li.
The distance from the ground is seven thousand li.
The Shangshu says, “The light of the sun illuminates three hundred and six thousand li.” The Dishuoshu says, “The sun and the moon illuminate four hundred and fifty thousand li.” The Liezi says:
Confucius traveled east and saw two children debating with each other.
When he asked why, one child said, “I think that the sun is closer to us when it first rises and is far away in the middle of the day.” The other child held that the sun is far away when it first rises and is closer in the middle of the day.
The first child said, “When the sun first rises it looks like a large wheel but in the middle of the day it looks like a small pan.
Does this not mean that when it is far it looks smaller and when it is closer it looks larger?” The other child said, “When the sun first appears the temperature of the air is cold.
In the middle of the day it is as hot as boiling water.
Does this not mean that when the sun is close by it is hot and when it is far away it is cold?” Confucius could not decide.
The two children laughed, saying, “Why do people say that you are wise?” Huan Tan’s Xinlun says:
When I was young I heard people tell the following story on the street.
Confucius traveled east and saw two children debating with each other.
When he asked why, one child said, “I think that the sun is closer to us when it first rises and is far away in the middle of the day.” The other child held that the sun is far away when it first rises and is closer in the middle of the day.
The commandant of Changshui, Guan Ziyang, thought that the distance between people and heaven above is far, and the areas in the four directions are closer.
When stars rise in the east in the evening they are few and scattered; the distances between them are over one chang.
In the middle of the night they are high up in the sky in great numbers. The distances among them are only one or two chi.
The sun is the heavenly yang.
Fire is the earthly yang.
The earthly yang rises above.
The heavenly yang comes down.
If one lights a fire on the ground and checks its heat from the sides and from above, regardless of differing distances the heat above exceeds by half the heat from the sides.
When the sun is above , the heavenly yang is balanced at its peak point.
Therefore, it is hot.
When the sun has just risen the heat comes out of the sun , and so it is cool.
In the west  the level of the heat is the same .
Yet the air is different from what it is in the morning.
The Lunheng says:
The sun and moon are not round.
They look round because they are at a great distance from people.
The sun is fire essence.
On earth water and fire are not round.
How could only fire in heaven be round?
The sun and the moon in heaven are like the five planets.
The five planets, like other stars in constellations, are not round.
Only their light makes them look round.
How do we know this?
In the Spring and Autumn period a meteor fell in the city of Song.
It looked like a piece of stone.
Stones are not round.
Thus, we know that the sun, moon, and the five planets are not round. The Lunheng says:
Confucian scholars say, “There is a three-legged crow in the sun.” The sun is fire.
If a crow goes into a fire it is burned.
How could a crow stand in ?
Thus, the crow shares the essence of the sun.
The Shi wei, Tuiducai chapter, says, “The moon acquires a soul in three days and light in eight days.
When the body of the toad is formed the rabbit begins to appear.” The Chunqiu wei, Yangong tu chapter, says, “The toad is the essence of the moon.” The Chunqiu wei, Yuanmingbao chapter, says:
The yin essence forms the moon.
Each day it moves thirteen degrees.
It always obediently accepts responsibility and receives. It receives the yang essence.) Because it receives luminous essence within, metal and water form its internal illumination. The Hetu wei, Shikai chapter, says:
The dust of the Yellow Spring goes up to form the blue cloud.
The dust of the Red Spring goes up and forms the red cloud.
The dust of the White Spring goes up and forms the white cloud. The dust of the Black Spring goes up and forms the black cloud.
This appears in the Huainan Zi as well.) The Hetu wei, Kuadixiang chapter, says, “From Mount Kunlun five-colored clouds appear.
The Yijing , Shuogua chapter, says, “Xun is wind.
Nothing is quicker than wind in bending myriad things.” The Hetu wei, Ditongji chapter, says, “Wind is the messenger of heaven.” The Erya says:
The condition in which the four energies are in harmony is considered to be pervasively correct.
This is called jingfeng . Li Xun says “auspicious wind” is the Wind of Grand Peace.) The southern wind is called kaifeng .
The eastern wind is called gufeng .
The northern wind is called liangfeng .
The western wind is called taifeng .
The fenlun is said to be tui, “collapsing.”  The fuyao is said to be yan .
When wind is combined with fire it is called tun . “Disturbance” here describes how it flares up.) The turning wind is called piaofeng .
The wind that blows when the sun comes out is called baofeng .
The wind that blows bits of soil is called mai .
The wind that blows in cloudy weather is called yi .
The Yi wei, Jilantu chapter, says, “Falling yang is wind.
The movement of falling yang does not cause tree branches to make sounds.” The Yijing, Shuogua chapter, says, “Zhen is lei .
Nothing is greater than lei in moving myriad things.” The Hetu wei, Ditongji chapter, says, “Thunder is the drum of heaven and earth.” The Zuo zhuan says:
If one stores ice at the proper time, then when thunder occurs it shakes .
If one abandons the ice and does not use it, then even when thunder does not occur, it shakes.
The Chunqiu wei, Yuanmingbao chapter, says, “When yin and yang come together thunder is formed.” The Shi guang zhan says:
In the spring thunder begins to occur. It makes the sound bobo gege.
A thunderbolt is male thunder ; it is formed by the essence of drought.
It makes a noise like the sound of the word.
The sound is not loud. A thunderbolt is female thunder; it is formed by the essence of water. The Shi guang zhan says:
In the vernal equinox, if rain is accompanied by thunder , its sound is like that of thunder but it is not really thunder.
The sound comes from below the ground.
Soldiers appear from below the residence.
If there is no cloud in the sky and yet it thunders, it is called the movement of a comet .
Inauspicious things will happen in the kingdom within three years.
The Hetu wei, Shikai chapter, says, “Intensified yang is thunder .” The Yi wei, Jilantu chapter, says, “When yin and yang are combined, the lightning is bright and its light lasts long.” The Chunqiu wei, Yuanmingbao chapter, says, “When yin and yang strike against each other, there is lightning .” The “Heavenly Offices” chapter of the Book of History says, “Lightning is the movement of yin and yang.” The Geliang zhuan says, “Duke Yin said, ‘Ting is a kind of lei .’” (Note:
This refers to an excessive one.
Today these are called by another name for thunderbolt.) The Erya says, “Quick thunder is called tingni .”  The Shuowen says, “Zhen means thunderbolt ; it shakes things.” The Shiming says, “Pili means to break.
Zhen means to fight .
It destroys whatever it attacks, as if in battle.” The Yiyuan says:
When the monk Huiyuan was meditating on Mount Lu, traveling dragons flew in front of him.
Master Yuan, angered, threw a stone at a dragon and hit it.
The dragon then flew up high.
Then a sudden windstorm occurred.
The master realized that this was caused by the dragon.
He climbed up the mountain, burned incense, gathered the monks, and they recited verses together.
Thereupon, a thunderbolt circled around the stone thrown at the dragon.
The cloud and rain then disappeared. The Yiyuan says:
The Qifu group had a hostage who was brutal.
He held a thunderbolt in his palm, and released it outside his body.
Four characters written on his back marked his offense.
Early in the history of the kingdom Shiqu abandoned him.
verses say: The sun and moon have long been hung in their places. The stars in the sky are constantly bright. Like gold during the day and at night like jade. How could they compare with total darkness? When they appear there is bright light. When they disappear, they will return. Waxing and waning, hiding and reappearing, From the last day of the month to the first day of the next, they move in accordance with the measurements of astronomical instruments. Stars are lined up according to their ranks. Fortunes and longevity are controlled by mysterious powers. Sages establish all these. According to karmic causes good things increase. Cloud and dragon meet, Going up and down, then separating from each other. Thunder and lightning strike, And cold and hot weather appears according to its proper time.
The Six Realms of Rebirth The Gods , Human Beings, Demons , Ghosts and Spirits, Animals, and The Hells. Introduction, Explanation of the Name, Suffering, and Decrease of Karmic Effects .
To discuss the gods’ rebirths, we know that they are rich and colorful.
Their clothing and possessions are luminously fresh and their bodies are light and skillful.
Yet even in the sixth and highest heaven among the heavens of the realm of desire there is King Māra.
Heaven of No-thought is still a state that non-Buddhist teachings claimed .
At the height of the four heavens of emptiness in the formless realm, attachment to evil views is not slight.
In the midst of the six heavens of the realm of desire, delusions are particularly heavy.
When one fails to uphold the Perfection of Wisdom Sutra and to serve the Nirvana Sutra, arrogance grows and attachment to the self and others becomes increasingly powerful.
Consequently, the flowers worn by the gods on their heads wilt, and the sweat from their armpits dampens the edges of their clothes.
The light shining around the palace fades and the clothes of the deities made of diaphanous material gather dirt.
Because of their pure minds beings repent and wash away all sins, and they are variously born as gods in the heavenly realms:
the six heavens of the realm of desire, i.e., the heaven of the four rulers, the Heaven of the Thirty-three Gods, Tuṣita Heaven, the realm of Yama, the Heaven of Selfproduced Pleasures, the Heaven of Pleasures Produced by Others; the heavens of the realm of form, i.e., Brahmā, Brahmapurohita, Ābhāsvara, Śubhakṛtsna, Bṛhatphala, Anāgāmi, Abṛha, Atapa, Sudarśana, and Sudṛśa; the four heavens of the formless realm, i.e., the heavens of Empty Space, of Infinite Consciousness, of Nothingness, and of Neither Thought Nor No-thought.
In this way they occupy all possible space horizontally and vertically reach to the summit of the heavens.
Sometimes the gods sit upright on flower seats.
Activated, their movement lasts over many world ages. When they meditate in a jade palace, they fix their gaze on one place and do not move from it for a thousand years.
Let the clothing given to them spontaneously never leave their bodies.
roam around Indra’s palace, called the Hall of Good Conduct.
remain above the suffering of birth and death , remain free of the troubles of warfare, reject receiving the five signs of decline for a long time, and remain richly blessed with the seven jewels forever.
Let their physical bodies be handsome and awe-inspiring, their appearance blindingly luminous.
Having left behind the causes of suffering for long, let them rise in purity to receive the fruits of happiness.
Question:
What is meant by the six realms of rebirth ? Answer:
According to the Pitan lun , qu means “to arrive at.” It also means “way.” The point is that good or evil causes are the “way” to “arrive” at places of rebirth; for this reason these realms are called qu.
Also people arrive at different places of rebirth according to the karma that they themselves have produced; for this reason these places are called qu.
To name the point of arrival implies a sense of direction.
In other words, the karma that people produce directs them toward such realms as heaven and hell.
Question:
Are there only these six realms? Certainly there are other realms, isn’t it so?
Answer:
Each school is consistent about the number of realms.
The Loutan jing speaks of the sentient beings of the nine realms of existence, listing the realm of the bodhisattvas, that of pratyekabuddhas, and that of śrāvakas in addition to the six realms of rebirth mentioned earlier.
This is because ordinary beings and those holy beings live together, so that the former might benefit from the latter’s influence.
According to the terminological explanation in the Posha lun , heaven is so called because it is filled with shining light.
The word “heaven” has a similar sound and meaning and is related to the word “peak” , which means “above.” Heaven is the only existent thing among myriad things that are located in the sky above.
That is why it is called the “peak.” Heaven also means “manifest” .
“Manifest” implies that it is lofty and visible from everywhere.
Among the myriad things only heaven is located high above, making everything clearly visible.
For this reason it is called “manifest.” Question:
Why is the realm of heaven called by that name?
Answer:
That realm is the most excellent, the happiest, the best, the subtlest, and the highest among all the realms.
That is why it is called the realm of heaven.
According to one source, it is only after producing extraordinarily good conduct, speech, and thought that people are led there, born there, and continue to remain there; for this reason it is called the realm of heaven.
According to another source, that realm is called heaven because of the increase of light there. In that realm light shines spontaneously day and night.
Grammarians say that it is called heaven because there is the capacity for illumination there; with this capacity superior consequences are manifested and the karmic causes of previous lives are thoroughly illumined there.
There is also an explanation that the realm is called heaven because beings there enjoy the pleasures of play.
They are constantly playing and experiencing wonderful delights there.
Question:
What do the gods look like?
Answer:
They stand erect.
Question:
What language do they speak?
Answer:
They all speak Sanskrit.
According to the Lishi apitan lun :
Gods are called devas; because they have performed good deeds they are born in that realm of existence; that is why they are called devas.
To briefly discuss features of the retribution bodies of gods, there are no bones and flesh in their bodies, nor do they do such impure things as urinating or excreting.
Their bodies shine brightly both day and night.
Because of their karmic retribution, they are endowed with the five supernatural powers, and their physical bodies are free from all obstructions.
Therefore, the Zhengfanian jing , explaining the matter through metaphor, says:
Suppose someone were to light five hundred lamps in one room; the light of each of these lamps does not overpower the light of any of the other lamps.
Similarly, five hundred gods may be easily placed in the hand of one god, and the gods would not crowd or obstruct each other.
The same scripture also says :
Sometimes one hundred and sometimes one thousand Yama gods sit together on a single filament of a lotus flower; because of the good consequences of their good deeds in previous lives they do not obstruct or crowd each other.
According to the Dazhidu lun , “In Bianjing Heaven, the third heaven of the realm of form, sixty gods can sit on the tip of a pin and listen to the Dharma without obstructing each other.” Again, the Zhengfanian jing says:
At that time the King of Yama deity spoke in verse to the other deities:
If a person contemplates the Buddha in his mind, He is called someone who lives his life well. Because he does not neglect contemplating the Buddha, His life is called a life that matters among many lives. If a person contemplates the Dharma, He is called someone who lives his life well. Because he does not neglect contemplating the Dharma, His life is called a life that matters among many lives. If a person contemplates the Sangha , He is called someone who lives his life well. Because he does not neglect contemplating the monastic community, His life is called a life that matters among many lives.
Again, according to the same scripture , there were three great beings in Yama Heaven who constantly preached the Dharma for the sake of undisciplined and indulgent gods.
Who were these three?
First was the king of the Yama gods, Mouxiuluntuo Bodhisattva; second one was Goose King Bodhisattva; and third was Peacock King Bodhisattva, who was variously decorated.
These three great beings constantly preached the Dharma for the benefit of others, sometimes succeeding in causing some of them to attain the level of the śrāvaka’s enlightenment, and sometimes succeeding in causing some of them attain the level of the pratyekabuddha’s enlightenment.
I will now describe how the scriptures detail suffering in the realm of heaven as well as the suffering of the luminous realms of form and the formless realm.
Even though these higher realms are superior there is nevertheless some subtle pain there.
Therefore, according to the Chengshi lun : In the above two realms there are no crude forms of suffering but there are still subtle forms of suffering.
How do we know this?
We speak of the four positions of walking, standing, sitting, and lying down in discussing the four meditative states.
In each of these four positions there is also suffering.
Furthermore, in the realm of form there are the consciousnesses of the eyes, ears, and body.
Perception in each of these consciousnesses is labeled as either pleasure or suffering. When in one of the four modes of conduct , we seek to change to another.
From the fact that we seek to change we can infer the existence of suffering.
Furthermore, due to a lack of understanding people form attachments that are followed by karmic consequences.
When they make this mistake great suffering results.
As said in the scripture, when life is about to end only those who have attained the Way show no sign of despair and suffering. How can the ordinary beings we are discussing here be free of despair and suffering?
The expression “free from suffering” is used in the treatise because suffering is very subtle.
Just as when there is very little salt in our food we say it is “free of salt,” .
The expression does not mean that there is only pleasure and no suffering at all in heaven.
In the life of pleasure in the realm above beings are in a state of silent quietude, free from attachment, and they are incapable of giving rise to crude forms of greed and anger.
Therefore, they are said to be free from suffering and pleasure.
Furthermore, it is said that there is no suffering in heaven because there are no instruments of punishment such as swords and sticks there.
It is not that there are no subtle forms of suffering in heaven.
Therefore, according to the Niepan jing (T.374:552c29–553a4; T.375:
Even in the most supremely pure and clean garden, if one were to place a corpse inside it the garden becomes impure and people will abandon it and not be attached to it.
Similarly, in the heavens of the realm of form, even though that realm is pure, because beings have bodies the buddhas and bodhisattvas all abandon them.
Those who do not contemplate the matter in this way are not engaged in the cultivation of the body.
From this statement we know that suffering exists in the heavens. According to the Fajubiyu jing :
Four monks were sitting under a tree and asked each other, “What is the greatest suffering in the world?” One of them said, “Sexual desire is the greatest suffering.” Another said, “Hunger and thirst are the greatest suffering.” The third said, “Anger is the greatest suffering.” The fourth said, “Fear is the greatest suffering.” They debated the meaning of suffering endlessly.
The Buddha knew what they were saying and going to the place where the monks were he asked, “What have you been debating about?” The monks paid respect to the Buddha and explained what they were debating in detail.
The Buddha said, “Monks, your discussion has not penetrated to the bottom of the meaning of suffering.
The greatest suffering in the world is having a body.
Hunger and thirst, cold and heat, anger, fear, and the vice of sexual desire are all based on the body.
The body is the source of all suffering; it is the source of all trouble.
Human beings are worried and anxious about everything, crawling around in the three realms like worms, and yet we cruelly harm each other.
We are attached and bound to the idea of self and ceaselessly go through lives and deaths.
All of this comes from the body.
If you desire to be liberated from worldly suffering you must seek absolute quietude.
By controlling your mind correctly and becoming quietly freed from all thought, you can attain nirvana.
This is the greatest pleasure.
From this quotation we know that beings who have not attained the holy knowledge and who have not destroyed their bodies that belong to the three realms cannot be free from suffering.
Question:
In the realm of form beings have bodies and thus can receive suffering.
If they do not have forms and shapes , in what forms are beings born that they receive suffering?
Answer:
This kind of retribution is very subtle and minute, to the point of being invisible.
Though they are free from crude obstructions they are not without subtle forms.
This issue is discussed extensively in another chapter.
According to the Zhidu lun :
When beings die or withdraw from the above two realms , they are greatly distressed; in the lower realm it is as if they have fallen from the highest place and have been broken into pieces.
According to the Zhengshi lun :
Suffering and pleasure accompany a body through the four stages in the realm of form.
Despair and joy accompany the mind to the summit of all the heavens.
Question:
Those who are reborn in the heavens have rejected evil deeds and accumulated good deeds.
Why then are they reborn in the three evil realms of the hells, hungry ghosts, and animals if their karmic retribution has been exhausted?
Answer:
From the very beginning of time sentient beings have committed an infinite number of evil deeds.
If they have been greedy and angry for one day they receive rebirths in a thousand different forms.
So, since they have committed many evil deeds, they are reborn even more times. The karmic effects disappear after a limited period of time and further rebirths follow.
When the karmic retribution for their good deeds is exhausted, the seeds of the evil deeds they committed earlier mature, and they are reborn again in the three evil realms.
There is nothing puzzling about this.
Therefore, according to the Chengshi lun :
Suppose someone who is in the realm of form or the formless realm has claimed that that existence is nirvana; when his life ends he remains in the intermediate state of existence in the realms of form or desire, and falls into a heterodox view, saying that there is no nirvana.
He then reviles the supreme Dharma.
From this we learn that evil deeds exist in the the realms of form and desire.
Furthermore, according to the Zhidu lun , “Those who die in the Heaven of Neither Thought Nor No-thought fall into Avīci Hell.” From this we learn that all realms of rebirth in the three realms are filled with suffering.
Third, let us clarify suffering in the heavens of the realm of desire.
When beings engage in battles in those heavens, they harm one another and both their bodies and minds suffer.
If their limbs are cut off they grow back again.
When they are severed in two at their necks or torsos, they then experience the suffering of death.
According to the Pitan : All gods living in the heavens of the realm of desire commit deeds that belong to each of the ten categories of evil deeds, variously in opposition to the rules of discipline.
Even though gods do not harm other gods, they harm the beings in other realms of existence.
Sometimes they cut off their hands or legs but the beings are then reborn.
If they cut off the heads of these beings they die.
The beings attack each other, one after another. Starting from these extreme cases, evil deeds that fall into all the other categories of evil deeds are all present in the heavens.
Furthermore, when the effects of their merits are about to be exhausted, the five signs of decline appear and the gods become greatly distressed.
According to the Niepan jing :
Although in the heavens there is nothing that causes major suffering and the bodies of the gods are soft and smooth, when they see the five signs they suffer greatly in a manner that is no different from the suffering of the beings in the hells and other evil realms.
Thus, birth in heaven is like honey mixed with poison—it tastes good at first but causes suffering later.
According to a verse in the Zhengfanian jing :
If honey is mixed with poison it cannot be eaten. The pleasures in the heavens are like that; when beings leave, they suffer greatly. When their karmic effects have been exhausted they become despondent and distressed. As they abandon the heavenly maidens, Their moment of departing from the heavens is full of great suffering. Such suffering is beyond comparison. The time when the karmic effects of good deeds are about to be exhausted Is like the moment when a candle flame goes out. They do not know in which realms they will be reborn. Great suffering arises in their hearts. When they are about to leave the heavens, Great suffering arises in their hearts. Various kinds of suffering and pain in the hells— Sixteen of these is still less than this one kind of suffering . All circles of flame Result from the power of loving attachment. Loving attachment chains and binds sentient beings. to various evil realms of existence— The three realms are like a turning wheel. Bound by the effects of karma, the wheel turns ceaselessly. For this reason if a being abandons love and desire, Through rejecting desire, he can attain nirvana. Again, according to the Niepan jing :
Even if beings receive the bodies of gods such as in Brahmā Heaven and the gods of the Heaven of Neither Thought Nor No-thought, when their lifetime as a god is over they again fall into the three evil realms of existence.
Even if beings receive the bodies of gods such as the four heavenly kings and the Heaven Where Gods Freely Enjoy Pleasures Produced by Others , when their lifetime as a god is over they go to the realm of animals where some are born as lions, and others as tigers, buffaloes, hyenas, wolves, elephants, horses, oxen, and donkeys.
From this passage, we learn that when the karmic effects that led to their birth as gods are exhausted, these gods suffer greatly.
Now that we know about these difficulties we should confess our sins openly and sincerely, listing them item by item, and expiate them through ritual repentance.
If someone has committed a sin but its karmic consequences have been exhausted, and if that person later performs good deeds, he may be reborn in heaven. Yet, they are still subtly affected by the influences of their earlier sin.
According to the Zhengfanian jing :
If a god committed the sin of stealing in his previous life, at the time he sees with his own eyes the heavenly maidens taking the jewelry that he himself is wearing and offering the jewels to other gods.
If a god committed the sin of lying in his previous life, when the heavenly maidens hear what that god says they misunderstand him as expressing a wrong view and utter abusive words to him.
If a god offered wine to someone who was upholding the precepts, or violated the precept and drank wine himself, or produced wine, then when he is about to die his mind becomes confused and, unable to concentrate on correct thought, he falls into hell.
If a god committed the sin of killing living beings in his previous life, the life span of this god is shortened and his life in heaven ends quickly.
If a god committed the sin of sexual licentiousness in his previous life, all the heavenly maidens abandon him and sport with the other gods with delight.
These are called the five signs of decline.
Because the gods were negligent in upholding the five precepts, they are bound by the effects of karma and suffer from these retributions.
Again, according to the same source : The god Indra again contemplated the fruits of karma.
On the wall of the temple he saw the eighteen sections of Screaming Hell.
Those who commit the sins of killing living beings, stealing, sexual licentiousness, and lying fall into this hell and suffer in various ways.
When they come out of hell they are reborn as hungry ghosts and live very long lives in this form.
When they die in the realm of hungry ghosts they are reborn as animals and harm each other cruelly.
When they die in the realm of animals they are reborn as human beings.
Their bodies are emaciated and they lack any authority and power.
If they are suffering from the effects of other sins, even if they are reborn as gods the size of their body and their very appearance are inferior, and the jewelry that decorates their bodies and their halo are unimpressive.
They are not loved by the heavenly maidens.
The heavenly maidens turn against them, abandon them, and go to the other deities.
These humble deities possess little wisdom and their minds are not upright and honest.
They are laughed at by the other gods.
When the gods and asuras fight, they are killed by the asuras.
All this is because of the effects of the other sins that these beings had committed.
According to the new translation of the Posha lun (T.1545:364c21–22; When the life of a god in the heavens is about to end, two types of the five signs of decline appear; the first is called minor signs and the second is called major.
What are the minor five signs of decline?
kinds of beautiful music are heard from the jewels that decorate their bodies.
The music is more beautiful than that performed by professional musicians.
When a god reaches the stage nearing the end of his life this sound stops.
According to one view, an uncontrollable sound is also heard.
Their body has no shadow.
When their life is about to end the light becomes dim.
According to one view, when a god finally dies his shadow appears immediately.
the fragrant ponds and come out of the water it does not cling to their bodies and their skin is dry.
Their skin is like the flower and leaves of a lotus.
When a god reaches the stage nearing the end of his life water clings to his body.
beyond the limits of ordinary sense organs.
It turns like a wheel of fire and does not remain still even for short periods of time.
When a god reaches the stage nearing the end of his life he becomes fixated on one object of perception, and even after a long time he cannot get rid of it. blink their eyes.
When a god reaches the stage nearing the end of his life his physical strength weakens and he blinks many times.
What are the major five signs of decline?
A god’s clothing, which was previously clean, becomes soiled.
The crown of flowers , which was previously blooming, now withers.
Suddenly sweat flows from the god’s armpits.
An unpleasant smell suddenly comes from the god’s body.
The god cannot remain seated comfortably in his own seat.
The situation can be changed even after the first of these two sets of five signs of decline has appeared.
When the five kinds of minor signs of decline appeared the god Indra thought that the five kinds of major signs of decline were about to appear, and he became frightened. He entertained the following thought:
“If anyone can save me from this decline and calamity, I will later take refuge in him.” Then he realized that none other than the Buddha, the World-honored One, could protect him from .
He went to the place where the Buddha was staying and asked him to show compassion and save him.
The Buddha preached for him and when gained insight into the truth all of the signs of decline disappeared at once.
The god jumped up, dancing in joy and delight before the Buddha, uttered many loving words, and uttered the following verse:
The Great Sage should know That sitting in this seat I regained the life span of a god. I only wish to honor and remember you. According to the Shefu luohan jing :
Once there lived a god in the Heaven of the Thirty-three Gods.
When his life as a god was about to end seven kinds of signs appeared:
The light on his neck disappeared, the flowers in his headdress withered, the color of his face changed, dust gathered on his clothes, sweat came out of his armpits, his body became thin, and he left his own seat .
Then he thought to himself, “After my life here is ended I will be reborn in a lower realm as a pig in the womb of a scabrous sow in the kingdom of Kuśinagara.” He was greatly distressed but did not know what he could do .
The other gods said, “The Buddha is here now, preaching for the multitude.
Only the Buddha can help you escape from your plight caused by your previous sins.” The god immediately went to the Buddha and greeted him respectfully, bowing to touch his forehead to the Buddha’s feet.
Before he had a chance to ask a question, the Buddha knew what he had in mind and said, “You certainly know that all things are ultimately transient.
Why do you become distressed about such matters as obtaining or leaving the body of a pig? Recite the Three Refuges regularly.” Thus, the god recited the Three Refuges three times every day.
After seven days the god’s life as a pig ended and he was reborn as a son of an elder in the kingdom of Vaiśālī.
While he was still in his mother’s womb the god recited the Three Refuges three times daily.
As soon as he was born and his feet touched the ground, he kneeled and took refuge in the Three Jewels of his own accord.
When his mother gave birth to him there was no afterbirth.
The maidservants who were attending the birth were all frightened and ran away.
The mother was also puzzled, saying that the baby was a delusion caused by the deity of Mars, and she was about to kill it.
The father realized, however, that the baby was an extraordinarily noble person, and ordered that he be brought up with great care.
When he was almost seven years old he was playing at the roadside with some friends, and happened to see Śāriputra and Maud gal yāyana approach.
The child went forward and paid respect to them.
The holy ones were surprised, so the child explained in detail his experience with the Buddha in heaven.
This child invited the Buddha to come to his house and the Buddha preached for him.
The child, his parents, and all the members of his extended family attained the rank of avaivartya, which means “free from retrogression.” (Note:
According to the scriptures there are many different kinds of gods.
Details were given in the thirtytwo parts in the section on the three realms .
In the present context, in the discussion of the six realms of existence, I discussed the subject briefly in six parts.) Miracle Stories From the Jin dynasty , Layman Shi Shiguang and the monks Shi Huiwei and Shi Xianhu; from the Song dynasty , two women with the surname Lun; from the Wei and Wei dynasties , the monk Shi Tanluan and Layman Chuan Xianchao; from the Liang dynasty , the monk Shi Huishao.
Introduction to the Miracle Stories Evil karmic consequences are momentous, and they easily mislead people’s minds as they proceed on their paths; the powers of myriad good deeds are miniscule and it is difficult for them to evoke a response from spiritual reality.
Wicked thoughts occur frequently; we often hear about immoral situations.
The right Dharma is seldom encountered, the teaching declines, and the Way is lost.
For this reason, if we fail to pursue the truth even for one moment, then we are separated from it for a period of ten thousand world ages; if we are distanced from it even for one split-second, we are kept apart from it for a long period of one thousand reigns.
Indeed, because those who have faith in the right Dharma and those who damage it are constantly in competition, and good and evil people are in conflict with each other, ignorant and deluded people easily become shallow admirers of the heterodox teachings and those who follow the pure and correct teaching frequently encounter unjust persecutions.
For this reason, after more than six hundred years have passed since the Dharma entered China, has been persecuted three times.
Disasters followed one after another and calamities reached our own times.
The occurrences of such events are signs of cosmic responses and retributions for our moral conduct.
Thus, the Prince of Jian’an had a miraculous dream and was cured of his illness.
Miraculous spirits appeared to Wenxuan and his illness was cured.
When the king of Wu surrounded a temple a light appeared floating above the relic.
When a Qi ruler was about to execute punishment the blade of his sword suddenly broke into pieces.
When the ruler of the Yuwen family persecuted Buddhism boils erupted on his body.
When the Toba ruler abolished Buddhist temples pus flowed from his abscesses.
Sun Hao urinated on an image of the Buddha and his penis ached.
Helian was wicked and was killed by lightning.
Matters concerning good or evil deeds, fortunes and misfortunes, and other auspicious signs are recorded extensively in such works as the Xuanyan, the Mingxiang, the Baoying, the Gantong, the Yuanhun, the Youming, the Sao shen, the Jingyi, the Fayuan, the Hongming, the Jinglu yixiang, the Sanbao zhengying, the Shengji guixin, the Xiguoxing zhuan, the Mingseng, the Gaoseng, and the Mingbao shiyi.
There are hundreds of fascicles of such works and they cannot be listed here in detail.
In these works the facts are recorded in the scriptural style and highlighted more clearly than the sun and moon in the sky, so that everyone can see them clearly.
If anyone doubts the truth of retribution, the consequence is that he will end up in delusion.
Therefore, a scripture says, “If a person performs a good deed, good reward follows; if he performs an evil deed, an evil retribution follows.” The Book of Changes says, “A house that heaps good upon good is sure to have an abundance of blessings.
A house that heaps evil upon evil is sure to have an abundance of ills.” Truly we know that retributions for good and evil deeds follow like shadows and echoes; pain and pleasure appear one after another.
I have examined over four thousand stories, and selected stories of miraculous occurrences that I have appended at the end of each chapter.
Unless proofs are cited, it is difficult to remove a difficult disease.
As for other pieces of evidence not included here, it is my wish that someone will supplement these sections with them.
Jin Dynasty Layman Shi Shiguang was a man of Xiangyang.
In the eighth year of the Xianghe period he died in Wuchang.
Seven days later, the monk Zhi Fashan was reciting the shorter version of the Perfection of Wisdom Sutra when he became tired and laid down for a while.
He heard a human voice in the spirit altar.
There was a maidservant in the Shi household, whose name was Zhangxin.
She saw Shiguan sitting on the spirit altar, dressed in exactly the same way as he had always dressed.
Shiguang said to Zhangxin, “I was originally destined to be reborn in the realm of dragons but Master Zhi recited a scripture for me, and Tanhu and Tanjian welcomed me to the pleasurable location of the seventh heaven of the god Brahmā.
Tanhu and Tanjian were both novice monks of Zhi Fashan, and they had passed away.” Later, Zhi Fashan was again invited to the household to recite the longer version of the Perfection of Wisdom Sutra.
Shiguang again came to the spirit altar.
While he was still alive Shiguang had donated two banners, and the banners were still at the temple. He called out to Zhangxin and asked, “Send those banners to me.” As soon as Zhangxin replied “Certainly,” she immediately died.
When Zhangxin brought the banners, they both flew together in the northwestern direction, ascending a dark green mountain, the color of a vaiḍūrya jewel.
When they reached the top they could see the Gate of Heaven at a distance.
Shiguang then held up the banners himself and let Zhangxin return.
He gave her a piece of dark green incense that looked like a pea, saying “Present this to Master Zhi Fashan.” Before Zhangxin had completed her return trip she saw from a distance Shiguang entering the Gate of Heaven.
Zhangxin continued on her journey and arrived back home and suddenly she was revived.
She no longer had the incense in her hand.
The banner was still at the temple.
When Shiguang and Zhangxin had left the house together, a six-year-old boy in the household pointed his finger and said to his grandmother, “Father is flying in the sky.
Grandma, can you see him?” Later, Shiguang returned to the house accompanied by more than ten heavenly beings.
After roaming around the house for a while, they departed.
Every time he came back he was wearing a hairpin and a head cover, but when he left his head was bare.
Zhangxin asked him about this, and he answered, “In heaven there is a crown but I do not wear it here.” Later he appeared wearing the heavenly crown, accompanied by a group of heavenly beings who were playing drums and zithers and singing.
Quickly he went to his mother.
Zhangxin asked him, “Why do you come so frequently?” Shiguang said, “I come to let you people learn about moral retribution.
I also wish to entertain my mother.” The sound of the zither was pure and beautiful, entirely unlike worldly music.
Everyone in the household, both young and old, could hear it.
However, their voices seemed muffled as if they were being heard over a wall.
People could not distnguish them.
Only Zhangxin could understand their speech clearly.
After a while they left.
Zhangxin went to send them off and she saw Shiguang enter a black gate.
After a while he came out and said to her, “My father-in-law is receiving the punishment of whipping today. It will be extremely painful and unbearable.
I took a glance and came back.
He had been found guilty of the crime of murder.
Therefore, he is receiving this retribution.
Tell my sister-inlaw that if she gets a monk to recite a scripture will be able to escape this punishment.” The father-inlaw had been the General of Light Chariot. The punishment caused by retribution then ceased.
The origin of the monk Shi Huiwei of Chang’an is unknown.
He stayed at a great temple in Chang’an and upheld the precepts, maintaining remarkable purity.
Frequently he went up into the mountains and down into the valleys to cultivate the practice of meditation.
A headless ghost approached him but Huiwei did not show any sign of surprise or fear on his face.
He said to the ghost, “You have no head.
That means that you never have a headache.
How wonderful!” The ghost disappeared, and then reappeared as a ghost without a torso; he only had arms and legs.
Huiwei again said, “You have no torso.
That means that you never have troubles with any of the five organs.
How pleasurable!” Immediately, the ghost again changed his appearance.
Huiwen sent him away every time, speaking to him in the same manner.
A long while later, it became very cold and started snowing.
A woman came to ask him to let her stay overnight at the place where he was practicing.
Her appearance was attractive and she was wearing a brightly colored dress.
She conducted herself in a pleasing and elegant fashion, saying that she was a heavenly maiden.
She said, “Because you are virtuous the gods sent me to come and amuse you.” She spoke in a manner that was meant to arouse desire and lead Huiwei astray from his original commitment, but Huiwei maintained his integrity and his mind was not disturbed even for a moment.
He then said to her, “My mind is like lifeless ashes.
It cannot get tempted by a bag of skin.” The woman then went away, beyond the clouds.
Looking back, she said, “It is possible to drain the water of the ocean.
It is possible to make Mount Sumeru lean to one side.
But this monk holds fast to his commitment and nothing will affect that.” Later, in the third year of the Long’an period , Huiwei traveled to the west accompanying Faxian.
We do not know where his life came to an end.
This story comes from the Liang gaoseng zhuan, T.2059:396b18–c2.) There was also Shi Xianhu, whose secular surname was Sun.
His place of origin was Liangzhou.
He came to stay at Yanxingsi in Guanghan and practiced meditation on a regular basis.
He was also well informed about monastic discipline and never violated the monastic code even a little.
He died in the fifth year of the Long’an period of the Jin dynasty .
When he was about to die five-colored lights appeared from his mouth and illuminated the temple interior.
He had left instruction that his body be cremated, and his disciples followed this order.
After all the joints of his body had completely burned up, one finger of one hand remained intact.
So his disciples buried the finger at the bottom of his stupa.
This story comes from the Liang gaoseng zhuan, T.2059:396c4–8.) Song Dynasty Cengcheng in Dongguan was the place of origin of two women with the surname Lun, who were the sisters of Shizu.
In the ninth year of the Yuanjia period , the older sister was ten years old and the younger sister was nine.
Their village was remote and the people there were ignorant; no one knew the teachings of the scriptures.
Suddenly, on the eighth day of the second month, both sisters disappeared.
Three days later they returned and asserted that they had seen the Buddha.
On the fifteenth day of the ninth month they again disappeared.
After ten days they returned, speaking a foreign language.
They recited Buddhist scriptures and other books in Sanskrit.
When they encountered a monk from Central Asia they could communicate freely with him right away.
On the fifteenth day of the first month of the following year they again went away.
People who were working in the fields said that they saw them rise up into the sky with a gust of wind.
Their parents, fearful, wailed loudly and offered sacrifices to the gods, asking for good fortune.
After a month the sisters returned.
They had shaved their heads and become nuns.
They were clothed in nuns’ robes and held the hair that had been shorn from their heads in their hands.
They told the following story: “We saw the Buddha and some nuns.
They said, ‘Because of your karmic conditions from previous lives, you will be our disciples.’ The Buddha raised his hand and rubbed the hair on our heads and the hair then fell off.
The Buddha gave us our religious names.
The older one is called Fayuan and the younger Facai.
When we were about to be sent back, the Buddha said, ‘You should build a temple.
I will give you the scriptural teaching.’” After they returned home the women destroyed the spirit altar and raised a hut as a temple.
During the night they recited the scriptures.
Every evening a five-colored light was seen floating around the mountain peaks, like so many lamps.
The two women said, “From now on our deportment will be elegant and our use of speech correct.
Even the customs of the capital city will not be superior to our manners.” The prefect Wei Lang went to the village and offered his goodwill and material support .
When he heard the people in the village talking about them, he was truly amazed and marveled at what they said.
Because of these events the people in the village in a valley honored the Buddha’s teaching.
This story comes from the Mingxiang ji.) Wei Dynasty The family background of the monk Shi Tanluan of Xuanzhongsi in the Shibiku valley in Xihe is unknown, but the family was originally from Yamen.
The family’s residence was near Mount Wutai and people in the area enjoyed hearing stories of miracles and strange events.
Tanluan had a chronic disease and went around seeking treatment.
Coming to a ruin at Qinling in Fenquan, he went into the deserted city and looked upward above the eastern gate.
There were blue clouds and suddenly he saw the Gate of Heaven open.
Tanluan clearly saw the officials occupying the courtly ranks in the six heavens of the realm of desire, those of higher rank overshadowing those of lower rank in an orderly fashion.
Because of this his illness was cured.
Later, Tanluan visited Tao ’s hermitage in Jiangnan .
He was seeking the immortals’ techniques, which he hoped would prolong his life.
When he came to the mountain Tao welcomed him in delight, and gave him a work in ten fascicles describing the immortals’ techniques.
On his way back home Tanluan came to the Zhejiang River, where a deity called the Master of Baolang Zi lived.
When a drum was struck the high waves would last for seven days.
Tanluan encountered high waves and could not cross the river.
He then went to the shrine of this deity, explaining his situation, and he prayed to the deity, promising him that if he responded to his request he would raise another shrine there.
Immediately the deity manifested his body, which looked as if it was twenty zhang tall.
The deity approached Tanluan and said, “If you want to cross , you should do so tomorrow morning. I hope you will not renege on your promise.” In the morning the waves were still quite rough and high, sounding as if they were driven by angry drumbeats.
As soon as Tanluan entered the boat the water became quiet and peaceful.
Thus he was able to cross to the other side.
The emperor of the Liang dynasty thought highly of him, and therefore ordered a shrine to be built for the deity of the Jiang River .
Tanluan later left the emperor’s palace and came to the border of the northern state of Wei.
He was hoping to visit famous mountains to learn about new techniques for cultivation.
When he came to Luoyang he met the Tripiṭaka master Bodhiruci.
Tanluan said to him, “Buddhism contains many instructions for prolonging life and achieving immortality. Are these superior to the teaching of the immortals’ scriptures in this land?” Bodhiruci spat on the ground and said, “What kind of nonsense is this?
The two teachings are not comparable.
Where in this land is a teaching that prolongs life and achieves immortality?
Even if you could prolong life would it be very long before you died and ended up circulating in the three realms of existence?” Bodhiruci then gave Tanluan the Sutra on Contemplation , saying, “This is the technique of the Great Sage.
If you follow this in your cultivation you are bound to achieve liberation from the cycle of life and death that repeats for eternity.” Later Tanluan moved to Xuanzhongsi, a temple carved into the rock wall of Mount Beishan in Fenzhou.
Singlemindedly he followed the teaching of , cultivating the Pure Land practice.
When he was sixty-seven, on the day his life was to come to an end, flags, flowers, banners, and umbrellas appeared high above the temple building.
Fragrance filled the air and loud music was heard.
Everyone who was ascending the mountain to the temple witnessed this.
In the fourth year of the Xinghe period of the Wei dynasty, Tanluan died at the mountain temple on Mount Pingyao.
He was sixty-seven years old.
This story comes from the gao seng zhuan, T.2060:470a13–c6.) Wei Dynasty The personal name of Chuan Xianchao, a retainer in the Qibei Commandery, was Yiqi.
During the Jiaping period , while spending the night alone, he dreamed of a heavenly maiden who came and followed him.
She described herself as a jade woman of heaven.
She was originally from the Eastern Commandary .
Her name was Chenggong Zhi qiong.
She had lost both parents as a child.
The Ruler of Heaven pitied her for the pain she suffered living alone, and issued an order to allow her to descend to the human world and marry a husband there.
Chuan Yiqi’s dream mentioned above was the consequence.
Yiqi’s soul was alerted to her presence, and was delighted by her extraordinarily beautiful appearance.
When Yiqi awoke from the dream he kept thinking about the jade woman reverently.
Sometimes she seemed to be there, and other times she was absent.
This continued for three or four evenings.
Then she manifested more solidly, arriving in a carriage and attended by eight maidservants.
She was dressed in lace and embroidered silk, and her face and body were those of the flying immortals.
She said that she was seventy years old but her appearance was that of a fifteenor sixteen-year-old girl.
On the carriage was a barrel of wine, clear and white, and there were five kinds of utensils made of vaiḍūrya jewels.
Extraordinary food and drink were provided and they brought the wine down and started eating.
Yiqi joined in the feast.
The woman said to Yiqi, “I am a heavenly jade woman.
I was sent down to be married, and that is why I am here to accompany you.
Is this not a proof of your great virtue?
If the cosmic fortunes dictate that I spend the night , we shall become husband and wife.
Even if no benefits result from this there will be no harm, either.
However, in moving here and there, I must ride in a carriage or on a well-nourished horse; my food and drink must be of exotic kinds, sent from distant places; plain or patterned silk material must always be provided in plenty. And because I am a goddess I cannot bear a child for you.
My nature is not at all jealous, however.
It is alright if you fulfill the worldly obligations of marrying and having a human family elsewhere.” In the end Yiqi and the deity became husband and wife.
She presented a poem to him:
Fluttering up and down, and suddenly going up, I speak. I play with my fellow deities among cliffs of clouds piled up, one upon the other.
Flowers of miraculous grass do not require watering.
Supreme virtue appears at the appointed time.
Would an immortal descend for no purpose?
Immortals arrive in response to cosmic fortunes.
If you accept me as your wife, I will bring prosperity to the five groups of relatives.
If you send me away calamities will follow.
This is the outline of the poem.
The original text of the poem contains over two hundred words and cannot be reproduced here in full.
She also wrote a commentary on the Book of Changes, a work in seven fascicles, and predicted auspicious and inauspicious fortunes.
Yiqi always made use of her predictions.
Seven or eight years after they became husband and wife, Yiqi’s parents arranged for him to marry an ordinary wife. After that, the heavenly woman avoided him during the daytime and appeared at night to sleep in his house.
She would arrive in the evening and depart early in the morning.
She would appear and disappear suddenly, as if she were flying around.
Only Yiqi saw her; others could not see her.
If Yiqi was in a dark room with her human voices could be heard.
Such traces of her presence were frequently found, yet no one else could see her body.
Later people became suspicious and asked him about these events.
So, Yiqi told them about his situation.
Then the jade woman requested his permission to leave, saying, “I am a deity.
Though I have been with you, I do not wish to be seen by others.
You are by nature careless and sloppy, and have told others about our relationship over the years.
Our love is strong, and once we are separated we will certainly feel miserable and resentful. But this turn of events prevents us from prolonging this relationship.
Each of us must do our best.” She called her attendants to bring wine and food.
She wrote a Daoist register, made two layers of clothes from a piece of silk cloth, and presented these to Yiqi.
She also offered a poem:
Taking your arm, I take leave of you; shedding tears I depart on an aimless journey.
In numinous quietude I climb onto the carriage, which leaves quickly, as if it is flying.
After , Yiqi fell into a deep depression that lasted for days and took him to the verge of a nervous breakdown.
Later, he happened to be on a road on Mount Yu in Qibei.
He was traveling westward and, looking far ahead, he saw a horse-drawn carriage on a winding road. The person on the carriage looked like the jade woman, Zhiqiong.
He ran to the front of the carriage.
Indeed, she was the jade woman.
So he opened the cover over the carriage and the two saw each other.
At first they were overwhelmed with emotion but then they were happy.
Helping each other back into the carriage, they sat closely together and rode the carriage to Luoyang.
There they established a household and lived together just as they had before.
She was still alive during the Taikang period , but she no longer came and went everyday.
Only on the third day of the third month, the fifth day of the fifth month, the seventh day of the seventh month, the ninth day of the ninth month, and the first and fifteenth days in the same month does she come down to see him and, after spending the night, she returns .
Zhang Mosheng composed a poem about the divine woman .
Liang Dynasty The secular surname of the monk Shi Huishao of Longyuansi in the Shu Commandery was Chen. His original registration was in Taiqiu in Yingquan.
When he was a small boy he wanted to know a great deal, and he was remarkably more intelligent than his peers.
When he was fifty-four years old he died in the Moheyan Hall of the temple in which he was based.
At that time there was a citizen of Chengdu called Ying Shifeng, a wise person.
He became ill and lost consciousness but his body around his heart remained warm.
After five days he regained consciousness and told the following story.
He had been taken to King Yama and heard him give verdicts.
He heard Yama say, “Welcome, Dharma Master.” Shortly thereafter, Master arrived. King Yama stepped down from the building and, with palms joined, he bowed to touch his forehead to the master’s feet.
The king did not say a word but prepared a document that had one large character, zheng , on it.
Huishao went outside and sat under a tree at the side of an open road. A young boy appeared and presented a robe placed inside a lacquered willow winnower.
He bade Huishao to put it on.
Ten monks appeared to welcome him.
Shifeng recognized two among them as the meditation masters He and Ci.
There were lines of banners and decorative umbrellas along the sides of the road, and then flew up and went away.
Again, during the night of the day Huishao died, a nun at Anpusi, who had been ill for a long time, lost consciousness.
After regaining consciousness she told the following story. She had accompanied Dharma Master Huishao and five hundred monks, and they had climbed seven jeweled staircases to reach the lecture hall of the heavenly palace.
The ground looked like quartz and the seats were beautifully decorated.
There were also dusters and tables.
Lotus flowers filled the pond.
Huishao sat at his seat and talked for awhile.
After a short while he stood up and ordered those who had come to send him off to return .
There are other extraordinary signs and miracles like these that occurred at Huishao’s death.
On the third day of the seventh month of the second year of the Tianjian period , Huishao died at Longyuansi.
He was fiftyfour years old. This story comes from the Liang gaoseng zhuan; ref.
Tang gaoseng zhuan, T.2060:470c16–471b2.) Introduction, Explanation of the Name, Places Where Human Beings Reside, Karmic Causes, Noble and Humble Beings , The Wealthy and the Poor , and Suffering.
In the realm of human beings their bodies look impressive on the surface, but they commit numerous sins.
Human beings take pleasure in doing wrong things.
The Way of humanity and wisdom has declined and the teaching of love and goodness has disappeared.
Consequently, Cui Shu murdered his lord; Shang Chen killed his father.
Six powers competed with each other; ten thousand states formed aggressive alliances.
All indulge in arrogance; each displays unrestrained licentiousness.
The atmosphere of purity has long disappeared; influences of moral superiority do not prevail.
The three poisons flourish in competition; the ten entanglements contest with each other to issue forth.
The four violent flows of passion spread widely; the five corners that obscure the mind are deeply rooted in mysterious profundity.
Wrong views and ignorance continuously reappear in great profusion.
Consequently, life becomes precarious, like a leaning tree or a city under siege.
The sweet taste of honey in one’s mouth disappears quickly, the vine inside a well does not remain for long.
Under a pine tree on a hill echoes the wailing of a broken man; in a broad street inside many gates voices moaning with sadness are heard.
If all the beings of the human realm now repent—the creatures of “round head and square feet,” which includes superior examples endowed with wisdom and inferior ones that are ignorant, and who live everywhere:
in the western direction as far as Aparagodānīya, in the eastern direction as far as Pūrvavideha, in the north as far as Uttarakuru, and in the south as far as this Jambudvīpa world; some furthermore living in houses under roofs made of wooden boards and with curtains of woven wool, others with their bodies tattooed and with disheveled hair, drinking blood and eating fur, or nesting in caves and holes, polishing their hooves and blackening their teeth, or sleeping on their stomachs and crawling around, floating on Roshui like a hair, or climbing steep mountains with ropes, living in a remote city among barbarians, protected by armor and bearing a spear, or chained in prison; some carrying money on their shoulders or wielding wooden sticks in their hands— if all these beings were to make the vow to cultivate rites and polite conduct, human beings would acquire the virtues of filial piety on the part of those below and loving-kindness on the part of those above; wanton thoughts would cease and licentious desires would come to an end.
The substance of these beings would become as solid as rock and metal; they would soar above other beings just like the sacred mountains Song and Hua.
The eight kinds of suffering would not invade their lives and the nine calamities would have long been removed from them.
According to an explanation in the Posha lun :
Human beings are called by that name because the word means “to stop and cease.” Because beings can “stop and cease” in that realm, which is one of the six realms of existence, it is called the realm of human beings.
What is meant by this is that only in this realm among the six realms, beings can “stop and cease” giving rise to passions and evil disturbances.
In no other realm than that of human beings can beings do this better. That is why the nature of this realm matches the meaning of “stopping and ceasing.” In addition, the pronunciation for the word “human” is the same as that of the word “to bear,” and this points to the fundamental similarity between the meaning of these words.
Because these beings can peacefully “bear” a life that is sometimes at odds with the ways of the world, they are called by this name.
The Lishi apitan lun says:
Why is man called manusha ?
There are eight reasons.
He is intelligent, his conduct is superior, his mind is refined, he has the potential for supreme enlightenment, his wisdom is superior, he is capable of distinguishing the real from the unreal, he is the correct vessel in which the holy Way may be placed, and he is produced from the karmic effects of intelligent wisdom.
For these reasons, man is called manuṣya.
The new Posha lun says:
Question: Why is this realm of rebirth called manuṣya?
Answer: In the past there was a universal monarch called Māndhāta.
He told the people, “Whatever you want to do, you must first think about it, take its measure, and observe.” At that time people did just as the king taught them and whatever they wanted to do, they first thought about it, took its measure, and observed.
In a variety of work requiring skills, they then turned out to be skillful.
That was because they were able to use their minds and think and observe whatever they were doing.
For this reason, human beings are called manuṣya.
According to another view, because they perform to an increasing degree the lower category of subtle deeds of body, speech, and mind, beings are born in that realm and are made to continue their existence there.
For this reason that realm is called that of human beings.
According to yet another view, because they are arrogant, these beings are called human.
It is because none of the beings in the five realms are as arrogant as human beings.
According to still another view, because they are capable of quieting the mind they are called human beings.
It is because none of the beings in the five realms are as capable of quieting the mind as are human beings.
For this reason, it is said in scripture that human beings are superior to gods in three things: they are courageous, they have a good memory, and they can commit themselves to a life of purity.
The new Posha lun says: In the four realms under heaven, human beings live in the four great continents.
They are Jambu, videha, godānīya, and kuru.
Human beings also live in the eight subcontinents.
What are the eight subcontinents?
The continent of kuru has two subordinate continents: Kurava and Kauravā.
The continent of videha has two subordinate continents:
Deha and Suhe .
The continent of godānīya has two subcontinents:
Śāṭha and Uttaramantriṇas.
The continent of Jambu has two subordinate continents: Cāmara and Faluozhemoluo .
In these eight subcontinents people are short in height, just like dwarves in our world.
According to one view, people live only in seven of the subcontinents.
Only demons live in the subcontinent of Cāmara.
According to another view, the eight that are mentioned here are nothing more than alternate names for the four main continents.
This confusion arose because for each of the four continents two alternate names were given.
If we are to follow this interpretation, as mentioned above each of these eight subcontinents has five hundred smaller subordinate continents. Human beings live in some of these smaller continents, non-humans in other, and still others are empty.
Question:
What is the outward appearance of the beings in the human realm like?
Answer:
They stand upright.
Human beings in Jambu have faces that look like a wheeled carriage; human beings in videha have faces that look like a half-moon; human beings in godānīya have faces that look like a full moon; human beings in kuru have faces that look like a square pond.
Question:
What are their languages like?
Answer:
When the world first came into being everyone spoke the holy language .
Later, when beings began taking food and drink, inequalities developed and flattery and deception increased.
Consequently, different languages developed and those who are unable to speak at all also appeared.
The Yebao chabie jing presents four phrases to distinguish the different types of karmic causation:
“Karmic causation that results in physical pleasure but mental suffering” refers to ordinary beings in fortunate external circumstances; “karmic causation that results in mental pleasures but physical suffering” refers to arhats in unfortunate external circumstances; “karmic causation that results in both physical and mental pleasure” refers to arhats in fortunate external circumstances; and “karmic causation that results in both physical and mental suffering” refers to ordinary beings in unfortunate external circumstances.
In all these cases, everyone receives pleasure and suffering through karmic causation.
The Pusazang jing says:
At that time the World-honored One told the elder Xianshou, “The elder should know the following.
As I observed all the sentient beings in the world, they were oppressed by ten situations of suffering.
What are the ten?
They were oppressed by the suffering of birth.
They were oppressed by the suffering of old age.
They were oppressed by the suffering of illness.
They were oppressed by the suffering of death.
They were oppressed by the suffering of sadness.
They were oppressed by the suffering of resentment.
They were oppressed by the very fact of experiencing suffering.
They were oppressed by melancholy.
They were oppressed by the suffering of unbearable pains.
They were subjected to the oppression of the great of pain of repeated birth and death. I saw these ten kinds of suffering oppressing sentient beings.
In order to attain supreme enlightenment and be released from these oppressions, with pure faith I abandoned the household of the Śākya clan and pursued the supreme Way.
Furthermore, Elder , I observed that all sentient beings in the world, for innumerable world ages, commit millions and trillions of faults and are constantly struck by ten kinds of large poisoned arrows.
What were the ten?
They are the poisoned arrow of love, the poisoned arrow of ignorance, the poisoned arrow of desire, poisoned arrow of stupidity, the poisoned arrow of arrogance, the poisoned arrow of biased views, the poisoned arrow of the mistaken view of being, and the poisoned arrow of the mistaken view of nonbeing.
I saw sentient beings struck by these ten kinds of poisoned arrows and sought supreme enlightenment in order to put a stop to these poisoned arrows.
For this reason, with pure faith I abandoned the household of the Śākya clan and pursued the supreme Way.
If we are to speak in terms of the four directions, in the north in Uttarakuru there is no differentiation of noble and humble beings.
The distinction between master and servant is absent there, and that is why there is no differentiation of noble and humble beings.
In the other three directions differentiation of noble and humble beings is always present.
Rulers, ministers, and common people are separated and in great households the masters and servants are distinguished.
Therefore, noble and humble beings form different categories.
Altogether these types can be classified into six groups:
the most noble group among the nobles, referring to such beings as universal monarchs, the middle group among the nobles, referring to kings of small kingdoms, the lowest group among the nobles, referring to many officials, the humblest group among the humble, referring to developmentally challenged children, the middle group among the humble, referring to servants and slaves, and the least extreme group among the humble, referring to princesses and maidservants.
This is a rough and general classification.
To attempt a more detailed, exhaustive classification would be difficult.
If we are to speak in terms of the four directions, the people in the north in Uttarakuru are the wealthiest and have the greatest equality . In the continents in the east and west, some are wealthy and others are poor.
In the south, in Jambudvīpa, people are the most impoverished.
The situations in the continents in the four directions all differ and are described in detail in the scriptures.
Again, in Jambudvīpa, the economic fortunes of people are not fixed.
There are three categories.
The highest category includes such beings as the universal monarch, who governs everywhere in the four directions and rules over the four oceans.
Everything he needs is supplied without fail. The situation of the universal monarch is described in the scriptures.
The universal monarch’s powers, provided for him through the merits of his deeds in previous lives, are the greatest.
When he renounces the householder’s life five miraculous phenomena appear and seven jewels arrive through cosmic response.
The five miraculous phenomena are through cosmic response flowing springs and bathing ponds with calm and clear water appear everywhere in the world; through cosmic response heavenly sweet dew appears in the palace courtyard, and when the monarch drinks the dew his body becomes light and his illnesses are cured; through cosmic response the level of the great sea goes down by the length of one yojana, and roads of golden sand appear everywhere, on which the monarch travels around in the realm under the four heavens; through cosmic response oxhead incense appears on the shores of the ocean; if the king picks it up and burns it the aroma is even stronger, and if he blows on it into the direction of the wind the fragrance reaches far to places forty miles away; if dead people smell this fragrance they come back to life; the kācilindika bird is born in the ocean; if the monarch holds and touches its body he experiences a great sensation of comfort in body and mind, superior to any of the pleasures of the six senses.
The following verse in the Wangsheng lun refers to this bird:
The seven jewels that decorate the Pure Land are like grasses; They are soft and flexible and turn right and left. If anyone touches these he feels extreme pleasure, Greater than that given by the kācilindika bird. has one thousand sons, endowed with seven jewels, courageous and fierce.
The second category of median wealth refers to people like the rulers of small kingdoms.
The third category of wealth, the lowest, refers to Jotika.
There are also three categories of poverty and if you think about it you will be able to determine them for yourself.) In the realm of human beings there is no real pleasure and everything leads to suffering.
Ignorant people think that there is pleasure, but informed people know that everything is suffering.
Deluded views hold that there is pleasure but the view that corresponds to reality holds that everything is suffering.
Therefore the Fu fazang jing says:
Those who are suffering in different ways in the world all wish to obtain pleasure.
But this body is not solid; it rots and is easily destroyed.
Like bubbles, our bodies change and disappear after a moment’s time.
Even a handsome appearance to which people are very attached goes away and cannot be found anywhere anymore when the decline of old age sets in.
Outside our bodies are covered with skin, which is decorative; pus and blood, which are impure, flow within.
Conditioned phenomena are impermanent and in one moment of our life, extremely quickly, they come into being and go out again four hundred times.
These phenomena may be compared to phenomena in the open sky, where clouds gather with thunder and lightning and strong winds blow, yet soon the clouds scatter, the wind ceases, and everything is back to normal again.
The five kinds of desires are unstable, just like the phenomena in the open sky.
People may seek peaceful happiness together, yet given the effects of impermanence who will be left remaining in this state?
The world is filled with many forms of suffering and it is difficult to remain in the world for long.
For this reason, we know that the human body consists only of suffering and impermanence. Reason dictates that we should abhor life and quickly seek liberation.
All conditioned phenomena are nothing but heaps of suffering—they are like a tumor or a latrine, or an arrow that has pierced a human heart.
The wheel of life, old age, sickness, and death turns endlessly.
Impermanence is the law of dissolution and rapid decay.
Like a prisoner facing death, whose life cannot be said to be long-lasting, or a prisoner who has nothing he loves or for which he seeks, or a piece of fruit on the road that people find bitter and throw away, this body is to be reviled. It is bound to be reduced to nothing.
After death crows, magpies, foxes, and wolves rush to eat it; blowing winds and exposure to the sun turn the body into a rotten and smelly lump; the hair and teeth are scattered around in disorderly fashion.
Why should we be attached to a body like this?
We should work diligently on the means of salvation and quickly seek liberation.
Even the wealthy and noble gods are in the end bound to be reduced to nothing; even if they possess an attractive outward appearance inwardly they are in a state of constant despair and sadness.
For this reason, as it is said in the Dazhuangyan lun :
It is like wearing a golden chain; the chain is good but it can be used to bind and tie up a person.
The throne of a king is like this; the king is constantly despondent and fearful.
is thinking about protecting . If he loses it, he is visited by great sorrow.
It is as if we speak of pleasure precisely because food and clothing have been denied to us.
Thoughts of pleasure go out of control in the midst of acute suffering For this reason Piṇḍola spoke in verse to King Udayana : Even though the throne of a king is honored and awesome, Changes in the throne cannot be stopped even for a short while. Quickly, like electric lightning, In a moment it is reduced to decline and disappearance. The throne of a king is endowed with tremendous wealth. Ignorant ones truly yearn for it. But decline and disappearance come in no time, and The suffering of the mighty is greater than that of lowly and humble ones. The king occupies a high throne; His reputation fills the world in all ten directions. Being handsome and attractive, He ornaments his body in a variety of ways. He is like someone who is about to die, Wearing a flowered headdress and necklaces. It will not be long before he gives up his life. The throne of a king is like this. The Buddha said that the example of someone about to die is just like a king:
They are both always afraid. While walking, standing, and sitting down, all the time, Whether they are among familiar people or among strangers, they are always filled with suspicion and fear. Ministers, commoners, and queens and court ladies in the palace, Elephants, horses, and rare jewels, The land that belongs to the kingdom, and everything else, Are all the king’s possessions. Yet when a king is about to give up his life, All abandon him, and not one of any of these things will accompany him.
Again, in the Niepan jing the Buddha says in verse:
In all the worlds, Those who have been born are returned to death. Even if their life span is incalculably long, They are bound in the end to die. Those who prosper are bound to decline. Things that come together will be separated. The vigorous years cannot last for long. A healthy condition will be invaded by illness. Life is swallowed by death. There are no entities that exist permanently. Kings may be free to do anything they want, And their power may be unmatched. Yet everything changes and disappears. Our life span is also like this. The wheel of suffering ceaselessly turns. Beings flow and turn on it without end. All three realms of rebirth are impermanent. There is no happiness in anything that exists. Even though the Way toward salvation must be based on reality, Everything that exists is empty and ultimately nonexistent. Entities that dissolve keep changing. In every instance, these entities eventually decline and become troubled. Fear is worse than any of the other evils. Old age, illness, and death bring distressing decline. In this realm where nothing exists permanently, Destruction and hatred easily enter. Everything is obscured by the passions, In the same way as the silkworm is within its silken cocoon. How could wise ones find happiness in this place? This body is constituted by suffering. Everything is impure. Tied to catastrophes by ropes, our body is just like a tumor. There is nothing good at its very basis. Even superior bodies like those of the gods are also like this. All the objects of our desires are impermanent. Therefore, I do not become attached to them or hunger for them. Leaving desire behind, I direct my thought skillfully, And achieve realization of the truth. Therefore, Honorable Piṇḍola said to the king :
Great king, please observe the matter well.
What objects of the five desires are permanent?
Is there a king’s throne that remains stable for a long time?
Which kingdoms maintain their borders without having the size of their territory reduced?
What rare jewels are free from eventual loss and dispersion?
Which pleasures based on desire are permanent and unchanging?
Which entities come together and do not scatter apart again?
All the objects of the five desires are in their essence nothing but suffering.
They all arise from deluded thought and take shape as “pleasures.” For this reason, even a king’s throne is suffering and there is no peace in it.
The situation is similar to that of the man who saw things in a dream and when he woke up realized that the things of which he dreamed were not real.
For this reason, wise people should feel revulsion toward existence and take leave of it, and then immediately realize that everything, both within and outside of ourselves, changes—all is impermanent.
Even though coarse and fine entities appear to be different, in one moment the difference disappears and the two become the same. For this reason it is said in the Nirvana Sutra (T.374:588b15–19; T.375:
of time appears.
The ten periods are the stages of membrane, foam, froth, lump of flesh, limbs, infant, childhood, youth, adult, and declining old age.
If any of these stages was not impermanent the progression from the membrane stage to the stage of old age and death would not take place.
The ferocious fire of the three poisons burns the mind ceaselessly.
Therefore, we are pained by this suffering. According to the scriptures there are many kinds of human beings.
Details have been given above in the part on the four realms under heaven in the section on the three realms of existence.) Miracle Stories The Chunqiu wei, Yangong tu chapter, says:
Confucius was ten chi tall and nine wei around the middle.
When he was sitting he looked like a squatting dragon; when he stood he looked like a bull pulling weight, and when you went near him, he looked like the lunar stations Mao or Dou. The Wuyue chunqiu says:
Wu Zixu had an audience with King Liao of Wu.
Liao saw from a distance that Wu Zixu’s appearance was extremely fearsome—he was over one zhang and ten wei wide, and the distance between his eyebrows was one foot in length.
King Liao spoke with him for three days and Wu Zixu did not repeat the same words even once. Wu Zixu knew that the king liked him.
Every time he entered the palace to talk to the king, Wu Zixu appeared strong and relaxed; he had an air about him of great courage and fortitude.
The Liang ji says: Guang, styled Shiming, formed alliances with powerful and wise people and provided for the strongmen who attended him.
He was eight chi and four zun tall, his eyes had double pupils, and flesh protruded from his left elbow.
By nature he was grave and careful, while when discussing strategies he was open and relaxed.
He was accessible and prepared to consider a wide range of possibilities.
His contemporaries did not know about him.
Only Wang Meng, when he was still a private citizen, marveled at him, saying, “This man is an extraordinary person.” The Hetu wei, Yuban chapter, says:
If you go ninety thousand li to the north of Mount Kunlun, you reach the kingdom of Longbo.
The human beings who live there are thirty zhang tall.
They live for eighteen thousand years before they die.
If you go eastward from Mount Kunlun, you reach the kingdom of Great Qin.
The human beings there are ten zhang tall.
From there if you go one hundred thousand miles to the east, you reach the kingdom of Tiao.
The human beings there are three zhang and five chi tall.
From there, if you go one hundred thousand miles to the east, you reach the kingdom of Zhongqin.
The human beings there are one zhang tall.
The Hetu wei, Longyu chapter, says:
At each of the eastern, western, southern, and northern poles of heaven there are soldiers with copper and iron foreheads.
They are thirty million zhang tall, and there are three trillion of them.
At each of the eastern, western, southern, and northern poles of heaven there are diamond warriors who do not fear death.
They are thirty million zhang tall, and there are three trillion of them.
In the City of Great Peace in the middle of heaven, there are armed soldiers who are steel-faced ghosts that eat everything.
They are thirty million zhang tall, and there are three trillion of them.
The Wuxing zhuan, Hongfan, says:
At the time of the First Emperor of Qin, giants appeared.
They were five zhang tall and their footprints were six chi in diameter. The barbarian tribes were subjugated by them. They were seen in the sky above Lintao.
The people of Qin said, “We should not let them prevail among the barbarians; that will cause calamities.” The Weizhi says, “People in the Indian kingdom are all one zhang and eight chi tall.
Men and women in the kingdom of Cheli are both eight chi tall.” The Weizhi also says:
In the second year of the Xianxi period in Xiangwu, an oracular statement appeared:
“A large human being will appear.
He will be over three zhang tall, and his footprints will be three chi and two zun in diameter.
White-haired, he will wear a single layer of yellow clothing and a yellow hat.
He will raise his staff and call to the people.” The king began to say, “The Age of Great Peace is upon us now.” The Shenyi jing says:
There is an unusual kind of human being who lives in the southeast direction.
These beings travel everywhere under heaven.
They are seven chi tall, and they are measure the same around the middle.
The hair on their heads is disheveled and they do not take regular food or drink.
In the morning they swallow three thousand evil ghosts and three hundred in the evening.
They simply swallow them, they do not chew.
The ghosts are the food of these beings and mist and dew are their drink.
They are called Tianguo; they are also called Shixie . They are also called Huangfu .
The Huangfu ghosts people talk about today are named after these beings.) The Shenyi jing says:
There is an unusual kind of human being who lives beyond the ocean in the northwest direction.
They are two thousand li tall, and the distance between their two legs is one thousand miles.
The measurement around their abdomens is one thousand six hundred miles.
They only drink two and half sheng of wine , and they do not eat the five kinds of grain or meat.
When hungry they raise their faces toward heaven and then they feel satiated.
They love to roam around the mountains and oceans.
They do not commit violence on common people, nor do they harm any of the ten thousand things in the universe.
They form one living organism with heaven and earth.
They are called “people of no roads” (Note:
The reason for the expression “no road” is that they do not consider high rank or great reputation as their way.) They are also called “humanity” . In ceremonies they are called “people of humanity.”) Another name is “trustworthiness.” .
Another name  is “spirits.” (Note: They live as one organism with heaven and earth and never die.
That is why they are called “spirits.”) The Shuwang benji says, “During the reign of Prince Xiang of Qin, there was a man of Xiangchang in the Dangqu Commandery who was twenty-five zhang and six chi tall.” The Waiguo tu says, “Human beings who live in the kingdom of Great Qin are over one zhang and five chi tall.
They have long arms and are very skillful at riding camels.” The Shi wei, Hanshenwu chapter, says, “At the northeastern pole there live human beings who are nine cun tall.” The Guoyü
says, “Confucius said, ‘People of the kingdom of Jiaoyao are three chi tall.
They are the shortest people.’” The Xiyu zhuan, Weilue, says:
The kingdom of dwarves is located to the northwest of Kangju .
Both the men and women there are three chi tall and they are very numerous.
According to the local tradition in Kangju, a merchant once lost his way and arrived at this kingdom.
There were many pearls and fluorescent jewels in the kingdom.
After crossing this kingdom the merchant traveled more than ten thousand miles before he arrived at Kangju.
The Weilue says:
In southern Japan there is a kingdom of dwarves.
Human beings there are three or four chi tall.
This kingdom is located over four thousand li away from the kingdom of the female ruler.
The Waiguo tu says: The people of Jiaoyao are one chi and six cun tall.
When a headwind blows toward them they lean backward; when a tailwind blows over them they lean forward.
They have all the usual facial features, like eyes and eyebrows.
They only sleep outdoors.
According to one source,  Jiaoyao are three chi tall.
In their kingdom grasses and trees die in summer and come back to life in winter.
The kingdom is located thirty thousand li from Mount Jiuyi.
The Liezi says:
Forty thousand miles eastward from the central continent of China lies the kingdom of Jiaoyao.
People there are one chi and five cun tall. At the northeastern pole live the people called Jingren, who are nine inches tall.
In the twenty-sixth year of the First Emperor of Qin, giants over thirtytwo feet in height appeared.
Their footprints were six feet in diameter. All the barbarian tribes bowed down before them.
Twelve of these people appeared at Lintao.
Confucius said, “People of the kingdom of Jiaoyao are three feet tall.
They are the shortest people.” Even the tallest human beings are not taller than ten feet.
Ten is the highest of numbers.
Now we hear about human beings who are five zhang tall.
These must be exceptions. In this year the Qin kingdom for the first time annexed the six states.
They were happy and regarded the appearance of the giants as an auspicious sign. They smelted metal and produced twelve images of them.
They established fortresses in the Five Peaks in the south and constructed the Great Wall in the north.
The wall went through Lintao in the west and reached Liao dong, spanning a distance of several thousand miles.
This is why the giants first appeared at Lintao: they indicated the place where troubles would first occur.
Twelve years later, the rule of Qin came to an end.
In the fourth year after Wang Mang established his state , shadows of dwarves, only a little more than one chi tall, were observed at Chiyang.
Some of these dwarves were riding on a carriage and others were walking on foot; they were handling numerous things, large and small.
They themselves said that this event would end in three days.
According to the Guanzi, in the marsh that had been dried up for hundreds of years, in an impassable valley where water wells up incessantly, the water monsters called qingji are born.
The qingji have an appearance like that of human beings.
They are four zun tall, wear yellow clothes and yellow headdresses. Carrying yellow umbrellas, they ride on small horses and are skillful horsemen, galloping around everywhere.
If you call them by their name, even if they happen to be one thousand li away, they respond immediately.
Thus, the shadows observed at Chiyang might well have been the qingji.
Also, according to the same work, in a small pond that has long been dried up live frog spirits.
The frog spirits have one head and two bodies; their appearance is like that of a snake.
They are eight feet long.
If you call one by its name you can use it to catch fish and turtles.
These two stories are found in the Sousheng ji.) Introduction, Explanation of the Name, Dwelling Places, Karmic Causes , Attendants, Food and Clothing, and Battles. We shall now discuss the realm of the asura demons.
Those born in this realm in their pathological thought always suspect that they are not being treated the same as others; some organize rebellions and engage in battles; they also lead troops to do battle with and conquer each other.
They are tall and large in appearance but always look tired and hungry.
Their bodies are rough and coarse and they are always angry.
Standing tall, they are fearsome; accompanied by others who are equally tall they take people by surprise.
All have three heads and eight arms that protrude from their bodies in layers.
Striding over mountains and walking upon the ocean, they grasp the sun and hold the clouds up high.
In heaven they seek banquets and they ferment wine in the ocean.
Such beings all take refuge in the Three Jewels.
Particularly, the asura kings Śambara and others, the attendants of Vemacitra, the peers of Khara skandha, and furthermore the retinues of Bali and his brother Rāhu, or the like-minded Śācī and Batuo —they all vow to get rid of their arrogance and practice to remove their tendency toward flattery.
Their palace halls are illuminated, with rich and luxurious carpets of orchid flowers everywhere.
When a ceasefire is declared and warfare ceases their anger disappears and greed does not arise.
The suffering from double-edged swords is no more; the pain, continuous like a lotus root thread, is forever eliminated.
Happily listening to the right Dharma and thirstily looking up to the Great Vehicle, they give up their tired and ugly bodies and accept a handsome form; they protect the state’s borders, as well as the state and the ruling house.
Building the city of Dharma, they contribute to the cause of wisdom’s sun. Why are these creatures called “demons” ?
According to the Lishi apitan lun :
Demons are unable to tolerate good deeds nor can they repent of their infractions.
Even when they listen to various teachings their minds are unmoved.
Because they are arrogant they are not good young men, but because they are not gods either they are called demons.
The name axiulo is given in other scriptures as axulun.
Now, according to the new Posha lun :
In the Sanskrit text the correct sound is given as suluo.
Suluo means “gods.” Because these creatures are not gods, however, they are called asuluo Furthermore, suluo also means “handsome.” Because these creatures are not handsome they are called asuluo.
The Chang ahan jing says:
demons give birth to handsome girls and ugly boys.
For this reason, they are called “not handsome.” Sometimes they are called “not drinking.” There are two interpretations of the significance of this name.
According to the first, these creatures upheld the precept of not drinking in their past lives, and because of the karmic effect of this conduct they are called “not drinking.” According to the second interpretation, they originally were very fond of wine.
In the realm under the four heavens they gathered flowers and scattered them over the ocean in order to ferment the seawater into wine. This did not work, however, and the water of the ocean turned into saltwater.
Because they could not obtain wine they were forced to abandon wine completely.
Therefore, they are called deities that do not drink wine.
The Posha lun says:
Some say that demons belong to the realm of the gods, but because their minds are crooked they are not firmly established as gods.
Some say they belong to the realm of hungry ghosts .
As illustrated by the fact that the god Śakra’s consort Śācī was an asura demon, however, they are able to mate with gods.
Therefore, the Gāthā-sūtra says that some of the demons are ghosts, some animals, and some gods.
The Zhengfanian jing says “Some are ghosts and some animals.” Some say that are inferior gods.
The designation “inferior god” applies to Vemacitra.
The name Vemacitra means “loud sounds”; it also means “cave-dweller.” When a loud sound is heard at the bottom of the great ocean he shouts “I am Vemacitra.” For this reason, he is called “loud sounds.” He lives in a cave in the ocean.
Therefore, he is called “cave-dweller.” The Zhengfanian jing says:
demons live in five locations.
The first location is on the earth in the middle of a mountain range.
The demons who live there are the weakest.
The second location is to the north of Mount Sumeru.
If you go into the ocean for a distance of twenty-one thousand yojanas there is a place where a demon lives.
His name is Rāhu and this monster rules over a host of an infinite number of demons.
If you go another three times the distance of twenty-one thousand yojanas you reach a place where another demon lives.
His name is Yongjian.
If you go another four times the distance of twenty-one thousand yojanas, there is a place where another demon lives.
His name is Huaman .
If you go further twice the distance of twenty-one thousand yojanas, you come to a place where yet another demon lives.
His name is Vemacitra.
The voice of this demon goes through the ocean and is heard outside of the ocean.
He says, “I am the demon Vemacitra.” For this reason this demon is called Loud Sounds.
As for the mother of Vemacitra, the Chang ahan jing (ref. Guanfo sanmei hai jing, T.643:646c14–647a18) says:
At the very beginning of the world age the god Guangyin  went into the ocean to wash his body.
A water spirit entered his body and planted one egg.
After eight thousand years a girl was born.
Her body was shaped like Mount Sumeru.
She had nine hundred and ninetynine heads and each head had one thousand eyes.
There were nine hundred and ninety-nine separate mouths, and each mouth had four tusks.
At the end of each tusk was a flame that looked like thunder and lightning.
There were twenty-four legs and nine hundred and ninety-nine hands.
At one time this girl was bathing and playing in the ocean. A water spirit entered her body and planted an egg.
Again, after eight thousand years Veracitra was born.
He had nine heads and each head had one thousand eyes.
Water was constantly coming out of his mouth.
He had nine hundred and ninetynine hands and only six legs.
A female gandharva gave birth to Śācīrāhu, who was chosen by the god Indra as his consort.
The asura demon Rāhu is also called Zhangriyue ; he stands at the front of Indra’s army and directs the light of the sun toward the asura demons, blinding them so that they do not see the army of gods approaching.
Therefore the asura demons hold their hands up to block the rays of the sun.
They are powerful and fight with the gods frequently.
The new Posha lun says:
Question:
To where do the asuras retire?
According to one view, inside Mount Sumeru is a vacant space.
The mountain thus resembles a treasure bowl that has been placed upside down.
Inside this empty space is a city, and that where the asuras live.
Question:
According to a scripture, an asura said, “The ocean in which we live has the same uniform salty taste.” If the village where they live is located within the salty ocean, how could the asura king live inside a mountain?
According to one view, on top of the golden wheel inside the salty ocean is a large golden platform, five hundred yojanas in both height and width.
There is a city on top of the platform, and that is where the asura king lives.
The asura king also has four gardens; the first is called Auspicious Happiness, the second Delight and Joy, the third Utmost Joy, and the fourth Attractive.
Just as in the Heaven of the Thirty-Three Gods there is the pārijātaka tree, so too in the asura king’s residence there is also a tree. Question:
What do the asura demons look like?
Answer: They stand upright.
Question: What is their language?
Answer: They all speak the holy language . Question: To which of the six realms of rebirth do they belong?
Answer:
According to one view, they belong to the realm of the gods; according to another they belong to the realm of the hungry ghosts.
The Qishi jing says:
One thousand yojanas beyond Mount Sumeru to the east and under the ocean is the land of the asura king Vemacitra. The living space is eighty thousand yojanas in width and depth.
It is surrounded by seven balustrades and seven layers of gold and silver nets with bells.
Outside there are seven lines of tāla trees.
All these are made of seven jewels.
They are decorated elaborately in a manner that cannot be described completely.
Inside the big city is a palace standing by itself, called Shemopoti.
The palace is ten thousand yojanas in width and depth, and is surrounded by seven walls, all of which are made of seven jewels.
The walls are one hundred yojanas tall and fifty yojanas wide.
Inside the garden are ponds, flowers, and fruit, and birds singing harmoniously. More complete descriptions are found in the original passage in the scripture; details have been abbreviated here).
One thousand yojanas beyond Mount Sumeru to the south and under the ocean is the palace of the asura king Yongyue.
His palace is eighty thousand yojanas in width and depth.
One thousand yojanas beyond Mount Sumeru to the west and under the ocean is the palace of the asura king Śambara. His palace is eighty thousand yojanas in width and depth.
One thousand yojanas beyond Mount Sumeru to the north and under the ocean is the palace of the asura king Rāhu.
His palace is eighty thousand yojanas in width and depth The city of Mopodi is where the king lived.
The asura king Rāhu held meetings at a palace, which was also called Seven Heads.
This palace was eighty thousand yojanas in width and depth, and was surrounded by seven walls and seven layers of balustrades.
These were made of seven jewels.
On all four sides, to the left and close by, innumerable numbers of minor asura demons are gathered. Details cannot be given exhaustively here. They are explained in the sutra.) The Yebao chabie jing says:
The ten deeds that lead to rebirth as an asura demon are:
minor evil conduct of the body, minor evil conduct of speech, minor evil conduct of thought, giving rise to the arrogance that despises others, giving rise to the arrogance that assumes that one’s own body and mind are permanent, giving rise to the arrogance of falsely claiming that one has attained enlightenment, giving rise to great arrogance, giving rise to the arrogance of falsely claiming to have virtue, giving rise to the arrogance of claiming to be superior to those who actually are superior to oneself, and directing the karmic effects of all good deeds to rebirth in the realm of the asura demons.
The Zhengfanian jing (ref.
T.721:108c7–109a16; 109b11–113a9; 113c25– causes for rebirth as an asura demon.
This work appears to summarize the teachings of other scriptures.
For the most part we attain rebirth in the asura realm through three kinds of causes: anger, arrogance, and doubt.
The Za ahan jing says:
In a previous life an asura demon was once a poor man, who lived near a riverbank.
He regularly crossed the river to collect firewood.
At one time the river water became very deep and the current very fast and strong.
Several times the man was carried away by the water and almost lost his life.
At that time a pratyekabuddha visited the house and begged for food. The people of the house were delighted and gave food to him.
After eating the food, the pratyekabuddha flew into the sky and went away.
When the poor man saw this, he was led to make a vow:
“In my later rebirth I vow to obtain a body so large that the deepest waters will not come above my knees.” Because of this development, the asura obtained an extraordinarily large body.
The waters of the four oceans do not reach above his knees.
If he stands up in the ocean, his body rises higher than the summit of Mount Sumeru.
He can let his hand rest on top of that mountain and look down on the Heaven of the Thirty-three Gods.
The Zhengfanian jing says:
The first king of the asura demons, Rāhu, has four jade women, who had been born from memories: Shadowlike, Fragrances, Beautiful Forest, and Superior Virtue.
Each of these ladies was attended by twelve million maidens.
They all attend the king of the asura demons and entertain themselves together.
They indulge in sense pleasures freely in ways that cannot be described in detail.
The second king is called Yongjian, more powerful than the first king.
The third king is called Huaman , and is even more powerful than the second.
The fourth king is called Vemacitra.
His power and the number of his attendants are many times greater than that of the third, beyond calculation.
As for the other ministers, court ladies, and various servants, their numbers too are incalculable.
For this reason, we know that the gap between noble and humble asura kings is very wide, and they cannot be discussed in a uniform manner .
The Zhengfanian jing says:
The food and clothing of the asura demons appear spontaneously by themselves.
The garlands of their crowns and their clothing are all made of seven jewels, and are just as fresh and clean as those of the gods.
The food they eat appears just when they think of them, and all are as variously delicious as the gods’ foods. The Dazhidu lun says:
The food and clothing are superior to those of human beings.
When the food is actually eaten, however, it is no longer as good as human beings’ food.
In other words, when the asura demons eat their food, the last mouthful turns into blue-green mud, like the food of a dragon king.
This food is varied and delicious with a hundred flavors, but when the king actually eats the food the last mouthful turns into a toad.
For this reason the scripture says that an asura king’s food is not as good as that of human beings.
The Zengyi ahan jing says:
At that time the Buddha said to the monks, “No being has been given a larger body than the king of the asura demons.
Its height and width are eighty-four thousand yojanas.
Its mouth is one thousand yojanas in width and height.
When was about to touch the sun, his body doubled in size to one hundred and sixty thousand yojanas.
When he appeared before the sun and moon, the kings of the sun and moon both became afraid and were no longer at peace in their places.
This was because the body of the asura king was so fearful .
The kings of the sun and moon were frightened and their light disappeared.
“However, the asura demon did not dare go forward to seize the sun and moon.
This was because the sun and moon are endowed with great supernatural powers.
Their life spans are extremely long and in appearance they are most handsome.
They enjoy pleasures endlessly. is the period of one world age .
Furthermore, the beings in this world came to rescue .
Consequently, the sun and moon were beyond the reach of the asura demon.
The asura demon then became distressed and disappeared into its own place.” The Chang ahan jing says:
The asura demon is very powerful and says to himself, “These gods of the Heaven of Thirty-Three Gods and the gods of the sun and moon move above my head.
I vow to seize them and turn them into earrings.” He became more and more angry and wanted to strike them.
So he ordered the two asura kings Śambara and Vemacitra and their ministers to make preparations to engage in battle with the gods.
At this time the two dragons Nanda and Upananda encircled Mount Sumeru seven times with their long bodies.
The mountain moved and was covered by clouds.
When they hit the surface of the great ocean with their tails, the waves covered Mount Sumeru.
The gods of the Heaven of Thirty-Three Gods said, “The asuras are about to begin a battle.” Many dragons and supernatural beings, holding weapons, went into battle, one after the other.
The outcome of the battle went against them and they all fled.
In front of the palace of the god of the four heavens they armed their vehicles to engage in combat.
The god of the four heavens first reported the situation to the god Indra , who in turn reported to higher deities, up to the deity of the highest heaven of the realm of desire.
Numerous gods as well as dragons and other supernatural beings surrounded them.
Indra gave the command, saying, “If our army turns out to be victorious, bind the asura Vemacitra with five bonds and bring him to the Hall of Good Dharma.
I would like to have a look at him.” The asura demon also said, “If our army turns out to be victorious, bind Indra with five bonds and bring him to the Hall of Seven Leaves.
I would like to have a look at him.” The great battle began immediately but neither was injured.
Only their bodies touched each other, which caused them both great pain.
Then Indra manifested a body that had one thousand eyes, holding a vajra that emitted smoke and fire.
When the asura demon saw this, he retreated in defeat.
The gods then captured Vemacitra and brought him back to Indra .
Seeing him from a distance Vemacitra abused Indra.
Indra responded, “I would like to discuss morality with you.
Do not abuse me.
The life span in heaven is one thousand years; a few live longer and most do not live that long.
With your evil intentions you fight well in battle.
Furthermore, you have violated the precepts.
Yet even though you are unreliable in speech, because you have given generously for spiritual purposes you have been reborn in this form. According to another scripture, the asura had been reborn in that form because even though he had not been straightforward in thought he had indeed cultivated meritorious deeds.) The Guanfo sanmei jing says:
As for the king of asuras, Vemacitra, whose mother eats ghosts, eats only by chewing mud and lotus roots.
When this demon grew up he saw that the gods were attended by maidservants.
He said to his mother, “Everyone has a consort.
Why am I the only one who is alone?” His mother replied, “In Fragrant Hill lives a supernatural being called a gandharva.
That supernatural being has a beautiful daughter, is as white as white jade.
Beautiful music can be heard coming from all the pores on her body.
It would please me greatly for you to have her as your wife.
Do you want her?” The asura demon said, “Good, good.
I would like you to go there and ask for her.” The mother then went to Fragrant Hill and said to the god of music , “I have a son who is so powerful that he is free to do anything .
There is no other being in the realm under the four heavens as powerful as he.
You have a good daughter. You should let my son marry her.” When the daughter heard about this proposal, she wished to happily return with the mother and marry her son.
Not long after the asura demon married the girl she became pregnant, and after eight thousand years she gave birth to a baby girl.
The child was exceptionally beautiful; there was no one comparable to her either in heaven or in the realm under heaven.
She had eight thousand four hundred attractive facial expressions and she could strike eight thousand four hundred attractive poses, both to the right and to the left, and likewise on the front and back sides .
When the asura demon saw her he thought that she was extraordinary.
It was as if the moon had taken the place of the stars.
She was indeed quite remarkable.
Kauśika  heard about her and requested her as his wife.
The asura demon was delighted and gave her to him to be his wife.
Kauśika became the god Indra and called his wife Yueyi.
All the gods who saw her marveled at her beauty, exclaiming that such beauty had never before existed.
When they looked at her to the east, they forgot all about the western direction; when they saw her to the south, they forgot about everything in the northern direction.
Every one of her features, including the hair on her head, gave pleasure.
Indra was very fond of his garden and bathed in the pond there with a number of maidservants.
Yueyi became jealous and sent five yakṣa demons to her father, saying, “Now Indra does not bestow love on me; he only plays with maidservants.” When her father heard these words, he became very angry.
Mobilizing the four kinds of troops , he attacked Indra . There in the midst of the great ocean, sitting atop Mount Sumeru, with his ninety-nine hands he attacked the city in the Heaven of the Thirty-three Gods and caused Mount Sumeru to move.
The waters of the four great oceans made huge waves.
Indra was taken by surprise and did not know where to go.
At that time a supernatural being told the god, “Do not be greatly frightened.
In the past the Buddha preached the Perfection of Wisdom Sutra.
The king recited the scripture over and over again and the army of ghosts was crushed by itself.
Then Indra sat in the Hall of Good Dharma, burned many famous types of incense, and made a great vow:
“The Perfection of Wisdom Sutra is a great spell.
It is the supreme spell.
It is an incomparably wonderful spell.
It is truly effective.
I uphold this teaching and will realize the Buddha’s Way in order to make the asura demons flee without any effort on my part.” When he said these words a wheel of swords appeared in the sky.
This was due to Indra’s merit.
Spontaneously the wheel began to come down right on top of the asura demon, severing its ears, nose, arms, and legs, which then fell into the water of the great ocean. They looked red, like a pearl in a clam.
The asura demon was amazed and frightened.
Not knowing where to flee, he scrambled about and crawled into a lotus filament.
Miracle Stories The Xiguo zhuan says:
In a rocky valley to the south west of the kingdom of Campa in Central India there is a cave of asura demons.
A man was traveling around the mountains, engaged in religious practice, and came across this cave by accident.
He then went inside the cave and saw the palace of the asura demons.
It was marvelously beautiful, almost like the palace of the gods in heaven.
The pond in the garden and the forest of fruit trees cannot be described fully in detail.
When the asura demons saw the unexpected arrival of the man , they said, “Can you stay here for long?” The man answered, “I wish to return home.” When the asura demons saw that he did not wish to stay they gave him a peach, and when the man had finished eating it the asura demons said, “You should get out quickly.
I am afraid your body is growing larger and the cave will not be big enough to contain it.” As soon as the demons finished saying this, the man ran to escape.
He grew taller and his body became rough and large.
He managed to get his head out of the cave but his body had become so large that became stuck in the cave and in the end he could not get out.
Several hundred years have passed since then.
Only the man’s head can be seen from the outside, and it resembles three large jars.
When people see it they tell this story to each other.
Taking pity on him, one man offered, “We can carve the rock to let you get out.
How about that?” The head answered, “I would be grateful.” The man then reported this in detail to the ruler of the kingdom.
The ruler consulted his ministers, who said, “This extraordinary man must be so strong that he alone could fight against a thousand soldiers.
If we were to carve away the rock and let him get out but then something unexpected happens, no one could control him.” So they left the large man stuck in the rock cave as before.
People at that time called him the Large-headed Sage.
An emissary from the Chinese kingdom of Tang, Wang Xuance, went to that place three times, and spoke to the man, patting the large head .
He could clearly understand what the head said.
Recently there was a forest fire on the mountain and the head was burned black. Yet the man with the large burned head is still alive.
The Record of the Western Regions was compiled in sixty fascicles as a national project and submitted to the throne.
By imperial edict learned scholars were ordered to produce paintings and drawings to accompany the sixty-fascicle record, and these were collected at the government’s central office.
This constituted altogether forty fascicles.
The project began at the beginning of the third year of the Linde period and ended in the summer of the first year of Qianfeng period .
I have met Xuance, who told me the details of this story.
The Biography of Dharma Master Xuanzang says:
The kingdom of Dhanakataka belongs to South India.
Both on the eastern and western sides of the capital city are mountains, and there are large temples in these mountains.
In one of these temples was a master of doctrinal treatises, Bhāviveka. Before Avalokiteśvara Bodhisattva he made a vow to stop eating grain and to drink only water for three years.
He was determined and prayed to see Maitreya Bodhisattva.
Then Avalokiteśvara manifested his material body and ordered Qingbian to go to the deity Vajrapāṇi, who was staying in a large cave in the mountain to the south of the city, and to recite the vajra spell .
After three years the deity gave him this instruction, “Inside the cave is the palace of the asura demons. If you follow the correct way and make a proper request a rock door will open.
Go through the door and bring out Maitreya, who will be waiting there.
I will make sure that you will succeed in this act.” After another three years had passed, Qingbian uttered the spell and threw a pepper seed at the rock wall , and suddenly the wall opened wide.
Hundreds of thousands of people were present there and all were amazed to see this.
The master stepped through the gate and looking back, again and again, he told the people to follow him, but only six people followed him.
Others were afraid and did not enter, saying that poisonous snakes lived in the cave.
After the master had gone inside, the rock doors closed up and formed an intact wall again.
Dharma Master Xuanzang also told the following story:
In the thirteenth year of Zhenguan was at Nālanda Monastery in the kingdom of Magadha in Central India. met a layman, who told me, “There was a man who loved women.
Every time he heard scripture recited he noted that the male offspring of the asura demons are extremely ugly but the female offspring are attractive.
He had heard that there was an asura cave in a nearby mountain and that there was a extremely beautiful palace there, as refined as the palace of the gods in heaven.
That man thought that he would like to meet an asura’s daughter and marry her.
He practiced spells diligently for three years, and when the three-year period was about to end his wish was granted.
This man had long been a close friend of mine.
When he was about to go to the cave, he invited me to accompany him on his trip to the palace of asura demons.
At that time I went with him, and since the spell had become effective, we arrived at the gate of the palace.
“The guard at the gate looked very serious.
My friend asked the guard, sincerely and passionately, to let him pass through the gate to see the lady of the palace.
The guard reported the reason of our visit in detail to those inside.
The lady of the asura demon was delighted and asked the guard, ‘How many people have come?’ The guard replied, ‘There are two people.’ The lady said to the guard, ‘The one who uttered the spell may come in.
The one who accompanied him will stay outside the gate.’ He returned and said, ‘The one who recited the spell may come in.’ I had no sensation of how this happened, but as I watched my friend being led inside my body was suddenly back at my own house, and I was standing to the south of the building.
“From then on I have never heard any news about my friend.
Because of this I made the commitment to renounce the householder’s life and cultivate the religious path.
I vowed to make offerings to the Three Jewels in this temple building.” This man told this story in detail to Dharma Master Xuanzang.
The Six Realms of Rebirth Introduction, Explanation of the Name, Dwelling Places, Categories, Karmic Causes , Body Size, Life Span, Beautiful and Ugly Appearance, Pain and Pleasure, Noble and Ignoble Ghosts, and Residences.
Introduction To come to the methods used by ghosts and spirits, such creatures take particular delight in strange and evil things.
They frequently commit crimes in mysterious and secret places.
Some dwell among darkly shaded rocks; some find shelter in high hills, or in unreachable mountain streams, or in dense bush.
Others stay in deserted fields in uninhabited places outside of cities.
They are of extraordinary appearance and make strange sounds that disturb ordinary beings and frighten ignorant creatures.
They falsely adopt awesome manifestations and cunningly strange appearances.
Some ghosts are in the shape of a bird but have the nature of fish, or they may have a human face but the heart of a beast.
Some make music with drums and sing along with stringed instruments, beating drumsticks and chiming bells.
All these creatures alike repent their sins.
They dwell in shrines in the nine continents and serve as the spirits of ten thousand states.
Among them are the Great Count of Gusu, Ji Zi of Yanling, Yuchuan Wenming, the bearded kings of caves and marshes, water gods, mountain spirits, masters of wind and rulers of rain, Feng long, Lieque, the fire god Huilu, and Linghou.
Some ride on a bamboo pole as if it were a dragon, flying like wild birds instead of geese.
They reside in tall shrines attached to multistoried buildings.
Coming and going in the falling rain, they travel up and down the dividing winds.
There are also such ghosts such as the yellow-headed general and those with needle hair, Xiuli , Lena , pantu , and other rākṣasas, with their three thousand attendants and five hundred followers.
All repent .
Furthermore, there are those who have extremely grave hindrances, called hungry ghosts .
The light in their eyes is like flashing lightning.
Their throats are as small as the eye of a needle.
They cannot even hear words like “water” or “juice,” and they never taste foods made with rice.
The joints of their limbs are all aflame at the same time.
As they turn around their bones creak, as loudly as the sound of five hundred carriages.
Today the merit of good acts are available to bring benefit to all sentient beings.
A vow should be made to ensure that the hungry and thirsty ghosts may be able to eat and drink freely and that the other seductive and alluring ghosts and spirits stop groveling before people to get what they need.
Let them glorify the teaching of the Buddha, protect the world, and guard the images and scriptures.
We make offerings for a long time and record the consequences of good and evil deeds in order to enable people to practice spiritual cultivation forever.
What does the name “realm of ghosts” mean? According to the Lishi lun :
The realm of ghosts is called preta because King Yama is called a preta.
Those who are born in this realm are called by the name of its king.
Therefore, are also called pretas.
It is also said that this realm is connected with other realms as beings come and go through it, superior and inferior realms are connected by this, and therefore it is called preta, the realm of “coming and going.” Again, the new Posha lun says:
Question:
Why is that realm called preta?
Answer:
The Shishe lun says, “Just as the ruler of the world of ghosts at the present time is called Yama, so the ruler of the world of ghosts at the beginning of the world age was called preta.
For this reason sentient beings that went and were born there were called pretas.
Thus, everything in the world of the pretas has been called by this name since then.” According to one view, if a person has committed and indulged in excessively greedy evil deeds of body, speech, and mind he is born there.
For this reason, he experiences both hunger and thirst .
For more than one hundred thousand years he does not even hear the word “water,” so how could he see or touch it?
Impossible! Some of these beings have a belly as big as a mountain but a throat as narrow as a pinhole.
Even when they find food and drink they cannot take them in.
According to one view, they are called ghosts  because they are driven and forced into labor.
They are constantly made to work everywhere by the gods and are always running around.
According to another view, because they have many desires they are called ghosts.
Among the five realms of existence none is inhabited by beings whose desires exceed those of the inhabitants of this realm, always wanting many favors from other sentient beings.
For this reason this realm is called the realm of ghosts.
Furthermore, ghosts and spirits are explained in the Posha lun (ref.
T.1545: are weak and fearful.
Also, something that is always greedily seeking is called a ghost.
This refers to the fact that hungry ghosts constantly seek food from others in order to live.
Therefore, they are given the name “greedily seeking.” According to the Posha lun :
Hungry ghosts have two dwelling places: primary and secondary.
There are different views on the primary dwelling place.
The work mentioned above says that five hundred yojanas below this world we call Jambudvīpa is the realm of hungry ghosts, governed by King Yama.
This is the  primary dwelling place.
The Shansheng youposai jing also has the same view:
Five hundred yojanas below this world is the city of Yama, the ghost king.
The perimeter of each of its four sides is seven hundred and seven million five hundred thousand yojanas.
The multitude of ghosts that the king rules over live inside .
In addition, as the Wudaoku jing (ref.
Wudao zhangju jing, T.741:548a18– Therefore this scripture says in verse: Between the two Iron Surrounding Mountains One does not see the sun or moon. Hungry ghosts gather together there In order to pay for their sins previous lives. Coming now to the secondary dwelling place, according to the Posha lun , there are again different views:
There are two kinds of secondary dwelling places:
one is for awesome ghosts and the other for ghosts that are not awesome.
Awesome ghosts live in mountains and valleys, or in the sky, or on the shores of the ocean.
They all have palaces and their karmic retribution is superior to those of humans.
The ghosts without awesome powers dwell amid impure dung and dirt, or in overgrown graves, or by lavatories and old tombs.
None of them has a house.
Their karmic retribution is inferior to that of humans.
Again, as the abovementioned work says (ref. T.1545:867b12–19; T.1546:48c12–17):
The four directions under heaven all have dwelling places for ghosts.
In the two directions, east and west, there are both awesome ghosts and ghosts without awesome powers.
There are only awesome ghosts in the northern direction and no ghosts without awesome powers.
This is because karmic conditions are superior there.
In the heavens, up to Tuṣita Heaven, are also the dwelling places of the awesome ghosts.
They are driven to labor by the gods of those heavens.
Hungry ghosts do not live in heavens higher than Tuṣita Heaven.
The new Posha lun also says:
Among the gods of the four heavenly realms and the thirty-three heavens dwell only the awesome ghosts.
They guard and patrol the gates and all serve as servants for the gods who live in these heavens.
It is said that to the west of this world are five hundred islets, in two rows.
According to the old Posha lun , to the west of this world are five hundred cities of ghosts. These five hundred cities are of two kinds.) On the two rows of islets are five hundred cities.
In two hundred and fifty of these cities the awesome ghosts live; in the other two hundred and fifty cities live the ghosts without awesome powers.
For this reason in ancient days a universal monarch, called Nimi, said to his charioteer Mātali, “I wish to go out on a pleasure drive.
You should drive the chariot on this road and let me see the sentient beings receiving good and evil karmic retribution.
Mātali did as he was told by the king and drove the chariot between the two rows of islets.
The king saw the awesome ghosts.
They wore crowns on their heads and their hair was decorated with flowers.
They were dressed in heavenly garments and ate delicious food, as if they were the sons of gods.
They rode on carriages drawn by elephants and horses and every one of them was playing happily.
The king then saw the ghosts without awesome powers.
Their hair was disheveled and they were naked, lacking clothing.
They looked emaciated, covered with their own hair.
They went around begging, carrying unglazed pots.
When the king saw these sights, he came to believe deeply in good and bad karmic retribution.
Question: What do the ghosts look like?
Answer: They mostly look like human beings.
Some look like animals. Some ghosts look like pigs; some look like different kinds of other inferior animals.
They look as they do in the wall paintings.
Question: What is their language?
Answer: At the beginning of a world age they all speak Sanskrit.
Later they use different languages according to their circumstances.
Some say that their appearance and speech are determined by the circumstances in which they ended their earlier lives to be reborn in this realm.
Comment:
We do not follow this view.
Suppose someone dies in the formless realm and was reborn —would he be without form and speech?
If one follows this view, wherever one had been born previously would determine his language and appearance .
The Zhengfanian jing says:
The total number of hungry ghosts may be divided generally into thirtysix kinds. Because the behavior that caused rebirth differs, they receive different retributions.
Boiling cauldron ghosts: Because these creatures committed murder when hired by others, they are cooked in a boiling cauldron.
Or they had been entrusted with objects and refused to return them to the owners later, so they receive this retribution.
commit murder.
Their throats are narrow like a pinhole and not even a drop of water can pass through them.
their wives to make religious offerings, but the women said there was nothing to give.
Instead they accumulated property and were stingy.
Therefore, these wives now must constantly eat vomited-up food in this rebirth.
and drinking by themselves, and who felt hatred toward their husbands, now as ghosts eat and vomit up excrement all the time.
caused their deaths, so they are now burned by fire and suffer from hunger and thirst.
not give any to their wives and children, letting them suffer from hunger and thirst, so they now only have odorous breath for food. others only in order to obtain wealth.
Their bodies are now racked by hunger and thirst and they have lost all their flesh.
Their lives are maintained by virtue of the monks’ preaching of Dharma.
ignorant people and causing them to violate the pure precepts, so they constantly suffer from scorching thirst.
and selling and obtained things by cheating, so they now constantly suffer from hunger and thirst.
They obtain food from the offerings given for ancestral spirits.
renounced the householder’s life by giving them impure food, so they are constantly hungry and thirsty and their bodies are cooked and boiled.
They beg for other people’s saliva and eat it with impure food.
stole the Buddha’s garland offerings to adorn themselves.
When people, on encountering unfortunate events, now make offerings of garlands these ghosts subsequently get to eat them.
their blood but did not give anything to their wives and children, so they have received the form of this type of ghost. If blood is poured out during a sacrificial rite these ghosts get to eat it.
and cut off their flesh, weighed it, and committed deception when trading in it, so they have received this retribution.
Because they are very deceptive and ugly, people shun them the sight .
If people sacrifice mixed pieces of meat these ghosts get to eat it.
received a handsome price for it, so they eat only the smoke from incense and later receive the retribution of poverty. wore monk’s robes.
They took through deception, saying that they would offer them to ill people, but they did not give the food to the ill and instead consumed it themselves.
Consequently they receive this retribution.
They eat impure food all the time and their bodies burn without any external cause.
These creatures cheated and stole property and did not cultivate meritorious works, so they receive this retribution.
Flames burst forth from the hairs on their body.
They consume people’s vital powers and impure excretions in order to sustain their own lives. and caused the legitimate owners to be imprisoned in jail.
Blinded in the darkness of jail, the legitimate owners appealed continuously for help with pitiful cries.
For this reason, their tormentors now suffer the pain of being put in a dark place full of evil snakes and of being cut up with swords.
and gave them to bad friends, not performing meritorious acts of giving, so they receive this retribution.
They are endowed with great supernatural powers but must endure great suffering. and murdered people.
For this reason they receive this retribution.
They scream and shout as flames burn all over their bodies.
Later they are reborn as humans and are constantly robbed by others.
reason they receive this retribution.
They constantly spy on people defecating and are capable of harming children. but did not give anything for meritorious purposes, so they receive this retribution.
They wander around among humans and engage in sexual intercourse with them.
They deceive people by taking the forms of extraordinary creatures in order to secure their livelihood.
saw an ill person and cheated him of his possessions, so they are reborn in an ocean islet and receive the pain of heat and coldness ten times worse than usual.
creatures were close to kings and ministers and committed violent and evil deeds in a dictatorial manner, so they receive this retribution.
They have become attendants of the King of Hell, Yama, and serve as his stickholding ghosts.
property from others by deceit, and killed pigs and sheep, so they have fallen into hell after death and receive this retribution. They constantly eat small children.
friends, saying, “I will protect you” to urge their friends to be more daring; the friends then fell and died in the battlefield while they did nothing to aid them.
Because of this they receive this retribution. big party, so they receive this retribution of suffering from hunger and being burned by fire.
stinginess and they delighted in eating food that belonged to the monastery, these creatures first fell into hell and after coming out of hell their bodies are scorched in a cauldron of fire.
practitioners, so they receive this retribution and eat impurities.
came to beg alms, these creatures agreed to give him food but did not give it in the end.
Because of this they receive this retribution and constantly suffer from thirst and hunger.
Their torment is like the pain of hell.
creatures prevented the inmates from eating and drinking.
Because of this they receive this retribution, and constantly eat burning coal.
so they fell into hell and later came out and became ghosts.
They are thirsty and hungry all the time and constantly eat poison and fire, which burns their bodies.
ponds have been created to provide travelers with water, these creatures spoke rudely, broke dikes, and let travelers go thirsty.
Because of this they receive this retribution.
They are constantly hungry and thirsty and fire burns their bodies.
sold flowers that had been offered to the Buddha in order to make a living.
Because of this they receive this retribution.
They constantly eat the hot ashes of burned corpses among the dead.
to provide shade for others, and they then maliciously cut them down for their own use.
Because of this, they have fallen into the realm of trees and constantly suffer from cold and heat. their provisions.
For this evil deed their bodies are sawed apart constantly. They take food from the shrines at crossroads and live on it.
not believe in the correct and true teaching, so they have fallen to the status of ghosts of Māra and constantly harm others who practice the right Dharma. According to the Shunzhengli lun :
There are three kinds of ghosts:
those “without property,” those “with little property,” and those “with a great deal of property.” Those “without property” also include three kinds:
“torch-mouth,” “pin-mouth,” and “foul-mouth.” The torch-mouth ghosts constantly emit blazing flames out of their mouths, which burn with incomparable intensity; their bodies look like burned up tāla trees.
This is the painful retribution caused by extreme stinginess.
The pin-mouth ghosts’ stomachs are massive, like a mountain valley, but their mouths are like a pinhole.
Even though they see various kinds of wonderful food and drink they cannot take them in; their hunger and thirst are difficult to bear.
The foul-mouth ghosts have extremely bad breath, which stinks like rotting matter and comes from these ghosts all the time.
is worse than excrement overflowing from a privy; the foul smell clings to their mouths and they constantly go through the motions of vomiting.
Even when they find food and drink they cannot take them; tortured by hunger and thirst, they run around screaming wildly.
Those “with a little property” also include three kinds:
“needle hair,” “smelly hair,” and “big goiter.” The needle-haired ghosts have body hair that is straight, hard, and sharp, so that one cannot go near them.
The hair drills holes into their own bodies and pierces the bodies of others.
These ghosts are like a deer shot by poisoned arrows, running wildly in fear.
Sometimes they find impure food that temporarily eases their hunger and thirst.
The smelly-hair ghosts have hair that is extremely odiferous and dirty; it makes their skin and bones stink and rot.
Steaming dust from their bowels and stomach rises into their throats and becomes their spittle.
Their pain is unbearable; if one seizes the body of such a ghost and pulls on its hair, it rends the skin and increases the excessive pain.
These ghosts sometimes find impure food that temporarily eases their hunger and thirst.
Because of the effect of evil karma, the goiter ghosts develop a large goiter in their throat; it is hot and dry like a tumor and it aches.
When they peel the skin of the goiter for each other stinking pus wells out.
They fight over food to ease their hunger a little.
Those “with a great deal of property” also include three kinds:
“shrineseeker,” “thrown-away food-seeker,” and “greatly powerful” ghosts.
The shrine-seeker ghosts constantly go to shrines and feast on what people have offered for the sacrifice.
are born in realms as determined by their karma but they often visit different places.
They fly in the sky like birds and go back and forth freely.
With the superior understanding they had in a previous life they made the wish, “When my life ends, may my descendants build a shrine for me and provide me with food and drink.” Because of this superior understanding they are born among these ghosts.
The good karmic causes of their previous lives bring about the offerings at shrines now.
Some of them loved those who were close to them in a previous life and wished to make them all wealthy and well provided for, but they accumulated wealth in a manner that does not accord with the Dharma.
With stinginess in their minds they did not make spiritual gifts.
Because of this evil karmic cause they were born among these ghosts.
Such ghosts live around lavatories and other impure places near their original residences.
Their loved ones, remembering them, invite solitary and impoverished monks and brahmans to make offerings to them and honor their merit.
When these ghosts see that they are recalled by their close ones in connection with the wealth they had left behind, and also see the results of their stinginess clearly manifested in the poverty of those who are receiving the offerings, pure faith arises in their minds.
They continue to nurture the activities that accompany the act of giving.
Because of this they receive the fruit in the same life, and because of this karmic force they obtain plentiful provisions.
The ghosts who seek thrown-away food wish to collect leftover food and excrement discarded by other people to use as their food.
So they are also well provided for.
Because of the fault of stinginess in their previous life, however, where there is food or drink they see only filth or nothing at all.
In pleasure and purity they see only filth.
Yet because of good karmic rewards all their needs are amply provided for.
Food and drink are available to them. We are born into realms as determined by karma but our different fates are unpredictable. Offerings made to ghosts affect them accordingly.
In the hell realm different karmic causes mature at different times, producing different effects ; some are interrupted and then resume, but not so in other realms.
In the human realm we can acquire superior knowledge and pure practice, but not so in other realms.
In heaven everything appears as one wishes.
These things are determined by karmic rebirth but there is no fixed formula for predicting the ultimate outcome.
As for the ghosts of great power, the description here is roughly the same as that found in the Posha lun above.
In addition, the Yüqie lun says:
There are three kinds of ghosts.
The first are external obstruction ghosts.
Because sentient beings were stingy they are reborn among these ghosts.
They are always hungry and their skin and flesh are dry like coal.
The hair on their heads is in wild disorder and their lips are dry and burned.
They constantly lick their mouths and faces with their tongues.
Hungry, thirsty and fearful, they run around everywhere.
Whatever springs and ponds they find are guarded by sentient beings wielding swords and sticks who do not let them approach.
Or the water turns into pus and blood and they themselves do not wish to drink it.
They are called external obstruction ghosts.
The second group is internal obstruction ghosts.
This refers to sentient beings whose mouths like a burning needle and who have very large stomachs.
Even if they obtain food and drink they cannot take them.
These are the internal obstruction ghosts.
There are hungry ghosts called violent flame garland ghosts; their food and drink all get burned up.
For this reason they suffer greatly from hunger and thirst.
They are called the no obstruction ghosts.
Now, good deeds are said to be of benefit.
They occasion happy karmic rewards.
Evil deeds harm others and invite destructive retribution.
Doing good deeds is comparable to climbing a mountain: one understands that it is difficult to ascend.
Evil deeds are like collapsing and falling, which are indeed easy to do.
Therefore, the heavenly palace is vacant and the footsteps of visitors are few, while the jails of hell are overwhelmed by those who compete for a place in it and gather there in great numbers.
As the Dazhidu lun says, “There are three kinds of evil .
Only if a creature commits the minor kind of evil is he reborn in the realm of hungry ghosts.” The Shidi lun also presents the same view and explains which of the ten evil deeds a creature may commit that will cause him to first be reborn in the three inferior realms of hell, hungry ghosts, and animals, and later to obtain a human body.
The Zhengfanian jing says:
If out of greed and jealousy a being falsely flatters and deceives others, or while being stingy and accumulating wealth he does not give offerings, he is reborn in the realm of ghosts.
When his lifetime as a ghost is over, often he is reborn in the realm of animals, receiving the body of cātaka bird.
Constantly hungry and thirsty, he suffers greatly.
He can only drink rain that falls from heaven, waiting for it with his mouth open and facing upward; he cannot drink any other water.
Therefore he is constantly troubled by hunger and thirst. The Yebao chabie jing says:
If a being commits all of the ten evil deeds he is reborn among the hungry ghosts. with his body he commits light evil deeds, with his mouth he commits light evil deeds of speech, with his mind he commits light evil deeds, he is stingy and greedy, he perpetrates inappropriate evil deeds, he fawns over others and is envious, he entertains heretical views, he is attached to wealth and life at the moment of death, he dies of hunger, he dies of thirst.
Because of these evil deeds one is reborn among hungry ghosts.
The Fenbie gongde lun says:
Some monks were practicing meditation, some in a graveyard and others under trees.
A monk was once contemplating a corpse.
At night he saw a hungry ghost beating the corpse.
The monk asked, “Why do you beat this corpse?” The ghost answered, “Because this corpse troubles me so much, I beat it.” The follower of the Way said, “Why don’t you beat your mind rather than beat the corpse?” After a short while a god sprinkled this stinking corpse with heavenly mandāra flowers.
The monk asked, “Why do you sprinkle this stinking corpse with flowers?” The god answered, “Because of this corpse I attained rebirth in heaven.
This corpse is a good friend of mine.
Therefore, I come to sprinkle flowers on it to repay it for its kindness in the past.” The follower of the Way answered, “Why don’t you sprinkle flowers on your mind rather than on the stinking corpse?
The source of all good and evil deeds is the activity of the mind.
Are you forgetting the source to grasp at the branches?” According to the Wudao jing:
The largest in size among the hungry ghosts is one yojana in height.
His head is like a large mountain yet the diameter of his throat is as thin as a needle.
The hair on his head is disheveled and he looks gaunt and thin.
He walks supported by a stick.
There are many such ghosts.
The smallest of the hungry ghosts is like a small child with mental faculty .
Some say its size is three inches in diameter.
Details are in the scriptures and need not be recorded here.
According to the Guanfo sanmei jing , “The longest life span of ghosts is eighty-four thousand years; the shorter life spans are not specified.” Following the Chengshi lun , “The longest life span is seventy thousand years; shorter ones are also not specified.” Following the Youposai jing :
The longest life span is fifteen thousand years.
Five thousand years in human time is one day and night among the ghosts.
In terms of these days and nights, the ghosts live fifteen thousand years. To calculate by human days, months, and years, the number is equivalent to seventeen million years). Following the Zhengfanian jing :
The life span of a ghost is five hundred years.
Ten years in human time is one day and one night among the ghosts.
It is five hundred years with this latter time. To calculate in human days, months, and years, the number is equivalent to one million eight hundred thousand years). According to the Posha lun :
The ghosts with awesome powers are counted among the good-looking ghosts in appearance.
They are handsome, no different from gods.
Also the gods of the five sacred mountains and the four rivers are all very handsome.
They are all said to be good-looking.
On the other hand, among the ugly ones are the ghosts without awesome powers.
Their appearance is hideous and cannot be described in detail here.
Their bodies are hollow like the insides of a hungry dog; their hair is in disarray like wild weeds; their throats are like thin needles; their legs are like dry and rotten wood; from their mouths saliva constantly drips and snot flows from their noses; pus seeps from their ears and blood from their eyes.
With all these things they are said to be extremely ugly.
According to the Posha lun (ref.
T.1545:867a27–b1; b7–12, 23–26; T.1546:48c2–3, 10–11, 21–23): Those who suffer pain among the ghosts are the ghosts without awesome powers.
Constantly beset by hunger and thirst, they cannot even hear words such as “juice” or “water.” How could they encounter a good meal?
It is impossible! If they find a wide river and wish to drink from it, the water turns into a burning torch.
If the water enters their mouths it scorches their stomachs.
How could such creatures not suffer pain?
On the other hand, those who happily enjoy pleasures among the ghosts are the ghosts with awesome powers.
Rich and beautiful, they obtain whatever clothing and food they want just by wishing for it.
They wear heavenly garments and eat the food offered to gods.
Their appearance is always elegantly relaxed.
Riding with a whip, they go from place to place, traveling quickly.
They roam and play according to their mood.
In what way are they be different from gods?
How could such things not be pleasures? Impossible!
Question:
Since such pleasures are superior to those of human beings, why does the scripture speak of the different realms of humans and ghosts?
Answer:
The scripture says that the realm of ghosts is inferior to that of humans.
This has two meanings, described briefly:
ghosts are inferior to humans in regard to public and manifest behavior; that is to say, because ghosts hide during the daytime and roam around at night they are inferior to humans; ghosts are inferior to humans in that they are timid and fearful.
Even if they have awesome powers, because their retribution is inferior they are always afraid of humans; if they encounter any people during the day or night, they invariably make way for them and hide.
Question:
If the gods are inferior to humans, how did they acquire awesome powers similar to those of the gods as retribution?
Answer:
They performed giving frequently and on a large scale in their previous lives so they obtained this awesome retribution; but because they were not truthful, flattering others dishonestly, they received rebirth in the realm of ghosts.
According to the Posha lun , some have awesome powers.
They may be called “noble.” Some lack awesome powers.
They may be called “ignoble.” Also, the rulers of ghosts may be called “noble,” while those who are driven and used may be called “ignoble.” Question:
What about their economic conditions?
Answer:
Those with awesome powers are well provided for and freely have the use of servants.
Thus they are called “wealthy.” Some ghosts are constantly driven and ordered to work.
They do not hear even of simple food and have difficulty finding even worn-out clothes.
These are called “poor.” According to the Posha lun (ref.
T.1545:867b8–9, 10–12; T.1546:48c10– Those with awesome powers have palaces and residences decorated with the seven jewels.
All mountain and river deities have residences to live in.
Those without awesome powers, such as the floating and wandering ghosts and the hungry and thirsty ones, do not have residences.
They live temporarily in grave mounds and stay in bushes, among grasses and trees, and in caves.
These are their living quarters.
The Zhuangyan lun says:
The Buddha said, “In the past I heard of a son of a merchant whose name was Śroṇakoṭikarṇa.
He took to the ocean to seek treasure and having achieved success he returned.
He and his companion stayed overnight in different places.
One time, having lost his companion, he was frightened and pressed by hunger and thirst.
He saw a city far away and thought there would be water there.
He approached the city to look for water to drink, but it was a city of ghosts.
He entered the city.
The crossroads of the major streets running in the four directions and other places where people would usually gather together were empty and he did not see anyone.
Hungry and thirsty, he said “I am pressed with hunger and thirst!” He then saw another city and thought there would be water there.
He approached that city and looked for water, but again it was a city of ghosts.
He entered the city, but the crossroads of the major streets running in the four directions and other places where people would usually gather together were empty and he did not see anyone.
Hungry and thirsty, he cried out “Water, water!” The hungry ghosts heard a voice saying “water” and they all gathered like a cloud, saying, “Who among the merciful wishes to give water?” The bodies of all these ghosts were like scorched pillars.
Covered with their own hair, they all approached with their palms joined, and each said, “Please give me water!” When the hungry ghosts heard that Śroṇakoṭikarṇa was himself pressed by thirst and was looking for water, their hope vanished and, sighing deeply, they said, “Perhaps you don’t know, but this is a city of ghosts.
Why did you come here to look for water?” Then they said in verse:
We live in this castle. In a billion years We have not yet even heard the word “water.” How could be any among us who were able to drink some? Like a palm tree forest That is burning, ablaze, We are likewise Burning in all our limbs and joints. The hair on our heads is entirely disheveled. Our bodies are broken and bruised all over. Day and night we think of food and drink. Out of fear we run around in all directions. Pressed by hunger and thirst, With our mouths wide open, we run in search for food and drink. A man follows us with a stick And, pursuing us, he whips us. Another man hits us with a hammer and no one can go near him. We suffer this pain. How could we obtain water?
Be merciful and give to others. In our previous lives We were stingy and jealous. We never gave anyone juice, water, or any food and drink. We did not give any of our possessions to others, And we caused others not to give. For these grave acts We now suffer pain. Miracle Stories From the Song dynasty , Sima Wenxuan, Wang Hu, and Li Dan; from the Tang dynasty , Sui Renqian, demons and monsters in the mountains in Linchuan, and miscellaneous non-Buddhist stories about ghosts. Song Dynasty Sima Wenxuan was a man of the Honei area and he believed deeply in the Buddhist teaching.
In the ninth year of the Yuanjia period his mother and younger brother died.
Toward the morning of one full moon night he suddenly saw his brother sitting at the spirit altar, looking just as he used to when he was alive.
Turning quickly toward Wenxuan, he sighed and said he wanted food and drink.
Wenxuan then tested him, saying, “You performed the ten good deeds in your lifetime.
If the scripture is true, you should have been reborn in heaven or in the realm of humans.
Why were you reborn among ghosts?” Deep in thought, the brother looked up and down and did not reply.
That evening Wenxuan saw his brother again in a dream.
His brother said that because of the good deeds he had cultivated in his life he had been reborn in heaven; the figure at the spirit altar in the morning was the king of ghosts, not he.
Since he was afraid that the older brother might become skeptical , he had come to tell this to him .
The next morning Wenxuan asked the monks to recite the Shoulengyan jing and ordered his men to beat and tie up the ghost.
The ghost escaped under the floor and ran outside the house.
His appearance was ugly. Everyone in the house was surprised and fearful, and chased him away, shouting loudly.
The ghost said, “I was hungry and was only begging for food.” He left some days later.
Later, there was a ghost at his mother’s altar.
It was tall and had a red body.
Wenxuan’s oldest son, Xiaozu, exchanged words with the ghost.
The ghost’s answers were all well-informed.
At first Xiaozu was afraid, but in the end he became more at ease and accustomed to the ghost.
The ghost also became more tame, going in and out of the house just like a member of the family.
The story about this ghost spread in the capital city at that time and many people came to see it.
At the time there was a monk in Nanlin Temple who along with Senghan, a monk of Lingwei Temple, debated with the ghost in a very relaxed manner.
The ghost said, “In a past birth I was a respected and noble person.
Because I committed many evil deeds, however, my karmic retribution is not exhausted, and I have this body as a consequence.
In the past Year of the Tiger, four hundred divisions of ghosts spread diseases all over.
The calamities they caused should not have troubled you who are followers of the Way.
But they committed many evil deeds and disrupted good activities.
Therefore, I have been sent to look over things.” The monks offered him food.
The ghost said, “I have my own food.
You should not offer this food to me.” Senghan said, “You know a great deal about my life.
From which realm have I come and why did I become a monk?” The ghost answered, “You came from the realm of humans.
Your original vow is the karmic reason for your renouncing the householder’s life.” The monk asked about life, death, and the realms of rebirth, and the ghost answered almost all his questions.
There were also miracles, but since they were too numerous we cannot record the details .
Senghan said, “The realms of humans and ghosts differ.
You are not looking for food.
Why have you stayed here so long?” The ghost said, “There is a woman here that I must arrest, but she honors the precepts and is diligent in religious duties, so I have difficulty in obtaining her.
This is the reason for my delay now.
I am greatly ashamed to disturb my host.” After this he did not show his body very much, and later visitors heard only his voice.
This was in the tenth year of Yuanjia .
On the twenty-eighth day of the third month the ghost said to Wenxuan, “I appeared suddenly and stayed on, yet you used all your family resources to perform meritorious deeds.
Having been treated with such great reverence, how could I be so rude as to stay much longer?” Xiaozu said, “You may stay, but why did you appear at the altar set up for someone who had just died?” The ghost answered, “The deceased in your family all have their own places.
This seat was vacant so, I borrowed it temporarily.” So saying this, he departed.
Wang Hu was from Chang’an.
His uncle had been dead for several years when, in the twenty-third year of the Yuanjia period , he suddenly reappeared.
Returning home, he blamed Hu for lacking diligence in spiritual cultivation and for not managing the family affairs properly.
He gave him five strokes of the cane as punishment.
Those who were nearby or were in the neighborhood all heard his words and the sound of the cane.
They also saw the wounds.
But they did not see the uncle; only Hu could interact with him personally.
The uncle told Hu, “I should not have died.
Authorities of the realm of the dead should check the ghost registration for me.
I have a large following of officials and soldiers now. I am afraid they may frighten people and damage the village.
So I won’t go any further into it.” Hu also saw a large crowd of ghosts in turmoil outside of the village.
Suddenly the uncle departed, saying, “I will come back again temporarily on the seventh day of the seventh month next year.
I want to take you around the dark realms of hell, of ghosts, and of animals to let you know the retribution for sin and for meritorious deeds.
Do not prepare a reception.
If you do not put a stop to your faults suffering will come.” When the time came, the uncle returned and said to the people in Hu’s household, “I am now going to take Hu for sight-seeing.
I will bring him back, so do not worry.” Hu then suddenly lay down on the bed and became unconscious, as if he were dead.
Then the uncle took Hu to many mountains and showed him ghosts and strange creatures.
Before they arrived at Mount Songgao ghosts passing by Hu offered him food.
The taste of the offering was no different from ordinary food except for the ginger, which was extremely soft and tangy.
Hu wanted to take it back with him.
The creatures laughed at Hu and said, “You can only eat this food here.
You cannot take it back.” Hu finally saw one place, a beautiful and spacious building, with high quality and well-made curtains and carpets.
Two young monks stayed there.
Hu went to them and the two monks offered him a variety of fruit and some coconuts.
Having visited many places over a long period of time and seen in detail the painful and happy retributions of sins and meritorious deeds, Hu took his leave and returned home.
His uncle said to Hu, “You know that you must cultivate good.
Why remain a householder?
The forest-dweller White Feet is loftily correct in upholding the precepts and the practice of cultivation.
You should serve him as your master.” This follower of the Way in Chang’an had white feet, so his contemporaries called him “Forest-dweller White Feet.” He was greatly revered by the barbarous Wei people and the Wei ruler treated him as his teacher.
Hu followed his uncle’s advice.
When he was in the temple he saw the young monks of Mount Songgao among the visiting student monks.
Hu was very surprised and, breaking from his orderly conduct, he asked when they had come.
The two monks said, “We live in this temple.
We don’t remember meeting you in the past.” Hu mentioned the encounter at Mount Songgao.
The monks said, “You are mistaken.
How can there be such a thing?” The next day the two monks had departed without giving any reason.
Hu then told the other monks what had happened, describing what he had seen at Mount Songgao earlier.
Everyone in the community was surprised and pursued the monks, but they did not find them.
Thereupon they realized that the two monks were divine personages.
Toward the end of the Yuanjia period a monk from Chang’an called Shi Tanshuang who traveled in the region south of the Yangzi River told this story in detail.
Li Dan, styled Shize, was from Guangling.
He was well known in his village for his assiduous filial piety and simple life.
On the fourteenth day of the first month in the third year of Yuanjia he suddenly died.
After seven days, before his heart had become cold, he regained consciousness, and took a drink and ate some gruel.
He recovered overnight and told the following story.
A man with the flag of a messenger had come to the head of his bed and said, “The ruler of hell is calling you.” Dan immediately followed him and went directly northward.
The road was very flat and clean.
When he arrived, he found city buildings as tall and beautiful as our present city gates.
Some creatures sent welcoming words, telling him to come to the front.
In the office above the courtyard he saw thirty people in unlined official robes and blue headdresses, sitting gravely in rows.
One person was sitting in the eastern corner. His jacket was open and he was leaning on a desk.
He had attending guards that must have numbered over one hundred. Seeing Dan, these people spoke.
The man who was sitting said, “I will show you hell in order to let the world learn about it.” When Dan heard these words, he raised his head to look around.
The scene had changed completely and he was now in the middle of hell.
He saw many sinners receiving painful retribution, moaning and screaming. It was unbearable to watch.
In a while word came that the ruler of hell had sent a message to him and that there were people waiting for him.
Because of this, he returned to this world.
In the first month of the sixth year Dan died and again revived on the seventh day.
He described the things he had seen, which were roughly the same as the first time.
There also were sinners who sent word to their families through him.
They had committed crimes when they were alive and they now instructed their families to perform meritorious deeds.
They mentioned their names, close acquaintances, and village units.
Dan sought out their families according to what he had been told and always found them.
He had also heard that in the jia-shen year of the calendrical cycle an epidemic would spread to kill evil people.
If the disciples of the Buddhist teaching performed the one-day practice of the eight precepts, cultivated their minds, and did good deeds they would be spared.
Dan, originally a Daoist leader , immediately wanted to abandon Daoism, but the Daoist believers remonstrated against him, so he ended up following both teachings.
He constantly encouraged people to perform the one-day practice of the eight precepts.
Zheng Xianzhi of Yingyang was Vice-Director of the Imperial Secretariat.
During the fourth year of the Yuanjia period he was traveling to the capital following the emperor’s carriage.
When they arrived at the capital Zheng died suddenly that evening.
Thereupon, a man was possessed with miraculous speech and said, “My life span has long since ended and I should have passed away from the world a long time ago.
Fortunately, in recent years I have been honoring the Buddhist teaching. I freed living creatures from captivity and made offerings.
With this merit I added several years to my life.
Both hidden and manifest retributions follow a person just as do shadows and echoes.
Abandon all worldly obligations and honor the great teaching!” At this time many superior and noble people heard these words.
Tang Dynasty Sui Renqian was from Handan in the Zhao Commandery.
As a young man he studied Confucian scriptures and did not believe in ghosts, always wanting to test their existence.
So he followed a ghost specialist and studied for over ten years, but he still could not see ghosts.
Later he moved to the Xiang district and saw a man on the street who looked like a heavenly official.
The man was wearing shining clothes and riding a good horse, followed by fifty mounted men.
Seeing Renqian, he did not say a word.
Later Rengian saw this man several times but it was always like this.
In ten years they ran into each other dozens of times.
Later, the man suddenly stopped his horse and called to Renqian, “I see you frequently and truly think of you with affection.
I wish to be a friend of yours.” Thereupon, Renqian greeted him respectfully and asked who he was.
The man answered, “I am a ghost with the surname Cheng and personal name Jing.
Originally from Hongnong, I served as an Administrative Aide during the Western Jin period .
My present appointment is that of the Administrator of the state of Hu.” Renqian asked, “Where is that state and what is the name of the ruling prince?” The man answered, “Regions north of the Yellow River share a border with the state of Hu.
The capital is to the northwest of Loufan, in the desert.
As for the prince, the late Prince Wuling of Zhao governs the state now, but it is controlled by Mount Tai.
Every month the prince sends an envoy to pay homage to Mount Tai.
That is why I came here so frequently and encountered you.
I can be useful—I can let you know about calamities before they arrive so that you may avoid them and escape from violent injuries.
Only the fate of life and death and retributions of great fortunes and misfortunes cannot be changed.” Renqian agreed.
So Jing ordered one of his followers to serve as the officer in charge.
Having thus presented Renqian with a man to accompany him, Jing told him to report to the man as soon as something happened.
If there was ever anything that the man did not know, he was to come and ask Jing.
Having given this instruction Jing departed.
The officer in charge followed Renqian as if he were his personal attendant.
Whenever Renqian asked something, the man knew the answer.
In the beginning of the Daye period , Cen Zhixiang of Jiang ling was the director of Handan.
His son Wenben had not undergone the initiation ceremony.
Zhixiang requested Renqian to teach Wenben at home.
Renqian told the above story to Wenben, and then said that Administrator Cheng, told him, “There is one thing I am embarrassed to tell you, but since we are friends I must tell you.
Ghosts also eat, but they cannot eat sufficiently and they suffer from hunger.
If they obtain human food they can be satisfied for one year.
Many ghosts frequently steal human food. Since my status is high and I have important duties I cannot steal.
Would you prepare a meal for me?” After Renqian told Wenben this, Wenben prepared an offering consisting of rare and tasty food.
Renqian said, “Ghosts do not wish to enter people’s houses.
We should set up a tent and seats outside near the water and offer the wine and food.” Wenben followed this instruction.
When the time came, Renqian saw Jing and two other guests come and sit down.
After this the one hundred mounted soldiers came and sat down.
Wenben repeatedly bowed toward the seats and apologized for the modesty of the meal.
Renqian also communicated Jing’s words of gracious acceptance.
Earlier, when Wenben had been about to set out the food, Renqian asked that a gift of gold and silk also be offered.
Wenben asked, “What sort of things?” Renqian said, “The things that ghosts use are different from those of people—only gold and silk are used in common, and it is better to give ersatz gold and silk.
A large piece of tin painted yellow for the gold and materials made with paper for the silk would be the most valuable.” Wenben did as he was told.
When Jing finished eating, he had his followers take a seat and eat.
Wenben presented the gold and silk materials he had prepared.
Jing was overjoyed and thanked him, “Through scholar Sui , I troubled you.
Do you wish to know the length of your life span?” Wenben declined, saying, “I do not wish to know.” Jing laughed and departed.
Several years later Renqian became very ill, not rising from his bed for over a month.
Renqian relied on the ghost officer in charge of his affairs.
The latter did not know the reason for Renqian’s illness so he asked the administrator Cheng. The administrator reported, “There is no one who knows anything about it in our state.
When I go to the court in Mount Tai next month I will ask about it for you and report back.” The following month the administrator came and said, “A man from your region, called Zhao something, is the recorder of Mount Tai.
There is a vacancy for one member at the recorder’s office and he recommended you for this position.
Therefore, they are preparing a document in order properly to recruit you.
When the document is ready you will die.” Renqian asked about requesting to have the document nullified.
Jing said, “Your life span should be over sixty years.
Now you have only just turned forty, but Recorder Zhao is arbitrarily recruiting you.
You should make the request.” Then he said, “Recorder Zhao asked about you, saying, “Brother Sui was a fellow student in the past and I have deep affection for him.
Fortunately, I have now become a recorder at Mount Tai, and there is a vacancy in the office.
The district magistrate is now looking for someone .
I have already spoken to him.
He approved of the appointment.
Brother Sui cannot live for very long.
Our lives all end in death.
When death does come, a man does not necessarily find an office such as the vacant one I now have.
Why does he begrudge twenty years and temporarily extend his life span?
If the document is nullified now I cannot place the request again. He must make up his mind about coming here.
There is no room for doubt.” Renqian was depressed and fearful and his illness became more serious.
Jing said to Renqian, “Recorder Zhao wishes to take you there, no matter what means he has to use.
You can only escape if you appeal directly to the ruler of Mount Tai.” Renqian asked how he could see the ruler.
Jing said, “Only ghosts can see him.
Go to the shrine at Mount Tai.
Once you cross a small peak to the east, there is a flat area which is the location of their capital.
If you go there, you should be able to see him.” Renqian told Wenben, who made the travel preparations for him.
Several days later, Jing spoke to Renqian once again, “The document is about to be completed.
I am afraid you cannot escape even if you appeal.
Quickly, make a Buddhist image.
The document will then quickly disappear by itself.” Renqian told Wenben to spend three thousand pieces of gold and have an image of the seated Buddha painted on the western wall of the temple.
When it was completed Jing came and said, “You have escaped!” Renqian did not truly believe in the Buddha and was still doubtful.
So he asked Jing, “Buddhism teaches about the causes and consequences governing the three ages, past, present, and future.
Is this teaching true or false?” Jing answered, “It is all true.” “If so, when people die, they must be divided and enter into the six realms of rebirth.
Why should everyone become ghosts, just as both Prince Wuling of Zhao and you are now ghosts?” Jing said, “How many families are there in your district?” Renqian said, “Over ten thousand.” Jing asked again, “How many prisoners?” Renqian said, “Always fewer than twenty.” Jing asked again, “Among the ten thousand families, how many are officials of the fifth rank?” Renqian replied, “None.” Jing asked again, “How many officials above the ninth rank?” Renqian said, “Several tens.” Jing said, “The division into the six realms is just like this.
Not even one in ten thousand succeeds in being reborn in heaven.
This is comparable to the fact that not even one person in your district is an official of the fifth rank.
Several people among ten thousand succeed in being reborn as human beings, just as several tens in your district are officials of the ninth rank.
Several tens also enter hell, like your prisoners.
But the majority are reborn as ghosts and animals, like the taxed peasants in your district.
There are also ranks within the realm of ghosts.” Jing then pointed to one of his followers, “That man is far inferior to me, but those who are inferior to him are even more numerous.” Renqian said, “Do ghosts die?” Jing said, “Yes.” Renqian asked, “When they die, into which realm are they reborn?” Jing answered, “We do not know—just as people know life but do not know what happens after death.” Renqian asked, “Is the Daoist ceremony of presenting a written request profitable or not?” Jing said, “Daoists govern over the six realms by the order of the Heavenly Ruler.
They constitute the Heavenly Office.
King Yama is comparable to the Son of Heaven among humans.
The ruler of Mount Tai is comparable to the Director of the Imperial Secretariat.
The Divine Secretaries of the Five Realms are comparable to ministers.
Our state is like a large region or commandery.
Every time human affairs are judged Daoists send up a ceremonial petition.
This is called ‘requesting a fortune’ and is comparable to seeking the benevolence of spirits.
The Heavenly Office receives it and sends it down to King Yama, saying, ‘On such a month and such a day, we received So-and-so’s appeal.
You should investigate the truth exhaustively without committing injustices.’ Yama respectfully receives the order and executes it.
This is like receiving when one receives an Imperial Order in the human realm.
Unless there is a good reason, one should not seek an exemption from orders.
If there is injustice one should always be able to report it.
How could one call this ‘profitable’?” Renqian asked again, “What sort of merit does a family that cultivates the Buddhist teaching receive?” Jing said, “The Buddha is the Great Sage. He does not send down documents.
The gods in heaven reverently honor those who cultivate the Buddhist Way, and such people often receive generous pardons.
If their merit is great, even if they are in inferior realms of existence, the condemning documents cannot reach them.
This is something with which I am not familiar.
I do not know the reason for this.” After saying this, Jing departed.
After a few days Renqian was able to get up and recovered from his illness.
Wenben’s father died and he returned home.
Renqian sent a letter to Wenben, saying, “Ghosts and spirits are indeed greedy.
In the past they wanted you to provide food and drink for them. Consequently they were extremely polite.
These days they know that there are no benefits to be had any more, so they do not bother to come and see me any longer. Yet the ghost officer who was charged to attend to me still appears and follows me wherever I go.
When this district was ransacked by bandits and many were killed, I was guided by this attendant ghost as usual, and even though the bandits were not seen anywhere I was able to capture them all in the end.” On the eighth day of the ninth month in the sixteenth year of Zhengguan , civil officials gathered for an archery ceremony at Xuanwu Gate.
Wenben was at that time the Vice-Director of the Secretariat.
He was with his brother who was Chamberlain for the Palace Revenues, as well as Secretarial Censor Ma Zhou and Palace Steward Wei Kun. When the emperor sat facing them, Wenben related the above story himself.
The above miracle story is from the Mingbao ji, T.2082:792b21–793b29.) The Sousheng ji says:
In mountain districts in Linchuan specters appear.
Often strong winds and heavy rain causes a howling sound, and the specters shoot at people.
The place they hit leaves a mark like a hoof that has swollen up greatly. The poison is either of the male or female kind.
The male kind works quickly, the female kind slowly.
The quick one does not take more than half a day, and the slow one not more than overnight.
Bystanders often come to the victim’s rescue and with their help the stricken person gets a little better, but death always come in the end.
This phenomenon is commonly called the “sword-trouble ghost.” Therefore, a secular book says, “The evidence of the manifestation of good and evil fortune caused by ghosts and spirits is known in the world.” The Laozi says:
Of old, these obtained the One; heaven obtained the One and was clear; earth obtained the One and was tranquil; gods obtained the One and had their potencies; The valley obtained the One and was full; lords and princes obtained the One and the realm under heaven became settled.
Thus, heaven, earth, ghosts, and spirits share the common vital root with the self.
When the breath is divided, inherent nature becomes differentiated.
When divisions are established, forms become different.
There is nothing that can share a common nature and form with other things.
The living are the masters in the realm of yang; the dead are the masters in the realm of yin.
Each according to his nature keeps his own sphere at peace.
The specter exists in the midst of the great yin.
The Hanshi waizhuan says:
When a creature dies he becomes a ghost.
“Ghost” means “returning” .
The soul returns to heaven.
The flesh returns to soil.
The blood returns to water. The blood vessels return to valleys.
The voice returns to thunder.
Physical movement returns to wind.
The eyes return to the sun and moon.
The bones return to wood.
The muscle returns to mountains.
The teeth return to stone.
The fat returns to dew, and the dew returns to grass.
The inhaling and exhaling breath again return to another person.
The “Sacrifice” chapter of the Liji says:
Zaiwo said, “I have heard of ghosts and spirits but I do not know what they mean.” The Master said, “The breath is the thriving activity of the spirits; the body is the thriving activity of the ghosts.
When ghosts and spirits are brought together, the teaching is realized.” Cui Hong’s Shiliuguo Chunqiu, “The Record of the Former Liang” chapter, says:
Zhang Qing was a man of the Ma clan in Anding region.
When Qing killed Qu Jian, Jian uttered this curse:
“A white dog appears in the moonlight.” After drawing his sword and killing Jian, Qing fell to the ground and did not rise.
His attendants saw Jian at his side.
In this way Qing died a violent death.
The Shenyi jing says:
In the northeastern direction is the rock cave of the star of ghosts.
This cave has three hundred doors.
On the side of the rock is a sign saying, “Gate of Ghosts.” The gate is closed during the daytime.
In the evening human voices are heard.
There is a blue-colored fire.
Once when as a young man Song Dingbo of Nanyang was walking around at night he met a ghost.
He asked it, “Which ghost are you?” The ghost asked back, “Who are you, sir?” Dingbo deceived him, saying, “I am also a ghost.” The ghost asked, “Where are you going?” Dingbo answered, “I am going to the city of Wan.” The ghost said, “I also am going to the city of Wan.” So they walked together for several miles.
The ghost said, “Walking on foot is too slow.
We could take turns carrying each other.” Dingbo said, “Very good.” So the ghost first carried Dingbo for several miles.
Then it said, “You, sir, are too heavy.
Perhaps you are not a ghost?” Dingbo said, “I died recently, so my body is heavy.” Dingbo then carried the ghost, which was almost weightless.
They repeated this two or three times.
Dingbo said again, “I have only recently died and do not know what ghosts fear and avoid.” The ghost answered, “The only thing we do not like is human saliva.” As they were traveling together the road eventually ran into water.
Dingbo let the ghost cross it first and heard no sound.
When Dingbo himself waded across, he made a sound.
The ghost said again, “Why is there a sound?” Dingbo said, “Because I only recently died I have not practiced crossing water. That is why I made a sound.
Don’t become suspicious of me.” When they were about to reach Wan, Dingbo lifted the ghost up on top of his head and held him fast.
The ghost screamed loudly, asking to be let down, but Dingbo did not listen to the ghost’s cries.
Soon they arrived at the market in Wan and he let the ghost down on the ground.
The ghost then changed into a sheep, so Dingbo sold it.
Frightened by the transformation of the ghost into a sheep, he spat at it.
Dingbo went away with one thousand five hundred pieces of money.
At this time Shi Chong said, “Dingbo sold a ghost and got one thousand five hundred pieces of money.”  The Biography of Zhao Tai says:
Tai suddenly died.
Two messengers came to help him.
They entered the local government building from the western side.
The building had three black gates altogether and walls that extended several tens of miles.
The building was tall and had a tiled roof.
Others who had also died on the same day, five or six thousand men and women, stood outside the gates.
An official wearing unlined silken clothes held a pen and recorded the names of all the people who had gathered there.
Men’s and women’s names were recorded separately. The official told Zhao Tai, “Do not move.
We are about to present you to the ruler of Mount Tai.
Your name is the twentieth in the list.
Your turn will soon come.” The ruler was sitting facing west, surrounded by guards holding swords.
The attendants called each person by name and brought them all into the ruler’s presence.
The ruler ordered them to jail according to the severity of their crimes.
According to the Baopu Zi, “Both the Jiuding ji and the Qingling jing say, ‘Ghosts appear at the death of both humans and animals.’” When Sun En of Wei was in rebellion, the Wuxing region was in chaos.
A man who was escaping from a dangerous situation suddenly entered the shrine of Lord Jiang.
When he went through the gate a wooden image pulled a bow and shot him dead.
Passers-by and the shrine guards all witnessed it.
Introduction, Explanation of the Name, Dwelling Places, Body Size, Life Span, Karmic Causes , Retribution, Cultivation of Merit, Pain and Pleasure, and Beautiful and Ugly Appearance. To come to animals, they are born due to the retribution caused by ignorance.
There are many kinds of animals and there is more than one principle that governs them.
Endowed with the impure quality of ignorance, a creature is reborn in this inferior realm.
Having lost intelligence it has only excessive greed and anger.
Thus, wasps and scorpions accumulate poison and snakes nourish anger.
Pigeons and sparrows are addicted to copulation, jackals and wolves are quick and violent.
Some are also covered in fur and have horns.
Some have beautiful green feathers and carry jewels in their beaks.
Some have large beaks with sharp points and others have long and sharp talons or claws. Again, some are under the rule of other creatures, while some are controlled by humans.
Dogs are busy barking at night and roosters compete with each other to announce the dawn.
Oxen exhaust themselves in the fields and horses labor in military campaigns.
Their flesh thus wastes away and their skin dries up.
Some may hide in fields of grass and marshes, but in the end they are captured in nets and traps.
Some escape into ponds but unexpectedly become victims of fishing nets.
All of these animals repent.
There are large creatures such as the gigantic bird Peng and the leviathan Kun, and those with tiny bodies like crickets and ants.
There is the mole, about which it is said, “When the mole drinks at the river, he takes no more than a bellyful,” and there is the tailor bird, of which it is said, “When the tailor bird builds her nest in the deep woods she uses no more than one branch.” There are creatures born in water and those who are born on land; there are feathered families and species with fur; there are those with purple scales or silken material, or those with red gills and tails.
If we ourselves repent for all the animals, their faith becomes pure and they abandon their inferior forms; their wisdom shines forth and they again obtain the reward of being reborn in heaven.
They no longer suffer from being forced to labor, and they are liberated forever from the sorrow of being slaughtered and butchered for food.
They may wander around as their hearts desire and freely indulge in pleasures following their own inclinations.
They know no external limitation of eating and drinking.
They warble and sing spontaneously.
They have escaped from their bird cages and fish baskets and are free from all bondage.
According to the Posha lun :
Sheng in the word chusheng means sentient being , and chu means domestication and rearing.
This means that the conduct of such a creature is wild and its nature is dull and ignorant.
Such creatures are unable to be independent and so are domesticated and raised by others.
For this reason they are called animals, i.e., “domesticated beings” .
Question:
If chusheng refers to those animals that are domesticated and raised by humans, how can creatures such as dragons, which travel through the water, land, and sky, be considered to be among those that are raised by humans and thus called animals?
Answer:
The meaning of “rearing” is broad.
The term covers the six heavens as well as the human realm.
The places in which creatures that are not raised by humans live are narrowly limited—only the mountains, fields, and marshes in the human realm.
Furthermore, in ancient days dragons were also raised by humans.
Details can be found in the literary and historical writings.
Now, since the overwhelming majority of these creatures are domesticated and raised by humans, they are all called chusheng.
The Lishi lun says: The Sanskrit name for animals is tiryañc .
The reason is that a being is born in this realm because of slavishly fawning upon people.
It is also said that sentient beings in this realm often hide their bodily activities.
Therefore they are called tiryañc.
According to the new Posha lun :
Animals are called horizontal creatures.
Question:
Why is called the realm of horizontal creatures?
Answer: Because the orientation of these creatures is horizontal; they also walk sideways and because they walk sideways, their orientation is horizontal.
Therefore, they are called horizontal creatures.
Some say that because these sentient beings committed extremely ignorant evil acts of body, speech, or mind they are reborn in that realm of dark stupidity.
Therefore they are called “crooked creatures.” They say that such creatures are present everywhere in the five inferior realms.
In naraka there are legless animals such as nyaṅkuṭā worms, two-legged ones such as the iron-beaked bird, four-legged ones such as the large black dog, and many-legged ones such as centipedes.
In the realm of hungry ghosts there are legless animals such as poisonous snakes; two-legged ones such as crows and hawks; four-legged ones such as foxes, boars, elephants, and horses; and many-legged ones such as six-legged creatures and centipedes.
In the three continents in the human realm there are legless animals such as all the various reptiles, two-legged ones such as wild swans and geese, four-legged ones such as elephants and horses, and many-legged ones such as centipedes.
In the continent of Uttarakuru there are two-legged ones such as wild swans and geese and four-legged ones such as elephants and horses, but there are no legless or many-legged ones.
This is because that continent is a place where creatures receive the karmic reward of freedom from suffering.
In the heavens of the four heavenly kings and in the thirty-three heavens there are two-legged animals such as beautiful colored birds, and fourlegged ones such as elephants and horses.
As has been explained in the previous case, there are no others.
In the highest of the four heavens there are only two-legged animals such as beautiful colored birds; there are no other creatures.
This is because what takes place in the heavenly realms is perfect.
Question: If there are no elephants and horses in some places, what do the inhabitants use for vehicles?
Also, I have heard of elephants and horses in those heavens.
Why do you say there are none?
Answer: Because of the meritorious karmic power of the gods in those heavens, they create nonsentient forms of elephants and horses, which they use as their vehicles and to enjoy themselves.
According to the Loutan jing :
Animals differ from each other.
Generally speaking, there are three kinds:
fish, birds, and mammals.
Of these three categories, each has many species.
The fish category has six thousand four hundred species; the bird category has four thousand five hundred species; and the mammal category has two thousand four hundred species.
In this scripture only the overall numbers are listed, not the names of the various species .
The Zhengfanian jing gives different numbers of species, saying that there are four billion species.
It also does not list the names . The new Posha lun says: Question:
Where was the original dwelling place of horizontal creatures?
Answer: Their original dwelling place was in the ocean.
Later they dispersed into many realms.
Question: What do they look like?
Answer: Mostly, they stand sideways.
There are also some that stand upright, such as the singing and dancing deities known as kiṃnaras, the corpse-eating ghosts called piśācas, and the xilusuojia.
Question: What language do they speak?
Answer: At the beginning of the kalpa everyone spoke Sanskrit.
Later, differences in the time of eating and drinking developed, and sentient beings were no longer the same as each other. Some creatures slavishly fawned upon others and deceived each other, and so many languages appeared.
Creatures who cannot use language at all also appeared.
According to the old Posha lun :
The places in which animals live may be divided into primary and secondary.
First, to consider their primary dwelling place, some say that it is in the darkness between the two areas of the Iron Surrounding Mountains; some say it is in the middle of the ocean; some say it is on an island in a big river.
Second, their secondary dwelling place is in the five inferior realms.
In the realm of hell there are legless animals such as snakes, two legged-ones such as crows and doves, and four-legged ones such as dogs.
Among these some are there because of the real consequences of karma, while others are temporary manifestations. They may be in this form due to either one of these two possibilities.) In the realm of ghosts there also are legless, two-legged, and four-legged animals.
Namely, among the ghosts with awesome powers are elephants, horses, and camels; among ghosts without awesome powers are only dogs.
Among the asuras (Note: Some say this realm is similar to the realm of ghosts.) and the realm of gods there only are two-legged and fourlegged animals, no other kinds.
In the heavens of the two realms of desire and form there are animals with karmic causes and those without, i.e., animals that are only temporary manifestations.
The situation is the same as the explanation given above in the case of the gods.) According to the Pusa chutai jing , first, no large bird is bigger than a garuḍa.
The distance between its head and tail is eight thousand yojanas. Its height is the same.
When a garuḍa flies it goes without stopping from one Mount Sumeru to another.
Details are given in the scripture.
Second, among animals none surpasses the dragon in size.
According to the Ahan jing , in appearance the two dragons Nanda and Upananda are the largest.
They surround Mount Sumeru seven times.
While their heads rest on the mountain top, their tails are in the ocean.
Third, among those with the body of a fish, none surpasses the great fish makara. According to the Sifen lü
, the length of the great fish makara can be three or four hundred yojanas.
The biggest is seven hundred yojanas.
According to the Ahan jing its eyes are like the sun and the moon, its nose is like a big mountain, and its mouth is like a large valley.
If one were to follow secular books, Zhuang Zhou said that there is a large bird called Peng.
This bird is extremely large.
One does not know how many thousand miles long the back of the great Peng is.
When it is about to fly, it hits the water with a splash that rises three thousand li high.
Its wings are like clouds hanging from the sky and they flutter slowly as the bird goes up.
Reaching a height of nine thousand li above the ground, it then flies away.
To go from the Northern Ocean to the Southern Ocean it flies straight for six months without stopping to rest.
This refers to the small garuḍa bird mentioned in Buddhist literature.
Secular writers are unaware of this, so they speak as if there exists in addition a bird called Great Peng). Secular Chinese books also say that among the large aquatic animals, none is bigger than the turtle Juling.
It has the biggest of all animal bodies, and its head lays in Penglai Ocean.
The texts do not specify its height and length.
The description of this turtle does not match a very small makara fish, so we cannot discuss in detail the differences in size.) Zhuang Zhou said that among the small birds, none is smaller than the jiao ming “bird.” This is a type of insect that produces its offspring inside a mosquito’s antennae.
It lays its eggs inside the antennae yet, the eggs do not fall. This does not go far enough.
In Buddhist literature, the sentient beings who receive the retribution of being reborn as extremely small creatures are shaped like dust.
They can only be seen with a divine eye.
Therefore, the Buddhist Vinaya has the following story: The Buddha instructed the monks to filter their water before drinking.
Śāriputra filtered his water many times but there were still small insects in the water, so he did not drink any water for seven days and his body became severely dehydrated.
When the Buddha learned of this, he asked Śāriputra, “Why have you become so haggard?” Śāriputra answered, “The Buddha asked us to filter water before drinking.
I filtered my water many times but I still saw insects with my divine eye.
They go through the filter like the minute particles that float on the surface of water in a pot.
In order to protect their lives I did not dare to drink the water.
Therefore, my body has become emaciated.” The Buddha told Śāriputra, “If one were to always check with a divine eye, no one would be alive.
From now on, use only your coarse physical eyes to see if the water is clean.
If you cannot see any insects in it with your physical eyes, you can drink it.” Therefore, we know that sentient beings with the retribution of being born as minute beings fill space everywhere.
How could it be that the smallest ones are as big as tailor birds?) According to the Pitan , “In the realm of animals none has a longer life span than one kalpa, as in the case of the earth-upholding dragon and the Elāpattra dragon.” None has a shorter life span than the insect known as the dayfly, which is born in the morning and dies in the evening, its life lasting not even as long as one day.
The life spans of animals that fall between these two extremes cannot be described in detail here.
According to the Dazhidu lun : The Buddha instructed Śāriputra to observe the past and future of a pigeon.
Over a period of eighty thousand kalpas this creature never abandoned the body of a pigeon.
Therefore, we know that the life spans of animals are extremely long and beyond the limit of what ordinary beings can comprehend. According to the Yebao chabie jing :
A living being receives the retribution of rebirth as an animal by committing the following ten types of acts:
evil deeds of the body, evil deeds of speech, evil deeds of thought, evil deeds committed out of greed, evil deeds committed out of anger, evil deeds committed out of ignorance, cursing sentient beings, maltreating sentient beings, making an offering of impure objects, and committing adultery.
According to the Zhengfanian jing , the species of animals differ from each other.
The karmic causes and the consequences differ for each species.
Details can be found in this scripture and are not described here. According to the Dichi :
If a living being commits any one of the ten evil deeds, he will  the realms of hell, of animals, or of hungry ghosts.
Later he will be reborn as a human being and will still suffer pain from remaining karmic retribution.
According to the Xianyu jing (Sutra of the Wise and the Ignorant, T.202:
Some merchants once hoped to visit another country.
These merchants had a dog. Midway on their journey, the merchants stopped to take a rest.
Thinking that no one was looking, the dog stole some meat.
In anger, the merchants hit the dog and broke its leg, and they then went on, abandoning the animal in the middle of the field.
At that time Śāriputra saw the dog with his divine eye.
Crippled and hungry, it was greatly distressed and about to die.
Putting on his robe and holding his almsbowl, Śāriputra entered the city and begged for food. After he obtained some food he took it outside the city.
Flying to where the dog was, he offered it the food out of compassion and pity.
When the dog ate the food it revived and was overjoyed.
Śāriputra then preached the profound teaching to the dog.
Thereupon the dog died and was reborn in a brahman’s family in Śrāvastī.
Later, Śāriputra was out walking alone on almsrounds.
A brahman saw him and said, “The Honored One is walking alone, without an attendant novice.” Śāriputra said, “I have no attending novice.
I hear that you have a son.
You should give him to me.” The brahman said, “I have a son named Cunda.
He is still too young to fulfill such duties but before he is fully grown I will give him to you.” Later, when the child reached the age of seven years old, the brahman entrusted him to Śāriputra, causing the boy renounce the householder’s life.
Thereupon Śāriputra accepted the child .
Just as Śāriputra was about to reach Jetavana he preached the teaching to the novice, step by step.
The latter’s mind opened up and he understood the teaching, obtaining the reward of arhatship.
He was endowed with all superior qualities.
When Cunda first attained the Way he contemplated past lives with his own power of knowledge: what conduct had he performed so that he had met a holy person and obtained the goal of salvation?
He saw that in his previous life he had been a hungry dog.
Thanks to the compassion of his master, he had now obtained a human body and attained the religious goal.
Happy feelings arose deep within him and he said to himself, “Thanks to my master’s compassion I was delivered from much suffering.
I should now dedicate myself to looking after his needs.
I will request to remain his novice and not receive the complete precepts .” The Buddha said to Ānanda, “In the past age, during the time of Kāśyapa Buddha, Cunda was a young monk with a beautiful voice.
He was very good at chanting verses and people loved to listen to him.
There was an old monk who had a raspy and dull voice, and he could not chant the sutras.
He had obtained arhatship, however, and was endowed with all superior qualities.
The youth was proud of his good voice.
When he saw the old monk he had reviled him, saying that his voice was like a dog barking.
The old monk immediately called out to the youth, saying, “Don’t you know that I have attained arhatship and all the ceremonies have been performed for me?” When the youth heard this, he was shocked and his hair stood on end.
Greatly frightened, he blamed himself and repented his faults before the old monk.
Because of his evil speech, however, he received the body of a dog for a period of five hundred kalpas.
Because he renounced the householder’s life and upheld the pure precepts, he has now been able to meet me and obtain salvation.” Furthermore, the Dazhidu lun says:
Because of excessive ignorance beings are reborn as insects and birds; for example, earthworms, dung beetles, crickets, ants, owls, ducks, and hawks.
Nāgārjuna Bodhisattva said elsewhere that for excessively licentious desires a being receives the body of a duck.
One also receives a duck’s body for excessive ignorance.
Are these two duck’s bodies the same or different?
Answer: Those who are reborn from excessive desire become waterfowl such as ducks and drakes; those who are reborn due to ignorance are land birds such as hawks and owls.
Some are seen both day and night.
Those that are reborn on account of desire always fly together.
Birds that float on water together belong to this category.
Some are seen at night but not seen during the day.
Reborn out of ignorance, these creatures always roam around at night.
There are two kinds of owls:
those who are reborn from desire are hawk owls; they are seen during the day and not at night.
Those who are reborn from ignorance are horned owls; they are seen at night and not during the day.
Furthermore, the Chang ahan jing and the Zeng ahan jing say: There are four kinds of garuḍa birds:
those born from an egg, from a womb, from moisture, and through spontaneous generation.
They all previously generously made offerings.
Because their minds were lofty they fly high in the sky, but they tormented sentient beings and their minds became full of anger and pride, and so they were born among these birds.
They have a garland made of wish-fulfilling jewels and so they can transform themselves in ten thousand ways and their every need is met.
Their bodies are forty miles in height and their clothes are eighty miles in width.
They weigh two and half ounces.
For physical food, they eat turtles and crocodiles (Note:
The Niepan jing, T.374:437b8–9; T.375:678c24–25, says that they can eat and digest all kinds of fish, gold and silver, and so forth. The only exception is vajra.) To increase the pleasure of their sense of touch, they wash their clothes.
They also marry:
two bodies touch each other and form yin and yang.
Their life spans are one world age, though some are shorter.
On the northern shore of the great ocean is a tree called Jiuluozhenma.
Its height is one hundred yojanas and its shade extends fifty yojanas.
To the east of the tree is the palace for the egg-born dragons and the palace for the egg-born garuḍas.
To the south of the tree is the palace for the womb-born dragons and the palace for the womb-born garuḍas.
To the west of the tree is the palace for the moisture-born dragons and the palace for the moisture-born garuḍas.
To the north of the tree is the palace for dragons born through spontaneous generation and the palace for garuḍas born through spontaneous generation.
Each of these palaces is six thousand yojanas long and wide.
Each is decorated as described above.
When an egg-born garuḍa flies down to the ocean it hits the water with its wings and the water opens up to a depth of two hundred yojanas.
The garuḍa captures egg-born dragons and eats them freely. The Huayan jing, ref. Dazhidu lun, T.1509:566b18–21, says:
This bird eats dragons; if the wind that it stirs with its wings goes into human eyes, it blinds them at once; therefore this bird does not appear among humans as it fears damaging human eyes.) The cases of womb-born and moisture-born garuḍas and those born through spontaneous generation are similar. The Niepan jing, T.374:437c1; T.375:679a17–18, says that the only creature garuḍas cannot eat are those that have received the Three Refuges.) There was a dragon who was receiving the eight precepts on an important day of fasting that occurs once every six years.
At that time a garuḍa wished to eat it and carried the dragon in its beak to the top of a great iron tree north of Mount Sumeru.
The tree was one hundred and sixty thousand miles in height.
When the garuḍa looked for the dragon’s tail he could not find it.
The bird listened to the teaching and also received the five precepts.
Furthermore, the Guanfo sanmei jing says:
The king of the garuḍas, named Zhengyin, was happy and lived free among numerous species of birds.
In this world he ate one dragon king and five hundred small dragons each day. In all of the four continents surrounding Mount Sumeru he ate the same number of dragons every day.
He toured around the continents, eating every day, and started all over again the next day.
After eight thousand years the sign of death appeared and many dragons spat out poison. The garuḍa could not eat .
Hungry and afraid, it found no peace and came to Vajra Mountain.
The garuḍa went straight downward from Vajra Mountain and from the edge of a large body of water proceeded to the edge of a circle of wind.
It was blown by the wind back up to Vajra Mountain. This was repeated seven times, and then the garuḍa died.
The poison that the bird had eaten caused the ten jewel mountains to all catch fire at the same time.
The dragon king Nanda feared that they might burn down Vajra Mountain so he caused torrential rainfall with raindrops as big as the axle of a chariot.
The flesh of the dead garuḍa completely disappeared and only its mind remained.
It went downward and returned seven times, and then it rested on Vajra Mountain as before.
The dragon king Nanda picked it up and treated it as if it were a clear jewel.
The universal monarch obtained it and treated it as a wish-fulfilling jewel.
If a person contemplates the Buddha his mind becomes like this garuḍa’s mind.
Furthermore the Loutan jing and the Chang ahan jing say:
There are four kinds of dragons.
All of them had previously been full of anger, with dishonest and perverse minds, but they later performed a great act of giving, as a consequence of which they received their present bodies. Due to this merit of giving, their palaces are made of seven jewels.
The location of these palaces is as described above in the section on garuḍas.) The dragons are forty miles in height, and their clothes are forty miles long, eighty miles wide, and weigh two and half ounces.
They have full command of supernatural powers.
They eat and drink food of a hundred flavors.
After they eat the last mouthful of food they turn into frogs.
If they teach their attendants, causing them to make the intention to pursue the religious path and make offerings to monks, and if they let the dragons make offerings to monks, the sand does not fall over them and they are free from many afflictions.
They can also transform themselves into snakes, and then they do not encounter frogs nor garuḍas.) They eat turtles and crocodiles for physical food.
They wash their clothes to increase the pleasure of the tactile sense.
They also marry:
two bodies touch each other and form yin and yang.
Their life span is one kalpa, though some have shorter life spans.
They can avoid being eaten by garuḍas.
There are sixteen kinds of dragons: Sāgara, Nanda, Upananda, Elā pattra, Dhṛtarāṣṭra, Shanjian, Alu, Qiejuluo , Qiepiluo, Apalāla, Qienou, Quqienou, Anavatapta, Supratiṣṭhita, Yuoshanqiebotou, and Takṣaka.
The Loutan jing T.23:288b1–b8) and the Huayan jing (ref.
Chang ahan jing, T.1:127b3–5) say: The dragon king Sāgara lives at the bottom of the ocean to the north of Mount Sumeru.
His palace is seven thousand yojanas long and wide and made of seven jewels.
It is surrounded by seven walls, which are decorated with balustrades covering them like a net.
In the palace garden, groves, and bathing pool many birds sing in harmony.
The palace has golden walls and silver gates.
Each gate is two thousand four hundred miles in height and two thousand two hundred miles wide.
They are beautifully painted in wonderful colors and constantly guarded by five hundred demons and gods.
There it rains according to the dragon king’s wishes.
Ordinary dragons cannot reach the palace of the dragon king nor stay there.
The tide from the palace flows into the ocean.
Its color is that of lapis lazuli.
The Hailongwang jing says: The dragon king said to the Buddha, “From the beginning of the world age I have lived in the great ocean.
From the time of Krakucchanda Buddha there have not been many wives for me nor many children born to me in the ocean.
Yet, there are many ocean dragons now.” The Buddha told the dragon king, “When someone leaves the householder’s life, following the Buddha’s teaching, and breaks the precepts but does not abandon the correct views, he does not fall into hell.
When such a person ends his life span, he is reborn among dragons.” The Buddha told the dragon king, “At the time of Krakucchanda Buddha, nine billion eight hundred million lay followers renounced the householder’s life.
Those who broke the precepts were all reborn among dragons.
At the time of Kanakamuni Buddha, eight billion lay followers renounced the householder’s life.
Those who broke the precepts and indulged in their whims without restraint were all reborn among dragons when their lives ended.
At the time of Jiashe Buddha six billion four hundred million lay followers renounced the householder’s life.
Those who violated the precepts were all reborn among dragons.
During my lifetime, ninety-nine billion lay followers will renounce the householder’s life.
Those who fight and revile the scriptures and precepts will be reborn among dragons after their death. Those who have committed these crimes in the past have for this reason already been reborn in the great ocean.
This is the reason why there are countless numbers of dragons in the great ocean.
After my death many lay devotees will violate the precepts and will either be reborn among dragons or fall into hell.
Furthermore, the Senghu jing says:
At that time the World-honored One told the monk Senghu , “You saw the dragon king in the great ocean.
Having received a dragon’s body with fangs, shells, fins, and horns, his appearance is fearsome.
He is unapproachable because of his bad smell and his filthiness.
Because he has been born as an animal he cannot practice the teaching of renouncing the householder’s life.
He cannot escape being eaten by the king of garuḍas.
“Dragons sleep a lot by nature.
There are five occasions in which a dragon cannot hide itself:
when it is born, when it dies, when it performs sexual acts, when it is angry, and when it sleeps.
“There are also four poisonous flaws because of which he cannot act according to the correct teaching: Because of the flaw of poisonous speech he cannot live according to the teaching.
If he speaks and someone hears it, the one who heard him speak is harmed.
Because of the flaw of poisonous appearance he cannot live according to the teaching.
If someone sees his body he will necessarily harm the one who saw him.
Because of the flaw of poisonous breath he cannot live according to the teaching.
If he breathes upon someone, the one his breath touches is harmed.
Because of the flaw of poisonous touch, he cannot live according to the teaching.
If someone touches him, the one who touches him is harmed.” The Pusa chutai jing says:
The Buddha told Zhiji Bodhisattva, “Once, for a period of innumerable world ages, I was a king of the garuḍas.
My palace, back garden, and bathing pool were all made of seven jewels.
I felt free at heart, just like a universal monarch.
I could go into the ocean and look for dragons for food.
“At that time, in that ocean there was a dragon that had been born through transformation.
On days of fasting it upheld the eight precepts.
At that time the kings of the garuḍas were eight thousand yojanas in length.
Their right and left wings were each four hundred yojanas long.
I hit the ocean with my wings in order to seize a dragon.
Before the wave ended and the water came back together, I flew out holding the dragon in my beak.
When garuḍas eat a dragon, they swallow it tail first.
I then proceeded to the great iron tree north of Mount Sumeru, sixty thousand miles in height.
Having arrived there, I wished to eat the dragon I had caught and looked for its tail but could not find it.
One day and night later, on the next day, the dragon showed its tail for the first time and said to me, ‘I am a dragon born through transformation.
If I fail to uphold the teaching of the eight precepts on fasting days, you will immediately perish.’ “When I heard this, I repented and said, ‘The power of the Buddha is very difficult to fathom.
I have a palace not far from here.
Go there with me and let us enjoy ourselves.’ The dragon then followed me to my palace and, looking upon it, said, ‘Now these dependents of yours have not heard the Tathāgata’s teaching of the eight precepts for fasting days.
Let me instruct them on the precepts and rites.
Then when their life spans are finished they can be reborn among humans.’ Then the dragon read aloud all the teachings of the eight precepts and he preached the following verses at my palace.” I am a dragon prince. I cultivated the Buddha’s doctrine for seven thousand world ages. I had a mind that was as sharp as a needle that can pierce the leaves of a tree.
But I broke a precept and was reborn in the body of a dragon. My palace is inside the ocean. It is also made of seven jewels, gems and crystal, clear moonstones, and gold and silver. You may follow me there and observe the cultivation of Buddha’s teaching, And further increase the foundation of good deeds. The Buddha’s compassion extends everywhere.
“At that time, the birds heard the dragon’s preaching and received the instruction of the eight precepts for fasting days.
They spoke out spontaneously, ‘From now on until the end of this life span, we will refrain from killing as the Buddha taught.’ The dependents of the garuḍa received the Three Refuges and followed the dragon to the ocean palace.
There was a stupa of seven jewels in which the teachings of the buddhas were hidden.
There was also a box of seven jewels filled with Buddhist scriptures.
People brought offerings, as in heaven.
The dragon said to the garuḍa, ‘I have received the body of a dragon and my life span in this body, lasting many world ages, has not yet been exhausted.
I have not yet committed killing which would disturb my nature as a being who lives in water.’ At that time the male and female dragons achieved understanding.
After their life spans were completed they all were reborn in the land of Amitābha Buddha.” According to the scriptures there exist fortunate dragons.
Due to their karmic retribution all pleasures are available to them:
wives, concubines, and performing girls; clothing, food, and drink; elephants, horses, and the seven precious objects. All these are available.
They enjoy leisurely pleasure at will to a much greater degree than do humans.
Also in the six heavens of desire there are birds and animals, and they enjoy pleasures at will.
On the other hand, there are dragons that have not been greatly blessed with fortune.
Every day they are exposed to hot sands and small insects bite them.
Among humans, animals are whipped, forced to carry light and heavy burdens, and made to run quickly. There is no freedom for them.
They live in the water, on land, or in the sky, but as with insufficient water and grass they fight and harm each other.
Again, in the Iron Surrounding Mountains, animals of two realms permanently live together in darkness, subject to pain without relief and they do not enjoy any pleasure even for a brief moment.
We cannot describe their pain in detail.
According to the scriptures, people love and treasure dragons, supernatural horses, phoenixes, peacocks, parrots, mountain and day pheasants; people hate to see and are unhappy to hear the sounds of monkeys, mountain dogs, wolves, tigers, single-horn water buffaloes, venomous and nonvenomous snakes, owls, and hawks.
It is difficult to exhaustively list and describe the good and bad appearances of all creatures.
We know whether creatures are noble or ignoble.
We cannot describe them here in detail. Miracle Stories In the Wei dynasty  a monster appeared during the Huangchu period . A monster called Jiaguo appeared in the mountains of the Shu region. A bird monster appeared in the mountains of the Yue region.
A sheep monster appeared in Ji Huanzi’s well. During the Jin dynasty a dog monster appeared in the grounds of Huai Yao’s house. A dog monster appeared during the time of Yi Xin. Monsters were born between human beings and animals, according to the Record of the Western Regions.
During the Huangchu period of the Wei dynasty a man was traveling at night on a horse in an area of small hills.
He saw an animal the size of a rabbit in the middle of the road.
Its eyes were like mirrors.
It had jumped over a bank and now blocked the horse’s passage, preventing it from going ahead.
Surprised and frightened, the man fell off the horse.
The specter then seized him and the man fainted.
After a while he revived.
When he revived, the specter had departed and he did not know where it had gone.
Thereupon he mounted his horse and traveled on for several miles until he met another man.
After exchanging greetings the first man described the strange event that had happened to him and said that he was very happy to have found some company.
The second man said, “I am also traveling alone. I am happy beyond words to be able to provide company for you.
You should go quickly ahead on your horse.
I will follow behind.” So the two men traveled together.
The second man asked, “What did the thing that frightened you look like?” The first man answered, “Its body was like a rabbit and its eyes were like mirrors.
It was very ugly.” His traveling companion said, “Just look back at me.” The first man looked back and saw that was again the same specter, which then jumped on the horse; the man fell on the ground and fainted out of fear.
The man’s family found it strange that his horse came back alone, so they went out looking for him.
They found him on the road. After the night had passed he regained consciousness and described his experiences as above.
On a high mountain in the southwest region of Shu is a creature similar to a monkey.
It is seven feet tall and can walk like a human being. called Jiaguo, is good at running and chasing people.
It is also called Mahua, and sometimes it is called Jueyuan.
This creature hides on the road. When an adult woman passes by, the creature seizes her and takes her away. People can never find where the abducted person has been taken.
When someone passes by this creature, it pulls the person in with a long rope and no one can escape it.
This creature can distinguish men from women by smell; it takes women but does not touch men.
When the creature gets a woman, it starts a family with her. If the woman is childless she is not allowed to return for the rest of her life.
After ten years her appearance changes and she resembles the creature.
Her mind is also disturbed and she does not wish to return.
If the woman has a child she is sent back home, with the child.
The baby always looks human.
If she does not raise the child the mother dies immediately.
For this reason, captured women are afraid and do not dare to abandon the children they have with the creature.
When the children grow up they look no different from any human being.
They all have the surname of Yang.
Therefore, now in the southwest region of Shu there are many people with the surname Yang, and they are all descendants of Jiaguo or Mahua.
Deep in mountains in the land of Yue there is a bird about the size of a pigeon, blue in color, called the zhi bird.
It cuts a hole in a big tree and makes a nest that resembles a fiveor six-gallon vessel and with an entrance that is several inches in diameter.
The nest is decorated all over with clay with red and white sections. The nest looks like a shooting target made of animal skin.
When woodcutters see a tree with such a nest, they flee from it.
Sometimes in the dark of night someone does not see the bird.
The bird also knows that the person has not seen it and calls out, “Oh, how extraordinary!
Climb up.
Climb up tomorrow. Oh, how extraordinary!
Climb down.
Climb down tomorrow.” Even if the zhi bird does not let the person leave and talks and laughs like a human being, one should never cut down the tree.
If an impure and defiled person comes to the place, a tiger appears and guards the area through the night.
If the person does not leave the tiger will attack and hurt them.
If you were to look at this bird during the day, its form is that of an ordinary bird.
Listening to it at night, the sound is also that of an ordinary bird.
When pleasure-seekers arrive, these creatures take on human form, three feet in height, harvest crabs from a creek, and roast them at the newcomers’ fire.
The people cannot touch the creatures.
The people of Yue call these birds the ancestors of the priests in the Yue region.
Ji Huanzi dug a well and obtained an earthenware pot, which contained a yangma .
He asked Confucius, “I dug a well and obtained a dog.
What does this mean?” Confucius said, “From what I have heard, it should have been a sheep.
I heard that the spirits of wood and stones are called quqi and wangliang ; the spirit in the water is longmang ; and the spirit in the ground is called biyang .
The Xiading zhi says that the water monster Wangxiang looks like a threeyear-old child: its eyes are red; it is black in color; it has large ears, long arms, and red nails.
If you catch this creature, you can eat it.
The Wangzi says, “The spirit of wood is floating light; the spirit of metal is clear brilliance.” During the Yuangang period of the Jin dynasty , in Huai Yao’s house in the Lou district of Wu Commandery, the sound of puppies was suddenly heard.
The place over the sound had a small hole, like a hole made by an earthworm.
Yao poked into the hole with a stick.
The stick went in for several feet and then struck something.
Yao then dug up the place and found one male and one female puppy.
Their eyes had not yet opened.
Their size was that of ordinary dogs.
Yao fed the dogs and they ate.
Neighbors all came to see the dogs.
An elder said, “These dogs are called Xi dogs.
If one obtains them, his family will prosper.” Because their eyes had not opened, Yao put the puppies back and covered the surface of the ground with soil, patting it down so that the spot was flat.
When Yao looked for the place after a while, there was no hole and he could not find its exact location.
For many years there was no particular fortune or misfortune in Yao’s family.
During the Daxing period , in the government office of Wu Commandery, two animals, similar to the two dogs described above, were found.
After that the governor, Zhang Mao, was killed by the soldiers of Wuxing.
The Shizi says, “There is a dog in the ground.
The dog is called Ground Wolf.
There is a man in the ground.
The man is called No Harm.” The Xiading zhi says, “If one digs the ground and obtains a dog, the dog is called Gu; if one digs the ground and obtains a pig, the pig is called Xie; if one digs the ground and obtains a man, the man is called Ju,” Ju is the same as No Harm mentioned above.
All these are natural creatures; we should not call them spirits or treat them as if they were monsters.
The dogs in the ground described here have been called by names other than Ground Wolf but their substance is one and same.
The book Wanbi by the Prince of Huainan says, “The liver of the one thousand-year-old sheep becomes the minister of the earth ; if a toad obtains gu grass, at that time the toad becomes a quail.” These are all the products of the transformation of material substance .
Cosmic responses cause these confusing phenomena.
An old woman of the Gaoxin clan lived in a king’s palace.
She suffered from an ear disease, and a doctor later treated her, digging out a worm the size of a silk cocoon from her ear.
After the lady left, the doctor placed the worm inside a gourd-shaped fence and covered it with a bowl.
Suddenly the worm became a dog with a pattern of five colors.
Therefore, the people called the dog Panhu , and kept it.
At that time, the barbarous people called Wu were very powerful and frequently invaded the border region.
The king sent his generals against the invaders, but they could not achieve victory and capture the barbarians.
So the king announced publicly that if some able person were to obtain the head of the general of the Wu barbarians, he would be rewarded with one thousand ounces of gold, a tract of land with ten thousand families, and even the king’s own young daughter.
Later Panhu came to the palace gate, holding a severed human head.
When the king inspected it, the head turned out to be none other than the head of the general of the Wu barbarians. What should the king do?
All the ministers said, “Panhu is an animal, he should not be given the income of an official, nor should he be given a wife.
Although he has performed a meritorious service, we should give him nothing.” The young daughter of the king heard this and said to the king, “The great king offered me to anyone in the realm under heaven.
Panhu came holding the head in his mouth, having removed a harmful enemy for the sake of the state.
Heaven has caused this.
How could such a deed be attributed to the intelligence of a dog?
The king treats faithfulness to his words as a weighty matter. The military leader treats his credibility before the people as a weighty matter.
You should not renege on your promise, made clearly to everyone in the realm under heaven, just for the sake of the insignificant body of a young daughter.
That would lead to misfortunes in the state.” The king was afraid and obeyed her, allowing his young daughter to go with Panhu.
Panhu took the woman to Mount Zhongnan, where the grasses and trees were dense and there were no traces of human paths.
Thereupon, the woman removed her top robe and took on the appearance of a young servant, carrying a spear with a single twisted point.
Following Panhu, she climbed the mountain, entered the valley, and they finally stopped at a rock cave.
The king yearned for her and sent people to look for her, but the winds and rains came and the peaks quaked under the dark clouds. None of those who went  ever found her.
In this way, three years or so passed during which the woman gave birth to six sons and six daughters.
After Panhu’s death their sons and daughters married each other.
They wove cloth with wood bark and dyed them with grass seeds.
They liked clothing of five colors, and so they cut and sewed the materials they prepared to wear as clothes.
After a while the woman returned and spoke to the king.
The king sent for the men and women who were the woman’s offspring, and it did not rain anymore.
These people wore loose clothes, spoke a foreign language, and drank and ate while crouching.
They loved the mountain and hated the capital city.
The king followed their wishes and granted them famous mountains and wide marshes.
He called them the Manyi barbarians.
Manyi barbarians appear ignorant from the outside, but they are intelligent within. The king granted land to them again and again.
Because they were endowed with an unusual substance from heaven, these creatures were treated differently by the ruler.
They sold the products of their fields and were exempt from government taxation.
All the heads of their villages were provided with a seal.
They use otter skin for their crowns and live in leisure near water.
The barbarians who presently live in the Liang, Han, Ba, Shu, Wuling, Changshe, and Lu Jiang regions are their descendants.
They mix different kinds of fish and meat and sing while banging on buckets, and they sacrifice to Panhu regularly.
This custom is preserved even today.
Therefore, people say that the Jigan and Hengrun people are Panhu’s descendants.
The Record of the Western Regions by Dharma Master Xuanzang (T.2087:
The kingdom of Siṃhala (Note: This is not a kingdom in India but since it is on the route to India its description is appended.) was originally a treasure island.
There are many rare treasures and ghosts and spirits dwell there.
Later there was a king in South India whose daughter visited a neighboring state. She was sent back on an auspicious day but encountered a lion on the road.
Her guards abandoned her and fled.
The woman was in a carriage and she accepted the fate of death.
The lion king carried her away on his back.
He entered deep mountains and dark valleys, catching deer and collecting fruit, to provide for her needs regularly.
Months and years later, the woman gave birth to a boy and a girl.
They looked human in appearance but their nature was like that of animals.
When the boy grew up his physical power matched that of carnivorous animals.
While he was still young he displayed human intelligence.
So he asked his mother, “What am I?
My father is a wild animal and my mother is human.
As I do not belong to one category, how am I to marry?” The mother then told her son the events of the past.
The son said, “Humans and animals belong to two different categories of existence.
We must escape as soon as possible.” The mother said, “I once tried to escape but I could not succeed by myself.” Thereafter the son followed his lion father, climbing mountains from peak to peak, observing how his father roamed and rested, so that he would know how to escape from him.
Finally, when the father was away he carried his mother on his back and went to a village.
The mother said, “Let’s be careful about the secret and not tell others about your origin.
If people learn our past they will despise us.” In the kingdom of the woman’s father’s the government was no longer ruled by her family and the ancestral shrine had been destroyed.
So they stayed with a villager.
People asked them, “Which is your kingdom?” They said, “We originally were from this kingdom but we have been roaming around in foreign regions.
Together we, a son and his mother, have now returned to our home village.” All the people took pity on them and gave them food.
When the lion king returned he found his lair empty.
He missed his wife and child and became angry.
So he went out into the mountains and valleys, roaming around the villages and uttering frightening roars.
He attacked people and animals with great cruelty.
When the villagers were away from their village and let down their guard, he caught and killed them.
Only when they struck drums and blew conch shells, carried arrows on their backs and held shields, and traveled in groups could they avoid being harmed.
The king feared that his humane government was being disrupted, and undisciplined hunters wanted to capture the lion.
The king himself led four divisions of soldiers and tried many different strategies, laying ambushes in forests and bushes and traveling across mountains and valleys.
Yet when the lion roared both people and animals fled in fear.
Because he could not capture the lion, the king made an announcement:
“Whoever catches the lion and removes this pest from the kingdom will be heavily rewarded and honored with flags.” When the son heard the king’s announcement he said to his mother, “We have suffered from hunger and cold for a long time. I should respond to the announcement.
If I can catch the lion I can provide comfort for you.” The mother said, “What you say is not right.
If it is that lion, even if it is an animal, it is still your father.
How can you commit the eternal sin of patricide because of life’s hardships?” The son said, “Humans and animals belong to different species. How could there be ceremonial conduct and righteousness in this case? We have already disobeyed him.
Why should we change our minds?” Thereupon, he drew a dagger and went out to respond to the announcement.
At this time, thousands of soldiers and horsemen were gathering together, like clouds or fog.
The lion huddled in the forest and nobody dared to approach him.
Because the lion was his former father, however, the son could approach him.
The lion became affectionate and forgot his anger.
Thereupon, the son thrust the dagger into the lion’s belly.
The lion, still loving and free from anger, and with his belly cut open and bearing his pain, died.
The king said, “Who is this man?
How extraordinary is this!” He tempted him with rewards and threatened him with horrifying punishment.
Thereupon, the son described the details of his circumstances. The king said, “This amounts to the crime of patricide! You went so far as to kill your father. How much more willing would you be to kill those who are not your parents?
Animals are difficult to tame and they are easily affected by evil emotions.” The king turned to the others and said, “But this man has also performed the highly meritorious service of removing the lion that was harming everyone’s lives.
He has committed a crime by terminating his father’s life.
Reward him greatly to match his service.
Exile him afar as punishment for his crime.
Then we shall not counter the law of the state and at the same time we are not reversing my earlier promise of a reward.” On hearing these words, the people filled two boats with a great deal of food and supplies.
The mother remained in the country and was provided generously with rewards.
The son and the daughter set off in separate boats, drifting along with the waves.
The boat carrying the son floated into the ocean and reached the treasure island .
Seeing plentiful rare types of jade, the son settled there.
Later, a merchant traveling to gather treasures also reached this island.
The son killed the merchant and kept his children and women.
Thus, the son’s descendants increased, and eventually they established the ranks of ruler and ministers to maintain hierarchical order.
They linked the cities and built villages, forming a feudal territory.
Because their ancestor had captured a lion, this ancestral feat was used as the name of the state.
The daughter’s boat drifted to Pārṣa.
There, bewitched by spirits, she gave birth and raised numerous daughters.
The consequence of this is the current Western Country of Big Women.
For these reasons, the people of Lion Country are dark and base in appearance, with square jaws and large foreheads.
They have a violent temperament and are resistant to poisoning.
This is all because they inherited something of animal nature.
It is also said that these people are often courageous and strong.
In the Buddhist records, if one follows the Qishi jing, in the past five hundred female demons lived within an iron city on this treasure island.
Furthermore , in a large dragon pond in front of the divine shrine to the north of the city at the eastern border of the state of Kucha, dragons transformed their appearance and mated with mares.
This led to the birth of the hybrid dragon horse.
They were then tamed and ridden.
For this reason, this state produced many good horses.
We heard the following story from an early gazetteer.
Not too long ago, there was a king, called Suvarṇapuṣpa, who established an enlightened government and who communed with and rode a dragon.
When the king wished to go underground he touched the dragon’s ear with his whip.
It then disappeared into hidden places.
The city does not have wells even now so people used the water of the dragon pond.
The dragon changed his appearance into that of a human being and mated with many women.
The children born from this union were brave and could run as fast as horses.
Through this contamination, all of the people in this state came to have the dragon seed.
Being so strong, they terrified others and they did not honor the king’s order.
Thereupon, the king plotted and brought in some Turks to murder them.
Both young and old were massacred and there were no survivors.
Their city is now deserted and no smoke, which would indicate human communities, is ever seen to rise from there.
Compiler’s Comment:
I have frequently heard ignorant people of wrong views say, “There is a difference between noble and humble; humans and animals differ from each other.
How could a human being become an animal or an animal a human being?
The teaching of the Buddha is empty and false, not based on reality.” Why do you hold on to ignorant views and not believe the sayings of the Buddha?
The above examples are described in detail in secular scriptures and histories.
If you were to see the phenomenon with your own eyes, would you still disbelieve it?
If one’s conduct is compassionate and patient, then the outcome will be exactly like that of Zhi, Prince of Chu, whose chronic diseases were all cured.
Or it will be like the case of the Duke of Song: even though he did not pray, the inauspicious stars disappeared in the evening.
If one’s conduct is evil then the consequence is illustrated by events such as the following: The Han people poisoned Ruyi, Prince of Zhao, and a blue dog appeared; the Qi people murdered Pengsheng and the wild boar became the curse.
Even short-lived consequences illustrate the principle.
How much more clearly does the relationship between one’s conduct as cause and good and evil karmic results prove the truthfulness of the principle— sentient beings rise and fall among different realms of existence and receive punishments through many eons!
The Six Realms of Rebirth Introduction, Explanation of the Name, Karmic Retribution, Duration, The Hell Kings, The City of the King of Hell, Karmic Causes , and Warning Signs. Now to come to the hells. The hell realms are dark and difficult, and the pain creatures suffer there is acute and distressing.
Forests of swords rise as high as the sun; the peaks of mountains of swords merge with the sky above.
Boiling cauldrons raise waves; cauldrons of fire go up in flames.
Iron city walls enclose the hells during the day; copper pillars glimmer dully during the night.
These places are filled with frightened sinners suffering great pain, screaming and shouting.
Prison guards with the heads of oxen, malicious eyes, and frightful fangs pierce the torsos of the sinners and pound their livers and hearts.
Fiercely burning flames lap at the sinners’ bodies and destroy their skin completely.
Some sinners have their heads and legs ground up and their spirits cooked.
Their gall bladders are split in pieces and their intestines are pulled out. Their slaughtered bodies are cut up into pieces a delicious meal.
The pain that sinners suffer in hell is beyond words and thought.
Thus, the sinners bob up and down in cauldrons of boiling water; they look up and down in fear and despair inside furnaces of burning coal.
Their flesh is pierced by spears and swords; their bones are crushed and left at the side of other old corpses.
How could anyone sleep peacefully on an iron bed?
How could one get used to staying around copper pillars for a long time?
Because the fire gets into their eyes no tears flow when they cry; because smoke gets into their mouths they utter no sound when they scream.
When someone is in such a place very small things can give relief:
if he encounters a warm wind in the midst of cold ice, or if he senses cool air in the midst of a coal fire, he is immediately pleased and happy.
Someone in Avīci Hell suffers excessive bodily pain.
The iron wall there is eighty thousand yojanas long and wide.
Explosive sounds cause the sinner to shake; foulsmelling smoke rises up everywhere.
The sinner is like a fish in a frying pan: his fat and blood are burned and scorched.
There are no temporary pleasures here; everything someone touches gives pain.
He cannot move or turn around; he is bound up tightly in chains.
He is moved about in every direction:
when the fire that destroys the world at the end of the world age burns in one place, he is moved to another place; when the world age ends in the second place he is returned to the first place.
Cycling in this manner, he passes through an infinite number of world ages.
If a person makes the vow to cultivate the Buddhist Way and repents all his past evil deeds, then at the moment he makes this vow the boiling water in the cauldron becomes clear and pure and the cauldron turns into a flower pond.
The thick smoke rising from the coal furnace becomes an umbrella of incense smoke.
The tall sword trees become a jade forest.
The mountains covered with knives become Vulture Peak.
The copper pillars change their color and the banner of the Dharma is raised up forever.
Steel nets change forms and a vision of the Pure Land appears.
The ox-headed jail guards throw away their swords and take the Three Refuges.
The soldiers in the jail put down their whips and instead take up the five precepts.
Families in conflict are reconciled peacefully and no longer display angry faces.
Creditors are satisfied and there is no one in distress.
The sojourner in these hells who has lost his head and neck becomes whole again because of this change.
One whose bones were crushed into powder and whose muscles were torn into pieces is restored to his original form due to the vow.
Question:
Why is this realm called hell ?
Answer:
According to the Lishi apitan lun , its Sanskrit name is niraya; there is no playful pleasure, no joy, no path to liberation, and no meritorious deeds, and a creature is reborn there because he has not stopped committing evil deeds.
Another explanation is that this realm is the most inferior one in the realm of desire.
It is called the negative realm.
For this reason hell is called niraya.
According to the Posha lun , the term “hell” means “not free.” The sinners there are controlled by the officials of hell and are not free.
Therefore that place is called hell.
The term “hell” also means “not able to love and enjoy.” This is why the place is called hell.
Di in the Chinese word for hell, diyu, means “bottom” .
Hell is located at the absolute bottom of all things.
This is why the place is described as the bottom.
Yu means “room.” The sinners are confined in a room and have no freedom.
For this reason hell is called diyu.
Furthermore, the term for hell in Sanskrit is nir, which marks negation.
There is no way of improving or benefiting one’s present and future lives when one is in jail.
Therefore, hell is described as negation.
Question: There are many kinds of hells.
Some are in the ground, some are above ground, and some are located in the sky.
Why are they all called diyu ?
Answer:
According to old translations, diyu means a narrow space that does not have access to the ground and the sky.
According to the new translation of scriptures and treatises, however, the Sanskrit term for hell is rendered as naraka .
This term refers to all places where human beings suffer excessive pain.
This is why it is appropriate to call hell naraka.
For this reason, the new Posha lun says: Question:
Why is this realm called naraka?
Answer: There sentient beings do not have happiness, love, tastes, material benefits, or joy.
Therefore it is called naraka.
Another view is that sinners have committed excessively violent evil deeds of body, speech, and mind before they go there, so they go there and continue to stay there.
This is why it is called naraka.
Another view is that sinners go to that realm by falling into it.
This is the reason for calling it naraka.
The following verse illustrates this point:
Sinners fall into hell With their feet up and heads down. Because they reviled holy men Who were happily and quietly practicing ascetic deeds.
Another view explains that nara means “man” and ka means “evil.” Evil people are born there.
This is why the realm is called naraka. Question:
Why is the lowest and greatest among all the hells called No Interruption Hell ?
Answer: Sinners in that hell suffer pain constantly.
There are no moments of pleasure interrupting the pain.
Therefore it is called No Interruption. Question:
In other hells sinners cannot enjoy singing, dancing, drinking, or eating. Yet it could be thought that they might have these pleasures as the morally neutral fruit of karmic retribution. If they had such pleasures in the other hells that would have constituted interruptions, but as a matter of fact denizens of those other hells do not have any interruptions in them either.
Why are the other hells also not called No Interruption? Answer:
Although in the other hells there are no yishu pleasures, or the karmic retribution of the morally neutral fruit of acts performed in previous lives , there are still the dengliu pleasures, or karmic retribution that produces the same effect continually from passing causes.
As the Shishe lun says, “In Equally Reviving Hell cool breezes sometimes blow and restore the flesh and blood.
Sometimes there is a voice saying ‘denghuo’ and those sentient beings are suddenly revived.” When the flesh and blood are thus restored and sentient beings are revived, this hell brings pleasure and joy, so there is an interruption of pain and suffering.
Thus this hell is not called No Interruption.
The new Posha lun says:
Question:
Where are the hells? Answer: They are mostly below this world. Question: Why are they said to be “securely standing”?
Answer:
According to one view, if you go forty thousand yojanas under our continent , you will reach the base of No Interruption Hell.
This hell is twenty thousand yojanas high and twenty thousand yojanas wide and deep.
Located in the nineteen thousand yojanas above this hell are the other seven hells, called “securely standing”:
first is the Hell of Extreme Heat, above that is the Hell of Heat, above that the Great Hell of Screaming, above that the Hell of Screaming, above that the Hell of Gathered Multitude, above that the Hell of Black Rope, and above that the Equally Reviving Hell.
Each of these hells is ten thousand yojanas wide and deep.
Above these hells there remains a space of one thousand yojanas.
Five hundred yojanas of this space is white clay and the other five hundred yojanas is soil.
According to another view, under the soil there is No Interruption Hell at the center.
The other seven hells surround it in the same way that villages surround a great city today.
Question:
If so, how does this accord with what the Shishe lun says?
This text says that this world is six thousand yojanas, or three and a half yojanas in periphery.
Each hell is very large.
How can they all be contained underneath the continent of Jambudvīpa?
Answer:
This world is narrow at the top and wide at the bottom, shaped like a pile of grain, so it can contain all these hells at the bottom.
Thus the scripture says that just as when one enters any of the four seas from the shore the sea becomes deeper as one goes in further, so each of the hells has sixteen spheres of increasing intensity.
Namely, each hell has four gates and outside each gate are four spheres of increasing intensity.
First there is the sphere of buried embers, where there are knee-deep embers buried in ash.
Second there is the sphere of corpses and excrement, which is filled with corpses and excrement.
Third there is the sphere of sharp swords.
In this sphere there are three kinds of difficulties.
The first is a road of sword blades, where swords are spread with the blade tips pointing upward to form a road.
The second is a forest of sword leaves.
Here all the leaves are as sharp as the blades of swords.
The third is the forest of steel needles, made of sixteen-inch-long sharp steel needles.
Although these three kinds , such as the road of sword blades and so on, are distinct they form part of the same steel forest. Therefore they are contained in the same sphere.
Fourth there is the sphere of dangerous water.
This sphere is filled with hot saltwater.
Together with the original hell, there are seventeen spheres.
Thus, the eight great hells with their accompanying spheres add up to one hundred and thirty-six places.
Therefore, the scripture says, “There are one hundred and thirtysix narakas.” Thus, the Chang ahan jing says:
There are altogether eight great hells.
Each of these eight great hells has sixteen smaller hells surrounding it.
This configuration is similar to that of the four realms under heaven, which is surrounded by eighty thousand realms under heaven.
Beyond these eighty thousand realms under heaven is the great ocean.
Beyond the ocean is Great Vajra Mountain. Beyond this mountain is another mountain, also called Vajra. The Loutan jing calls the latter Great Iron Ring Mountain.) Between these two mountains are the deities of the sun and moon, but their light does not shine forth.
The eight great hells are Illusory Thought Hell, Black Rope Hell, Crushing Hell, Screaming and Howling Hell, Loud Screaming and Howling Hell, Roasting Hell, Intense Roasting Hell, and No Interruption Hell.
The Loutan jing and other scriptures give different names for the hells, due to differences in translation. The general meanings of the differing translations of the names of the hells are the same.) The sixteen subsections of the first Illusory Thought Hell are as follows.
In this hell sentient beings grow iron claws and when they become angry at each other, they scratch at each other .
Where they touch the bodies of their opponents, the flesh is torn off and the victims then think that they have died.
This is why this hell is called Illusory Thought Hell.
Then the sentient beings in this hell conceive the thought of harming each other.
They grab swords and knives and cut and pierce each other.
Their skin splits and their flesh is cut into pieces; their bodies collapse into a pile on the ground.
They then think that they have died, but cold breezes blow and they subsequently revive.
Then they think to themselves, “Now that I have revived the long period of punishment is over. I am going to leave Illusory Thought Hell.” They fearfully cry out for help.
Suddenly, without realizing what is happening, they arrive at Black Sand Hell.
Hot winds rise violently and blow hot black sand.
When the sand touches their bodies it sticks to them, burning their skin and penetrating to their bones.
A flame is ignited and the fire spreads all over their bodies which become singed.
Yet the punishment is not over and these sinners are purposely not allowed to die. After they have suffered for a long time they leave Black Sand Hell and reach Boiling Excrement Hell.
Here boiling excrement and iron balls appear everywhere in front of them, advancing quickly toward them.
If they touch an iron ball, it singes their hands and body.
If they take it into their mouth, everything is burned as it passes from their throat to their stomach.
There are insects with iron mouths in this hell, and these insects eat their flesh until they reach the bone marrow.
This is infinitely painful. Yet the punishment is not over and the sinners are not allowed to die.
After they have suffered for a long time they leave Boiling Excrement Hell and reach Iron Nail Hell.
The jailors of this hell hit them and make them lie face-down on a hot iron bed.
Stretching their bodies out on the bed, the jailors then nail them down through their hands and feet.
The jailors put five hundred nails all over their bodies.
They are in great pain and scream but they still do not die.
After they have suffered for a long time they leave Iron Nail Hell and reach Hunger Hell of Iron.
The jailors in this hell put them on a hot iron bed and pour melted copper into their mouths, and as the copper flows from mouth to stomach it burns everything as it goes down.
Yet their remaining sins are not exhausted and they do not die.
After they have suffered for a long time they leave Hunger Hell and reach Thirst Hell.
There they are placed on a hot iron bed and jailors put hot iron balls in their mouths, which burn their lips and tongues. As the iron balls go down to their stomachs they burn everything.
The sinners cry and scream in great pain.
After they have suffered for a long time they leave Thirst Hell and reach Copper Cauldron Hell.
Jailors glare at them with angry eyes, and seizing them by the legs they throw them into a cauldron.
As the water in the cauldron boils, they bob up and down in the water and their bodies are cooked until they are about to fall apart.
They experience all kinds of pain simultaneously but purposely they are not allowed to die.
After they have suffered for a long time they leave Copper Cauldron Hell and reach Many Cauldrons Hell.
Jailors seize them by the legs and throw them into a cauldron.
As the water in the cauldron boils they bob up and down in the water and their bodies are cooked until they are about to fall apart.
Then a jailor picks them up with an iron hook and throws them into another cauldron.
They cry and scream in great pain but purposely they are not allowed to die.
After they have suffered for a long time they leave Many Cauldrons Hell and reach Stone Mill Hell.
Jailors seize them and hit them, and then they place them on a heated stone.
They spread out their arms and legs and press on their bodies with another large heated stone.
Then they turn the top stone and grind up their bodies, crushing the bones and flesh into small pieces.
The pain is excruciating yet they purposely are not allowed to die.
After they have suffered for a long time they leave Stone Mill Hell and reach Pus and Blood Hell. Here there is boiling pus and blood everywhere, and as the sinners run from east to west across the blood and pus it covers their bodies.
Their faces are burned and become shapeless.
They also eat the pus and blood, and as they swallow it they experience unbearable pain. Yet purposely they are not allowed to die.
After they have suffered for a long time they leave Pus and Blood Hell and reach Measuring Fire Hell.
There is a huge fire and the violent flames press toward them.
They must take up a hot iron measuring vessel to measure the size of the fire.
As they do this, the fire burns their bodies all over and the heat and pain cause excessive suffering.
They scream and cry aloud yet they purposely are not allowed to die.
After they have suffered for a long time they leave Measuring Fire Hell and reach the Ash River.
The river of hot ash is five hundred yojanas wide and deep.
The water mixed with hot ash boils up and a foul smell permeates everywhere.
The sound the river makes is frightening.
Everywhere from the bottom to the top of this hell, there are iron spikes placed both vertically and horizontally.
On the banks of Ash River is the Sword Forest.
The branches, flowers, and fruits of the trees in this forest are all made of knives and swords.
The sinners must enter the river and following the waves they bob up and down in the water as iron spikes pierce their bodies.
As their bodies are pierced blood and pus flow out.
They feel pain all over their bodies yet purposely they are not allowed to die.
Then they come out of the Ash River and climbing up the bank they reach the Sword Forest.
Here they are cut and pierced by the swords and their bodies suffer severe injuries.
There are also wild dogs and wolves that attack the sinners and eat their flesh while they are alive.
When the sinners climb up a sword tree, the sword blades on the tree are pointed downward; when they climb down, the sword blades are pointed upward.
If they raise their hands they are cut off; when they take a step their feet are severed.
Their skin and flesh fall off.
Only white bones, sinews, and veins remain to connect the skeletons together.
The iron-beaked bird on the sword trees pecks at the sinners’ heads and eats their brains.
The sinners scream in pain but purposely they are not allowed to die.
Then they return to the Ash River and, pushed by the current and bobbing up and down in the waves, are pierced by the iron spikes in the water. They feel pain all over their bodies.
Their skin and flesh are destroyed and lose their original shape; pus and blood ooze out.
Only their skeletons of white bones float in the water.
When a cool breeze blows the sinners that have been reduced to skeletons immediately stand up.
Pulled by the force of their past karma, they suddenly reach Iron Ball Hell without realizing it.
Here there are hot iron balls and the jail guards chase them and make them grab these iron balls.
Their hands and feet are burned beyond shape; their bodies rise up all aflame.
All kinds of pain are simultaneously experienced, yet purposely they are not allowed to die.
After they have suffered for a long time, they leave Iron Ball Hell and reach Ax Hell.
Jail guards seize the sinners and hit them, they place them on a hot iron table and cut off their hands, legs, ears, noses, tongues, and the rest of their bodies.
They scream in extreme pain yet they still are not allowed to die.
After they have suffered for a long time they leave Ax Hell and reach Wild Dogs and Wolves Hell.
Here packs of wild dogs and wolves come one after the other to attack and tear up the bodies of the sinners.
Their flesh falls off and their bones are cracked; pus and blood ooze out.
They feel pain all over their bodies yet they are purposely not allowed to die.
After they have suffered for a long time they leave Wild Dogs and Wolves Hell and reach Sword Tree Hell.
When the sinners enter the sword forest a violent windstorm arises and blows the sword leaves down, which drop onto the bodies of the sinners.
all over their heads, faces, and bodies; there is nowhere that is not injured.
The iron-beaked bird pecks at their eyes.
The sinners scream wildly in extreme pain but purposely they are not allowed to die.
After they have suffered for a long time they leave Sword Tree Hell and reach Cold Ice Hell, where icy cold winds blow over their bodies, freezing them all over and their skin and flesh drop off.
The sinners scream in pain and then their life ends.
If one’s physical bodily acts have not been good and his speech and thought are likewise not good, then a sinner will fall into Illusory Thought Hell.
The prospect of this is so frightening that it makes the hair on one’s body stand up. The second great hell is Black Rope Hell , and it is surrounded by sixteen smaller hells, each of which is five hundred yojanas wide and deep.
Why is this great hell called Black Rope?
Here the jailors of hell seize the sinner, beat him, and place him on a hot iron bed with his body stretched out.
Then they stretch him with hot iron ropes, and following the pattern of the ropes they cut the sinner with an ax into one hundred thousand pieces.
Then they saw him with a stretched iron rope.
Then they hang hot iron ropes in all directions, crossing each other at innumerable points.
The jailors chase the sinner through these ropes.
A windstorm arises and causes the ropes to tangle around the sinner’s body, and they burn the sinner’s skin and penetrate into his flesh, scorching the bones and boiling the bone marrow.
The sinner suffers extreme pain all over his body.
The remaining effects of his sins from previous lives are not exhausted, however, so purposely he is not allowed to die.
This is the reason this hell is called Black Rope.
After the sinner has suffered for a long time he leaves Black Rope hell and reaches Black Sand Hell. In this manner he goes through different hells until he reaches Cold Ice Hell, where his life ends. We will not describe all of the hells in detail here.
The sinner suffers great pain in the remaining sixteen hells in a manner similar to the case of Illusory Thought Hell above.
Only the severity of the pain increases.
A person falls into Black Rope Hell from entertaining evil thoughts against his parents, the Buddha, or arhats.
The pain one suffers in that hell is immeasurable. The third great hell is Pressing and Crushing Hell.
This hell also has sixteen smaller hells surrounding it, each of which is five hundred yojanas deep and wide.
Why is it called Pressing and Crushing?
There are two great rock mountains facing each other and when a person enters the space between them, the mountains spontaneously come together, pressing and crushing his body.
When the bones and flesh have been crushed and ground into small particles, the mountains return to their original places.
The sinner suffers extreme pain all over his body but he is purposely not allowed to die.
There is also a huge iron elephant, and its entire body is ablaze in flames.
It screams and comes running, and stepping upon the sinner it then rolls on top of him.
The sinner’s body is crushed and pus and blood ooze out.
The sinner howls and wails in pain but he is purposely not allowed to die.
Furthermore, the jail guards seize the sinner and make him lie down on a large rock. They then crush his body with another large rock.
Or they put him down on the ground and pound him with an iron pestle.
From head to toe, the skin and flesh are crushed and ground, and pus and ooze flow out.
He experiences all sorts of pain and yet the remaining effects of his sins in previous lives are not exhausted so purposely he is not allowed to die.
These are the reasons this hell is called Pressing and Crushing.
After he has suffered for a long time, the sinner leaves Pressing and Crushing Hell and reaches Black Sand Hell and the other hells, finally arriving at Cold Ice Hell, where his life ends.
A person falls into Pressing and Crushing Hell for committing the three kinds of evil deeds and failing to perform the three kinds of good deeds.
The pain he suffers there is immeasurable.
The fourth great hell is Screaming and Howling Hell.
This hell also has sixteen smaller hells surrounding it, each five hundred yojanas long and wide.
Why is this hell called Screaming and Howling?
The jailors of this hell seize the sinner and throw him into a large cauldron of boiling water and it cooks the sinner.
The pain is excruciating and the sinner cries out.
Then they take the sinner out of the cauldron and throw him into a large hot pan, in which he is jostled back and forth, as if being stir-fried.
After he has suffered for a long time the sinner leaves Screaming and Howling Hell and reaches the other hells starting with Black Sand and ending up at Cold Ice, and then his life ends.
A person falls into Screaming and Howling hell for committing evil deeds out of anger and resentment..
The fifth great hell is Loud Screaming and Howling Hell.
This hell also has sixteen smaller hells surrounding it. The size of this hell is the same as the earlier ones.) Why is this hell called Loud Screaming and Howling?
The jail guards seize the sinner and put him in a large iron pot.
The sinner is in the cauldron for a long time and the boiling water cooks him.
The sinner is then thrown into a large iron pan and jostled back and forth, over and over.
The pain is excruciating and the sinner cries and screams loudly.
The remaining effects of the sins he committed in his previous lives are not exhausted, however, so he is purposely not allowed to die. For this reason this hell is called Loud Screaming and Howling.
After he has suffered for a long time the sinner leaves Loud Screaming and Howling Hell and after going through many hells, he eventually reaches Cold Ice Hell, where his life ends.
A person falls into Loud Screaming and Howling Hell because he held many heterodox views and was dragged around by the net of attachments, and committed base acts.
The sixth great hell is Roasting Hell.
This hell also has sixteen smaller hells surrounding it. The size of this hell the same as the earlier ones.) Why is this hell called Roasting?
The jailors of this hell seize the sinner and put him in an iron city.
The city burns, glowing red both inside and outside, and the sinner is roasted.
They then attach him to an iron building, which burns, glowing red both inside and outside.
They then throw him into an iron kiln.
The fire burns and the kiln glows red both inside and outside, and the sinner is roasted.
His skin and flesh are scorched out of shape and he experiences all sorts of pain.
The remaining effects of the sins he committed in his previous lives are not exhausted, however, and he purposely is not allowed to die.
For this reason, this hell is called Roasting.
After the sinner has suffered for a long time he leaves Roasting Hell and after going through many hells he eventually reaches Cold Ice Hell, where his life ends.
A person falls into Roasting Hell because he has roasted other sentient beings, so he suffers the pain of being roasted for the duration of a period of a long night.
The seventh great hell is Intense Roasting Hell.
This hell also has sixteen smaller hells surrounding it. The size of this hell is the same as the earlier ones.) Why is it called Intense Roasting?
It is so called because the jail guards of this hell seize the sinner and put him in an iron city, which burns, glowing red both inside and outside.
The sinner is roasted; his skin and flesh are scorched out of shape and he experiences pain all over his body.
There is a large fire tunnel containing a brightly burning fire.
At both ends of the tunnel is a large mountain of fire.
The jail guards seize the sinner, pierce him with an iron fork, and put him upright into the fire, and he roasts in the flames, his skin and flesh scorched out of shape. The remaining effects of the sins he committed in his previous lives are not exhausted, however, so purposely he is not allowed to die.
After he has suffered for a long time he leaves Intense Roasting Hell, and after going through many hells he reaches Cold Ice Hell, where his life ends.
A person falls into Intense Roasting hell because he has abandoned doing deeds that produce good karma and has committed evil deeds.
The eighth great hell is No Interruption .
This hell also has sixteen smaller hells surrounding it. The size of this hell is the same as the earlier ones.) Why is it called Avīci?
This term means that the hell continue without interruption.
Why is it said to have no interruption?
The jail guards of this hell seize the sinner and flay him from head to toe.
Then they bind the sinner’s body with strips of his own flayed skin and attach the body to a burning vehicle.
As the wheels of the vehicle turn, hitting the hot ground again and again, the body is crushed and the skin and flesh fall off.
The sinner experiences all kinds of pain, yet he is purposely not allowed to die.
There is also an iron city in which fire burns from four directions.
The flames from the eastern end reach the western end, and the flames from the western end reach the eastern end.
Similarly, the flames all reach from the southern to the northern ends and from top to bottom.
The fire burns intensely and advances quickly. There is no empty space that the fire does not reach.
The sinner runs around from east to west , but his body is burned, the skin and flesh are scorched and lose their shape, and he feels sharp and excruciating pain.
The sinner experiences all sorts of pain.
After he has been inside the city for a long time, the jail guards open the gates of the city.
The sinner runs toward the gates, flames coming out of all his joints, but just as he is about to reach the gates they automatically close.
The remaining effects of the sins that the person committed in his previous lives have not been exhausted, and for this reason he is purposely not allowed to die.
Furthermore, in this hell, if a sinner opens his eyes to see, he perceives only unpleasant forms.
His ears perceive only unpleasant sounds, his nose only unpleasant smells, his body feels only pain, and his mind generates only unpleasant thoughts.
There is not even a period of time as brief as it takes to snap one’s fingers when the sinner feels no pain.
Therefore, this hell is called No Interruption.
After the sinner has suffered for a long time he leaves No Interruption Hell, and after going through the other hells he finally reaches Cold Ice Hell, where his life ends.
A person falls into No Interruption Hell because he repeatedly committed sinful deeds that led to rebirths in inferior realms.
The punishments a sinner receives in this hell are beyond measure and description.
These hells are called the eight great hells.
In each of them the sinner goes through sixteen smaller hells and suffers as described above.
Furthermore, the Guanfo sanmei hai jing says:
Avīci Hell is eight thousand yojanas long and wide.
This hell is surrounded by seven iron city walls and covered by seven layers of iron nets. Seven sections divided into eighteen units surround the hell.
There are also seven lines forests of swords in this hell In the four corners of this hell are four large bronze dogs, forty yojanas long and wide.
Their eyes are like flashes of lightning; their fangs are like trees of swords; their teeth are like mountains of swords; their tongues are like steel daggers; the fur all over their bodies is ablaze with a fierce fire emitting foul-smelling smoke.
There are eighteen jail guards of this hell; their mouths are like the mouths of the most hideous demons.
Their sixty-four eyes project iron balls.
Dog fangs protrude from their mouths, pointing upward to a distance of four yojanas above their mouths.
From the tip of their fangs fire shoots out and spews forth burning iron carriages.
The hoops of the carriage wheels are ablaze and tongues of the fire form sharp swords and halberds which set the city of Avīci Hell on fire.
As the city burns it glows red like molten copper.
The jail guards of this hell have eight heads and sixty-four horns, and fire burns at the tip of their horns.
The flames turn into steel, which in turn becomes a wheel of swords.
These wheels emerge one after another between the flames and fill up the city of Avīci Hell.
There are seven iron flags in the city.
Fire springs up as if it were boiling and melted iron flows everywhere.
On top of the four gates are melting pots from which molten copper overflows, spreading throughout the city.
There are eighty-four thousand iron dragons and snakes between divided sections.
These creatures spit poison into all the fire, and their bodies fill the entire city.
They make howling sounds like thunder and lightning in the sky, and large iron balls rain down.
There are five hundred demons and fifty billion insects.
Fire pours from the heads of eighty-four thousand creatures like rain and fills up Avīci Hell.
When the insects descend a ferocious fire blazes brilliantly, illuminating eighty-four thousand yojanas above this hell.
Above Avīci Hell is a great ocean and the water pours down into the hell, in drops as large as chariot axles that fill the Avīci fortress.
When someone who has killed his father, harmed his mother, or insulted the six classes of close relatives dies, the bronze dogs transform themselves into eighteen carriages with jeweled tops and the flames in this hell become jade women.
When he sees these things from a distance, he is delighted and wants to go there.
As the wind breaks up the corpse the sinner feels extremely cold and says, “I should go get the fire on the carriages.” When the sinner goes to a carriage the burning fire explodes and his life ends inside the golden carriage.
The creatures that he saw as jade women earlier all take up iron axes and cut up his body.
The sinner immediately falls directly into Avīci Hell, falling like a spinning wheel of fire from the highest section of the hell down to the lowest.
When his body reaches the lowest section, the bronze dogs howl loudly, bite into the bones, and eat the bone marrow.
A hell demon picks up an iron fork and pierces the head of the sinner to pull him up.
The flames covering the sinner’s body fill up Avīci Hell.
Yama, the King of Hell, declares in a loud voice, “A stupid person fated for hell!
When you were in the world you were unfilial to your parents and immoral in other ways.
This place where you have now been reborn is call Avīci Hell.” In this way, everything unfolds and the sinner experiences great suffering that is beyond description.
One day and night of punishment in hell is equivalent to sixty shorter world ages in this world, which is equal to one great world age.
Those who have committed one of the five grave sins are punished here for five world ages.
There are also sentient beings who have committed one of the four grave sins.
They may have eaten almsfood obtained from lay believers under false pretenses, while holding heterodox views that revile the proper authorities and, out of ignorance about causes and conditions, they abandoned the study of perfect wisdom .
Or they have destroyed images of the Buddha in any of the ten directions. Or they may have stolen monastic property.
Or they may have immorally engaged in licentious acts, coercing and violating nuns who were upholding precepts of purity, or sisters and other relatives, committing numerous evil deeds.
These people’s sins are such that they are punished just before their lives end in the following ways.
For a period of eighty-four thousand great world ages, they enter the eighteen eastern sections of the hell and are punished in the manner described above; similarly, in the southern, western, and northern sections.
Their bodies fill Avīci Hell and their four limbs fill the eighteen sections of hell.
Avīci Hell contains eighteen smaller hells and in each of these smaller hells there are eighteen Cold Ice hells, eighteen Darkness hells, eighteen Heat hells, eighteen Wheels of Knives hells, eighteen Wheels of Swords hells, eighteen Carriages on Fire hells, eighteen Boiling Excrement hells, eighteen Cauldrons of Boiling Water hells, eighteen Ash River hells, fifty billion Forest of Swords hells, fifty billion Forest of Daggers hells, fifty billion Copper Pillar hells, fifty billion Steel Mechanism hells, fifty billion Iron Net hells, eighteen Iron Cave hells, eighteen Iron Ball hells, eighteen Pointed Stones hells, and eighteen Drinking Molten Copper hells.
Thus in Avīci Hell there are these eighteen hells and within each of these hells there are eighteen sub-hells.
From the Cold Ice hell to Drinking Molten Copper hell, altogether there are one hundred and forty-two sub-hells.
Each is connected with different past evil deeds, but those who experience Avīci Hell visit them all.
Again the Qishi jing says:
The Buddha told the monks, “Inside the large Avīci Hell are sixteen smaller hells that are subordinate to it and surround it.
Each of these is five hundred yojanas in size.
All sentient beings who are born, or emerge, or live there are born there because of the fruit of past evil karma.
Jailors seize the bodies of the sinners in this hell with both hands and violently throw them on a ground of red-hot iron.
Fierce flames immediately rise and spread quickly, covering the ground.
Then the jailors take sharp knives and, starting from the heels and going upward, they cut apart the sinners’ bodies and remove their muscles.
They take the muscles in their hands and pull them.
They pull and pull all the muscles together, all the way up to the sinners’ heads.
As they are being pulled the muscles rip through the heart, and the pain the sinners experience is beyond words.
After having pulled out the muscles in this manner, the jailors put the sinners on iron carriages and run with them very fast.
The carriages are very hot with blazing bright flames.
Everywhere they go it is empty like a cave.
A narrow road of hot iron goes on and on.
The carriages follow the will of the guards in hell and do not stop even for a short while.
Wherever they want the carriages to go, the carriages go accordingly, and everywhere they go, the jailors pull out the sinners’ muscles.
The jailors never leave the sinners even for a moment and everywhere they go they remove more from the sinners’ bodies, until there is no flesh or blood left in their bodies.
The sinners experience the karmic consequences of all the deeds that they committed either as a human being or a nonhuman creature.
“As retribution for evil deeds a great fire suddenly appears in the eastern direction.
Glowing bright red, this large and ferocious fire blazes up.
The same thing happens in each of the other directions, in the south, west, north, in the four intermediate directions, and above and below.
The sinners are surrounded by all these large masses of fire, which gradually come closer, causing them to experience all sorts of pain.
From the eastern wall a large flaming fire emerges, immediately shoots toward the western wall, and stays there after reaching it.
From the western wall a large flame emerges and immediately shoots toward the northern wall.
From the northern wall a large flame emerges and immediately shoots toward the southern wall.
Flames shoot from below to above and from above to below.
Horizontal lines of shooting flames touch each other and vertical lines cross over them.
The space is filled with intensely bright light and red-hot heat. Flames fly and hit each other.
At this point the jailors of hell throw the sinners into the middle of these masses of six kinds of flying fire, and the sinners experience extreme pain.
“Still their life does not end.
The karmic effects of their evil deeds are not yet exhausted, so they suffer in the midst of this hell with all its pain.
Because of the consequences of their evil deeds in past lives, sentient beings in Avīci Hell suffer pain for an infinitely long period of time. “Then the four gates of hell open again.
When the gates open, the sinners hear the sound and see the gates open.
Running toward the gates, they think:
‘Now we will surely be able to get out!’ When a sinner runs in great speed his body burns, ferociously ablaze.
It is as if a person carrying a torch of dried grass ran against the wind; the flames of the torch would surely blaze up .
The sinner stops running and then resumes running.
His body falls into pieces and burns even more brightly.
When he raises his feet, the flesh and blood drop and scatter.
When he is about to put down his feet, the flesh and blood are restored again.
Just as he arrives at the gates of hell, the gates close again.
Because he cannot get out he is mentally tortured and, deranged, falls on the ground.
Fire burns all over his body, first burning his skin, then the flesh and bones, and finally the fire penetrates to the marrow.
As if in a chimney-like empty tunnel, a great quantity of smoke arises and the fire burns brightly.
The smoke and flames mix and the heat tortures the sinner with redoubled intensity.
The sinner suffers extreme pain in this hell, yet the karmic effects of his past evil deeds is not yet exhausted and he experiences all the pain inflicted on him there.
In this great hell of Avīci a sinner does not have even as brief a moment of happiness as the time it takes to snap one’s fingers.
In this manner the sinner suffers this pain.” The World-honored One said to the monks, “You should know that in the midst of the world there are ten other hells.
What are the ten?
The first is Arbuda Hell, the second Nirarbuda Hell, the third Aho Hell, the fourth Huhuva Hell, the fifth Aṭaṭa Hell, the sixth Saugandhika Hell, the seventh Utpala Hell, the eighth Padma Hell, the ninth Puṇḍarīka Hell, and the tenth Kumuda Hell.
“Due to what causes and conditions is the first hell called Arbuda?
Here the bodies of sentient beings are like bubbles .
For this reason it is called Arbuda Hell.
Again, due to what causes and conditions is the second hell called Nirarbuda ?
Here the bodies of sentient beings are like chunks of meat.
For this reason it is called Nirarbuda Hell.
Again, for what causes and conditions is the third hell called Aho Hell?
Here sentient beings are pressed with grave and severe pains, they cry out ‘Aho, aho.’ The pain is excruciating.
Thus, it is called Aho Hell.
Again, for what causes and conditions is the fourth hell called Huhuva Hell?
Here when sentient beings are pressed with the excessive pains of this hell, they cry out, saying ‘Huhuva, huhuva.’ For this reason it is called Huhuva Hell.
Again, for what causes and conditions is the fifth hell called Aṭaṭa Hell?
When sentient beings are pressed with extreme pains in their body, they can only chant ‘Aṭaṭa, aṭaṭa.’ But the sound that their tongues make does not come out of their mouths.
For this reason it is called Aṭaṭa Hell.
Again, for what causes and conditions is the sixth hell called Saugandhika Hell?
When sentient beings are in this hell, they see flames of ferocious fire with the color of the saugandhika flower.
For this reason it is called Saugandhika Hell.
Again, for what causes and conditions is the seventh hell called Utpala Hell?
When sentient beings are in this hell, they see flames of ferocious fire with the color of the blue lotus flower .
For this reason it is called Utpala Hell.
Again, for what causes and conditions is the tenth hell called Kumuda Hell?
When sentient beings are in this hell, they see flames of ferocious fire with the color of the yellow lotus flower .
For this reason it is called Kumuda Hell.
Again, for what causes and conditions is the ninth hell called Puṇḍarīka Hell?
When sentient beings are in this hell, they see flames of ferocious fire with the color of the white lotus flower .
For this reason it is called Puṇḍarīka Hell.
Again, for what causes and conditions is the eighth hell called Padma Hell?
When sentient beings are in this hell, they see flames of ferocious fire with the color of the red lotus flower .
For this reason it is called Padma Hell.” Furthermore, according to the Sanfadu lun jing , “There are three hells:
the first is Hot Hell, the second is Cold Hell, and the third is Borderland Hell.” As for the Hot Hell, the Sarvāstivāda school speaks of eight great hells.
The first is Repeatedly Reviving Hell .
It is also called Againrevived Hell .
Sometimes the jail guards in this hell chant and revive the sinners.
Sometimes a cold wind blows.
Although these two conditions differ they both equally revive the sinners.
Therefore, this hell is called Repeatedly Reviving.
The second hell is called Black Rope Hell.
Soldiers in this hell first bind the sinner with ropes and later cut him up with an ax.
The third hell is called Gathered Multitude Hell.
It is also called Mass Knocking Hell. This is because two mountains come together and the sinners are ground against each other at the bottom of the mountains.
The fourth is called Shouting Hell.
It is also called Howling Hell.
Here the guards of hell come and chase the sinners and the sinners shout and run.
The fifth hell is called Loud Shouting Hell. It is also called Loud Howling Hell.
Four large masses of fire blaze up, and even though the sinner wants to escape there is no way out.
Therefore, it is called Great Howling Hell.
The sixth hell is called Hot Hell. It is also called Burning Hell.
Flaming pieces of iron closely surround the sinner and he feels hot surrounded by them.
The seventh hell is called Intense Heat Hell.
It is also called Great Burning Hell.
A mountain of fire breaks out and the sinners are roasted on skewers.
The eighth hell is called No Choice Hell. It is also called No Interruption Hell.
Once a sinner is thrown into the fire in which he feels pain, there is no moment of pleasure.
Since there is no moment of pleasure, where would there be any room for choice?
These eight hells exist in a layered manner within this world.
According to the Sanfadu lun ,  torturers play a prominent role in the first two , a limited role in the next three , and no role in the last three .
These eight hells are the main hells.
Each of these main hells has sixteen hells surrounding it, four minor hells on each side of the main hell.
Altogether, including the main hell, there are seventeen hells in each case.
Eight sets of seventeen hells make one hundred and thirty-six altogether.
Sinners suffer the pain of heat in these places.
Second, there are also eight kinds of Cold Hell.
The first is called Arbuda Hell, so called because the pain of coldness cuts through the flesh and causes chilblains.
The second is called Nirarbuda Hell, so called because a cold wind blows and chilblains appear all over the body.
The third is called Aṭaṭa Hell, so called because the sinners cannot move their lips; they can only move their tongues and so they produce the sound aṭaṭa.
The fourth is called Apapa Hell, so called because the sinners there cannot move their tongues; they can only move their lips and therefore they make the sound apapa.
The fifth is called Ouhou Hell, so called because the sinners can move neither lips nor tongues, and therefore they make the sound ouhou in their throats.
The sixth is called Utpala Hell.
This term means blue lotus flower, and the petals of this flower are narrow.
This hell is so called because the flesh of a sentient being in this hell has fine edges and resembles the utpala flower opening under the bright sun.
The seventh is called Padma Hell.
This term means red lotus flower.
It is so called because the flesh of sentient beings in this hell has rough edges and resembles a padma flower when it is open.
The eighth is called Puṇḍarīka Hell.
This term means white lotus flower.
It is so called because the edges of the bones of beings in this hell resemble a puṇḍarīka flower when it is open.
The first two hells are named in reference to the appearance of the body; the next three hells are named in reference to the sounds the sinners there make; the last three are named in reference to the appearance of the wounds they receive there. The Jushe lun says:
In these eight hells sentient beings are oppressed by extreme cold; their bodies, their sounds, and their wounds manifest unusual changes; therefore, these hells are given these names.
According to the Sanfadu lun ,  in the first two hells the sinners can scream, in the second three hells the sinners cannot scream, and in the last three hells sinners do not scream.
These eight hells are situated between the continents at the bottom of the Iron Ring Mountain and face upward.
Sinners suffer the pain of cold temperatures and freezing in these hells. Third, the Borderland Hell is also of three kinds.
According to the Sanfadu lun , the first is in the mountains, the second is in the water, and the third is in a deserted field.
Sentient beings receive different retributions of their previous deeds in these three places.
Here sentient beings are punished by a combination of cold and heat.
As for the length of life, the life span of a sentient being in these places varies. It is sometimes long and sometimes short.
Furthermore, the Lishi apitan lun says:
The World-honored One said, “There is a great hell called ‘Darkness.’ Outside of each world-system there is always one example of this hell. This hell is always without a cover on top.
In this hell sentient beings hold their arms up to get their bearings, because they cannot see anything with their eyes.
Although the sun and moon are endowed with great mysterious powers, their light does not illuminate this place.
When the Buddha appears in the world a great light illumines all directions.
This light enables sentient beings in this hell to see each other.
This hell is located between two mountains outside the Iron Ring Mountains surrounding the world. Thus it is said to be ‘outside the world-system.’ It is a cold hell.
Between the mountains there are ten places with different names, beginning with the first hell, called Arbuda Hell, and ending with the tenth hell, called Padma Hell.
Sentient beings in these hells walk on their sides, and like a lizard they strain to face upward.
Outside the Iron Ring Mountains everyone walks sideways.
The size of their bodies is like that of a bubble .
If a cold wind touches them their bodies break apart, just like a ripe fruit when hit by a cold wind.
A sinner walking among the reeds here is burned up by an intense fire.
The sound of explosions is heard repeatedly all over the place, and when the sinners are touched by a cold wind their bones break and the breaking sound is heard repeatedly throughout the place.
Because of this sound, sentient beings in this hell come to know of each other’s presence.
Many of the sentient beings who die in our world are reborn in this hell.
Cold Ice Hell is located outside of the Iron Ring Mountains.
When sentient beings die in a world other than our own and are to be reborn in Cold Ice Hell, they are reborn outside of the Iron Ring Mountains of that world.
The closest point between the two worlds is eighty thousand yojanas.
There is no bottom and no cover above this space.
The widest point measures sixteen thousand yojanas.” According to the Qishi jing :
The Buddha said the following:
“Suppose a person measures sesame seeds with a measuring unit of the state of Kośala and fills twenty hu measures without leveling them at the top.
Now suppose that someone were to pick up one sesame seed after a hundred years.
He does this again after one hundred years and each time he throws the seed away.
Even by the time the person has thrown away all twenty hu units of sesame seeds in this way, when compared to the time measurement of hell, one life span in hell will not yet have been exhausted.
To calculate roughly with this number, twenty life spans in Arbuda Hell are equivalent to one life span in Nirarbuda Hell; twenty life spans in Nirarbuda Hell are equivalent to one life span in Aho Hell; twenty life spans in Aho Hell are equivalent to one life span in Huhuva Hell; twenty life spans in Huhuva Hell are equivalent to one life span in Aṭaṭa Hell; twenty life spans in Aṭaṭa Hell are equivalent to one life span in Saugandhika Hell; twenty life spans in Saugandhika Hell are equivalent to one life span in Utpala Hell; twenty life spans in Utpala Hell are equivalent to one life span in Kumuda Hell; twenty life spans in Kumuda Hell are equivalent to one life span in Puṇḍarīka Hell; twenty life spans in Puṇḍarīka Hell are equivalent to one life span in Padma Hell; twenty life spans in Padma Hell are equivalent to one intermediate world age .
Furthermore, the Naxian biqiu wenfo jing says:
The fire in this world is not as hot as the fire in hell.
If a person were to put a small stone on a fire in this world, it would not melt away even if he waited until the end of the day. If he takes a large stone and puts it in the fire of hell the stone immediately melts away.
If a person commits evil deeds he enters hell at death and will not die even after several millions of years.
Various large and small dragons eat sands and stones that melt away ; when human beings are pregnant there is a child in the abdomen, yet the child does not melt away there.
All these things are due to the fact that the power of retribution resulting from good and evil deeds in previous lives determines what will melt away and what will not.
The good and evil deeds a person has committed in previous lives follow him just as a shadow follows their body.
When a person dies he only loses his body, he does not lose his past deeds.
The relationship may be compared to the situation of writing by the light of a burning fire at night. Even though the fire burns out by morning, the writing remains. The effect of the fire lingers long after the fire is gone.
The deeds a person commits in this world linger into a later world.
Again, when the fire is fully ablaze in Padma Hell a sinner even one hundred yojanas away from it is still roasted; if he is sixty yojanas away, he becomes deaf in both his ears and he does not hear anything.
If he is fifty yojanas away, both his eyes are blinded and he does not see anymore.
The monk Kokālika held evil thoughts in his mind and reviled Śāriputra and Maudgalyāyana.
When his body disintegrated and his life ended he fell into this Padma Hell. The Qishi jing says:
Around the place where Padma Hell is located, if a sentient being is one hundred yojanas away from the hell the flames of the fire there reach him; if he is fifty yojanas away he will be completely blinded by the smoke; if he is twenty-five yojanas away his flesh and blood will be scorched and destroyed.
Because those who have renounced the world and practice the religious path occasionally entertain defiled thoughts, tormenting thoughts, poisonous evil thoughts, unmeritorious thoughts, uncompassionate thoughts, and impure thoughts, they automatically suffer such calamities.
Conversely, all those who follow the religious path and know only compassionate actions of body, speech, and mind always receive pleasure later on.
At this time the World-honored One uttered the following verse:
People of this world, while they live in this world without even thinking, make their tongues sharp and biting instruments. If a person says poisonous evil things, he is in turn weakened and harms his own body. Not praising what one should praise, wrongly praising what one should not praise—such is called “causing strife with speech.” Because of thus causing strife, one does not receive pleasure. If a person gambles and obtains wealth, this is a minor matter of worldly strife. If a person follows the pure religious path nourishes defiled thoughts, this is called major strife and struggle. For such a person, there are three hundred and sixty thousand Nirarbuda Hells and five Arbuda Hells. Again, that person falls into Padma Hell. If one reviles a saintly person they reap these consequences. These consequences arise because that person has committed evil deeds of speech and thought.
According to the Wendiyu jing and the Jingdu sanmei jing, hell has altogether one hundred and thrity-four realms.
To give the name of the chief of hells and his dwelling place first, King Yama in the past was King Bimbisāra.
During a battle with King Weituosheng, his military strength did not match that of his opponent, and therefore he made an oath to become king of the hells.
King Bimbisāra’s eighteen assisting ministers led one million soldiers with horns for ears who were easily provoked to anger.
These soldiers joined in the king’s oath, saying that they would later offer assistance in punishing the sinners there.
King Bimbisāra became the present King Yama; the eighteen ministers became the present eighteen minor kings of hell; the one million soldiers became the hell soldiers.
Furthermore, the Chang ahan jing says:
To the south of this world is Vajra Mountain.
Inside the mountain is the palace of King Yama.
The palace is sixty yojanas long and wide.
The Wendiyu jing says that the city in hell is three hundred thousand miles long and wide and made of gold and silver.) Three times during the day and night a large cauldron spontaneously appears.
If the cauldron ends up inside the palace, the king becomes frightened and throws it outside the palace.
If the cauldron is outside the palace and the king enters the palace, a huge soldier from hell forces the king to lie down on a hot iron bed and, forcing open the king’s mouth with a steel hook, pours molten copper into his mouth.
From the throat all the way down, the king’s internal organs are all scorched and burned beyond recognition.
When this is over, the king goes back to enjoying the pleasures of the company of the women in his court.
The ministers who enjoy pleasures with the king are also treated in the same way.
The Wendiyu jing says: Eighteen kings rule over the eighteen hells.
Jiayan is in charge of Niraya Hell.
Quzun is in charge of Knife Mountain Hell.
Feijinshou is in charge of Blowing Sand Hell.
Feishi is in charge of Boiling Excrement Hell.
Jiashi is in charge of Black Ear Hell.
Gaicuo is in charge of Fire Chariot Hell.
Tangwei is in charge of Boiling Water Cauldron Hell.
Tiejiaran is in charge of Iron Floor Hell.
Esheng is in charge of Kai Mountain Hell.
Cold Ice Hell (Note: The scripture does not give the name of the king of this hell.) Pijia is in charge of Peeling Skin Hell.
Yaotou is in charge of Animal Hell.
Tibo is in charge of Soldiers with Swords Hell.
Yida is in charge of Iron Mortar Hell.
Yuetou is in charge of Water Hell. Iron Rods Hell (Note:
The scripture does not give the name of the king of this hell.) Mingshen is in charge of Worm Hell.
Guanshen is in charge of Molten Copper Hell.
The Jingdu sanmei jing says that there are thirty more hells, and each of these hells has someone in charge.
Their names are not listed here in detail. I will list only the names of five officials:
first is the fish official who prohibits killing, second is the water official who prohibits stealing, third is the iron official who prohibits licentiousness, fourth is the earth official who prohibits divisive speech, and fifth is the heavenly official who prohibits drinking alcohol.
The Wendiyu jing says: To the east, west, south, and north of the city of King Yama are various hells.
The light of the sun and moon shines but does not illuminate anything. The light does not shine only in Black Ear Hell.
When a person’s life ends he is first in an intermediate existence.
A sentient being in this intermediate existence has already gone through the moment of death but has not yet reached the moment of rebirth.
The sinner acquires a body of intermediate existence and enters the city of Niraya Hell (Note: Niraya means “densely branched city” or “closed city.”), where sinners gather together before they receive their punishments.
As the cleverly discriminating wind blows, the sinners receive bodies of different sizes according to the effects of the deeds they committed in their previous lives.
If a foulsmelling wind blows, sinners take coarse and ugly forms.
If a wind with a good fragrance blows, fortunate people receive fine and subtle bodies. According to the Qishi jing :
Outside of the two Iron Ring Mountains to the south of this world is the palace of King Yama.
The length and width of the residence is exactly six thousand yojanas.
Sevenfold walls, sevenfold balustrades, sevenfold nets with bells, and, outside of these, sevenfold lines of palm trees surround the city.
Seven jewels produce a beautiful combination of colors.
There are gates in each of the four directions.
Each gate has a tower for defense.
The palace buildings, gardens, and ponds are all filled with many kinds of beautiful fruit.
Fragrant breezes carry distant fragrances, and many birds sing in harmony.
Because the king’s evil deeds in his previous lives resulted in bad consequences, both during the three time periods of the night and the three periods of the day, red molten copper appears in front of him.
The palace changes into a building made of iron.
All pleasurable objects of the five senses disappear.
When the king sees this, he becomes frightened and anxious. His hair stands on end and he immediately leaves the palace.
If he happens to be outside when this happens, he immediately runs inside.
At this time the guardians of hell take hold of the king, and raise him up high then throw him down onto a red-hot iron floor.
This floor is fiercely ablaze, glowing red with flames shooting from it.
After throwing him onto the floor and ordering him to lie down, the guardians of hell then force open his mouth with an iron instrument and pour molten red copper down his mouth.
At this time King Yama’s lips and mouth are burned, then his tongue, and finally his throat are burned.
His bowels and intestines are gradually scorched.
Going downward, the molten copper eventually passes out of his body.
At this time the king entertains the following thought: “Any sentient being who has committed evil deeds of body, speech, and mind receives this suffering with other sentient beings who have committed similar deeds.
Let me make a vow that from now on I will renounce this body; that I will be reborn only among humans; and that I will follow the teaching of the Buddha and obtain the correct faith and understanding, shave off my beard and hair, and don a monk’s robe.
After I have obtained correct faith and understanding I will renounce the householder’s life, and after I have renounced the householder’s life I vow to attain penetrating enlightenment.
Then I will have exhausted life and death and will have become firm in the pure practice.
All that has to be done will have been done.
I shall not have any further births.” When the king nourishes such a transformative thought, the seven jewels are restored in the palace where he lives. The palace becomes like the heavens and the pleasurable objects of the five senses are fully manifested before the king.
Because of the effects of the three good deeds of body, speech, and mind that he performed in his previous lives, the king immediately enjoys all of these pleasures.
Again, the new Posha lun says:
Question: Are the guards of hell to be counted among sentient beings or are they counted among nonsentient beings?
Answer: The guards of hell who bind sentient beings with iron chains when they are first born in hell and take them to King Yama are themselves counted among sentient beings.
But those who harm sentient beings with various instruments of torture are counted among nonsentient beings.
Under the continent of this world are the great hells; above the continent of this world also are the borderland hells and the isolated hells.
Some hells are in valleys, some are on top of mountains, some are in deserted fields, and some are in the sky.
In the other three continents there are only borderland hells and isolated hells; there are no great hells.
Only the people of the continent of this world accomplish great good deeds.
They also commit excessively evil deeds.
Other continents are different. This is why the hells are different.
Some say that the northern Uttarakuru continent lacks the borderland hells, too, and that this is because it is the place for receiving the effects of pure deeds. Question:
If the other continents have no great hells, where do those sentient beings who have committed extremely grave sins and cut off the roots for good deeds go to receive the karmic consequences of their deeds?
Answer: They receive them in the great hells beneath the Jambudvīpa continent.
Question: What is the form of the sentient beings in the hells like?
Answer: Their form is like that of human beings. Question:
What is their language?
Answer: When sentient beings are first born there they all speak Sanskrit.
Later, when they are tortured, they utter various sounds of pain but not one word is understandable.
There are only the sounds of cutting, piercing, breaking, and splitting.
According to the Shilun jing :
The five grave sins are the most serious sins.
What are these five?
To intentionally kill one’s father, mother, or an arhat, to destroy the affairs of the harmonious monastic community of hearers , and to maliciously shed the blood of the Buddha—these are called the five grave sins.
If one commits any of these grave sins, he may not renounce the householder’s life and receive the complete precepts.
If a person has been permitted to renounce the householder’s life and then commits a grave sin, he must be expelled from the monastic community.
In the case of those who have renounced the householder’s life and received the precepts, we should not use whips on them nor bind them in confinement .
There are also four kinds of great sins, which are identical with the four crimes of the fundamental sins.
What are these four?
Killing a pratyekabuddha—this is called the fundamental sin of killing.
Committing licentious acts with a nun who has attained the status of arhat—this is called the fundamental sin of licentiousness.
If people have made a gift of their goods or property to the Buddha, Dharma, and Sangha and a person in charge of the property uses it for his own private purpose, this is called the fundamental sin of theft.
If a person who holds heterodox views does damage to the community of monks, this is called the fundamental sin of damaging the sangha.
If someone commits any of these four fundamental sins, without exception he will not be allowed to renounce the householder’s life according to the Buddha’s teaching.
If he has already renounced the householder’s life, he will not be allowed to receive the complete set of precepts.
If he has already received the precepts, he must be expelled .
Because of the monastic rules pertaining to those who have renounced the householder’s life, one should not whip, bind in confinement, or take the life of any one who had received the precepts when he commits one of these sins.
These are all fundamental sins.
They are not identical with the grave sins.
There are cases where an act is both a fundamental sin and a grave sin.
There are cases where an act is a grave sin but not a fundamental sin.
There are cases where an act is neither a fundamental sin nor a grave sin.
What is the case of an act that is both a grave sin and a fundamental sin?
If a person has renounced the householder’s life, received the complete precepts, and succeeded in attaining the way of the truth, to cut off this person’s life is called both a grave sin and a fundamental sin.
The person who commits such a sin should be expelled according to my rules.
What is the case of an act that is a fundamental sin but not a grave sin?
If a person renounces the householder’s life according to my teaching but harms the life of such an ordinary sentient being, by poison for example, or through aborting his fetus when he is reborn among humans in a later life, this is called a fundamental sin but not a grave sin.
A person who has committed such a sin must not be given a share of the monastic property, food and drink, and floor mats that offered to any monk as common benefits.
If a sentient being gives rise to doubt concerning the Buddha, Dharma, and Sangha, yet renounces the householder’s life according to them, or if seeing others reciting the scriptures interferes with the recitation of even one verse, this fault is neither a fundamental sin nor a grave sin.
These offenses are said to be extremely evil. They are similar to the grave sins.
In the case of such sentient beings, unless they repent and remove the root of their sins, we can never allow them to renounce the householder’s life according to the Buddha’s teaching.
If they happen to have renounced the householder’s life or have received the complete precepts, those among them who do not repent their faults are to be expelled.
To not have faith in the right Dharma, to revile the three vehicles, to harm the Dharma eye, to wish to terminate the lamp of the teaching, and to cut off the seed of the Three Jewels—these all drastically reduce the possibility of rebirth in the realms of humans or gods and have no benefits. The result  is to fall into inferior realms of existence.
The two kinds of people mentioned above, i.e., those who doubt and those who revile the hearers, pratyekabuddhas, or the Mahayana, are designated as those who revile the right Dharma and as those who belittle sages and holy ones. Their life spans in hell increase.
These evil deeds are called major fundamental sins.
What are the fundamental sins contrary to the precepts?
If a monk deliberately commits licentious deeds or kills, or an ordinary person does not give but only takes, or deliberately commits the sin of lying—if a monk or an ordinary person commits any one of these fundamental sins they are not allowed to participate in any of the religious ceremonies performed by the monks and they may not take a share of the use of common property, drinks, food, and bedding belonging to the monastery.
However, the imperial ruler, ministers, and officials may not impose the punishment of whipping and confinement and they may not take the life .
These offenses are called the substance, nature, and appearance of fundamental sins.
Why are they called fundamental sins?
If a person commits these sins, when his body dissolves at the end of life he falls into inferior realms of existence.
To commit these deeds is the root of  inferior realms.
For this reason they are called fundamental sins. Thus, there are eleven kinds of sins:
the five grave sins, the four major prohibitions, and the sins committed by sentient beings who either destroyed the right Dharma or reviled the wise and holy ones.
If a person commits any one of these sins, when his body dissolves at the end of life he will fall into Avīci Hell. Just as an iron ball, when thrown into space, does not stay there but quickly falls to the ground, so will such a sinner fall into this hell.
According to the Zhengfanian jing (T.721:74a17–19, b4–7; 75c20–22, The suffering in Avīci Hell is one thousand times greater than that in the previous seven hells.
The life span there is one world age.
The body grows as large as five hundred yojanas tall.
Those who have committed four grave sins are four hundred yojanas tall; those three grave sins are three hundred yojanas tall; those two grave sins are two hundred yojanas tall; and those one grave sin are one hundred yojanas tall.
When a person who has committed the five grave sins is about to die, he screams, loses control of his bowels, and his breath passes out of his throat.
A color not seen during his lifetime appears on his corpse.
His body becomes like that of an eight-year-old child.
King Yama takes a flaming iron net, ties the person’s throat, and binds his hands.
The head is held downward and the legs upward.
For a period of two thousand years all such sinners move downward.
Often their headdresses burn, full of flames.
First the head burns, then the body burns.
When the gods of the six heavens of the realm of desire smell the air of Avīci Hell, they all disappear.
Because the creatures of Avīci Hell have a strong unpleasant smell.
Furthermore, the Guanfo sanmei hai jing has the following passage:
The Buddha told Ānanda, “If a sentient being kills their father, harms their mother, or abuses and humiliates one of their relatives in the sixfold classification of relations, such sinners, when their life ends, very quickly— in the time that it takes a powerful man takes to bend and stretch out his arm—fall directly into Avīci Hell.
King Yama, appearing as a phantom, decrees in a loud voice, ‘Ignorant people bound for hell, while you were in the world you were not filial to your parents and committed evil and arrogant deeds of lawlessness.
The place you are now born in is called Avīci Hell!’ After saying this, he disappears immediately and is not seen anymore.
At that time the jail guards hurry them around, taking them from lower to higher sections of hell, going through eighty-four sections  altogether.
Bending their bodies, they pass through these sections of hell until they reach the boundary protected by steel nets.
It takes an entire day and night to go around Avīci Hell.
An entire day and night in this hell is the equivalent of sixty small world ages, according to the measurement of time in our world. According to the way time is measured in hell, life in Avīci Hell lasts for one great world age.
“If a person has committed the five grave sins, his punishment will last for five world ages.
If a sentient being has violated the four major prohibitions, received a gift of almsfood while guilty of violating the precepts, reviled the truth by holding heterodox views, been ignorant of causes and conditions, terminated their study of the Perfection of Wisdom, broken images of the buddhas of the ten directions, stolen common property of the monastery, engaged in lawless licentious deeds, raped nuns who were upholding the precepts, sisters, or other relatives, and yet without repentance abused and humiliated those who are close to him—if someone has committed these evil deeds their punishment is as follows.
At the time of death winds as sharp as knives blow and cut up his body; in an instant his body becomes an iron flower that fills up the eighteen sections of hell.
Each flower has eighty-four thousand petals, and each petal has a head, a body, and arms.
Each is located in different sections of the hell. This hell is not large and this body is not small.
Consequently, the body fills this great hell for a period of eight thousand four hundred great world ages.
“When this Niraya Hell disappears, the sinner enters the eighteen sections in the eastern direction and is punished in the same manner as before.
In this way he goes through the eighteen sections in the southern, western, and northern parts of Avīci Hell.
Reviling the Mahayana scriptures, committing the five grave sins, destroying the monastic community, defiling nuns, cutting off the roots of good deeds—sinners who have committed these sins acquire a body that fills Avīci Hell; their four limbs fill the eighteen sections of hell.
“Sentient beings sent to Avīci Hell burn without interruption.
When the world age is about to end the eastern gate opens.
As the sinner looks out of the eastern gate he sees that a beautiful spring, running water, and a forest of trees bearing flowers and fruit have all appeared.
At this sight, the sinner runs upward from below and when he reaches the top section he raises a ring of swords with his hands.
At that time hot iron balls rain down from the sky.
The sinner runs toward the eastern gate but the gate closes when he arrives.
A demon guard of this hell picks up steel forks with his hands and pierces the eyes of the sinner.
An iron dog tears into the sinner’s heart. The sinner falls unconscious in convulsions and dies.
After dying, the sinner revives and this time he sees the southern gate reopen.
Yet the situation is the same as before; there is no difference. The western gate and the northern gate are also the same.
In this manner time passes for half a world age.
“After dying in Avīci Hell the sinner is born in Cold Ice Hell.
After dying in Cold Ice Hell, the sinner is reborn in Dark Place Hell.
For eighty million years his eyes see nothing.
He receives the body of a large worm and he must crawl on his belly, twisting around.
All his sense organs are dulled in the darkness and he knows and understands nothing.
One hundred thousand foxes and wolves seize the bodies of the sinners and eat them.
When this life ends, the sinner is reborn among animals.
For fifty million lives he receives the bodies of birds and animals.
Then he is reborn among humans but he is blind and deaf and suffers from leprosy and tumors.
He is extremely poor and marked by every sign of decline.
After five hundred lives in this ignoble form, such a person is reborn among the hungry ghosts.
In the realm of hungry ghosts he encounters good friends who are great bodhisattvas.
They reprimand him, saying, ‘In your former lives over an infinite number of lifetimes you committed boundless sins.
Because you reviled the teaching and lacked true faith you fell into Avīci Hell and received tortures that cannot be described in detail.
Now you should give rise to compassion in your mind.’ When the hungry ghost hears these words, he praises the name of the Buddha and the power of the Buddha’s love.
Thereupon his life ends and he is reborn in the dwelling place of the gods of the four directions.
Once he has been born in this realm, he repents his previous sins and feels a desire for enlightenment arise within himself.
From their compassionate hearts many buddhas emit light onto such sentient beings and do not abandon such people as this one.
The buddhas assist people like this, just as the Buddha once assisted Rāhula.
With their compassionate eyes and ears they teach him to avoid the hells.” Therefore, in the Qishi jing , the Buddha says in verse: If a person does wrong either in physical acts, or through speech, or even in his own mind, Then as a result of such an action he is born into inferior realms of existence. In this way he is reborn in the “Reviving” Hell. It is the most fearful place; it makes your hair stand on end. After experiencing this hell for millions of years, beyond the possibility of counting, The person dies but immediately revives. Hatred invites hatred and so sentient beings kill one another without cease.
If sentient beings cherish evil feelings toward their parents, Or toward the buddhas, bodhisattvas, and hearers, They will all fall into Black Rope Hell. The suffering experienced there is extremely grave and terrible. Those who mislead others who are practicing correct deeds and cause them to enter wrong paths, And those who always destroy good deeds as soon as they see them— Such people also fall into Black Rope Hell. Double-tongued, evil-mouthed, and constant liars who enjoy committing the three kinds of grave evil deeds And who do not cultivate the three roots of good deeds— These ignorant people will necessarily fall into the great hell of Clashing and Grinding and suffer punishment for a long time. Or if someone kills sheep, horses, cows, or other kinds of animals, chickens, or pigs, And even if he kills insects, he will fall into Clashing and Grinding Hell. If, through the many ways that frighten people in this world, A person oppresses and tortures sentient beings, This person will fall into Mortar Mountain Hell And receive the punishment of being pressed against the ground and pounded. If because of the bondage of greed, desire, anger, and ignorance, A person perverts the real truth and makes it into something different, Judging that which is correct to be wrong and deviating from the norms and rules, This person is in turn destined to be harmed by knives and swords. If someone, relying on his strength, steals from others, taking from both the powerful and powerless, If in these ways such a person commits many oppressive acts, He is destined to be kicked and stomped upon by an iron elephant. If someone enjoys killing sentient beings, his body and hands stained with blood and with a very evil mind, If such a person constantly commits such impure deeds, He will be reborn in Screaming and Howling Hell. Because they have tormented sentient beings in various ways, These sinners are roasted and cooked in Screaming and Howling Hell. Within this hell, furthermore, is the Great Screaming and Howling Hell. Here are people who are given to flattery and who have crafty minds, Which are obscured by wrong views as if with a dense forest; They are bound tighter and tighter by the taut nets of attachment and pulled downward. Those who commit the most base deeds fall into Great Screaming and Howling Hell. When a person arrives at the Great Screaming and Howling Hell, an iron city ablaze, his hair stands on end. There are iron halls and iron buildings there, and those who come and enter these places are completely consumed by fire. If those who while performing their worldly duties constantly torment sentient beings, They will fall into the place of torture by heat. They endure torture by heat for an infinitely long time. Monks and brahmans in the world, parents, superiors, and elders— If people constantly torment such worthies and do not please them, they will all fall into Heat Hell. Not having cultivated the pure deeds that lead to rebirth in heaven, always rejecting those who are closest and to be loved; If people commit these crimes with pleasure, they will enter Heat Hell. Those who commit evil deeds toward monks and brahmans, and other good people and parents, Or who harm other honorable ones, will fall into the place of torture by heat, where a fire constantly blazes. Those who constantly commit evil deeds And have never even for an instant harbored a good thought in their minds, These people go directly to Avīci Hell and receive an infinite number of punishments. If a person says that the right Dharma is wrong And various wrong teachings are correct, And he does not contribute to the good cause— Such a person will enter Avīci Hell. Reviving Hell, Black Rope Hell, and the two hells, If one adds to these such hells as Screaming and Howling, , the number becomes five. With Heat Torture Hell and Great Heat Hell, there are seven hells. Avīci Hell makes the number eight. These eight are called the great hells, Where sinners burn violently and their suffering is intense and unbearable. A person will be reborn because of the evil deeds he committed. Within each there are also sixteen smaller hells.
The Qishi jing says the following: The Buddha said to the monks, “There are three kinds of heavenly messengers in the world.
What are these three?
The first is old age, the second is illness, and the third is death.
“If a person is self-indulgent and commits the three kinds of evil deeds he will be reborn in hell when his body dissolves and life ends.
The guardians of hell come immediately and drive such sentient beings into King Yama’s presence.
They say, ‘Great king, these sentient beings were unrestrained and self-indulgent when they lived among people in their previous lives.
They did not make their three acts  good.
Would the great king properly instruct them?’ The king asks the sinners, ‘When you lived among humans in your previous lives, the first heavenly messenger instructed and reprimanded you well.
How could you have failed to see him appear in life?’ The sinners answer, ‘Great god, indeed we did not see him!’ “The king says, ‘When you had a human body you should have seen the following.
The decline of old age appeared to you, sometimes in the form of a man and sometimes in the form of a woman, with their teeth fallen out, white hair, loose and wrinkled skin, and black spots all over their body so that it looked like a sesame plant.
Their arms were crooked and their backs were bent and as they walked, crippled, their legs did not follow the body, which leaned to the left and then to the right.
Their necks were narrow and their skin was loose, hanging down on both sides like a cow’s jowls.
Their lips and mouths were parched, their throats and tongues dry.
Their bodies were bent and weak and their vitality was ebbing.
They gasped when they tried to speak, making a rasping sound like a saw.
Faltering, they walked clinging to a stick.
The vigorous years of their lives had declined and their blood and flesh had been reduced to the point of drying up; skinny, exhausted and weak, they were ready for the passage to the next life.
Their movements were slow and there was no longer even a trace left of their former vigor.
Both body and mind were all atremble.
All their limbs were scrawny and slack, held together only with difficulty.
Have you never seen such an apparition?’ “The sinners answered, ‘Great god, we have indeed seen this.’ Then the king says, ‘You are slow and ignorant people and have no wisdom.
When you saw such a sight in the past, why did you not think as follows:
I too have ahead of me this inevitable fate of old age; I have not transcended it yet.
I should perform good deeds so that I will be able to enjoy benefits and pleasure for a long time.’ The people answer, ‘Great god, indeed we did not think such thoughts because our minds were excessively self-indulgent and our behavior was undisciplined.’ King Yama then says, ‘You are slow and ignorant people and you have not cultivated good deeds.
You should receive all the punishments for undisciplined indulgence.
These painful punishments are not the result of what others did; they are the results of your actions.
The sum total of what you did now returns to you and you will suffer the consequences.’ “At that time King Yama, reprimanding the sinners for the second time, says, ‘Did you people not see the second heavenly messenger appear in the world?’ They answer, ‘Great god, indeed we did not see him.’ The king then says, ‘In the past, when you had a human body in the world, did you not see the following:
Whether one has the body of a woman or of a man, the harmony of the four great elements is suddenly disturbed.
Disease enters and clings to the body, causing great pains.
Lying in a large or small bed, the sick person tosses back and forth, soiled with urine and excrement.
He no longer has control of his body.
Lying down asleep or sitting up awake, he looks to someone to stay close by and look after him.
He requires others’ assistance to wash, to wipe himself, to hold something, to eat or drink.
Have you not seen such a sight?’ The people say, ‘Great god, indeed we did see this.’ “King Yama then tells them, “Ignorant people, when you saw such a sight, why did you not think the following:
I will also meet such a fate and I have not transcended the fate of disease.
I should perform good deeds that will enable me to obtain great benefits and pleasure for a long time in the future.’ The people say, ‘No, indeed we did not think such a thought because our minds were lazy and our behavior was undisciplined.’ The king tells the ignorant men, ‘You were lazy and did not perform good deeds.
You will receive these bad retributions not because of what others did.
What you did returns to you and you will thus receive these retributions.’ “Then King Yama, reprimanding them for the third time, says, ‘You slow and ignorant men, when you were human beings in the past did you not see the third heavenly messenger appear in the world?’ They answer, ‘Great god, indeed we did not see him’.
“The king says again, ‘When you were human beings, did you also not see the following?
Whether in the case of a woman or a man, when life ends they place the body on a bed and cover it with cloths of many colors.
When the body is to be taken outside the village, it is awesomely decorated with flags and umbrellas.
Relatives surround the corpse, their hands held aloft, their hair all in disarray.
Covering their heads with ashes, they lament greatly.
Wailing ceaselessly, they scream loudly.
Striking their chests in sorrow, they sob in sharp grief.
Have you not seen this?’ They answer, ‘Great god, indeed we saw this.’ “Then the king says to them, ‘Ignorant men, when you saw such a sight in the past why did you not think the following thought:
We too will die; we have not been liberated from death.
We should now perform good deeds to obtain great benefits for a long time.’ They answer, ‘Great god, indeed we did not think such thoughts.
Because we were undisciplined and indulgent.’ Then King Yama says, ‘You were undisciplined and indulgent and did not perform good deeds.
You created these bad retributions yourself; these retributions were not created by others.
When you receive these retributions you are receiving the results of your earlier deeds.’ After he instructs and reprimands the sinners with regard to the above three messengers, the king orders them to be taken away.
Thereupon, the guardians of hell seize the sinners by their legs and arms and, holding them with the sinners’ heads downward and their legs up, they throw them far into the midst of the many hells.” Now, the best way to stop a stream is to cut off its source.
The best way to stop boiling water from boiling is to put out the fire.
The source provides the water; if the source is not cut off the water is never exhausted.
The fire boils the water; If the fire is not extinguished, how could the boiling stop?
Therefore, if the source that feeds a spring is cut off, the water dries up by itself; if the fire that boils the hot water is extinguished, the boiling will stop by itself.
A discussion of these analogies makes us understand the issues at hand better.
If one dislikes a result it is best to cut off its cause.
If one fears suffering, wouldn’t it be best to give up evil deeds?
The cause provides the substance for the results.
If the cause is not uprooted the result will not be exhausted.
Evil deeds give rise to suffering.
If one does not give up doing evil deeds, how could suffering cease?
Therefore, if a person cuts off the cause the result will never come about, even if the person feels no .
If a wise person gives up doing evil deeds, suffering disappears even if he never feared .
Have a hundred noble ones not written books about this in order to warn us?
The verse says: Having been born, a person returns to death. When the sun goes down the moon returns. Someone who has been exiled while very young is easily moved by the evening wind. He roams around, following changing objects.
An ignorant person loses his way and, Floating and sinking, falls into a great abyss. Immediately he falls into the dark place and experiences sharp-pointed weapons for ten thousand ages. Beings in the six realms of rebirth revolve in the cycle of rebirth in the world and suffer, Yet the effects of the three types of evil deeds are not yet exhausted. As they follow this stream of rebirths no one can save them. In great sorrow, they can only rely on themselves to show pity. Only by returning to sincerity and meditating on the form of things Can they learn the empty and false nature of objects. The ocean of suffering is deep—where would it take us? We wish to board the ship of perfect wisdom. Miracle Stories From the Jin dynasty , Layman Zhao Tai and the monk Zhi Faheng; from the Zhao dynasty , the ghost at Hangu Pass, the sound of wailing in the Lu Jiang district, and the boiling caldron in Tibet; from the Tang dynasty , Liu Zhigan serves as a judge in hell.
Jin Dynasty Zhao Tai, styled Wenhe, was a man from Beiqiu of Qinghe.
His grandfather had been the governor of the capital district.
His commandery recommended Tai for government service as a morally upright person and the government invited him, but he did not serve.
He studied the scriptures a great deal and was famed for his scholarship in his home district.
Later he accepted official appointments and ended his career as the Grand Master of Palace Leisure.
When Tai was thirty-five years old he experienced a sudden pain in his heart and moments later he died.
When people lowered his corpse to the ground, his heart was still warm and his body bended and stretched when people moved it.
The corpse was left there for ten days, and then a sound like falling rain came from his throat. He suddenly revived and told the following story.
Right after his death, Tai dreamed that a man came and stooped over him at heart-level.
There were two other people riding yellow horses, and these two servants supported Tai on either side.
The path led eastward but he did not know how many miles they traveled.
Then they reached a large city, high and precipitous, which was colored blue and black like zinc.
They led Tai to the city gate and passed through two heavy doors.
Inside there were thousands of tiled houses and also thousands of men and women of all ages standing in lines.
Five or six officials wearing silk clothes read out names from a list of categories.
They were to present these people to the Commandery Governor according to the categories.
Tai’s name was under the twentieth category.
Soon they took Tai and several thousand other men and women to present them together.
The Commandery Governor sat facing westward. After examining the list, he sent Tai south to go through the black gate.
A man wearing red clothes was sitting under a large roof.
He called out the names one by one and asked what they had done in their previous lives:
“What sins did you commit? What good deeds did you perform?
Clearly, you should tell the truth.
Here we send messengers to the six branches of the government.
These messengers remain in the human world and constantly record good and evil deeds.
Their lists include all events without exception.
You should not lie.” Tai answered, “My father and elder brother served as government officials.
Both received two thousand gallons of rice.
Since I was young, I only studied at home and have not served in any office.
I have not committed any evil deeds either.” Thereupon, the man dispatched Tai to serve as an overseer in the Office of Waterways, where he supervised more than two thousand men who worked hard day and night carrying sand to repair riverbanks.
Later the man promoted Tai to Commissioner-in-Chief of the Office of Waterways and placed the affairs of the jail under his charge.
They gave Tai horses and soldiers and ordered him to visit the various hells for inspection.
The torture in the different hells Tai visited took different forms.
In one case, the tongue of a sinner was pierced with needles and blood completely covered his body.
In another case, people with disheveled hair and without headdresses, naked and barefooted, were dragged along while guards with large sticks prodded them from behind.
An iron floor and copper pillars burned with blazing flames, making hollow sounds.
The people were driven there and forced to embrace the pillars and lie down on the floor.
When they rose, they were all burned into shapeless forms, but they were immediately brought back to life.
In still another case, sinners were roasted and cooked in a flaming stove and a huge cauldron.
Heads and bodies were crushed and had fallen apart, and were roiling around in the water as it boiled.
Demons holding forked spears stood nearby, and three or four hundred people stood to one side, awaiting their turn to enter the cauldron, crying aloud and embracing each other.
Then there was a tree of swords, tall and wide and extending beyond any visible limit.
At its outermost points the trunk, branches, and leaves of the tree were all made of swords.
People abused each other and each climbed the tree, one by one, as if he was delighted to compete with the others.
As they climbed their heads and bodies were cut up into pieces, from a few inches to a foot long.
Tai saw his grandparents and two brothers in this hell, and they cried when they saw each other.
When Tai was going out of the gate of hell, he saw two people bring a document to the jail official and say, “There are three people whose family raised banners and burned incense at the temple in order to remove their sins.
They may be released from hell and allowed to go to a residence of good fortune.” Suddenly Tai saw three people come out of the gate of hell.
Immediately their clothes appeared on their bodies in perfect order.
They went to a gate called the Great Hall of Opening Light.
The threefold gate was illuminated in a bright red color.
When they saw this gate the three people immediately entered the hall.
Tai followed them.
Before him Tai saw a great hall, decorated throughout with rare treasures, shining brilliantly to the observer’s eye.
The floor was made of gold and jade.
He saw one supernatural person whose appearance was extraordinarily awesome and propitious.
This man was sitting on a seat and there were many monks standing in attendance around his seat.
Tai saw the Commandery Governor come and pay respect to the man with humility and reverence.
Tai asked to whom the Commandery Governor had extended reverence and an official said, “He is called the World-honored Master Who Saves Humanity.” After a while all the people in hell were brought out to listen to the scriptures.
At that time they were said to be one million and nine thousand in number.
They all came out of hell and entered the city, which was a hundred miles in size.
As they arrived they paid respect to the teaching and sat in large groups.
Even if there are shortcomings in a person’s religious practice he or she can still obtain salvation.
For this purpose, the teaching of the scriptures in hell had been established.
Within seven days the people achieved release from hell in the order determined by whether their deeds in previous lives had been good or evil.
Before Tai came out he saw one thousand people rise up into space and disappear.
After Tai came out of this hall he saw another city, over two hundred miles in size, called the City of Changing Forms.
The people who had completed the examination in hell enter this city and receive new forms for rebirth.
Entering the city, Tai saw several thousand sections of houses with clay tiles; each house had rooms and corridors.
Right in the middle of the city was a brick house with a high floor and decorated balustrades.
The house had several hundred rooms.
The officials, matching each case with documents, said, “Murderers will become dayflies, born in the morning and dying in the evening.
Thieves will become pigs and sheep, to be butchered by people. Sexual offenders will become cranes and deer.
Liars will become owls.
Debtors will become camels, oxen, and horses.” After Tai returned from the inspection tour, the chief of the Office of Waterways said to him, “You are the son of a noble family.
For what sins have you come here?” Tai answered, “My grandfather, father, and brothers all have a fief that produced two thousand shi of rice.
I was selected for service in government but turned it down.
Cultivating my mind and meditating on good deeds, I did not become defiled by various forms of evil deeds.” The chief said, “You have not committed any sins.
That is why you have been made Commissioner-in-Chief of the Office of Waterways.
Otherwise, there would have been no difference between yourself and those who are in hell.” Tai asked the chief, “What must a person do to assure happiness after death?” The chief said only, “If disciples who honor the Dharma practice it diligently and uphold the precepts, they obtain the karmic rewards of happiness and will not be punished.” Tai again asked, “After someone has submitted himself to the service of the Dharma, can the sins he committed before submitting be removed?” The answer was, “Yes, all sins can be removed.” After this conversation, the chief opened the sealed box and checked Tai’s years.
There were still thirty years left so he sent Tai back to the human world.
As they parted, the chief said, “You have seen what the punishment for sins in hell is like.
You must tell the people in the world about it and encourage them to perform good deeds.
The effects of good and evil deeds follow people just like shadows and echoes. Shouldn’t everyone be careful about them?” Tai then reported his experience to friends and strangers who visited him.
Fifty or sixty people heard him speak about his experience at one time.
Tai also wrote down his experiences and showed the document to his contemporaries.
The time was the thirteenth day of the seventh month of the fifth year of Taishi .
Then Tai requested a monastery to arrange for a large celebration on behalf of his grandparents and two brothers.
He ordered all of his descendants to change their faith and honor the Buddhist Dharma and practice Buddhism diligently.
People heard that Tai had died and come back to life, after seeing many instances of the consequences of good and evil deeds, and they visited him one after another.
At that time, the Superior Grand Master of the Palace Sun Feng of Wucheng, the Marquis of Guannei Ho Boping of Changshan, and others, altogether ten people, gathered together at Tai’s house and questioned him in detail.
Everyone was filled with fear and submitted themselves to the Buddhist Dharma.
The monk Zhi Faheng belonged to the beginning of the rule .
He was ill for ten days and then died.
Three days later he came back to life and told the following story.
When he died a man came to take him away.
He saw several places which looked like government residences but he was not accepted in any of them.
Suddenly he saw an iron wheel with steel claws come around from the western direction.
No one was pulling the wheel yet it turned and traveled as fast as the wind.
An official called a sinner and made him stand facing the wheel, and the wheel ran over the sinner.
In this manner the wheel turned repeatedly and crushed several people.
The official called to Faheng, saying, “The man of the Way should come and stand facing the wheel.” Faheng was afraid and, blaming himself, he said, “Because I did not practice diligently I must now face this wheel.” After he spoke these words, the official said to Faheng, “The man of the Way may go.” Then Faheng looked up and saw that there was a hole in the sky.
Without any sensation, he rose up quickly and his head went through the hole while his hands touched both sides of the hole.
Faheng looked around in the four directions and saw a palace decorated with seven jewels, occupied by heavenly beings.
Faheng kicked and jumped but could not get up further to reach the palace.
Exhausted, he went down again and returned to where he had been.
The man who had taken Faheng laughed and said, “What did you see that prevented you from going up?” Thereupon he handed Faheng over to a boat captain.
The captain piloted the boat and ordered Faheng to operate the rudder. Faheng said, “I cannot hold the rudder,” but the captain forced him to do so.
Several hundred boats followed Faheng was on.
Not knowing how to hold the rudder, Faheng steered the boat into a sandbar.
The captain shoved Faheng, saying, “You made a mistake guiding the boat.
According to the law you should be executed.” Dragging Faheng onto the shore, to the sound of beating drums, the captain was about to execute Faheng.
Suddenly two five-colored dragons pushed the boat and made it float again.
The captain then pardoned Faheng and they continued traveling northward for about thirty miles.
Faheng saw a village and on the riverbank there were tens of thousands of houses. The captain said that the village was a refuge.
Faheng slipped out and landed on the bank.
A large dog in the village was about to attack him and Faheng was very frightened.
When he looked in the northwest direction he saw a lecture hall, where many monks had gathered.
Hearing the sound of sutras being recited, Faheng hurried toward the hall, which had a twelve-step staircase.
Faheng climbed the first step and saw the deceased teacher Fazhu sitting on a chair.
Seeing Faheng, he said, “You are my disciple.
Why did you come?” Turning and rising toward the staircase, the teacher slapped Faheng in the face with a hand cloth and said, “Do not come up.” Faheng was very anxious to continue up the staircase and again raised his feet to climb the steps, but Fazhu again pushed him back down.
After the third time Faheng gave up.
Faheng then saw a well on the flat ground, three or four zhang deep and covered completely with bricks.
Faheng thought, “This is a natural well.” A man at the side of the well said, “If it is not natural, how could it be a well?” Faheng saw Fazhu deliberately lean and look toward him, and Fazhu said to him, “You should return by the same route you came on.
The dog will not attack you.” Faheng went back to the riverbank but he did not see the boat on which he had arrived.
He was very thirsty and tried to drink from the river, and thereupon he fell into the water.
Then Faheng revived.
Because of this experience he renounced the householder’s life, upheld the precepts, and did not eat meat.
Diligently practicing day and night, he became a monk of superior conduct.
Faqiao is a disciple of Faheng.
Zhao Dynasty Shi Changhe was a native of Gao in the state of Zhao.
At the age of nineteen he became ill and after one month and a few days he died.
His family was poor and could not perform the proper ritual of preserving the body in a coffin prior to burial.
Four days later he revived and told the following story.
As soon as he died Changhe walked in the southeastern direction and saw two people leading the way.
They were fifty paces ahead of him.
As he walked slowly or quickly, they accordingly changed their walking speed, still leading the way, slowly or quickly, always maintaining the same distance of fifty paces ahead.
On both sides of the road was a thick growth of thorny shrubs. Each thorn was like the talon of an eagle.
He saw a large group of people running into the thorny shrubs; their bodies were injured and torn and their blood flowed all over the ground.
Seeing Changhe walking on the flat road, they all sighed and said, ‘Only followers of the Buddha can walk in the middle of the Great Way.’ Further along the road he saw buildings with tiled roofs.
There must have been one thousand rooms.
There was one very tall building, and in this building a very large man wearing a ceremonial black jacket was sitting, facing the window.
Changhe paid respects to him.
The man above in the watchtower said, “Lord Shi has arrived.
It has been twenty years since we parted.” Changhe then felt as if he remembered the time of their parting.
Among his acquaintances was a man called Mamu Mengcheng.
It had been many years since he and his wife had died.
The man above in the watchtower said, “Do you know Mengcheng?” Changhe said that he did.
The man in the watchtower said, “When he was alive, Mengcheng failed to practice the Buddhist teaching diligently.
He is now serving as a house cleaner for me all the time.
Mengcheng’s wife was diligent and she now lives in a very pleasant place.” Pointing with the finger of one hand to a room in the southwest corner, he said, ‘Mengcheng’s wife is there.’ Mengcheng’s wife then opened the window and, seeing Changhe, she asked very politely how he was doing.
After inquiring about the welfare of the old and young in her extended family, she said, “When Lord Shi returns, you should write to me of what you see.” Suddenly Changhe saw Mengcheng coming from the west of the building, holding a broom and dustpan in his hands.
He also asked for news of his family.
The man above in the watchtower said, “I have heard that fish and dragons perform excessively diligently as proof of their faith.
What have you practiced?” Changhe said, “I have not eaten fish and meat. I have never drunk wine.
I constantly recite the honored scriptures to seek release from illness and pain.” The man in the watchtower said, “You have not forgotten what has been taught to you.” He spoke for a long time.
and then asked the man in charge of the complete records, “Examine Lord Shi’s record.
Do not make any mistakes.” The man consulted the record and said, “His has more than thirty more years of life left.” The man in the watchtower said, “Does Lord Shi wish to return or not?” Changhe answered that he wanted to go back.
Thereupon the man above in the watchtower ordered the man in charge of the records to send him back on a carriage with mounted soldiers and two accompanying officials.
Changhe paid respects to the man above in the watchtower, took his leave, boarded the carriage, and returned.
Along the road he had traveled on before, there were again the hostels where officials and private guests were eating and drinking what had been provided for them earlier.
Suddenly he reached home.
He hated the smell of his corpse and did not wish to approach it.
While he was standing by the corpse he was pushed from behind by his deceased sister and fell on top of the corpse, and thus revived.
The man of the Way Zhi Fashan had not yet renounced the householder’s life at that time.
When he heard Changhe’s story he decided to enter the Way.
Fashan lived during the Xianhe period .
Han Dynasty Emperor Wu of the Han dynasty traveled eastward but had not yet gone over Hangu Pass.
On the road there was a creature, several tens of zhang in height and shaped like an ox.
It had shining blue eyes and its four feet were buried in the ground.
You could not move it even if you pushed with all your might.
All the officials were amazed and frightened.
Thereupon Dong Fangshuo requested that they pour wine as an offering.
They poured several tens of hu , and the monster then disappeared.
The emperor asked the reason for all of this.
Dong Fangshuo answered, “This is called the result of suffering from distressed qi.
This must have been a place of the jail of the Qin ruling house.
If not, it must have been a place where prisoners were gathered together to labor.
Wine causes one to forget distress.
Therefore the wine could make the monster disappear.” The emperor said, “What a knowledgeable scholar!” On the border between the two districts of Wan and Chuangyang in the Lu Jiang Commandery lived dark blue creatures.
These creatures, some larger and others smaller, lived in the wild mountains and fields, and sometimes the sounds of them weeping could be heard.
Voices of a group of several tens of people at most, both male and female, young and old, which sounded just like the sorrowful wailing of people who have just lost someone, used to be heard.
People who lived nearby would be surprised and go running to the place where the voices were heard, but they never saw any human beings there.
However, at the place where the weeping voices were heard there would always be deaths later.
If many voices were heard, then a large family would die there later; if fewer voices were heard, then a small family died there.
The travel record of Wang Xuance relates the following story.
In southwestern Tibet there is a spring.
On a flat area very hot water shoots forth, reaching a height of four or five feet.
If you cook meat in this hot spring it becomes well done right away.
The vapor reaches to heaven, looking like mist.
One old Tibetan says, “Ten years ago the water shot up to the height of over ten zhang and spread out all over at the top.
A man riding a horse, chasing a deer, came directly to the spring.
Since that time the water has not risen up high any more.” Frequently human skeletons bubble up in the spring.
If you cover the spring with a piece of thick cloth, the cloth rots immediately.
The spring is sometimes called Cauldron Spring .
Sixty or seventy yojanas northwest of this spring is another one, about as hot as this one.
Sometimes the spring shoots up violently, sounding like a clap of thunder.
Many smaller hot springs like this are often found.
In China today there are many hot springs.
If we infer from the above cases, these springs in China are also “cauldron springs.” The reason is as follows.
In the Four-part Vinaya there is this passage:
The Buddha said, “To the north of the city of Rājagṛha there is a hot spring that comes out of hell.
The water is very hot when it first comes out, but later as it reaches distant places it becomes cooler.
The reason it becomes cooler is because other water mixes with it.” Tang Dynasty Liu Zhigan of Hetong became a Probationary District Magistrate at the beginning of the Zhenguan period .
One evening he died suddenly.
The following morning he revived and told the following story.
At first he had been chased by an official of hell and reached a big government building.
After seeing Zhigan, the official said, “At the present time there is a vacancy in one official position.
Therefore we have especially arranged to appoint you to that position.” Zhigan declined to take the position, giving his parents’ old age as the reason.
Then he described his meritorious deeds, which should have indicated that he should not yet have died.
The official of the ruler of the hells checked his record and Zhigan’s words were correct.
Therefore, the official said, “You are not yet to die.
We could appoint you as an Acting Administrative Assistant.” Zhigan accepted the position and, taking leave of the official, he withdrew and went to his office.
In the office five administrative assistants were sitting together; Zhigan was the sixth.
This office was conducted under a senior official.
Each of the three chambers had a platform.
The volume of business was quite heavy.
There was a seat on the western end where there was no administrative assistant, and an official led Zhigan there to take the vacant seat.
Many officials brought official documents.
Choosing his branch, they left the documents on the desk and withdrew to the bottom of the staircase.
Zhigan asked them why they withdrew.
They answered, “The bad air that we carry might distress you.” They stayed some distance away and answered questions about matters in the documents.
Zhigan read the documents very carefully, and these documents were just like those in the world of living human beings.
Then Zhigan wrote down some legal judgments.
After a while food was brought.
All the administrative assistants gathered together to eat.
Zhigan also wanted to join them, but the Other administrative assistants said, “Since you are an Acting Administrative Assistant you should not eat this food.” Zhigan followed their advice and in the end did not eat.
At the end of the day an official sent him back home and Zhigan revived. Dawn was just breaking in the world of living human beings .
When the sun went down and it became dark in the world of living human beings, the official returned to take Zhigan back to the other world, where another day was just starting.
Thus, he learned that between the two worlds days and nights are reversed.
Thereafter, Zhigan ruled on matters of the world of the dead as an Acting Administrative Assistant at night and occupied the position of District Magistrate during the day.
Eventually this became his regular pattern.
One winter Zhigan was in the office of the world of the dead and stood up to go to the lavatory.
At the western end of the hall he saw a woman, over thirty years in age, handsome in appearance and wearing colorful clothes.
She stood there crying.
Zhigan asked her who she was.
She answered, “I am the wife of the Administrator and Director of Granaries of the Xingzhou region.
I was brought here and was separated from my husband.
That is the reason for this grief.” Zhigan asked an official of the world of the dead about this, and the official said, “Among those whom the office has brought here is the one you enquired about.” This confirmed what the woman had said about her husband.
Zhigan then said to the woman, “for a long time I have been holding the position of District Magistrate.
If your husband happens to be examined, fortunately my section is not crowded.
I will make sure that the Director of Granaries will not be drawn into this and made to die with you for no purpose.” The woman said, “I sincerely wish not to draw him into this, but I fear that the officials might persecute him.” Zhigan said, “If you do not wish to draw him in, you need not worry about anyone else persecuting him.” When Zhigan went back to the region, he first asked the Director of Granaries whether his wife was ill or not.
The Director of Granaries said, “My wife is young and healthy.” Zhigan then told him what he had seen, describing her clothes and appearance, and he advised the Director of Granaries to perform meritorious spiritual deeds.
The director returned home in a hurry and saw his wife weaving fabric at her loom, and he did not take Zhigan’s words seriously.
More than ten days later the wife of the Director of Granaries suddenly became ill and died.
Frightened, the director then performed meritorious spiritual deeds and sacrifices.
On another occasion two scholars in the Xingzhou region who had passed the local examinations were going to the capital to be assigned their positions.
They said to Zhigan, “You serve as a judge in the netherworld.
Please tell us the positions to which we will be assigned.” Zhigan went to his office in the netherworld and asked a minor secretary about the matter, giving the family and personal names of the two candidates.
The secretary said, “The files are sealed in a stone box.
After looking into the matter I will be able to report back to you in two days.” When the time came the secretary gave his report, describing in detail the names of the positions that the two candidates were going to obtain later that year.
Zhigan told the two people about this.
When they came to the capital and received the appointments, both of the positions assigned by the Ministry of Personnel were completely different from those that Zhigan had told them about.
The official of the Xingzhou region heard about this and told Zhigan what had happened.
Zhigan later asked the minor secretary, who checked the files again and said, “Definitely there is no mistake in the results of my earlier investigation.” When the names of those who received appointments went to the higher office of the Chancellery for final approval, the Chancellery rejected the recommendations of the Office of Personnel and revised the two candidates’ assignments.
The new assignments matched the records in the files in the netherworld.
Whenever Zhigan saw the names, circumstances, and dates of death of his relatives and acquaintances, he reported back to those concerned, who could then perform meritorious spiritual deeds and avoid painful experiences after death.
After Zhigan had served for three years as Acting Administrative Assistant, the official from his branch in the netherworld came to him and said, “We have been able to appoint Li Sihu of the Longzhou region as a regular official to replace you.
Do not write any more judgments.” Returning to the regional office in the world of the living, Zhigan therefore told Regional Inspector Li about what he had learned.
Li Defeng sent a man to the Longzhou region to enquire about the matter.
A man called Sihu had died there.
The date of his death matched the time given by the official in the netherworld. Zhigan’s contact with the netherworld ceased from this time on.
Later the Regional Office ordered Zhigan to take prisoners to the capital city.
When they came to the border of the Fengzhou region, all four of the prisoners escaped. Zhigan was distressed, fearing that they would not be able to recapture the escaped prisoners.
While he stayed in the residence at night, the old official from the netherworld suddenly appeared and said, “We have all of the prisoners.
One is dead; the other three are in the western valley of the Southern Mountain.
They have all been captured.
Please do not trouble yourself about this matter any more.” After saying these words, the official took his leave and departed.
Zhigan immediately asked the secular officials and soldiers to go to the western valley of the Southern Mountain, and they found the four prisoners as predicted.
Knowing that they could not escape, the prisoners came out to fight the search party.
Zhigan overcame them, killing one and capturing the other three, just as he had been told would be the case.
At the present time Zhigan is assigned to a post in the south in the Cizhou region and is in charge of legal matters.
Liu Heng, Chief Minister of Splendid Happiness, told this story to Tang Ling .
Heng had once been Regional Inspector of Qiongzhou, and on seeing Zhigan he questioned him directly himself.
Royal Scribe Pei Tongjie is also said to have seen Zhigan.
Several people say that they can confirm these facts.
This story comes from the Mingbao ji, T.2082:801b16–802a12.) One Thousand Buddhas The Seven Buddhas, Causes and Conditions, The Clan, Conception, Birth, Attending to and Raising the Child , Prognostication, Studies, Marriage, Recognition of Suffering, Renunciation, Enlightenment, Preaching the Dharma, Extinction, and The Collection of the Teaching. Introduction, The Time of Coming into the World, The Name, The Clan, The Tree of Enlightenment, The Light Around the Body, The Number of Occasions of Teaching, The Disciples, and The Duration of the Teaching.
I have heard the following. The nine continents were divided and four kinds of living beings were differentiated.
The waves of ignorance contaminate beings easily and the work of wisdom is difficult to establish.
These beings return to the river of attachment and drift for a long time in the ocean of suffering.
The tree of thought does not grow nor is the lamp of mind illuminates.
The Great Sage of the Three Types of Supernatural Knowledge, the Adept of the Eight Liberations, stands in charge of the Dharma realm with his wisdom and ultimately makes the empty space his body.
His bodily form is everywhere and its size cannot be measured in human scale.
His wisdom operates in everything and its function transcends all categories of thought.
He cannot be fathomed by human categories.
How could he be discussed in terms of this world?
He wished to make ignorant people see and hear, and show the shadow and traces of the Perfected Person.
Like wind in a valley that follows the roaring of tigers, or auspicious clouds that rise after jumping dragons, stimuli and responses correspond to each other.
Miraculous incidents occur simply following unchanging principles—from the time the trees at the Deer Park first gave expression to the light until the Gold River marked the concealment of the bright light.
Sentient beings of the period of the imitation Dharma turn toward auspicious manifestations.
Though one thousand buddhas differ in their traces, their wisdom and path are one and the same.
Compassionate without discrimination, they follow natural desires and bring benefit to living beings.
Having made the universal vow to establish the buddha land, they steer the boat of compassion in order to save those who are drowning .
Sentient beings respond to this because their capacities and external conditions match each other. Comment:
The present belongs to the world age of the wise. Time is divided into four periods: formation, duration, destruction, and emptiness.
Of these four periods of time, the world age of formation has already passed but the world age of destruction has not yet arrived.
The present is the world age of duration.
One thousand buddhas appear during this period.
Speaking broadly, three buddhas have already gone by.
The present is the period of the teaching left by the fourth buddha, Śākyamuni.
Each of the four periods is divided into twenty minor world ages .
There are altogether eighty minor world ages.
The first is the world age of the great flood, conflagration, and winds.
The present is called the world age of the wise, but more specifically the present is part of one of the twenty minor world ages distinguished within the world age of duration.
The Lishi apitan lun says: Eleven world ages are in the future and eight world ages are in the past.
The present Śākyamuni Buddha attained buddhahood in the ninth world age.
Question: In the present world age of the wise, the buddhas do not appear in the world during the world ages of formation, destruction, and emptiness.
They choose only the world age of duration .
Again, within this world age only eleven minor world ages are still left in the future.
How can it be that nine hundred and ninety-six buddhas are yet to appear together in the remaining eleven world ages?
Answer:
This is indeed difficult to understand.
Even the ancient buddhas had such restrictions The meaning is obscure.
Let us learn the outline of this matter by consulting the Yaowang yaosheng jing and the Foming jing .
We will first record a passage from the Yaowang yaosheng jing and then confirm it by quoting from the Foming jing.
There are differences in the timing of world ages.
The Yaowang yaosheng jing says:
At that time Śākyamuni Buddha told the congregation, “Innumerable world ages ago in the last period of the Dharma of the Buddha of Wondrous Light, I renounced the householder’s life and, studying the Way, heard the names of these fifty-three buddhas.
When I heard them I joined my hands together in reverence and felt joyful at heart.
Furthermore, I taught others and made them remember them. After hearing these names of the buddhas others also taught them in their turn.
In this way, three thousand people recited these same sounds of the names of the buddhas with their three thousand mouths and paid respect to them with deep devotion.
Thus, they could overcome the sins committed during their rebirths in innumerable numbers of world ages.
The list of the first one thousand buddhas begins with Huaguang Buddha and ends with Viśvabhū Buddha.
They attained buddhahood during the world age of ornamentation just preceding the present world age of the wise.
These buddhas are the one thousand buddhas of the past.
The list of the one thousand buddhas of the present world age begins with Krakucchanda Buddha and ends with Ruci Tathāgata.
These buddhas will attain buddhahood one after another during the present world age of the wise.
The list of the last one thousand buddhas begins with Riguang Tathāgata and ends with Xumixiang Buddha.
These buddhas will attain buddhahood during the future world age of the lunar stations.” If we follow the Foming jing :
In the ninety-first world age counted backward from the present, there was a buddha called Vipaśyin; in the thirtieth world age counted backward from the present, a buddha came into the world; the name of this buddha was Śikhin; in this same world age another buddha came into the world; the name of this buddha was Viśvabhū Tathāgata.
Question:
Are these ninety-one world ages major world ages or minor world ages?
Answer: They are major world ages.
Question:
How do you know that? Answer: According to the old Posha lun :
Śākyamuni Bodhisattva planted the seeds of good works for the primary and secondary marks of the buddhahood since Vipaśyin Buddha.
He had lived through ninety-one major world ages before he reached the present ninth world age of duration.
According to the old Jushe lun , because of the vigorous efforts of worshiping Tiṣya Buddha, “Śākyamuni Bodhisattva was able to skip the nine major world ages to ultimately attain buddhahood.” Therefore, we know that the nine world ages are major world ages.
How could the remaining ninety-one world ages not also be major world ages?
In addition, according to the Yaowang yaoshang jing :
he past world age of ornamentation, the present world age of the wise, and the future world age of the lunar stations will each see the appearance of one thousand buddhas.
Thus, we learn that these world ages are major immeasurable world ages.
Again, it is said in the Yaowang jing :
If good men and women and all other beings hear these fifty-three names of the buddhas, these people will not be reborn in the lower realms of beings during the subsequent trillion immeasurable world ages.
The text continues in this manner, turning one by one to the past world age of ornamentation, present world age of the wise, and the future world age of the lunar stations, each of which sees the appearance of one thousand buddhas.
Thus, we learn that these creatures pass through the major world ages or immeasurable world ages.
As for the present world age of the wise in which four buddhas have already appeared, this is also an immeasurable world age, not a minor world age of duration.
Since it is a major world age, there is no doubt about the fact that in the present world age of the wise one thousand buddhas will appear.
The Chang ahan jing says: In the ninety-first world age going back into the past there was a buddha called Vipaśyin.
In the thirty-first world age back into the past a buddha appeared in the world who was called Śikhin.
In the thirty-first world age back into the past a buddha appeared in the world who was called Viśvabhū.
The buddhas Śikhin and Viśvabhū are none other than the two buddhas mentioned in the Foming jing, which says that in the same world age two buddhas appeared in the world.
It may be that the translator of the Chang ahan jing repeated the expression “in the thirty-first world ages into the past” by mistake.
There is also another view.
According to the Lishi apitan lun (ref.
T.1644: There have already been three buddhas that appeared in the world.
Śākyamuni appeared in the present ninth world age.
Thus, in the past nine world ages four buddhas have already appeared.
There are still eleven world ages in the future.
How could anyone know that there won’t be many more buddhas appearing in this future period?
A scripture says, “Sometimes incalculable numbers of buddhas appear during one world age; sometimes an infinite number of world ages passes without a single buddha appearing in the world.” To infer from this, even in a minor world age many buddhas may appear in the world.
Nothing prevents this.
Since the capacities of sentient beings differ in strength at different times, the frequency of auspicious events also differs. It is difficult to learn what this means. The meaning becomes clear after further inference.) Comment:
The realm where these one thousand buddhas of the world age of the wise teach includes the realm under the rule of the Zhou dynasty, but it is extended to include the entire universe covering the three thousand great chiliocosms.
The land in which the buddhas dwell is at the very center.
This is so that the teaching of the Buddha is initiated at the center of the empty space of the human mind and reaches externally human beings in all places.
Because this land is the center of everything, the vajra throne is located there.
Such a seat is absent in other areas. Therefore, the buddhas do not dwell there.
The Ruiying jing says: This land is at the center of three thousand suns and moons and twelve thousand heavens and earths.
The august Buddha does not appear in peripheral areas.
If he were to dwell on the periphery the ground would incline as a consequence.
Therefore, when buddhas appeared in the past, they always appeared here.
Miraculous responses all occur in the same way.
This passage demonstrates the truth of our observation above.
The Chang ahan jing says:
In the ninety-first world age going back into the past a buddha appeared in the world. His name was Vipaśyin.
At that time the life span of human beings was eighty thousand years.
In the thirty-first world age in the past a buddha appeared in the world. His name was Śikhin.
At that time the life span of human beings was seventy thousand years.
In the thirty-first world age in the past a buddha appeared in the world. His name was Viśvabhū.
At that time people lived sixty thousand years.
Earlier in the world age of the wise a buddha appeared into the world. His name was Krakucchanda.
At that time the life span of human beings was fifty thousand years.
Also during the world age of the wise a buddha appeared in the world. His name was Kanaka.
At that time the life span of human beings was forty thousand years.
Also during the world age of the wise a buddha appeared in the world. His name was called Kāśyapa.
At that time the life span of human beings was twenty thousand years.
I now appear in the world. At this time the life span of human beings is one hundred years. A few people live longer but the majority live for a time span shorter than this.
According to the Zhidu lun and Katyāyana’s Treatise , Śākyamuni was to appear when human beings lived ten thousand years.
He observed the sentient beings in the world but from the time of the ten thousand-year life span on there were no beings with the appropriate capacity for salvation.
When the time came when sentient beings had a life span of one hundred years, he saw that their suffering was intense and that the world age was about to end.
Therefore, he came into the world.
These treatises therefore say that at the end of a world age a buddha makes the world flourish; at the beginning of a world age a universal monarch appears; these two circumstances are different. The topic is discussed below in the section on the universal monarch (ref. Fayuan zhulin, T.2122:617a24–623b29).
The information below is based on the Zengyi ahan jing  and the Qifo fumu xingzi jing .
The first buddha Vipaśyin, the second buddha Śikhin, the third buddha Viśvabhū—these three buddhas had the same surname Kuru (Note:
The Chang ahan jing, T.1:1c19–23, says that the first buddha had the name Vipaśyin ; the second, Śikhin, and the third, Viśvabhū.) The fourth buddha Krakucchanda, the fifth buddha Kanakamuni, the sixth buddha Kāśyapa—these three buddhas had the same surname Kāśyapa.
The Chang ahan jing, T.1:2a5–15, says that the fourth had the name Krakucchanda Buddha ; the fifth, Kanaka Buddha, and the sixth had the name Kāśyapa Buddha, which is the same as above.) The seventh buddha is our present Śākyamuni.
His surname is Gautama.
[The Qifo fumu xingzi jing (T.4:159b21–c10, ref.
Chang ahan jing, T.1:2a16–19) says The first buddha Vipaśyin, the second buddha Śikhin, and the third buddha Viśvabhū—these three buddhas were equally of the warrior class .
The fourth buddha Krakucchanda, the fifth buddha Kanakamuni, and the sixth buddha Kāśyapa—these three buddhas were equally of the priestly class .
The seventh buddha, Śākyamuni, whom I now have become, is of the warrior class.
As for the first, Vipaśyin Buddha, his father’s name was Warrior King Bandhumant; his mother’s name was Bandhumatī; the name of the state they governed was Bandhumatī.
As for the second, Śikhin Buddha, his father’s name was Warrior King Aruṇavan; his mother’s name was Prabhāvatī; the name of the state they governed was Aruṇavatī.
As for the third, Viśvabhū Buddha, his father’s name was Warrior King Supratīta; his mother’s name was Yaśavatī; the name of the state they governed was Anupama.
As for the fourth, Krakucchanda Buddha, his father’s name was Agnidatta Brahman; his mother’s name was Vaiśākha; the name of the state they governed was Kṣemāvatī; the name of the king was Kṣema.
As for the fifth, Kanakamuni Buddha, his father’s name was Yajñadatta Brahman; his mother’s name was Uttarā; the name of the state they governed was Śobhavatī; the name of its king was Śobha.
As for the sixth, Kāśyapa Buddha, his father’s name was Agnidatta Brahman ; his mother’s name was Dhanavatī; the name of the state they governed was Vārāṇasī; the name of its king was Kṛki.
As for the seventh, Śākyamuni Buddha, whom I now have become, the father’s name is Warrior King Śuddhodana; the mother’s name is Mahāmāyā; the name of the state they govern is Kapilavastu; and the name of the previous great king was Panti.
To speak from a broader point of view, there are four classes:
first the priests , second the warriors , third the merchants and farmers , and fourth the serfs .
The last two classes are inferior and not the vehicle for the Great Sage.
The earlier two are noble and are vehicles for the birth of the truly enlightened ones.
The moral conduct of the priests is pure and lofty.
The fearsome authority and kindness of the warriors are widely known.) The Zhidu lun says that the Buddha was born among the class that was most honored at the time.
Śākyamuni appeared in the world when it was governed by strength.
He was incarnated as a warrior king to demonstrate his fearsome authority.
Kāśyapa was born at a time when everyone was good and obedient.
He dwelled in pure conduct and became a model of virtue.
When the first, Vipaśyin Buddha, attained the Way and became the Buddha, it was under a pātaliya tree.
When the second, Śikhin Buddha, attained the Way and became the Buddha, it was under a puṇḍarīka tree.
When the third, Viśvabhū Buddha, attained the Way and became the Buddha, it was under a śāla tree.
When the fourth, Krakucchanda Buddha, attained the Way and became the Buddha, it was under a śirīṣa tree.
When the fifth, Kanakamuni Buddha, attained the Way and became the Buddha, it was under an udumbara tree.
When the sixth, Kāśyapa Buddha, attained the Way and became the Buddha, it was under the a nyagrodha tree.
When the seventh, Śākyamuni Buddha, whom I have now become, became the Buddha, it was under an apeituoluo tree.
Beautiful temple buildings do not count as accomplishments for those who have renounced the householder’s life.
The regulations of purity for those who have entered the Way specify pine forests and grasses as suitable dwelling places. Why is this so?
The people of the world value their bodies and therefore dwell in beautiful houses.
The people of the Way consider household life to be bondage and therefore abandon and reject it.
None of those who engage in the hundred trades and services could have attained enlightenment earlier.
The teacher who trains us is said to have been wise by birth .
His attainment of the Way, final extinction , birth, and preaching all took place under a tree.
The meaning of this fact is .
He cut off his hair, pulled out the hair pin, rejected all honors, and shaved his head—how could anyone fail to look up to him and place their trust in him?
According to the Guanfo sanmei jing (T.643:693a17–18, b12–14, 22–24, Vipaśyin Buddha’s height was sixty yojanas and the halo of light around his head was one hundred and twenty yojanas in diameter; Śikhin Buddha’s height was forty yojanas, the halo of light around his head was forty-five yojanas in diameter, and the light around his body extended for one hundred yojanas; Viśvabhū Buddha’s height was thirty-two yojanas, the halo of light around his head was forty-two yojanas in diameter, and the light around his body extended for sixty-two yojanas; Krakucchanda Buddha’s height was twenty-five yojanas, the halo of light around his head was thirty-two yojanas in diameter, and the light around his body extended for fifty yojanas; Kanakamuni Buddha’s height was twenty-five yojanas, the halo of light around his head was thirty yojanas in diameter, and the light around his body extended for forty yojanas; Kāśyapa Buddha’s height was sixteen zhang, the halo of light around his head was twenty yojanas in diameter; Śākyamuni Buddha’s height is six zhang and the halo of light around his head is seven zhang in diameter.
The color of the bodies of these seven buddhas is purplish gold. To enquire into the matter respectfully, there is no distinction and order of superiority and inferiority among the Dharma bodies of the buddhas.
Their manifestations are different only because they follow the capacities and karmic conditions of their listeners.
Therefore, when he appeared in the world Śākyamuni’s color was purplish gold but a thousand monks all saw it as red.
Sixteen lay believers, with their biases, saw it as grey.
The difference is due to the differences between the monks and the laypeople. The Buddha was always the same.
If you understand the matter on the basis of this example, you will be free from error.) The Mile xiasheng jing says, “The height was one thousand chi and the halo around the head was twenty zhang in diameter.” The first, Vipaśyin Buddha, preached on three occasions altogether.
On the first occasion, one hundred thousand monks attained arhatship; on the second occasion ninety thousand monks attained arhatship; on the third occasion eighty thousand monks attained arhatship.
The Chang ahan jing, T.1.2b22–24, says:
On the first occasion of the preaching of Vipaśyin Buddha there were one hundred and sixty-eight thousand disciples; on the second occasion, there were one hundred thousand disciples; and on the third occasion there were three hundred and sixty-eight thousand disciples The second, Śikhin Buddha, taught on three occasions.
On the first occasion of his preaching ninety thousand monks attained arhatship; on the second occasion eighty thousand monks attained arhatship; on the third occasion seventy thousand monks attained arhatship.
The Chang ahan jing, T.1:2b24–26, says:
“Śikhin Buddha, on the first occasion of his preaching, had one hundred thousand disciples; the number on the second and third occasions was the same.”) The third, Viśvabhū Buddha, preached on two occasions.
On the first occasion of his preaching seventy thousand monks attained arhatship; on the second occasion sixty thousand monks attained arhatship.
The fourth, Krakucchanda Buddha, preached on one occasion.
Forty thousand monks attained arhatship.
The fifth, Kanakamuni Buddha, preached on one occasion.
Thirty thousand monks attained arhatship.
The sixth, Kāśyapa Buddha, preached on one occasion.
Twenty thousand monks attained arhatship.
The seventh, Śākyamuni Buddha, whom I have now become, preached on one occasion and one thousand two hundred and fifty monks attained arhatship.
Comment: According to the list given above, the seven buddhas preached and saved different numbers of people.
These numbers are based on the Small Vehicle teaching.
When the Tathāgata first attained buddhahood he saved the followers of wrong teachings; they rejected their mistaken views and adopted the correct one; as hearers and disciples they intimately served him.
The number of these people was limited to those given here.
If one bases their calculation on the entire lifetime of the Buddha’s preaching, in which he saved followers of the three vehicles and caused them to enter the Way, then the number is infinite.
Thus Dharma Master Xuanzang says the following:
According to the view prevalent in the West the teaching life of Śākyamuni is divided into three periods; during the first period he preached the teaching of form for the sake of the hearers in order to destroy their attachment to non-Buddhist teachings and awaken and lead them to attain the Way; in the second period he preached the teaching of nonform for the sake of the bodhisattvas of minor attainment in order to destroy their views of hearers and cause them to awaken to the Great Vehicle of nonform; in the third period he preached the teaching of both form and nonform for the sake of the bodhisattvas of greater attainment in order to destroy the teaching of form and of nonform and cause them to awaken to the Middle Way and the ultimate and perfect teaching.
During each of these three periods he adapted his teaching to his audience’s capacities and taught widely and without limits.
Some followed the disciples of these teachings of the three vehicles, and then the disciples of these disciples, and so on, as the transmission spread.
Those who heard the teaching in this manner and attained the Way were as numerous as the infinite number of particles of dust and grains of sand.
The Buddha’s teaching cannot be fixed in one piece of writing and cannot be limited to one meaning.
The Chang ahan jing says:
Vipaśyin Buddha had two disciples: one was called Khaṇḍa, the other Tiṣya.
Śikhin Buddha had two disciples: one was called Abhibhū, the other Saṃbhava.
Viśvabhū Buddha had two disciples: one was called Fuyou , the other Uttara.
Krakucchanda Buddha had two disciples:
one was called Sañjīva, the other Vidhura.
Kanaka Buddha had two disciples: one was called Youboxianduo , the other Yuduolou .
Kāśyapa Buddha had two disciples: one was called Tiṣya, the other Bharadvāja.
I now have two disciples:
one is called Śāriputra, and the other Mahāmaudgalyāyana.
The list above gives the names of two disciples for each buddha.
This is because they were the first among the hearers and therefore are mentioned separately from others.) Vipaśyin Buddha had an attendant disciple called Aśoka; Śikhin Buddha had an attendant disciple called Kṣemaṅkura; Viśvabhū Buddha had an attendant disciple called Upaśāntā; Krakucchanda Buddha had an attendant disciple called Buddhija; Kanaka Buddha had an attendant disciple called Svaskika; Kāśyapa Buddha had an attendant disciple called Sarvamitra; I now have an attendant disciple called Ānanda.
Vipaśyin Buddha had a son called Fangying; Śikhin Buddha had a son called Wuliang; Viśvabhū Buddha had a son called Miaojue; Kraku cchanda Buddha had a son called Shangsheng; Kanaka Buddha had a son called Daoshi; Kāśyapa Buddha had a son called Jinjun; I now have a son called Rāhula.
The Pusa benxing jing says:
After the tathāgata Vipaśyin Buddha disappeared the true Dharma remained in the world for twenty thousand years; after the tathāgata Shenwenfo Buddha disappeared the true Dharma remained in the world for sixty thousand years ; after the tathāgata Krakucchanda Buddha disappeared the correct teaching remained in the world for five hundred years; after Kanakamuni Tathāgata disappeared the true Dharma remained in the world for twenty-nine days; after the tathāgata Kāśyapa Buddha disappeared the true Dharma remained in the world for seven days; after the tathāgata Śākyamuni Buddha disappeared the true Dharma remained in the world for four hundred years; the imitation Dharma also remained in the world for five hundred years (Note:
According to the Shanjian lun , the true Dharma remained in the world for one thousand years.) Introduction, Scriptural Evidence, and Karmic Causes.
The vehicles of one thousand buddhas are bright; ten thousand spirits look up to their light. The buddhas observe beings’ capacities and attend to their works.
The buddhas are most holy and their love is all-encompassing.
Therefore, the holy ones describe happiness in order to encourage good deeds and point to disasters to warn about evil ones.
Inferior people say that good deeds produce no benefits and they do not perform them; they say that evil deeds do no harm and they do not control them.
Thus, mere statements of disastrous or happy consequences are only flowery words without substance; arguments that insist that there are no beneficial or harmful consequences are believed and considered to be proven by evidence.
For this reason, the great holy ones, full of great love and compassion, take pity on these ignorant and deluded beings.
They widely promote the teaching of the six perfections of wisdom to guide all beings of the different types of birth; they broadly declare the teaching of the two truths and end the poisonous effects in the three realms of existence.
Therefore, they show infinite compassion and attend to the karmic conditions of the present age of the wise.
The Wuxianren jing says:
Innumerable world ages ago holy people lived in a forest; four of them were masters and one was a servant.
The latter was never unhappy about his status.
One day he went to gather fruit and juice, and by mistake failed to return on time. Since it was past midday the holy people could not eat.
Resentment in someone’s mind can work as evil magic. The holy one who was a servant to the others felt the effects of their resentment and died.
He was then born among humans.
A brahman who could read facial features predicted that he would become a king.
Later he in fact became a king.
the Buddha said, “The king was none other than I myself.
The four holy people were Krakucchanda Buddha, Kanakamuni Buddha, Kāśyapa Buddha, and Maitreya Buddha.
The brahman was Devadatta.” The Zhidu lun says:
When the world age ends in fire everything is reduced to emptiness.
Because of the power of sentient beings’ beneficial merit, a wind blows in all directions and holds up a great body of water.
There is a being with one thousand heads and two thousand arms and legs.
He is called the god Viṣṇu.
Out of his navel a golden lotus flower of most precious jewels with one thousand petals appears.
Its light is as bright as ten thousand suns shining at the same time.
In the middle of the flower there is a person sitting with legs crossed, and he is also infinitely bright.
He is called King Brahmā.
Eight children are born from his mind.
These eight children give birth to heaven, earth, and people.
King Brahmā sits upon a lotus flower.
For this reason, because the buddhas follow the ways of the world, they are said to sit on lotus flowers with crossed legs and preach the six perfections of wisdom. The Dabei jing says:
The Buddha said to Ānanda, “Why is the present world age called the world age of the wise?
It is for the following reason. These three thousand great chiliocosms were all one mass of water when this world age was about to begin.
At that time, the Śuddhāvāsa deities observed with their divine eyes that the world was only a great mass of water.
They saw that there were one thousand stems of lotus flowers.
Each of the lotus flowers was called ‘one thousand petals.’ The lotus flowers’ color was golden and their golden light illumined everywhere, and the fragrance in the air was extremely pleasurable.
When the Śuddhāvāsa deities saw this, joy arose in their hearts.
Praising this vision, they said, ‘How extraordinary!
In this world age one thousand buddhas will appear in the world.’ Because of this, the present world age is called the world age of the wise.
After I disappear, nine hundred and ninety-six buddhas will appear in the world during the world age of the wise.
Krakucchanda Buddha was the first and I am the fourth.
Maitreya will then take my place. In this way, buddhas will continue to appear until Ruci Tathāgata.
You should know this sequence.” The Qianfo yinyuan jing says:
At that time the Buddha was coming out of a rock cave in Mount Gṛdhra kūṭa in Rājagṛha.
He asked Ānanda, “What doctrines are the hearers and bodhisattvas preaching now?” Ānanda replied to the Buddha, “Worldhonored One, each of the bodhisattvas is preaching the conditions of his own previous lives.” At that time, Bhadrapāla Bodhisattva said to the Buddha, “I would like to ask a few questions today.
Please, World-honored One, explain these things to me.” When he uttered these words, eighty-four thousand bodhisattvas all took off their precious necklaces and scattered them around the Buddha as offerings.
The necklaces scattered around the Buddha stayed on top of the Buddha’s head.
They looked like Mount Sumeru, awesome to observe.
At that time one thousand buddhas manifested themselves, sitting in the middle of the mountain cave.
At that time bodhisattvas said to the Buddha, “World-honored One, what sort of meritorious seeds did these one thousand buddhas of the present world age of the wise plant in the past world for all of them to be born in the same place, together in the same household, and in one and the same world age, to obtain enlightenment one after another in order to teach and save sentient beings?” At that time, the World-honored One said to the bodhisattvas, “I will explain this in detail for you.
You should now know that infinite numbers of trillions of infinite world ages ago, or again twice that long a time ago, this world was called Great Adornment.
The world age was called Great Treasure.
There was a buddha called Baodengyanwang  Tathāgata.
The lifetime of that buddha was half a world age. After the buddha’s disappearance the period of instruction of the world with the true Dharma lasted for one world age; the period of instruction of the world with the imperfect Dharma after that lasted for two world ages.
“During the period of the imperfect Dharma there was a king called Guangde , who instructed people by performing the ten types of good deeds and was like a universal monarch.
At that time the great king instructed people to recite the Pituolun .
There were then one thousand youths in school—all aged fifteen, intelligent, and knowledgeable.
They heard the monks praise the Buddha, Dharma, and Sangha.
A boy named Lianhuade said to the monk Shancheng , ‘What are the Buddha, Dharma, and Sangha?’ The monk answered : Fully endowed with the perfections, His pure nature realizes wisdom.
Since he has achieved the superior state of mind, He is called the Buddha. Undefiled, its nature is pure And forever detached from the world. Not contemplating the world, which is nothing but the five skandhas , It is eternal and is called the Dharma. bodies and minds permanently in a state of nonaction, And forever rejecting the four types of food , They serve as the field of merit for the world. Therefore, these monks are called the Sangha.
“When the one thousand youths heard the name of the Three Jewels each of them, holding incense and flowers, followed the monks and entered the stupa to worship.
On seeing the Buddha’s physical appearance they all threw themselves onto the floor, bowing their heads to the ground, and elbows and knees in the act of worship.
In front of the image they made the universal vow of bodhisattvas.
Each cherished the aspiration for supreme enlightenment .
“After many world ages will all attain buddhahood without fail.
They will succeed just as the present World-honored One succeeded.
Their lives differ in length but when they are about to die, because of the meritorious causal condition of hearing the names of the Three Jewels, the karmic effects of births and deaths lasting for fifty-one world ages will be removed from them, and when their lives end they will attain rebirth in Brahmā Heaven.
Recalling that in their past lives they heard the names of the Three Jewels, they will achieve rebirth in heaven.
, one thousand kings of Brahmā gods, each on top of his palace and holding flowers of seven treasures, arrived at the stupa and presented offerings to the buddha image.
The one thousand kings of the Brahmā gods unanimously proclaimed the following verse:
If we pronounce the Great Name of the Buddha, , We dwell in the good and quiet land of nirvana forever. If we hear the Name of the Buddha and remove all evils, We are spontaneously reborn in Brahmā Heaven. We now kneel to pay respect, And take refuge in the Great Liberation. “After saying this verse, each king returned to Brahmā Heaven.
Bhadrapāla, you must now know the following.
The king of that state who instructed people by performing the ten types of good deeds has long since attained buddhahood.
He is Vipaśyin Tathāgata.
The monk Shan cheng is Śikhin Tathāgata.
The one thousand youths of that time are none other than the tathāgatas of the present age, starting with Kraku cchanda Buddha and leading to the very last tathāgata, Ruci.
Bhadrapāla, you should now know the following.
Myself and the one thousand bodhisattvas of the present world age of the wise heard the name of the Three Jewels at the place of that buddha and first cherished the aspiration for supreme enlightenment.
This is how the matter stands.” The Buddha said to Bhadrapāla, “An innumerable number of immeasurable world ages ago in this sahā world there was a large kingdom called Vārāṇasī.
The name of the king was Fande .
The king always taught the people the good Dharma.
After handing the kingdom over to his son he renounced the householder’s life, studied the Way, and became a pratyekabuddha.
Leaping up into the sky, he performed eighteen miraculous feats.
“At that time one thousand kings of the Brahmā gods, each wearing a heap of beautiful flowers on his shoulder scarf, went to the udumbara forest and offered the flowers to the pratyekabuddha.
They said to the Buddha, ‘Virtuous One, please preach the teaching to us.’ Then the prat yeka buddha leaped up into the sky and performed the eighteen miraculous feats, stretching his arms and showing his legs.
“Among the kings of Brahmā gods was one called Huijian.
He said to the other Brahmā kings, ‘I see that the pratyekabuddha upholds the five precepts of lay followers.
Following the teaching of mental and bodily purity, we should perform the ten types of good deeds and contemplate the doctrine of causality .
If we transfer the merits of these good roots toward the goal of attaining that extremely profound supreme enlightenment and make the vow that we shall attain buddhahood, that would be trillions of times better than the attainments of this pratyekabuddha.’ “Then, after the lives of the one thousand Brahmā kings came to an end they were reborn as one thousand universal monarchs in one thousand sets of the four cosmic continents in the sahā world.
Their life span was eighty-four thousand years.
When were about to die there was at that time a brahman in the Himalayas.
He was intelligent and knowledgeable and had a life span of half a world age.
Earlier in a scripture he had heard of the past buddha called Zhantanzhuangyan Tathāgata.
That buddha preached the very profound teaching of the perfection of giving :
if one transcends the artificially conceived distinction between giving and receiving, one’s mind will be in peace.
The great holy man came out of the Himalayas when he heard about this, and visited the one thousand holy kings to praise the teaching of giving.
Thereupon, each of the one thousand holy kings handed his kingdom over to his son and renounced the householder’s life in order to study the Way.
At that time each of the one thousand holy kings built a hut in the Himalayas and sought the supreme Way.
They attained the five supernatural powers and flew up into the sky.
Their life span became one world age.
“At that time there was a large demon in the Himalayas.
Its body was four thousand li long, and its fangs extended eighty li in an upward direction.
Its face was twelve li wide and blood-colored light, which resembled molten copper, came out from its eyes.
The demon held a sword in his left hand and a trident in his right.
Standing in front of the holy kings, he shouted loudly, ‘I am now hungry and thirsty but there is nothing to eat or to drink.
Kings, please take pity on me and give me some food and drink!’ “The one thousand holy kings then said to the demon, ‘We have made the vow to give everything as an offering.’ They each poured water on the demon’s hands and gave him fruit to eat, such as holy men themselves eat.
When he received the fruit the demon became very angry and threw it on the ground.
He said to the kings, ‘My father was a demon and ate the vital parts of human beings.
My mother was a demoness and always ate the hearts of human beings and drank their warm blood.
I am now very hungry and need the hearts and blood of human beings.
What can I do with fruit?’ “The one thousand holy kings then said to the demon, ‘Nothing is more difficult to give as an offering than one’s own body.
Today we cannot give up our hearts and bring them to you for your use.’ Thereupon, the demon said in verse:
Contemplate that the heart has no real characteristic of a heart, That it is only the product of the four elements of matter. Only if one can give up everything, Should what he practices be called the bodhisattva practice. “At that time there was a brahman in the Himalayas, whose name was Laodubati.
He said to the demon, ‘Great master, please preach the teaching for me.
I now do not begrudge you either my heart or my blood.’ With these words he took off his clothes and spread them to make a high seat, and asked the demon to sit there.
Thereupon, the great demon spoke in verse: Desiring to seek the unconditioned Way, Do not begrudge having bodies or minds cut apart. Cutting them up, feel pain, But can bear that pain with a firmness that is like the Firmness of the very earth on which walk.
Not feeling pain, There is no regret in mind that seeks the Way. Not begrudging anything, Just as if saving head that is on fire, Rescue many who are hungry and thirsty without discrimination. Only then should what do be called the bodhisattva practice. “When Laodubati heard this verse his body and mind were filled with joy.
Immediately, he took a sharp dagger and pierced his chest to take out his heart.
At that very moment the goddess of the earth emerged from the ground and said to Laodubati, ‘Please, great holy one, take pity on us and on the gods of the trees.
Do not give up your body and life for the sake of a demon!’ Laodubati said to the gods in verse: The body is like an illusory flame. It appears due to karmic conditions and then changes and disappears. It is like the echo of a voice: Once the calling stops, there is no more response. It is based on the powers of the four elements and the five skandhas. Their force does not remain forever.
During trillions of years there has never been anyone who died Because he did something for the Dharma. For the Dharma I now sacrifice my heart and blood. Do not hinder me and deprive me of supreme wisdom. As the reward for this sacrificial gift, I vow, wishing to attain the Buddha’s path. That if I later attain buddhahood I will first bring salvation to you.
“After saying these verses Laodubati lay down in front of the demon and, piercing his neck with a sword he made an offering of his blood to the demon.
Then he cut open his chest, removed his heart, and gave it to the demon.
“At that moment heaven and earth shook greatly, the sun lost its light and lightning flashed in the sky although there were no clouds.
Five demons appeared from the four directions and scrambled to eat the offering, grabbing pieces of the torn-up heart.
After they ate the offering they flew up into the sky and said to the one thousand holy kings, ‘Who could perform an act of giving like Laodubati?
Only if you can perform the act of giving like this can you become a buddha!’ Then the one thousand holy kings were frightened and withdrew, no longer desiring enlightenment.
Full of regret, they all wanted to return to their kingdoms.
Then the five demons said in verse: Not to kill is the seed of buddhahood. A compassionate mind is the best medicine. The Great Compassionate One is eternally in a state of peace. He is forever free from the illusion of old age and death.
All those who receive bodies fear others who kill and poison. For this reason bodhisattvas teach us the precept of not killing. If you now fear death, Constantly practice the precept of not killing. Why do you want to return to your kingdoms , Giving up quietude and seeking the noisy world?
“When the one thousand holy kings heard these words, they all fell silent.” The Buddha said to Bhadrapāla Bodhisattva, “You must now know the following.
The first brahman who praised the perfection of giving is the past buddha Dingguangmingwang .
Laodubati is the past buddha Dīpaṅkara.
The one thousand holy kings left the householder’s life and studied the Way, and they met Dīpaṅkara Buddha.
They practiced austerities and then had regret in their minds; they fell into the Great Hell and stayed there for a period of one world age.
Even though they had fallen into hell, however, because their minds had once been adorned by the power of their vows to attain enlightenment the fires in hell could not burn them.
After this period of time they again met Dingguangmingwang Bodhisattva and thanks to his preaching they came out of hell.
They extensively praised the liberation of the past one thousand buddhas and ornamented those buddhas.
At the time of Zizaiwang Buddha, the one thousand holy kings heard the names of the one thousand buddhas and, overjoyed, they reverently worshiped the buddhas.
Because of this karmic condition, they were released from the sins that would have resulted in births and deaths as numerous as the grains of sand in the Ganges River multiplied by nine hundred million nayutas.
Bhadrapāla, you must now know:
the one thousand holy kings are none other than the one thousand buddhas of our world age of the wise.” Introduction, The Royal Tribe, The Clan, and Marriage.
To enquire respectfully, the lineage of King Śuddhodana begins with King Ikṣuvāku.
Universal monarchs followed one after another, and millions of clanspeople shone in light, like so many leaves of a tree.
Therefore, when Śākyamuni appeared temporarily in this world, he chose to be born in this prominent lineage, even more greatly manifesting its later generations.
Appearing in Kapilavastu as a golden figure six zhang in height, and manifesting the thirty-two marks of a buddha, he took charge of spiritual instruction for three thousand great chiliocosms.
Taking pity on those who are submerged in the four violent streams of defilement, he sends out the boat of the six perfections for their salvation.
The Chang ahan jing says:
When heaven and earth were formed the heavenly deities came down and, eating food, they became human beings.
Because conflicts arose human beings, after discussion, established a ruler.
Electing one person as the one most honored among nobles, they installed him as the head of the kingdom to govern the people.
This person was the king who became the ancestor of the Śākya tribe. Details were presented in the section on the world ages above, Fayuan zhulin, T.2122:276c7–26.) The Loutan jing says:
Later kings did not govern as well as the first kings and their life span decreased.
The human life span used to be eighty thousand years.
After this development the life span became ten thousand years and eventually one hundred years.
At the beginning of the world age there was a king called Mahāsammata .
According to the Sifen lü , there were altogether eighty-four thousand two hundred and fifty-three kings who appeared in the world.
Among these were the ten universal monarchs who ruled over the four realms under heaven.
Other kings cannot be listed in detail.
Only the names of the seven ancestors of the Tathāgata are listed.
The Wufen lü
There was a past king called Yumo (Note: The Sifen lü, T.1428:779b1, calls him Yishimo.) This king had four sons: the first was called Zhaomu (Note:
The Chang ahan jing, T.1:82c23, calls him Mianguang.), the second was called Congmu (Note: The same scripture calls him Shizhong .), the third was called Tiaoxiang (Note: The same scripture calls him Luzhi.), and the fourth was called Nilou . King Nilou had a son called Wutouluo.
King Wutouluo had a son called Jutouluo.
King Jutouluo had a son called Shixiuluo.
King Shixiuluo had four sons:
the first was called Jingfan , the second Bofan, the third Hufan , and the fourth Ganlufan .
The Chang ahan jing , the Sifen lü
T.1428:779b9– called King Śuddhodana and he had two sons (Note:
One was the Bodhisattva and the other Nanda.); the second was called Bofan and he had two sons ; the third was called King Drotodana and he had two sons (Note: One was Mahānāma and the other Aniruddha.); and the fourth was called Amṛtādana and he had two sons.
The Zhidu lun says, “King Siṃhahanu had a daughter called Ganluwei and she had a son called Shipoluo .” According the Za ahan jing , “The son of the Worldhonored One’s aunt was called the monk Tiṣyā.” The Fenbie gongde lun says:
Ānanda had a sister who left the householder’s life and became a nun. She disliked Kāśyapa who had disparagingly called Ānanda a small child.
The Dafangbian jing says: From the beginning of the world age, each successor in the lineage of Śuddhodana became a universal monarch.
Those in the last two generations, however, did not become universal monarchs but became the kings of this world .
The Youposaijie jing says:
I first had the thought of enlightenment under Śākya Buddha, then spent the first of the three infinitely long  required before attaining buddhahood under Baoding Buddha, the second under Dīpaṅkara, and the third under Kāśyapa .
says that going backward, the Buddha] encountered Vipaśyin Buddha, Dīpaṅkara Buddha, and Ratnaśikhin Buddha.
fulfilled the three infinitely long periods under Vipaśyin Buddha, and he would have had finished fulfilling them well before the time of Kāśyapa.
The scripture and the treatise disagree on this point, yet both have their own separate sources.
Truly, because of the Śākya clan’s unprecedented nobility, they had planted the seeds of merit earlier and they now receive their good retribution.) The Shieryou jing says:
An immeasurable period of time ago the Bodhisattva became a king.
When he lost his father and mother early in his life, he abdicated the throne and gave the kingdom to his brother in order to seek the Way.
From a great distance he saw a brahman whose name was Gautama. So the Bodhisattva followed the brahman and studied the Way.
The brahman said, “Take off your royal apparel and dress like me, and accept the surname Gautama.” Thereupon, the Bodhisattva accepted the name Gautama, went deep into the mountains, subsisted on berries and water, and sat in meditation, calming his thoughts.
The Bodhisattva wandered around almsbegging and eventually reached his kingdom, but none of the officials and the people recognized him and they called him “small Gautama.” The Bodhisattva built a residence in Ikṣuvāku Garden.
The Fosoxingzan jing , speaks of “the descendant of Ikṣuvāku.” Since King Wushengjing of the Śākya clan was endowed with both talent and virtue, he was called Śuddhodana.
Śuddhodana’s distant ancestor was a descendant of Gautama. Because the clan had lived in Ikṣuvāku Garden earlier, the scripture regards the king as “a descendant of Ikṣuvāku.”) There meditated by himself.
At that time five hundred thieves stole objects from the palace and their escape route passed by the Bodhisattva’s hut.
The next day people captured the thieves and since their footprints were found near the Bodhisattva’s residence, the people detained the Bodhisattva.
One after another, as dictated by law, the bodies of the thieves were pierced with a wooden pillar that was raised up in the sky for all to see.
Blood flowed down to the ground.
The brahman teacher Great Gautama saw this with his divine eye and immediately came flying, using his magical power.
He asked, “What is the crime you committed to receive this cruel punishment?
You have no descendants.
How will your family line be continued?” The Bodhisattva answered, “My life is about to end.
How can I speak about my descendants?” The king ordered his attendants to shoot the Bodhisattva with their bows and arrows to kill him.
The brahman teacher Gautama, in great sorrow, wept and placed the corpse in a coffin.
He collected the blood on the ground and formed it into balls with soil.
He placed these balls in two vessels and took them back to the deceased Gautama’s residence.
The blood that had been on the left side of the corpse was placed in the vessel to the left and the blood from the right side in the vessel to the right.
The brahman teacher Great Gautama said, “If the religious aspiration of this practitioner of the Way was sincere, the gods in the heavens will transform this blood into human beings.” Ten days later, the blood in the left vessel became a man and that in the right vessel became a woman.
Thereupon, they were given the surname Gautama.
They were also given the name Sheyi (Note: Sheyi is an aristocratic name for the Western Region.) Blood becoming a human being—this is an event in the past.
I cannot explain this transformation in detail here because it would require a long discussion.
The Pusa benxing jing says:
Before King Ikṣuvāku was a king called Damaocao .
He entrusted the throne to his ministers.
People surrounded the king as he left the city. The king shaved his head, cut off his beard, and put on the robes of those who have renounced the householder’s life.
After renouncing the householder’s life the king upheld the precepts and, maintaining purity, he practiced with great concentration and effort, thus mastering the four degrees of dhyāna  and became endowed with the five supernatural powers.
He became a royal sage and lived for an extremely long time.
Reaching a great age, he began to decline physically; he lost his vigor and his back became bent.
He could not walk very far even if he used a staff.
At that time the royal sage had many disciples.
Once his disciples were about to travel to the east and to the west, seeking food and drink.
They collected soft grass, put it in a basket, placed the royal sage in the basket, and then hung the basket from a tree branch.
Why did they do this?
Because they feared that insects and animals might come and bother the royal sage.
After the disciples left to beg for almsfood, a hunter who had been wandering in the fields and mountains saw the royal sage from a distance.
He thought that what he saw was a swan and he shot at him.
The royal sage was hit, two drops of blood fell on the ground, and he immediately died.
The disciples came back from almsbegging and saw that the royal sage had been shot and had died.
They also saw the two drops of blood on the ground.
Immediately they lowered the basket and placed the king on the ground.
Gathering firewood they cremated the king’s corpse, collected the bones, and built a stupa.
They also offered various kinds of fine incense and flowers at the stupa.
With reverence and praise, they completed their devotions to the royal sage.
Just at the places where the two drops of blood had fallen on the ground two sugarcanes sprouted.
In time they grew and when the sugarcanes had matured, the sun scorched them and split them open.
A boy came out of one of the canes, and a girl came out of the other.
They were wonderfully handsome, more attractive than anyone else in the world.
The disciples then thought, “When the royal sage lived in this world he did not have any children.
These two children are the descendants of the royal sage.
We shall look after them.” The disciples reported this event to the ministers.
They then called in a great brahman who could read facial features. The ministers ordered the brahman to read the facial features of the two children and also to choose names for them.
The brahman said, “Since this boy was born when the sun scorched the mature sugarcane and made it split open, his first name will be Shansheng .
Also, because he was born from sugarcane his second name will be Kanzhesheng .
Furthermore, because he was born when the sun scorched the sugarcane, he will be called Rizhong .
The circumstances of the birth of the girl were entirely the same.
Therefore, we shall name her Shanxian .
We shall also name her Shuibo .
The ministers then accepted the boy who was born from the sugarcane, and at an early age anointed him as their king.
When the girl Shanxian became old enough to serve him, they honored her as the first queen.
The Pusa benxing jing says:
At that time not far from the city of Kapilavastu was another city called Devadaha.
In that city a very wealthy man of the Śākya clan, named Suprabuddha, lived.
He was extremely wealthy and had accumulated a great deal of rare treasures.
Because of his great wealth, he wielded awesome authority.
Everything went as he wished without any effort on his part; there was no area in which he suffered from any shortage.
His residence was just like the palace of the deity Vaiśravaṇa.
This elder of the Śākya clan had eight daughters:
the first was called Weiyi, the second Wubiyi, the third Dayi, the fourth Wubianyi, the fifth Fayi, the sixth Heiniu, the seventh Shouniu, and the eighth Mahāprajāpatī (Note:
In Chinese, Dahui ; she was also called Fantian .) Dahui was the youngest of the daughters.
The day she was born brahman teachers capable of reading physiological features examined her body and said, “If this girl marries and gives birth to a boy, he will without fail become an universal monarch and rule over the four continents under heaven.
He will obtain the seven treasures of the universal monarch without any effort and he will be endowed with one thousand children.
He will govern people without the use of whips and sticks.” When the daughter of Suprabuddha grew up and was of age to be married, King Śuddhodana heard that a very wealthy man of his own Śākya clan had eight daughters who were incomparably beautiful, and that a reader of physiological features had predicted that one of them would give birth to a noble child.
When King Śuddhodana heard this he said, “I should seek out this woman and make her my queen, so that my lineage of Ikṣuvāku universal monarchs will not be terminated.” (Note:
This is the view of the Vinaya specialists.
They also say that Dahui is the mother of the Bodhisattva.
The text of the avadāna scripture says, “King Śuddhodana is my father; Lady Māyā is my mother.” avadāna scripture is borne out through the examination of various scriptures.) King Śuddhodana sent a messenger to visit the house of the great elder Suprabuddha, requesting that Mahāprajāpatī become his queen, to be called Prajāpati Suprabuddha said to the messenger, “Good messenger, on my behalf ask the king this question.
I have eight daughters. The first is called Weiyi and so on.
The eighth daughter is called Mahāprajāpatī.
Why does the great king ask for the youngest?
The great king must wait until I have taken care of the seven older daughters.
Only then will I give him my youngest daughter, Mahā prajā patī, to become his queen.” At this, King Śuddhodana sent the messenger back with the following message:
“I will not wait until you marry the seven older daughters one by one before I take Mahāprajāpatī as my queen.
I will take all of your eight daughters.” Suprabuddha, a man of the Śākya clan, then replied to the great king, “If this is your wish, I will obey the king’s order.
Please take my daughters at your convenience.” King Śuddhodana sent men to bring the eight daughters to the palace.
When they arrived at the palace, he took two daughters as his queens.
The name of the first of these two daughters was Weiyi and the second was Mahāprajāpatī.
He gave the remaining six daughters to his three younger brothers, two daughters for each brother.
Each brother married the two daughters given to him and made them princesses.
Then King Śuddhodana brought the daughters into the inner chambers of his palace and enjoyed to his content the pleasures they gave him.
He followed the laws of kingship in governance and brought spiritual guidance to the realm under his rule.
The Pusa benxing jing says:
At that time King Ikṣuvāku had a second queen.
She was incomparably beautiful and bore four sons:
the first was called Jumen , the second Jinse , the third Xiangzhong , and the fourth Biecheng .
The first queen, Shanxian , had only one son called Changshou .
He was extremely good-looking; few in the world could compete with him in appearance.
However, his facial structure was such that it clearly indicated that he was not suited to becoming a king.
At that time Queen Shanxian entertained the following thought, “The king of the Ikṣuvāku clan already has four sons.
These brothers, Jumen and the others, are a strong group.
I have only one son, and while he is extremely handsome and there is no one to compete with him in that regard, his features show that he is not suitable to become a king.
By what means can I assure that this child of mine succeeds to the throne?” She also thought, “The present King Ikṣuvāku is now with me.
He loves me greatly and is deeply attached to me, reveling in this emotion without any self-control.
I will now make myself up as elaborately as I know how and cause the king to become besotted with love and desire for me.
Once I induce this condition in him I will make my request to him in private.” Having entertained this thought, she decorated herself as described above, and she was incomparably beautiful.
Queen Shanxian went to the king, and when the king saw her approaching he felt great love and was overcome by desire.
Seeing that the king was feeling such desire, the king and the queen .
The queen said to the king, “Great king, you should know that I am now going to make a request.
Please grant it to me.” The king said, “Great queen, I will follow your wish without resistance.
I will grant you whatever you want.” The queen then said to the king again, to make sure, “After you have granted me my request you must not change your mind and regret that you have given me my wish.” The king said, “If I grant the queen’s request and regret it later on, may my head split into seven pieces.” The queen said, “Great king, please expel your four sons, Jumen and the others, and make my son Changshou the king.” King Ikṣuvāku immediately said to the queen, “These four sons of mine have not committed any crime.
Are there any inauspicious signs in the kingdom that indicate they should not be allowed to stay?” The queen, in turn, said again, “The king has already made a solemn vow, saying that if he changed his mind and regretted granting my wish, his head should split into seven pieces.” The king told the queen, “As I promised, I grant the queen’s request.” After the night was over and the morning came, King Ikṣuvāku gathered the four brothers together and gave them this royal order:
“You, my four sons, must leave the territory I govern.
You must not live here.
Go far away to another kingdom.” The four boys knelt on their right knees and, holding their palms together, said to their father, “Great king!
You must know that we four have not committed any crime.
We are free from blame.
Why does our father, the king, suddenly expel us, banishing us beyond the limits of his kingdom?” The king said, “I know you have not in fact committed any crime.
It was not my idea to impose expulsion on you.
It was the idea of great queen Shanxian.
The queen begged me to grant this request.
I did not refuse her request, so I now order you to leave the kingdom.” Thereupon, each of the mothers of the four princes begged for permission to leave with her son.
The king answered the ladies, “Go if you wish.” Then the relatives of the four ladies, the ministers, and some common people said to the king, “If you order these four sons to leave the kingdom, we who are your subjects also wish to leave with them.” The king said, “You may leave if you wish.” Then King Ikṣuvāku said to the princes, “From now on, when you wish to marry, you must not take a wife from another clan.
You must take a wife who has the same surname as yourself.
You must not let the lineage and surname of Ikṣuvāku die out.” Having received this instruction from their father, the king, each of the four princes left with his own mother and her relatives, their property and carriages, and went northward.
When they arrived at the base of the Himalayas, they stopped for a while.
There was a large river called Bhāgīrathī.
After crossing the river, they climbed to the top of the Himalayas, where they roamed around and stayed for a long time.
The river below was broad and peaceful and the ground was flat, without deep valleys or sharp hills.
Soft and fine grass, clean and lovely, covered the ground everywhere.
Trees, flowering and bearing fruit, grew densely over a large area.
When the princes saw all of this they said to each other, “We should build a city here and govern it.” After the princes established secure living conditions, they remembered the words of their father, the king, who had instructed them to find wives to marry from their own clan.
Since they could not find such women outside they married their own aunts and sisters with all the proper ceremony.
They did this first to obey the king’s instruction and second to prevent the lineage of the Śākya clan from being mixed with other clans, which would destroy the purity of their lineage.
One day the king of the Ikṣuvāku clan of the sun lineage invited a great brahman state teacher, “Great brahman, where are my four princes now?” The state teacher said, “Great king, you should know that your four sons left the kingdom and went northward.
Now they have  given birth to handsome male and female children.” Then King Ikṣuvāku wanted to see them because he loved his four sons, the princes.
He became very happy and said, “These princes are capable of managing state affairs and they will govern very well.” In this way the four princes established the surname Śākya.
Because the Śākya people lived in the shade of the spreading branches of a great tree, they were called Śākhiya.
Because they originated from where the Kapila ascetics lived, their city was called Kapilavastu .
Then three of the sons of King Ikṣuvāku died and only one son was left, whose name was Nirpura. The Chang ahan jing says:
They lived in a forest of straight trees, which was also called by the name Shilin .
The name of the forest was used as their surname.
The text also says that when their father, the king, heard that the four sons were handsome, he said that they were true Śākya sons.
Introduction, Signs of Decline in Heaven, Contemplating Capacities, Manifestation of Auspicious Signs, Descending into the Womb, and Guidance. When a sincere mind is stimulated from within, true enlightenment will soon occur.
When the external powers of the physical body are destroyed, the spiritual body is very near at hand.
For this reason, Śākyamuni Buddha, the original teacher, followed karmic conditions and adapted to the capacities of sentient beings.
Taking pity on that burning house that was already engulfed in flames, sharing the pain of the endless miasma that is the flow of desire, he embodied himself in the palace of King , and descended into Māyā’s womb.
He radiated golden light and dispelled the darkness of ignorance.
He dwelled in this world of the three poisons and exposed the falsity of the picturebook life of the palace.
Going out of the four gates, he warned of the transience of floating clouds .
The Yinguo jing says:
At that time Shanhui Bodhisattva’s practice had been completed, and he had ascended to the tenth stage.
In his last birth he was nearing the complete wisdom of the buddhas.
Born in Tuṣita Heaven, he was called Shengshan.
To the heavenly rulers he taught the practice of those who occupy the rank of the last birth before achieving the goal and appeared in many different forms in many lands in all directions, in order to properly preach to sentient beings according to their circumstances.
When the time approached for him to descend and become the Buddha, he contemplated the following five things.
First, he contemplated whether the capacities of sentient beings had matured or not.
Second, he contemplated whether the appropriate time had arrived or not.
Third, he contemplated which kingdom among many was located at the center.
Fourth, he contemplated which clan and tribe among many clans and tribes was most prosperous.
Fifth, he contemplated past karmic causes and conditions to determine who had the true qualifications to become his parents.
After he had contemplated these five things and was reborn below he would no longer be able to benefit the gods in heaven.
He then manifested five signs in the heavenly palace in order to let the gods know that the time had arrived for the Bodhisattva to descend and attain buddhahood.
The first sign was that the Bodhisattva’s eyes fluttered.
The second sign was that the flowers on his head wilted.
The third sign was that his clothing became covered with dust.
The fourth sign was sweat that appeared under his armpits.
The fifth sign was that he was not comfortable sitting on his own seat.
When gods saw the Bodhisattva manifest these unusual signs they were frightened, and blood poured out like rain from all the pores of their skin.
They said to each other, “The Bodhisattva will soon leave us!” At that time the Bodhisattva also manifested five auspicious signs.
First, he sent forth light to illuminate the three thousand great chiliocosms.
Second, the earth moved in eighteen ways; Mount Sumeru, the waters of the ocean, and the heavenly palace buildings all shook and quaked.
Third, the palatial buildings of the māras disappeared.
Fourth, the sun, moon, and stars lost their light.
Fifth, the eight categories of supernatural beings in the universe all trembled and could not control themselves.
When these deities saw that the Bodhisattva’s body had already manifested the five signs and also that the five extraordinary events had occurred in the universe, they all gathered at the Bodhisattva’s place.
They knelt before him, touching their heads to his feet to show their respect for him, and said, “Venerable One, today we have seen these signs and our bodies tremble all over; we cannot rest in peace.
Please explain the meaning of these events in terms of karmic causes and conditions.” Answering the gods, the Bodhisattva said, “Good sons, you should know that all conditioned things are impermanent.
Now I am about to leave this heavenly palace to be born in the world .” When the gods heard these words they cried loudly, weeping tears.
They were greatly distressed.
Blood appeared all over their bodies and they writhed in agony on the ground. In this way, they lamented the impermanence of all things.
Then one deity spoke in verse: The Bodhisattva was here and opened our spiritual eyes. Now he is about to leave us far behind. We are like the blind who have lost their guide. Or like those who were about to cross a river and suddenly lost their bridge or ferryboat. We are also like orphans who have lost their loving mother. We are like all these, having lost our place of refuge, drifting aimlessly along the current of life and death. There is absolutely no condition under which we can escape this roiling current. Our life is like a long night.
Having been pierced by the arrow of ignorance, we are losing the great King of Physicians. Who else can save us now? Asleep on a bed of ignorance, forever drowning in the ocean of love and desire, If we are forever deprived of the teaching of the Venerable One, We cannot see any hope of ever escaping from this world. The Bodhisattva then replied in verse: I will not stay here for long. I am about to descend into the world .
In the kingdom of Kapilavastu, I will be born in the palace of King Śuddhodana. Then, taking leave of my parents and relatives, renouncing the throne of the universal monarch, I will leave the householder’s life and pursue the spiritual path. Achieving the complete wisdom of a buddha, I will establish the banner of the right Dharma. Able to terminate desires as vast and endless as the ocean and closing the gate to the realms of inferior births, I will open the eightfold correct path of purity and benefit for all gods and humans, infinite in number. These developments, caused by karmic causes and conditions, should not cause you anxiety and distress.
The Zhidu lun says: Question: Why was the Bodhisattva born in Tuṣita Heaven, and not in higher or lower heavens?
This person of great merits and virtues should have been free to be born anywhere.
Answer:
Some people say that it is because the karmic effects matured in this way that he had to be reborn in the middle heaven.
They also say that bondage in the lower heavens is heavy and impure, while bondage in the higher heavens is excessively sharp.
In the case of Tuṣita Heaven, is neither too heavy nor too sharp and the wisdom of the Bodhisattva is safe and secure there.
Some also say that the Buddha did not wish to miss the time for appearing in the world.
If he had been born in the lower heavens, because the life span in those heavens is brief, when his life there ended it would still not have been the appropriate time for the Buddha to appear in the world.
If he had been born in the higher heavens, because the life span in those heavens is very long, before his life there ended he would have missed the time for the Buddha to appear in the world.
Tuṣita Heaven is located in the middle of the six heavens plus Brahmā Heaven.
There are three heavens above it and three below it.
the Bodhisattva had to be born in the world in the Middle Kingdom, descend there in the middle of the night, and leave the kingdom of Kapilavastu in the middle of the night.
He had to practice the Middle Way in order to attain enlightenment, teach the middle path to people, and enter complete extinction at midnight.
Because he preferred the teaching of the Middle , he was born in the middle heaven.
When the Bodhisattva entered the womb, he contemplated the human world in four ways.
First, he contemplated the time.
Second, he contemplated the land.
Third, he contemplated the clan.
Fourth, he contemplated the place of birth.
As for the contemplation of time mentioned first in the list above, there are eight kinds of time.
These include the first period of the Buddha’s birth when the human life span is eighty-four thousand years as well as the eighth period when the human life span is more than one hundred years.
The Bodhisattva entertained the following thought:
“When the human life span is one hundred years, the time for the Buddha to appear has arrived.” This is called the contemplation of time.
As for the contemplation of the land mentioned second in the list above, the important principle is that buddhas are always born in the Middle Kingdom, which is rich in wealth and whose land is pure.
As for the contemplation of the clan mentioned third in the list above, the important principle is that buddhas are born in one of the two classes, i.e., kṣatriyas and brahmans.
This is because kṣatriyas are powerful and brahmans are wise.
The Buddha is born to the clan that is more prestigious at the time of his birth.
As for the contemplation of the place of birth mentioned fourth in the list above, the Bodhisattva examined which mothers would be able to carry a bodhisattva of godlike powers and protect themselves by keeping the precepts of purity.
When the Bodhisattva finished contemplating in these four ways, it became clear that only the queen of King Śuddhodana of Kapilavastu in the Middle Kingdom could carry the Bodhisattva.
Having thought thus, the Bodhisattva descended from Tuṣita Heaven, and without losing correct wisdom, entered his mother’s womb.
The Fobenxing jing says:
At that time among the multitude of deities in Tuṣita Heaven was one called Jintuan.
He had in the past descended to the world .
A bodhisattva who was in his last birth before attaining buddhahood, whose name was Huming , said to him, “Deity Jintuan, you have descended to the world several times.
You should already know the cities, the village communities, and the royal clans.
In which family should this bodhisattva, who is in his last birth before attaining buddhahood, be reborn?” The deity Jintuan replied, “Venerable One, I know it very well.
Venerable One, please listen well.
I will now speak.” Huming said, “Good!” Jintuan said, “In these three thousand chiliocosms there is only one place of enlightenment.
The place is located inside the territory of the kingdom of Magadha in Jambudvīpa.
This is the place where buddhas attained enlightenment in the past.
I have traveled everywhere in the realms under heaven, but no other places ruled by other kings are appropriate for what the Bodhisattva intends to do.” Jintuan continued, “The world is filled with kingdoms, villages, kingdoms, and cities.
Everywhere kṣatriyas live in the cities and are engaged in all kinds of activities.
I have visited them for the sake of the Venerable One, and I am now exhausted and distressed.
My mind is confused and I cannot see any other places anymore.
There is only one kṣatriya family.
This ruling family was originally established by the populace through peaceful consensus, and has been the lineage that produced a universal monarch in each generation.
The Ikṣuvāku branch of this family has lived for generations in Kapilavastu.
They belong to the Śākya clan and the king’s name is Siṃhahanu; his son is called Śuddhodana.
They have a great reputation among the gods and humans in all the worlds.
Venerable One, please be born as a son and prince of that king.” Huming Bodhisattva answered Jintuan, “Well done, well done.
Deity Jintuan, you have examined many royal families.
I too have thought of being born in that family.
I am now deeply persuaded by what you have said.
Jintuan, you should know that I will definitely go to that family and be born as their son.
Jintuan, in the past the families that a bodhisattva in the last birth before achieving buddhahood chose as his own, were endowed with sixty kinds of merit.
What are these sixty merit? The family is pure and of good origin. It has been observed constantly by all holy beings. No member of the family has committed any evil deed. Those who have been born in the family have always been pure.
The lineage of the family is pure and has not been mixed with that of other families. The lineage of the family has been continuous and never broken. The family has always and continuously produced kings. All the kings born in the family have been those who in earlier times planted good karmic seeds.
Those who are born in the family have always been praised by holy beings. Those who are born in the family are endowed with great and awesome virtues. There are many beautiful women in the family. There are many men of wisdom in the family. Those who are born in the family have well-balanced and harmonious temperaments.
Those who are born in the family are always free from frivolity. Those who are born in the family are free from fear. Those who are born in the family are never weak. Those who are born in the family are intelligent and full of wisdom. Those who are born in the family are insightful and clever. Those who are born in the family are free from committing crimes.
Those who are born in the family do not indiscriminately engage in acts of worldly deception, nor do they show greediness in securing their livelihood. Those who are born in the family are always good to their friends. Those who are born in the family do not kill insects and animals in order to secure their own livelihood. Those who are from the class to which the family belongs never forget loving-kindness and moral duty. Those who are from the class to which the family belongs are capable of practicing austerities. Those who are born in the family do not take orders from others. Those who are born in the family never harbor feelings of hatred. Those who are born in the family are not bound by ignorant minds. Those who are born in the family do not out of fear submissively follow others. Those who are born in the family are afraid to kill others. Those who are born in the family are free from worries about committing crimes. Those who are born in the family obtain a great deal of almsfood when they go out begging. Those who beg alms from the family are not sent away emptyhanded. The family is powerful; it is difficult for others to defeat it and make it submit to them. The norms according to which the family conducts its affairs are all based on the rules of decorum and the law. The family constantly and happily gives alms to sentient beings. The family diligently establishes good causes and consequences of moral deeds . Those who are born in the family are courageous in the world. Those who are born in the family constantly present offerings to all the holy ones and sages. Those who are born in the family constantly present offerings to the divine spirits. Those who are born in the family constantly present offerings to the gods. Those who are born in the family constantly present offerings to courageous practitioners of the Way. The family has been free from vengeful enemies for many generations. The great reputation of the family is recognized everywhere. The family is the first leader among many clans. From the earliest times, those born in the family have had the potential for spiritual attainment. Those who are born in the family are the first leaders among those who have the potential for spiritual attainment.
Those who are born in the family are ranked among those who have the potential for becoming a universal monarch.
Those who are born in the family are endowed with the nature of and potential for becoming people of powerful virtue.
Those who are born in the family are frequently surrounded by innumerable relatives and attendants.
The relatives and attendants of those who are born in the family cannot be harmed.
The relatives and attendants of those who are born in the family are superior to others. All those who are born in the family are devoted to their mothers and take care of them accordingly. Those who are born in the family are without exception devoted and obedient to their fathers.
All those who are born in the family present offerings to all the monks.
All those who are born in the family present offerings to brahmans.
Those born in the family have plenty of grain filling up their storehouses.
Those who are born in the family have plenty of such valuable possessions as gold, silver, precious shells, and agate stones, and never suffer from the lack of any such possessions.
Those who are born in the family possess many male and female slaves, horses, cows, and sheep.
All these things are sufficiently provided for them. Those who are born in the family have never served others. Those who are born in the family are thus endowed with everything and lack nothing in this world.
The buddha told the deity Jintuan, “When the Bodhisattva who will experience his last birth before attaining buddhahood places himself in a mother’s womb, the mother can receive him in her womb only if she is endowed with thirty-two characteristics.
What are these thirty-two characteristics?
The mother was born in virtuous circumstances.
The mother has no physical defects.
The moral conduct of the mother has no defects.
The mother was born in an appropriate location.
The mother’s conduct is perfect.
The mother is of pure caste.
The mother is incomparably attractive.
The name of the mother is praiseworthy.
The appearance of the mother’s body is praised both by those above and below.
The mother has not given birth before.
The mother has great merit.
The mother constantly thinks about happy things.
The mother’s mind constantly seeks out all sorts of good things.
The mother has no evil thoughts.
The mother’s body, speech, and mind are controlled without effort.
The mother is free from fear of someone thinking or saying something bad to her. The mother has been widely instructed and remembers everything.
The mother is extremely accomplished in womanly skills.
The mother does not entertain flattering and fawning thoughts.
The mother does not entertain deceptive thoughts.
The mother is free from anger.
The mother is free from jealousy.
The mother is free from parsimony.
The mother’s mind is not bedeviled.
The mother does not change her mind very easily.
The mother’s body has signs of extreme virtue.
The mother’s mind is patient.
The mother’s mind is capable of feeling shame.
The mother has little capacity for sexual wantonness, anger, or ignorance.
The mother’s conduct is free from any faults of her family .
The mother is obedient to her husband.
The mother possesses all virtues and all religious practices are complete for her.
“Only such a mother is capable of carrying the Bodhisattva who will be reborn for the last time before achieving buddhahood. “When the Bodhisattva wishes to enter the mother’s womb, he chooses the day of the Gui lunar station in summer and enters his mother’s womb.
Before she receives the Bodhisattva who is being reborn for the last time before achieving buddhahood, the mother must go through the purification of the eight precepts.
Then the Bodhisattva enters her womb.” Huming Bodhisattva also said, “It is not for the sake of worldly wealth or the pleasures of the five senses that I accept this birth among humans.
I do this only because I wish to bring peace and happiness to sentient beings and I have compassion for suffering sentient beings.
The Fobenxing jing says:
When the winter was over and the most pleasant season of early spring had arrived, all kinds of trees flowered everywhere, the air was clear, neither too warm nor too cold, and numerous plants sprouted, soft and shining in their fresh color, and covering the entire ground.
Huming Bodhisattva chose an astrologically auspicious time and preached the essence of the Dharma to the gods, causing them all to rejoice.
The deity Śuddhāvāsa told the multitude of deities, “You will now see that Huming Bodhisattva is about to be born below but do not be distressed.
In his life in the realm below he will attain supreme enlightenment without fail.
After he is enlightened he will return to this heavenly palace and preach the Dharma for you.
Exactly the same things will happen as in the past when both Vipaśyin Buddha and Kāśyapa Buddha left this place and then returned to preach for you.” Then the Bodhisattva descended to be reborn at night.
When he was about to enter the womb, in that very night Māyā said to King Śuddhodana, “Great king, you should know that from tonight on I wish to uphold the eight precepts of purity.
These rules are not killing, not stealing, not engaging in sexual acts, not lying, not ingesting intoxicants, not slandering others, not speaking in a harsh and aggressive manner, and not uttering meaningless and only superficially beautiful words.
I also vow not to be greedy, not to get angry, not to be ignorant and deluded, and not to harbor heterodox views.
I will uphold the correct views.
I will now uphold the prohibitions and precepts to be upheld by all sentient beings.
I will now concentrate on constant practice and nourish compassion toward other sentient beings.” King Śuddhodana answered his wife, “Practice what your mind loves and delights in freely.
I too will give up the royal throne and follow what you practice.” A verse says:
When the king saw the mother of the Bodhisattva, He stood up from his seat respectfully. As if she were his mother or sister, No desire moved in his mind.
The Bodhisattva entertained the thought of descending from Tuṣita Heaven and entered the right side of the first queen of King Śuddhodana.
At that time the queen was sleeping and dreamed of a white elephant with sixteen tusks, a red head, and seven limbs holding the ground.
The elephant’s tusks were decorated with gold.
Then it flew into the sky and entered her right side.
The queen’s dream ended.
The next morning she told King Śuddhodana: “Great king, you should know that I had the following dream last night.
When the elephant entered my right side I felt a pleasure I had never before experienced.
From now on I will indeed give up worldly pleasures.
Who among the oracle readers can interpret the meaning of this auspicious sign for me?” King Śuddhodana called for the attendant women in the palace and told them, “Go quickly outside to the Office of Issuing Royal Edicts and tell National Teacher Danamozi to call in eight great brahman dream interpreters.” They did as they were ordered by the king and eight brahmans were called in.
When the eight brahmans heard the king’s words, they knew the signs well and could read the auspicious meaning of the dream.
They said to the king, “Great king, please listen carefully.
We will explain the auspicious meaning of the dream in detail.
In the record of the scriptures of the ancient holy ones and gods that we have seen there is a verse:
If a mother dreams the sun deity enters her right side, Then the child she bears will become a universal monarch without fail. If a mother dreams the moon deity enters her right side, Then the child she bears will be the best among all kings. If a mother dreams a white elephant enters her right side, Then the child she bears will become the Most Honorable One in the three realms of the universe. He will be capable of benefiting sentient beings without discriminating between those who are close to him and those who are hostile. He will bring salvation to billions of people, causing them to cross over the deep ocean of desires.
Then the brahman teachers said to the great king, “The signs of the queen’s dream are very auspicious.
Great king, you should now congratulate yourself.
The queen will certainly bear a holy child.
Later he will surely complete the path of becoming a buddha.
His reputation will spread widely.” When King Śuddhodana heard the oracle readers utter these verses he was overjoyed and presented them with a large gift.
After King Śuddhodana heard the oracle readers interpret the queen’s dream as a very auspicious sign he held a great feast outside of the four gates of the city of Kapilavastu.
In all large and small streets where people walked, he gave gifts, providing all kinds of desirable food, drink, treasures, buildings, and animals.
There was also Asita, a holy man who possessed the five supernatural powers.
He heard the Bodhisattva in Tuṣita Heaven entertain the thought of descending to be born to King Śuddhodana and enter the queen’s right side.
When he entered the womb he radiated light, illuminating everywhere throughout all the worlds of humans and gods.
Later, the great earth moved in eighteen ways.
When Asita saw these events that had never before taken place, he was frightened and all his hair stood on end.
“What conditions caused the earth to quake?
What are the consequences of these events?” The holy man thought for a while and then calmed down.
A great joy arose in his heart and he was infinitely delighted.
Unable to control himself, he uttered the following words, “A rare sage beyond our comprehension!
A great person will appear in the world!” When the Bodhisattva first descended from Tuṣita Heaven, entered the his mother’s right side, and settled in her womb, a god called Suwang went down to hell, saying loudly, “You should all know the following.
The Bodhisattva has descended from Tuṣita Heaven and has entered his mother’s womb.
Therefore you should all quickly make the vow to be reborn among humans!” The sentient beings in hell heard these words.
In the past all these sentient beings had performed good deeds as well as deeds of mixed character, but because the effects of their evil deeds were stronger they had fallen into hell.
Every one of these beings showed by the expression on their face that they hated being in hell.
Having seen the light their bodies and minds felt at peace, and on hearing the great deity Suwang’s voice they abandoned their bodies in hell and were reborn among humans.
Among all sentient beings in the three thousand chiliocosms, those who had performed good deeds in the past were all reborn in areas around the city of Kapilavastu.
The Niepan jing says:
When the Bodhisattva descended, all the gods of the realms of form and desire came and bade farewell.
They praised the Bodhisattva loudly and the breath from their mouths caused the earth to quake and move.
The Nianfo sanmei jing says, “When the Bodhisattva was about to descend into his mother’s womb the three thousand great chiliocosms all shook in six ways.” The Yinguo jing says:
The Bodhisattva was about to descend into his mother’s womb.
Riding on the six-tusked elephant he left Tuṣita Heaven.
Innumerable gods danced and played music, burned many kinds of superior incense, and scattered beautiful heavenly flowers.
They followed after the Bodhisattva, filling up the sky, and sent forth great light that illuminated all the directions.
On the eighth day of the fourth month, when the morning star Venus appeared, descended into his mother’s womb.
At that time Queen Māyā saw the Bodhisattva riding on the white elephant with six tusks come flying to her bedside and enter the right side of her body. You could see through the queen’s body and see the Bodhisattva’s body inside her, just as one can see through a piece of transparent blue jade .
The queen felt peaceful and experienced pleasure as if she had drunk heavenly dew.
Looking at her own body sending forth light like the sun and moon, she was overjoyed and felt infinite delight.
When she saw this sight she thought how extraordinary it was and reported it to King Śuddhodana.
King Śuddhodana saw the auspicious sign and could not restrain himself in his great joy and delight.
He then called in a brahman who was good at reading signs and ordered him to divine its significance.
He learned that the Bodhisattva was in the womb, that when he was born in the world he would attain buddhahood, and that the merit and benefit that would be brought by this event were beyond description.
At that point the gods in Tuṣita Heaven thought aloud, “The Bodhisattva is now born in the palace of King Śuddhodana.
We should also descend and be born among humans.
When the Bodhisattva attains buddhahood we will become his first attendants and listen to the teaching.” When they had finished this thought, they were immediately reborn below.
The gods who descended from Tuṣita Heaven and were born among humans numbered nine billion nine hundred million.
There were also gods from the uppermost heaven in the realm of desire as well as the four deva kings and the deva kings of the realm of form.
They descended with their attendants; their number was beyond calculation.
The Bodhisattva walked, stood, sat, and laid down in his mother’s womb without any obstruction to his movements.
Neither did he cause his mother any pain or suffering.
From within his mother’s womb the Bodhisattva preached to the gods of the realm of form in the morning, to the gods of the realm of desire at midday, and to the demons and spirits at the end of the day.
He followed the same order for the three periods of night. The Puyao jing, T.186: mother’s womb for ten months and taught for thirty-six years in order to establish the practice of the hearers and the Great Vehicle for gods and humans.”) The Huayan jing says:
When the Bodhisattva was in his mother’s womb the sentient beings of the three thousand great chiliocosms could see him in the womb as if they were looking at his image in a clear mirror.
The Pusa chutai jing (T.384:1023c13–1024a5, 1015b23–c26, 1017c26– The Buddha told Xijian Bodhisattva, “Do you wish to know whether the past buddhas in the state of nirvana stayed in their buddha lands?
You should know that my past births were infinite and incalculable in number.
By means of supernatural powers I entered into the realm of the moisture-born.
Endowed with all the characteristics of the moisture-born, I preached to the moisture-conscious sentient beings for innumerable ages, enabling those moisture-conscious beings to achieve liberation according to their wishes.
I entered into other realms such as that of the egg-born and, just as above, enabled the beings in these realms to achieve liberation according to their wishes.
Through supernatural powers I manifest future worlds and enter into the realms of the four types of living beings and, as above, enable each being to achieve liberation according to his wish.
“Today I am in my mother’s womb and preach the rare teaching of nonretrogression for bodhisattvas of supernatural powers throughout the ten directions.
I also enter the realms of the four types of living beings in heaven, hell, among the hungry ghosts, and among the animals.
Among the four types of living beings, the womb-born and those born through spontaneous generation are quick to exhaust the impure outflows of their minds.
The moisture-born and the egg-born are slower.
The womb-born and those born through spontaneous generation are creatures of sharp capacities.
The moisture-born and the egg-born are creatures of dull capacities.” Another passage from the same scripture says:
The Buddha said to Ānanda, “Listen and think carefully.
I will now distinguish one by one the rare teachings of great beings.” Ānanda said to the Buddha, “I wish to hear that.” The Buddha said to Ānanda, “At a distance as many worlds away as the number of grains of sand in one billion eleven thousand and sixty-two Ganges Rivers southeast from here, there is a world called Sile.
The name of the buddha there is Xiangyan Tathāgata.
He attained final extinction there and then came to the palace of Trāyastriṃśa Heaven.
During the long period of innumerable ages he returned thirty-six times to become the great divine king Brahmā, thirty-six times to appear in the body of the god Śakra , and thirtysix times to become a universal monarch.
None of the sentient beings saved by him fell into the wrong teachings of the two vehicles nor were reborn in inferior realms of existence.
Because they are all mysteriously informed by the divine wisdom of all the buddhas.” The Buddha said to Ānanda, “Does the body of the Tathāgata have a period of sojourn in a womb or not?
“ Ānanda replied to the Buddha, “The Tathāgata’s body does not have a period of sojourn in the womb.” The Buddha said to Ānanda, “If the Tathāgata does not have a period of sojourn in the womb, why it is said that the Tathāgata stayed in the womb for ten months to teach and preach?” Ānanda replied to the Buddha, “If the Tathāgata has a period of sojourn in the womb, nonetheless he still dwells in nirvana; if he does not have it, he also dwells in nirvana.” Then the World-honored One used his supernatural powers and appeared within Māyā’s body.
He sat, lay down, and walked around. There he found a great high throne, eight thousand yojanas long and wide, a stairway of gold and silver, and a canopy of heavenly silk hanging from an empty sky.
The pleasure there was beyond description.
Bodhisattvas and mahā sattvas eight thousand worlds away in the eastern direction from this sahā world all used their supernatural capacity to travel quickly and gather there, similarly from the south, west, north, and from the four cardinal directions between.
Also from six billion two hundred million worlds below bodhisattvas with supernatural powers came to the great gathering.
From seven billion two hundred million sky spaces above, bodhisattvas also gathered and swarmed into the womb.
At that time Mañjuśrī Bodhisattva asked the World-honored One, “These bodhisattvas and mahāsattvas gathered together like a cloud.
They wish to hear the World-honored One preach the teaching beyond comprehension.
Of the innumerable number of different types of concentrated trance states , which concentrated trance has the Tathāgata now entered, dwelling in the womb and preaching the teaching beyond comprehension to the great beings ?” The Buddha said to Mañjuśrī, “You should now observe the bodhisattvas of the first stage, the second stage, and so on up to the bodhisattvas of the tenth stage who are in their last birth.
Observe them according to their correct ranks and without mixing them up.
Now, all the beings in this crowd are completely pure and free from impure admixtures.
The branches and leaves on which they dwell are also free from defilement.
On these seats there is none who is defiled or has regressed.
Because those with sharp capacities do not dwell in the realms of life and death.
The Buddha also asked Maitreya, “When the mind produces a thought, how many thoughts and consciousnesses are formed?” Maitreya said, “In a period of time as brief it takes to raise one’s hand or snap one’s fingers three billion two hundred million thoughts take shape, and each thought this formed has consciousness.
Conscious thought is so fine that one cannot get hold of it.
The Buddha’s mysterious power enters into that fine consciousness and leads each one to salvation. Here he teaches consciousness. It is not that there is no consciousness.” One Thousand Buddhas Introduction, The Queen’s Return to Her Father’s Home, Auspicious Signs Before the Birth, The Birth, Auspicious Signs, Worship by the Gods, Simultaneous Births, and Calculation of Numbers. I respectfully entertain the following thought. Dīpaṅkara Buddha predicted attainment of buddhahood and conferred on him the name Nengren beforehand.
When conditions were mysteriously met he was embodied in the Śākya clan.
Auspicious signs appeared before he was born, and traces of truth appeared after his birth.
These signs and traces illumined the worlds of humans and gods and spread everywhere in a chainlike formation.
Their source is deep and superior.
Therefore the earth shook in six ways and the infant took seven steps as soon as he was born.
Five kinds of pure rain fell and nine dragons poured water over him.
Supernatural signs of good fortune appeared and all kinds of auspicious signs were also present.
These signs were unprecedented in the past one hundred generations.
Thus, was conceived in a different way from how the ancient rulers Yao and Xuan and he was born in a different way from the later rulers Yu and Xie, who founded the Yin people.
Signs such as the Black Emperor appearing in a dream or white light filling the room are not really auspicious signs. How could these be compared to the auspicious signs that appeared at the time of the birth of the Buddha?
Around his body there was light that extended one zhang and a five-foot-long white hair was curled between his eyebrows.
The auspicious sign wan was written on his chest.
He walked with one thousand wheels under his feet.
There were thirty-two major marks such as these.
The auspicious signs that accompanied the Chinese rulers—for example, in the case of Emperor Yao his dragon face, tiger nose, and eight-colored eyebrows, and for Emperor Shun two pupils in each eye—are nothing compared to the superior signs of the Buddha.
The Fobenxing jing says:
When Queen Māyā, the holy mother of the Bodhisattva, having conceived him and almost completed the ten months of her pregnancy, was about to give birth the queen’s father, Suprabuddha sent a messenger to King Śuddhodana in Kapilavastu.
The queen’s father’s name is given as Shanzhi in another tradition.) His message to the great king said, “I am informed that my daughter, the great queen Māyā, is carrying the Holy One in her womb.
His powerful virtue is great.
Once he is born my daughter’s life will be shortened; she will die soon after giving birth.
I want to bring my daughter Māyā back to my palace and let her stay in peace at Lumbinī, where we may share pleasurable moments with each other and indulge the natural sentiments of affection between father and daughter.
I beseech the great king not to obstruct this wish.
Please have pity on us and release my daughter.
Once she gives birth in my house I will send her back immediately.” When King Śuddhodana heard Suprabuddha’s messenger utter these words, he issued an edict ordering officials to repair and grade the road between Kapilavastu and Devadaha , decorate it with flags and flowers, and have music played there.
An innumerable number of servants and other people accompanied the queen when the king sent her back to her home.
The Puyao jing says:
When the Prince completed his ten months in the womb and was about to be born, thirty-six auspicious signs appeared:
trees in the back garden spontaneously bore fruit; blue lotus flowers as large as carriage wheels appeared on dry ground; all the dead trees on the ground sprouted flowers and leaves; gods appeared, pulling a carriage covered with seven jewels and dew; a treasure house containing twenty thousand jewels appeared from the ground; famous scents and pleasant fragrances spread all over; five hundred white lions appeared in the Himalayas and lined up in front of the city gate but they did not bother or harm anyone; five hundred white elephants lined up in front of the palace; heaven sent down a light and nourishing rain which was fragrant wherever it fell; a spring opened inside the king’s palace and provided water of one hundred flavors to the thirsty; dragons and jade women appeared in sky, showing the top half of their bodies; thousands of jade women from heaven appeared on the palace wall, holding peacock dusters; gods and jade women stood in the empty sky, holding ten thousand gold jars filled with sweet dew; ten thousand jade women from heaven held ten thousand jars filled with fragrant water; ten thousand jade women from heaven held a canopy in their hands and stood in attendance; gods and jade women lined up and stood, making hundreds and thousands of different kinds of music with their drums, and staying in the empty sky in great harmony; the water in the rivers and channels became clear but did not flow; the sun and moon stopped their movement; under the Puṣya lunar station stars appeared guarding it; a jeweled net, sprinkled with dew, covered the palace; a supernatural jewel as clear as the bright moon hung from the palace building, shining very brightly; lamps in the palace could no longer shine brightly; clothing that had been stored in boxes appeared on clothes hangers; precious necklaces and all other such treasures appeared; poisonous insects went into hiding and auspicious birds uttered sounds of fortune; in hell all punishment stopped and no one suffered pain; there was a great earthquake that flattened the hills; streets and four-way crossings were evenly leveled and flowers were scattered over them; deep holes and gullies were all filled in; fishermen and hunters became disgusted by their evil professions and for a while harbored compassion for all creatures; pregnant women inside the territory all gave birth to boys, and the dead, blind, mute, and those who suffered from any of the one hundred diseases were all cured; and tree deities showed the top half of their bodies from all the trees and paid respect by lowering their heads.
These were the thirty-two auspicious signs.
At that time everyone without exception expressed wonder at these unprecedented events.
The Yinguo jing says:
The Bodhisattva was in the womb for almost ten months, and the limbs of his body as well as all the marks of his superior destiny were completed.
The queen wished to go into the garden for sight-seeing.
The king ordered eighty-four thousand beautiful palace women to accompany Queen Māyā.
He also chose eighty-four thousand beautiful young girls to go to the Lumbinī Garden holding incense and flowers.
The king also ordered all of his ministers, officials, and their wives to follow her.
Thereupon, the queen stepped into the decorated carriage, and accompanied by the attending officials and women, both in front and back of the queen’s carriage, they went to the Lumbinī Garden.
At that time the eight kinds of heavenly beings, such as gods and dragons , filled the sky and followed the queen’s carriage.
When the period of ten months was completed and the Bodhisattva was about to appear on the eighth day of the fourth month, the queen saw a big tree, called aśoka, in the back garden.
Its flowers were colorful and fragrant and its branches and leaves spread widely, growing thickly and profusely.
As the queen raised her right hand to grasp a branch of the tree, the Bodhisattva emerged slowly from her right side.
The Pusa chutai jing says:
The Buddha said to Maitreya, “You should know that you also received the prediction to attain highest enlightenment under this large tree, the king among all trees, five million six hundred and seventy years from now.
I was born from the right side of the queen’s body.
You, Maitreya, will be born from the top of your mother’s head.
I had a life span of one hundred years.
You, Maitreya, will have a life span of eight thousand four hundred years.
My land was made of earth.
Your land will be made of gold.
My land was full of suffering.
Your land will be full of pleasure.” The Pusa benxing jing says:
When the Bodhisattva saw his mother standing on the ground taking hold of a branch of the tree with her hand, there in the womb he concentrated on the thought of birth and rose from his position.
When the mothers of all other sentient beings are about to give birth their bodies ache all over and they suffer greatly.
Sitting down and standing up over and over again, they cannot get comfortable.
The Bodhisattva’s mother was happy and peaceful and she felt a great pleasurable sensation in her body.
At that time Queen Māyā stood on the ground, took hold of a branch of the palāśa tree with her hand, and gave birth to the Bodhisattva.
This was a remarkable event, entirely unprecedented, that could only happen to the Bodhisattva.
It gave expression to the fact that after the Tathāgata has attained buddhahood he would tirelessly remove the root of all desire and cut off the bondage of desire just as when the tops of tāla trees are cut off they do not grow again.
His will be the teaching of characterlessness, formlessness, and the absence of subsequent births.
Such is the auspicious sign that accompanies the birth of a tathāgata.
Again, because of oppressive pain, inside the womb all sentient beings move around from place to place.
The Bodhisattva was different.
He entered his mother’s body from her right side and stayed on the right side.
He did not move around inside the womb at all.
When the time came for him to be born, he emerged from the right side of his mother’s body.
His birth was not characterized by painful pressure such as other sentient beings experience.
Such was the unprecedented birth that happened only in the Bodhisattva’s case, and which gave expression to the fact that after he achieves buddhahood future religious practices will forever be free from fear, always filled with pleasure, and devoid of pain.
Again, when the Bodhisattva in the right side of his mother’s womb first concentrated on the thought of birth, great light issued forth and illuminated everywhere.
This was an unprecedented event that happened only in the Bodhisattva’s case.
It gave expression to the fact that after achieving buddhahood he would destroy the dark net of ignorance and would cause the clear and pure light of wisdom to issue forth.
Again, when the Bodhisattva had just emerged from the right side of his mother’s body and remembered the past through concentration, his mother’s body was not in any discomfort, as usual, and was not injured, damaged, wounded, or pained.
The Bodhisattva’s mother’s body had undergone no change.
This was an unprecedented event that happened only in the case of the birth of the Bodhisattva.
It gave expression to the fact that after he has achieved buddhahood those who engage in religious cultivation would lack nothing and be well provided for.
Again, when the Bodhisattva had just emerged from his mother’s womb, he stood up feeling no pain, distress, or illness. None of the many defilements of the mother’s body could pollute him.
He was different from other sentient beings.
To describe the matter with a metaphor, he was like a vaiḍūrya jewel wrapped in Kāśi cloth. Neither the jewel nor the cloth is defiled.
This was an unprecedented occurrence that happened only in the case of the Bodhisattva’s birth. It gave expression to the fact that after achieving buddhahood he would remain in the world and while the precious teaching remained in the world no worldly defilements could pollute or stain it.
Again, when the Bodhisattva had just emerged from his mother’s womb, the heavenly deity Śakra wrapped him in the heavenly fine fabric called Kauśika cloth.
Receiving the Bodhisattva’s body before anyone else, Śakra held it up reverently.
This was an unprecedented event that happened only in the Bodhisattva’s case.
It gave expression to the fact that after the Bodhisattva achieved buddhahood and became master of the sahā world, the great god Brahmā would first request the Tathāgata to preach the truth.
Again, when the Bodhisattva had just been born from the right side of his mother’s body, the four great deva kings held him and, turning toward the mother to show him to her, they said, “Great queen, you should now rejoice!
The child you have given birth to has now attained a human birth.
Gods are rejoicing in praise of him.
How could it be otherwise with human beings?” This was an unprecedented event that happened only the Bodhisattva’s case.
It gave expression to the fact that after he achieved buddhahood the fourfold Buddhist community , with an incalculable number of members, would turn toward the Tathāgata and listen to his teaching.
They will follow the Tathāgata’s teaching and will not deviate from it in any way.
Again, as soon as the Bodhisattva stood upon the ground and standing there looked at his mother’s right side, he said, “I will not receive a human form again after today.
I will not enter the womb from the side of my mother’s body.
This is my last human body.
In this body I will become a buddha.” This was an unprecedented event that happened only in the case of the Bodhisattva’s birth.
It gave expression to the fact that after attaining buddhahood he will utter the following words:
“My births have been completely exhausted, my spiritual practice has been established, and what has to be done has already been done.
I will not receive future rebirths.” These are the auspicious signs that first accompany the birth of a tathāgata.
The Niepan jing says:
When the Bodhisattva had just been born he took seven steps in each of the ten directions.
The dragon generals Maṇibhadra and Pūrṇabhadra held flags and a canopy over him and shook the innumerable worlds of infinite extension.
Golden light shone and filled the sky.
The dragon kings Nanda and Upananda bathed the Bodhisattva’s body using their supernatural powers. Gods manifested themselves and worshiped the Bodhisattva.
The sage Asita reverently joined his palms and paid his respects.
When he grew up to be a young man, the Bodhisattva renounced the objects of human desire just as if he was spitting out saliva.
Not deluded by worldly pleasures, he left the householder’s life and found happiness in the spiritual life of quietude.
He refuted heterodox teachings and practiced austerities for six years. He adopted the attitude of complete equanimity toward all sentient beings.
Constantly meditating in his mind, he was from the beginning never disturbed.
Special marks, awesome and beautiful, ornamented his body.
Wherever he went the hills and hollows were leveled.
His clothes floated four inches off his body but they never fell down.
When he walked, he looked straight ahead and did not glance left or right.
When he sat down or stood up, the grass under him did not become crushed.
In order to guide sentient beings, he went forth and taught.
His mind was free from arrogance.
The Yinguo jing says:
When the Prince was born a lotus flower decorated with seven jewels and supported by seven stalks appeared under the tree.
This flower was as large as a carriage wheel.
The Bodhisattva then fell into this lotus flower and without any assistance took seven steps.
The Dashanquan jing says that the seven steps taken by the Bodhisattva correspond to the sevenfold practices of awakening.) He raised his right hand and uttered the lion’s roar, “I am the most honorable and superior being among all gods and humans.
Innumerable births and deaths are now over.” When he had uttered these words, the four deva kings wrapped the Prince’s body in a heavenly silk cloth and placed him on a table filled with treasures.
The god Śakra held a jeweled canopy; great Brahmā held a white duster. They stood to the Prince’s right and left sides.
The dragon kings Nanda and Upananda sprayed pure water from their mouths into the sky, bathing the Prince’s body with warm and cool water.
The Puyao jing says, “The gods Śakra and Brahmā rained many kinds of famous perfumes; nine dragons went up and poured down the perfumed water to bathe the Bodhisattva’s body.” The Ruiying benqi jing says, “Śakra and Brahmā waited upon him from below; the four deva kings took the Bodhisattva’s body and placed it on the table.” The Xiuxing benqi jing says, “The dragon king brothers rained down warm water on his left side and cool water on his right side; Śakra and Brahmā covered the Bodhisattva’s body with a piece of cloth.”) The Bodhisattva’s body was golden in color and adorned with thirty-two marks.
It emitted a great light that illuminated the three thousand great chiliocosms.
The state of Kapilavastu stood at the center of three thousand suns and moons and twelve thousand heavens and earths. There are ten billion suns and moons and forty billion realms under heaven.
The number three thousand is given as a shorthand expression. Therefore, the relative location of China and the barbarian countries may also be explained in more detail.
The Hainei jing says that Shendu is the country where the Yellow Emperor lives.
Guo ’s commentary says that it refers to India.
These passages indicate that it is not entirely wrong to speak of India as the center of heaven and earth.
The Houhan shu says that people designated as nine kinds of barbarians live beyond the Pamir Mountains.
Their civilization is said to be more impressive and beautiful than that of China.) The Zhidu lun says:
Question: Why is the Buddha of golden color?
Answer:
If one were to place iron next to gold it would not be noticeable.
Now if we were to place gold of today next to the gold of the Buddha’s time, the former would not be noticeable.
If we were to place the gold of the Buddha’s time next to the gold of the Jambu River, the former would not be noticeable.
If we were to place the Jambu River gold next to the gold sands of the ocean in the kingly realm of the universal monarch, the former would not be noticeable.
If we were to place the golden sands next to a gold mountain, the former would not be noticeable.
If we were to place the gold mountain next to the gold of Mount Sumeru, the former would not be noticeable. If we were to place the gold of Mount Sumeru next to gold from the necklace of the thirty-three deities, the former would not be noticeable.
If we were to place the gold from the necklace of the thirty-three deities next to the god Yama’s gold, then the former would not be noticeable.
If we were to place the god Yama’s gold next to the gold of Tuṣita Heaven, the former would not be noticeable.
If we were to place the gold of Tuṣita Heaven next to the gold of Nirmāṇarati Heaven, the second highest heaven of the realm of desire, the former would not be noticeable.
If we were to place the gold of Nirmāṇarati Heaven next to the gold of Paranirmitavaśavartin  Heaven, the highest heaven of the realm of desire, the former would not be noticeable.
If we were to place the gold of Paranirmitavaśavartin Heaven next to the golden color of the Bodhisattva’s body, the former would not be noticeable.
Such a beautiful color is called the mark of golden color. The Ruiying jing says:
When the Bodhisattva was first born the eight kinds of supernatural beings, such as gods and dragons, manifested themselves in the sky, playing heavenly music, dancing, and singing praises.
They burned incense and scattered flowers.
They let an innumerable number of heavenly cloth and necklaces fall onto earth like rain.
Under the tree near which the Bodhisattva was born there suddenly emerged four wells producing water of marvelous quality.
There were thirty-four auspicious signs.
These signs cannot be described in detail here. These signs are roughly the same as those described above in the section on the thirty-six auspicious signs.) The Ruiying jing says:
When the Prince was just born the great king immediately gathered the four divisions of his army and entered the garden with his ministers.
Seeing that the Prince’s birth had occasioned such miraculous signs, the king was both pleased and afraid.
With joined palms the king worshiped the deities and, embracing the prince, he placed him on an elephant-mounted carriage decorated with seven jewels.
Accompanied by his ministers and palace ladies and followed by dancing gods, the king entered the royal city.
Because he was unfamiliar with the Three Jewels the king first took the prince to a temple of the gods.
When the prince entered, the images of the god Brahmā all stood up and bowed at the Prince’s feet.
They said to the king, “Great king, you should know about this.
This Prince is honored among gods and humans.
The gods in the sky are all paying respect to him.
How could the great king have failed to see these signs and brought the Prince here to pay respect to us?” King Śuddhodana and his ministers marveled at this unprecedented turn of events.
Then the Prince left the temple of the gods and returned to the rear quarters of the palace.
The Puyao jing says: When the Prince came to the temple he spoke in verse:
When I was just born I shook the three thousand chiliocosms. Deities such as Śakra, Brahmā, and Sudarśana, and All the heavenly beings, such as the sun and moon, came and paid me respect. What heavenly deity is treated with greater respect? When I arrived at the palace, I was treated as a being higher than the gods, a god among gods; Among the gods none was superior to me. Adapting myself to the world, I manifested myself here. I cause these auspicious signs to appear and the people are overjoyed. I am nurtured respectfully by members of a small clan, yet I am holier than a god among all the gods.
Thereupon the heavenly kings Śakra and Brahmā and the four deva kings came down from their thrones and throwing themselves down to the ground they worshiped at the feet of the Bodhisattva.
Hundreds of thousands of gods and people were amazed and loudly uttered praises, exclaiming at such an unprecedented event, and danced in joy.
Heaven and earth shook; flowers rained down from the sky, and hundreds of thousands of musical tunes were heard as musical instruments played by themselves. The statues of the gods transformed into the deities they represented and the gods paid respect by bowing down at the feet of the Bodhisattva.
The deities then stood before the Bodhisattva and uttered the following verses of praise: Just as Mount Sumeru is contrasted with a mustard seed, So do the Bodhisattva’s supernatural powers exceed those of the dragon king. Would the sun and moon worship a dragon king?
How could the wise and virtuous pay respect to the dragon king? Three thousands worlds offer homage to the Bodhisattva on their own initiative. Just as a mustard seed is contrasted with Mount Sumeru, or The footprint of an ox is compared to the great ocean, So does the Most High and Honored One transcend the sun and moon. If one pays respect to this Honored One their merit will be incalculable. Everyone will obtain spiritual peace. The Bodhisattva’s virtue is infinitely rich.
The Ruiying jing says, “At that time, on the same day, five hundred male children were born into various branches of the Śākya clan.” The Xiuxing benqi jing says:
A child was born to each of the eighty-four thousand elders in the state, and they were all male children.
Foals were born in eighty-four thousand stables.
One among them was unique.
Its coat was pure white and its mane was threaded with jewels.
The foal was named Kaṇṭhaka; the stable lad who cared for it was called Chanda.
The Ruiying benqi jing says:
The stable lad was called Chanda and the horse was called Kaṇṭhaka.
At that time in the king’s stable an elephant gave birth to a baby elephant and a horse to a foal.
Cows and sheep also gave birth to five-colored offspring. The same thing happened to five hundred different species.
The Prince’s servants also gave birth to five hundred children who would later serve as the Bodhisattva’s servants.
The Puyao jing says that five hundred servants gave birth to strong soldiers.) At that time five hundred hidden treasure houses spontaneously opened up in the palace.
Many merchants came back from traveling the seas where they had gathered treasures, and they presented rare objects to the king.
In the light of all these auspicious signs, they wished to name the Prince Xida .
At that time, just as the Prince was born to King Śuddhodana, a child was born to eight princes in the realm.
They were all overjoyed and chose good names for these newborns.
The Fobenxing jing says:
The kingdom of Kapilavastu had eight cities and altogether nine million households.
Devadatta was born on the seventh day of the fourth month.
The Buddha was born on the eighth day of the fourth month. The Buddha’s younger brother, Nanda, was born on the ninth day of the fourth month.
Ānanda was born on the tenth day of the fourth month.
Devadatta’s height was one zhang, five chi, and four cun.
The Buddha’s height was one zhang and six chi.
Nanda’s height was one zhang, five chi, and four cun.
Ānanda’s height was one zhang, five chi, and three cun.
The height of those belonging to the aristocratic clan Sheyi was one zhang and four chi.
The height of those belonging to other ruling clans was one zhang and three chi.
The Bodhisattva’s mother’s house was eight hundred miles outside of the capital city.
Her father’s surname was Gautama.
Being a lesser king, he ruled over one million households and was called a one-myriad king.
The family of the Bodhisattva’s consort was surnamed Gautama and Elder Sheyi had the personal name Shuiguang . The name of the Bodhisattva’s wife’s mother was Yuenü
She lived in a neighborhood of the city.
When she was about to give birth to her daughter the sun was about to set, but the remaining light illuminated the house and the room was very bright.
Therefore, her daughter was given the name Gopī, which means “Bright Woman.” Juyi was the first wife of the prince.
His father was called Elder Shuiguang.
The second wife, who gave birth to Rāhula, was called Naweitan.
Her father was called Elder Yishi.
The third wife of the prince was called Luye .
Her father’s name was Elder Shi.
Because his son had three wives, the prince’s father built three palace buildings.
Twenty thousand palace ladies were present in each building, and altogether there were sixty thousand palace ladies in the three buildings.
Since the Prince was to become a universal monarch, the king placed sixty thousand palace ladies .
The Yuqie lun says:
There are four ways of entering the womb:
with correct knowledge in entering, but without correct knowledge when staying there and coming out; with correct knowledge when entering and staying there, but without correct knowledge when coming out; with correct knowledge in all three ; and without correct knowledge in any of the three .
The first refers to universal monarchs, the second to selfenlightened buddhas , the third to bodhisattvas, and the fourth to all other sentient beings.
A verse in the Baoxing lun says:
Withdrawing from heaven and entering the womb, He was born here to a mother and father. While living in the household he took the form of a child. He studied various arts and skills, Played happily, and went on excursions. After he renounced the householder’s life, he practiced austerities. Having mastered the non-Buddhist teachings, He conquered the heavenly Māra. He attained buddhahood and turned the wheel of Dharma. He showed the path to nirvana. Sentient beings with little merit Cannot see the Tathāgata.
The Ruiying jing says, “The prince was born during the night of the eighth day of the fourth month, when the morning star appeared.” The Xingzan says, “On the eighth day of the third month the Bodhisattva appeared from the right side of his mother’s body.” The Guoqu xianzai yiguo jing says:
On the eighth day of the second month the queen went to the Lumbinī Garden.
She saw an aśoka flower and picked it, raising her right hand.
At that moment the prince was born from the right side of the queen’s body.
Now this matter belongs to a time many generations ago.
The disagreement about the date among the translators cannot be easily sorted out in terms of the texts themselves, but we may be able to settle the matter by looking into non-Buddhist scriptures.
The Chunjiu says: The seventh year of the reign of Duke Chuang of Lu, i.e., the eleventh year of Prince Chuang:
On one day in the fourth month, one star disappeared and meteors fell like rain.
Comparing Buddhist and non-Buddhist texts, we may determine that the fourth month was the correct date of the Buddha’s birth.
Raising the Child Introduction, Raising the Child, and Auspicious Signs. Mysterious processes work through everything in silence; perfect wisdom illumines in quietude.
The Way transcends the realms of form and consciousness; the principle is beyond the spheres of changes.
Having transcended form and consciousness long ago, how could he in reality have been reborn in a king’s palace?
Having gone beyond changes, would he be guarded by illusory attendants?
Yet the Great One was born responding to cosmic conditions in order to benefit all beings, as he promised at the beginning. He appeared thus due to cosmic conditions, yet he sees all the profound truths.
There are many ways of teaching, and those who receive the teaching are many.
Some are enlightened through means of quiet meditation.
Some open their minds with the help of wisdom and understanding.
Some hold the baby and some feed the baby milk to nourish his body.
The conditions for enlightenment are many and cannot be limited to one example. In these many ways, all living beings can be motivated to seek salvation, and salvation may be brought skillfully to the world.
The Fobenxing jing says:
When seven days had passed after the birth of the Prince, his mother, Queen Māyā, came to the end of her life.
Some teachers say that the queen’s lifetime just happened to be only seven more days, and that is why she died at that time.
However, there is an ancient rule that the Bodhisattva’s mother dies after he has lived seven days. The reason why the mothers die so early is as follows:
the Bodhisattvas renounce the householder’s life at a very early age, and when their mothers see this event their hearts are broken and their lives end.
The Sarvāstivāda teachers say that when the mother saw that the child born to her had an unprecedentedly beautiful body, she could not bear the joy and her life immediately ended.
After her life ended she was reborn in the Heaven of the Thirty-three Gods.
When King Śuddhodana saw that the queen’s life had ended, he called the Śākya clan together and they all gathered like a cloud.
He told them, “You are all relatives and parents of the state.
Now this boy has lost his mother while still a baby.
To whom should I entrust him to provide him with milk? Whom shall I order to raise the baby?
Who will be able to love him as if he were her own child?
At that time there were five hundred new wives in the Śākya clan and they all said, “I can raise him.
I can look after him.” The elders of the Śākya clan told them, “All of you are young and vigorous. You indulge in sense desires.
You cannot nourish him at the appropriate times and love him in a manner that accords with the correct teaching.
Only Mahāprajāpatī happens to be the true aunt of the Prince.
Therefore, she is capable of raising the baby.” Thereupon, King Śuddhodana entrusted the Prince to his aunt and said to her, “Welcome.
You should raise the child.
Guard him well and help him to grow up.
Bathe him at the appropriate times.” He also chose thirtytwo other women to assist in raising the Prince:
eight women to hold him, eight women to bathe him, eight women to give milk, and eight women to play with him.
Then Mahāprajāpatī said to King Śuddhodana, “I will respectfully follow the king’s orders and not deviate from them.” The Fobenxing jing says:
After the Prince was born King Śuddhodana’s household became more prosperous day by day.
As they were more than sufficiently provided with all kinds of wealth, such as gold, silver, and rare treasures, those in the household uttered the following verse:
Five kinds of grain and other wealth and treasures, Such as gold, silver, and all kinds of clothing, Some produced by human beings and some not produced by humans— These have been provided spontaneously without any effort on our part. For both the child and his loving mother, Milk and its products are always richly provided. Nursing mothers who did not have sufficient milk before Now all produce milk plentifully. At that time King Śuddhodana’s enemies all felt the universal and equal love toward everyone and gradually came to feel as if the Pprince was a family member or someone very close.
Wind and rain came at the appropriate times and no natural disasters such as hailstorms occurred.
There was no disruptive weather.
People sowed few seeds yet the harvest was large.
Everyone in the realm obeyed the laws.
Many kinds of spiritual gifts brought numerous benefits.
There were no evil people and everyone was happy.
It was just like heaven.
It was due to the Prince’s awesome power of virtue that all these things happened.
Verses say: The world of humans followed the Honored One’s teaching. People were neither stingy nor ungenerous. They did everything according to the teaching.
Being compassionate, they did not kill. When hungry or thirsty, they were immediately relieved of these needs. Both food and drink were provided in sufficient quantity. Everyone was joyous and partook of heavenly pleasures. The Puyao jing says:
Seven days after the Bodhisattva was born, his mother’s life ended and she was happily reborn in the Heaven of the Thirty-three Gods.
When she arrived at that heaven, fifty thousand Brahmā deities held precious jars and twenty thousand Brahmā deities and māras held precious clothing and attended the Bodhisattva’s mother.
The Ruiying benqi jing says: The Bodhisattva knew of his mother’s virtue from the beginning and could not bear to become the object of her worship.
Therefore, he chose to be born when her life was about to end.
The Dashanquan jing says, “Seven days later his mother passed away and because of her merits ascended to heaven.
The Bodhisattva was not to blame for this.” The Yinguo jing says, “The Prince’s aunt Mahāprajāpatī nursed and raise the prince just as if she were his own mother.” Introduction, Ordering the Prognostication, Presenting the Prince to a Holy Person, Marks, Karmic Causes, Comparisons, Calculation, and Merit. The Holy One follows the karmic conditions in ways that may be either manifest or mysterious.
His mind is clear and illuminates without obstruction.
He responds to stimuli as if it were an echo.
In his quietude he does not move, yet he responds to stimuli and reaches everywhere.
Thus he descended from Tuṣita Heaven and was incarnated in the kingdom of Kapilavastu.
The ruling family of that kingdom had produced universal monarchs for many generations.
The reputation of the family was appropriate for the One Who Treads the Holy Path.
Of the three thousand realms on earth, the kingdom was even superior to the Chinese city of Luoyang.
There were numerous branch families, too many to be described in detail here. In ancient China, when Lü
Wen read the extraordinary features of the founding ruler Gaozu of the Han dynasty and predicted the latter’s future success, people treated him as someone who had superior knowledge of human beings.
However, compared to Asita’s prognostication about the future of Our Teacher, , Lü
Wen’s accomplishments were like nothing.
The Ruiying jing says: King Śuddhodana ordered five hundred oracle readers to read the Prince’s features.
The readers said, “This child of the king is the Eye of the World.
He is like pure gold. His extraordinary marks are very clear:
if he renounces the householder’s life he will achieve perfect knowledge of all things; if he remains in the world he will become a universal monarch and govern the four realms under heaven.
He will be the highest among rulers.” They also said to the king, “There is a brahman holy man called Asita who is equipped with five supernatural powers; he lives Gandhamādana.
He can remove all doubts the king might have about the future of the prince.” At that time the king thought to himself, “The road to Gandhamādana is extremely dangerous. Ordinary people cannot reach that place.
How will I be able to send an invitation for him to come here?” When the king was entertaining this thought, the holy man Asita learned of the king’s thoughts from a distance and came flying to read the Prince’s marks for the king.
When the king saw that the holy man had arrived, he was inexpressibly happy and relieved.
The king and queen brought the Prince out and wanted to make him pay respect to the holy man, but the holy man stopped the king, saying, “This child is the Most Honored One in the three realms of gods and humans.
